We shall not explain this in detail. 
it will consist of, we would say, not only of the rūpa of color but also of the rpa of figure , since many atoms are agglomerated in these. 
it will be, we should say, heavy or light, hard or soft; it could be cold or hunger, or thirst; it then consists of the dravyas that are either heaviness or lightness, softness or hardness, cold, hunger and thirst. 
four substances properly socalled, the four primary elements, the supports and sources of derived matter; and 2. 
This answer is not good, for each of these four derived elements is supported by all four of the primary elements. 
Words are subject to caprice, but one must examine their meaning. 
The mind and its mental states are necessarily generated together. 
The mind and its mental states cannot be independently generated. 
All things are necessarily generated with their characteristics. 
All conditioned dharmas, physical matter, the mind , its mental states, and the susāras disassociated from the mind , are necessarily generated with their sarūskrtalakṣaṇasarising, dura tion, old age, and impermanence. 
Among the conditioned dharmas, those that are integral to living beings aṟre necessarily geṉnerated with the prāpti relative to each one of them. 
The mental states are of five types, mahābhūmikas, etc. 
Bhūmi or sphere signifies place of origin. 
The place of origin of a dharma is the bhūmi of this dharma. 
The dharmas that are inherent in the mahābhmi are called mahābhūmika, that is, the dharmas that are always found in all minds. 
4kḥ What are the mahābhūmikas, the mental states found in all minds? 
24, Sensation, volition, motion, desire for action, contact, discernment, memory, the act of attention, approval, and absorption or concentration coexist in every mind. 
According to the Schoo1, all the ten dharmas exist in every moment of the mind. 
Vedanā is the threefold sensation, pleasant, painful, and neither painfulnorpleasant. 
Cetanā is that which conditions, informs, and shapes the mind. 
Chanda is the desire for action. 
parśa is the state of contact arisen out of the encounter of the o:gan, the object and the consciousness; in other words, the harṇa by virtue of which the organ, the object, and the consciousness are as if they were touching one another. 
Prajñā, which the Kārikā designates under the name of 7muari, is discernment of the dharmas 7. 
Smrṭi is nonfailing with regard to the object; a dharma by virtue of which the mind does not forget the object, by virtue of which it cherishes it in order to so express it. 
Manaskāra īs the modification of the mind; in other words, to bend or to apply the mind towards an object. 
Subtle, unquestionably, are the specific characteristics of the mind and its mental states. One discerns them,. only with difficulty even when one is content to consider each of the mental states as developing in a homogeneous series; how much more so when one envisions them in the moment in which they all exist. 
If the differences of the taste of vegetables, tastes that we know through a material organ, are difficult to distinguish, how much more so is this true with nonmaterial dbarmas that are perceived through the mental consciousness. 
ḵṣkṣk The sphere of the good dharmas of great extension is termed kuśalamāhabhūmi. The mental states that arise from this sphere are termed kuśalamabhābhūmśkas: the dharmas that are found in all good minds. 
Faith, diligence, aptitude, indifference, respect, fear, two roots, nonviolence, and energy are found only in a good mind, and are found in all good minds, These ten dharmas are always found in all good minds. 
Śraddha or faith is clarification of the mind.P According to aṉother opinion, it is adherence to the doctrine of the results of actions , to the Three Precious Ones , and to the Truths. 
The taking possession of and the cultivation of good dharmas is none other than the good dharmas being grasped and cultivated. 
Diligence is application to good dharmas. 
According to another schoo1, diligence is the guarding of the rmind. 
Prasrabdhi is the dharma through which the mind is clever, light, and apt. 
The Sūtra speaks of the prasrabdhi of the body as it speaks of bodily sensation. 
Thus, in our opinioṉ, in the Sūtra alluded to, prasrabdhi of the body is aptitude of the body. 
But it is propitious to prafrabdhi of the mind, which is a part of Bodhi; for this reason it receives the name part of Bodhi. 
The Sūtra often expresses itself in this manner. For example, it teaches that joy constitutes the part of Bodhi called joy. 
t teaches that hostility and the causes of hostility constitute the obstacle of wickedness. 
Upekṣā or equanimity, is mental indifference, the dharma by which the mind remains equal, even, free from modification. 
the specific characteristics of the mind and its mental states are very difficalt to know and determine. 
If this is so, then associated mental states canṉot be on the same object, which is contradictory to your definition of associated dharmas. 
We shall explain respect and fear later. 
The two roots of good are absenceofdesire and absenceof hatred. Absenceofeṟror, the third root of good, is discernment, prarña, by nature: hence it is already named among the mahābhūmikas. 
kesṭ The sphere of the mahākleśadharmas īs termed mabḥākleśabhñmi. 
Error, nondiligence, idleness, disbelief, torpor, and dissipation are always and exclusively in soiled minds. 
Etror, moha is ignorance , nonknowledge, nonclarity. 
Nondiligence, pramāda, the opposite of diligence, is the noṉ taking possession of and the noṉcultivation of good dharmas. 
Idleness, kausīdya, is the opposite of energy. 
Disbelief, āśraddhya, is the opposite of faith. Torpor, ṣyāna, is the opposite of aptitude. 
The weight of the body, the weight of the mind, inaptitude of the body, inaptitude of the mind. 
Torpor of the body and torpor of the mind are termed toṟpor. 
In the same way that there is bodily sensation. 
Dissipation, axddhatya, is noncalmness of the mind Only these six dharmas are kleśamahābhūmikas. 
But the Mūla Abhidharma says, on the one hand that there are ten klefamaḥābhūmikas, but on the other hand, it omits torpor from its enumeration. 
What are these ten? 
They are disbelief , idleness , default of memory , distraction , ignorance , nonobservation , wrong judgment , wrong resolution , dissipation , and diligence. 
What is its intention? 
Nonobservation is defiled prajña. 
Wrong judgment is defiled judgment. 
There are four alternatives: 
the Mūla Abhidharma omits toṟpor frorn its enumeration of the kleśamaḥābhñūmika, it is admitted that torpor is associated with all defiled dharrnas. 
In fact, they claim, persons with a torpid disposition , or dull persons, realize meditation sooṉer than do dissipated persons. 
But who is dull without being dissipated? 
kskḥ Disrespect and the absence of fear are always and exclusively found in bad minds. 
These two dharmas, which will be defined below are always found in bad minds. 
Anger, enmity, dissimilation, jeaḻousy, stubbornness, hypo crisy, greed, the spirit of deception, prideintoxication, the spirit of violence, etc., are the parītakleśabhūmikas. 
They are called this because they have parūtakleśas for their spheres. 
They are only associated with ignorance, with the ignorance that is cast off through the Path of Meditation, ignorance of the sphere of mental consciousness. 
We have studied five categories of mental states. 
There are five classes of minds in Kāmadhātu: 
1 the good mind constitutes one class; 23 the bad mind constitutes two classes, accordingly as it is independent, that is, associated only with ignorance, or associated with the other defiiements, lust, etc.; and 45 the neutral mind that is free of retribution constitutes two clfasses according as it is soiled, that is, associated with satkāyadrṣṭi or with antagrābadrṣṭi , or not defiled, that is, possessing retribution, etc. 
The mind in Kāmadhātu is always associated with vitarka and vicāra. 
ten mahābhūmikas, ten kuśalamahābhūmikas, plus two aniyatas, ṇamely vitarka and vicāra. 
Kaukrtya is, properly, the nature of that which is wrongly done, but here aukrṛtya means a mental state that has for its object kaukrṛtya in its literal sense, namely regret relative to an eṛror. 
In the same way, vmokṣaṃukha which has ūnyatā or absence of ātman for its object is termed fnyatā ; nondesire which has asubhā or the loathsome for its object is called 4swbhā. 
In the same way, in the world, one says that the village, the town, the country, are all brought together, designating thus the inhabitants by the name of the location. 
But how can one designate regret over errors, regret relative to an action not done, by the name of kaxukrṛtya? 
Because one says It is poorly done on my part not to have done this action, thus designating an omission as done or poorly done. 
It is bad when it is relative to a bad action omitted or to a good action accomplished. 
These two types of regret bear on the two categories of action. 
A bad mind consists of twenty mental states when it is independent of, or associated with views ; l. 
A bad mind associated with views is a mind associated with mithyādrṣṭi, with dṛṣṭiparāmarśa, or with śūavrataparāmarśa ; a mind associated with satkāyadrṭi and with antagrāhadrṣṭi is not bad, but defiledneutral. 
Twentyone, when it is associated with one of the four defilements, with anger, etc., with regret. 
Assocūated with lust, hostility, pride, or doubt , a bad mind consists of twentyone mental states, the same as above, plus lust or hostility, etc. Associated with anger, etc., that is, with one of the minor defilements enumerated above, ii.27. 
A neutral mind consists of eighteen mental states when it is defiled; In Kāmadhātu, a neutral mind, that is, a mind free of retribution, is defiled, that is covered by defilement when it is associated with satkāyadrṭi oṟ antagrāhadrṛṣṭi. 
This mind consists of ten wmeahā bhūmikas, sīx kleśamaḥhābhūmikas, plus vitarēa and vicāra. 
In the contraty case, twelve. 
An indefinitenondefiled mind associated with indefinite regret would consist of thirteen rnental states. 
The mind with which it is associated would then consist of twentythree mental states instead of twentytwo, twentyfour instead of twenty three, etc., accordingly as it is good and free from regret, or good and accompanied by regret, etc. 
The bad mental states, regret and apathy, aṟe absent from the First Dhyāṇna. 
Furthermore, vifarka is absent from the intermediate dhyāna. 
Further on, again, vicāra, etc. 
In the Second Dhyāna and above, up to and including Ārāpya dhātu, vcāra, hypocrisy, and deception are also absent. 
According to the Sūtra, hypocrisy and deception exist as far as the world of Brahmā, but not above the heavens where beings are in assembly. 
Mahābrahmā, sitting in his assembly, was questioned by the Bhikṣu Aśvajit: Where do the four primary elements completely disappear? 
I am Brahmā, great Brahmā, the Lord, the Creator, the Transformer, the Generator, the Nourisher, the Father of all Finally, when Aśvajit was leaving the assembly, Brahmā counselled him to return to the presence of the Master and ask hirn. 
We have to define the mental ṣṭates enumerated above. 
What is the difference between disrespect and absence of fear ? 
Disrespect is lack of veneṟation. 
Lack of respect, that is, the lack of veneration, the lack of fearful submission with regard to the qualities of oneself and others, and with regard to persons endowed with these qualities, is āhtīkya; ahrī is a mental dharma opposed to respect. 
Unpleasant consequences are called in the Kārikā bhaya or fear, because these unpleasant consequences engender fear. 
The expression abhayadarfitvam.signifies neither view , nor nonview. 
According to other Masters, āḥrkya is the absence of shame visavis oneself, in the commission of a transgression; anapatrāpya is the absence of shame visavis others.! But cannot one consider oneself and others at the same time? 
We do not say that the two forms of the absence of shame are simultaneous. 
There is āhrīkya, an outflowing of lust, when the person does not experience the shame of transgression when consideriṅg oneself; there īs anapatrāpya, an outflowing from mental confusion, when he does not experience the shame of transgression when.considering others. 
Their definition, according to the first theory, is respect, veneration, fearful submission, or fear of the consequence of transgression; according to the second theory, modesty, respect for humans. 
Affection is faith. 
Affection is of two types, defiled and nondefiled. 
The first is attachment; for example, affection for wife and sons. 
All faith is not affection, namely faith with regard to the Truths of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering. 
All affection is not faith, namely defiled affection. 
Faith can be affection, nemely faith with regard to the Truths of the Extinction of Suffering and the Path. 
According to another opinion,.outs,.faith is a belief in qualities: affection is produced from this belief. Affection is then not faith, but the result of faith. 
Respect is hrī.1 As we have explained above , respect is veneration, etc. 
According to another opinion, respect is veneration; shame is born from respect and this shame is called 5. Hence respect, the cause of hrī, is not hrī. 
Both exist in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
Affection and respect do not exist in Ārūpyadhātu. 
But you have said that affection is faith, and that respect is brī: 
Viṭarka and vicra aṟe grossness and subtlety of the miṇd. 
The grossness, that is, the gross state of the mind is termed vitarka; the subtlety, that is, the subtle state of the mind is termed vicra. 
Can the mind, at one and the same time, be both gross and subtle? 
By reason of the water and sun, the cheese is not too runny nor too hard. 
Now they cease at the Second Dhyāna, and adding to this the fact that no specific or generic differences can be established between grossness and subtlety, one then cannot differentiate viśara and vicāra. 
According to another opinion, vitarka and wvicāra are the factors of voice. 
l The Sūtra says in fact, It is after having examined, after having judged that one speaks, not without having examined, not without having judged. 
The factors of voice that are called gross are called vtarkas; those that are subtle are called vicāras. 
What contradiction is there in two dharmas, the first gross, and the second subtle, being associated with the same mind? 
This difference is inexpressible; but it is manifested through the force or the weakness of the mind. 
According to another opinion,;ours,varka and vicāra are not associated with one and the same mind. 
We would answer that the First Dhyana has five parts in the sense that five parts are possible in the First Dhyāna: 
But mada, pride intoxication, is the abolition of the mind of one who is enamoured with his own qualities. 
It is arrogance of mind with respect to others. Measuring the superiority of qualities that one has, or that one believes to have over others, one becomes bhaughty and depreciates others. 
The mind and its mental states receive, in the Scriptures, different names. 
The mind is termed cia because it accumulates ; it is termed manas because it knows and it is termmed vjñāna because it distinguishes its object. 
Heṇce these three names express different meanings, but they designate the same object; in this same way . 
tt The mind and its mental states have a support, have an object, have an aspect, and are associated. 
These four different names, have a support, etc., designate the same object. 
The mind and its mental states have a support because they rely on the organs ; have an object or a subject of coṉsciousness, because they grasp their sphere; have an aspect, because they take form according to their object; and are associated, that is, similar and united, because they are similar to one another and are not separated from each other. 
How are they saprayukta or associated, that is, similar and united? 
In five ways. 
The mind and its mental states are associated by reason of five equalities or identities, identity of support , of object , of aspect , of time , and equality in the number of dravyas. 
in any given moment there can be only one mind produced; to this one, unique mind there is found associated one sensation, one idea, or one mental state of each type. 
We have explained the mind and its mental states, in full, with their characteristics. 
35 The dharmas not associated. with the rnind are prāpti, aprāpti, sabhāgāta, āsanjñika, and two absorptions, life, characteristics, ṇāmakāya, etc., aṇḍ that which is of this type.ē These dharmas are not associated with the mind; they are not of the nature of rpa or physical matter; they are included within the saskātraskandha : they are called the ciīttaviptayukta saskāras, because they are disjoined from the mind, and because, being noṇmaterial, they resemble the mind. 
Prāpti is of two types: acquisition of that which has not been obtained or of that which had been lost; and possession of that which, having been obtained, has not been lost. 
When a conditioned dharma falls into the personal series, there is prāprś 
ot aprāpti; of this dharma, but not if it falls into the series of another person, for no one possesses the dharmas of another; ṉor if it does not fall into any series, for no one posseses the dharmas which are not of a living being. 
As for unconditioned dharmas, there is prāpti of pratisakhyiā nirodha and apratisakhyānirodha. 
And of the two extinctions. 
All beings possess pratisakhyānirodha with the exception of the sakalabandhana ūdigaṇasthas, that is, with the exception of the Āryans bound with all the bonds and who are found in the first moment of the Path, and with the exception of the Prthagjanas bound by all the bonds. 
No one possesses space. 
deny the existence of a dharma calied prāpti or possession. 
A Sūtra says, Through the production, the acquisition, and the possession of ten dharmas belonging to an Arhat, the Saint becomes a person having abandoned five things. 
1 If you conclude from this text that prāpti exists, we would remark that one possesses dharmas that do not belong to living beings, and also dharmas that do belong to another. 
In fact, a Sūtra says, Know, Oh Bhikṣus, that the Cakravartin King possesses seven jewels. 
In this text, the expression to possess signifies master of. 
One says that the Cakravartin King enjoys mastery over jewels, for they go as he wishes. 
But in the Sūtra on the Possession of the Ten Dharmas of an Arhat , the word possession designates a thing in and of itself. 
In fact 1. this prāpti is not directly perceived, as is the case for color, sound, etc., and as is the case for lust, anger, etc.; 2. 
one caṉnot conclude the existence of prāpri by reason of its effects, as is the case for the sense organs, the organ of sight, etc. 
If the dharmas arise by virtue of prāpti, 1. arising and the arisingofarising have no use; 2. the dharmas that do not belong to living beings do not arise; and 3. 
how does one explain the difference in the degree of defilement,weak, medium, and strong defilement,among persons who are bound to all bonds?: 
Would you say that this difference proceeds from causes distinct from prāps? 
Who maintains that prāpti is the cause of the arising of dharmas? 
Let us explain. 
what difference would there be between an Āryan at the moment in which he produces a mundane thought and a Pṛthagjana? 
For us, there is this difference that the first has abandoned certain defilements, while the second has not yet aban doned thern. 
The personality of the Āryan s modified, becoming different from what it was through the power of the Path. 
Like seed which is burned by fire and which becomes different from what it once was, and is no longer capable of germinating, we say that the Āryan has abandoned the defilement, because his person no longer maintains the seeds capable of producing a defilement. 
Contrarily one says that a person has not abandoned defilement when the seeds are neither burnt nor damaged. 
the seeds of defilement have not been damaged by means of the worldly path; 3. 
the seeds of innate good bave not been damaged through false views; and 4. 
the seeds of good obtained through effort are in good condition at the morment when one wants to produce this good, When the person is in such a condition, this is what we call possession of defilements, etc. 
But what should we understand by seeds ? 
By seeds we understand nāmarāpa , that is, the complex of the five skandhas, capable of generating a result, either immediately or mediately, by means of the parṇāmaviśeṣa of its series. 
In this text, we must understand by posses sion of greed the consenting to greed, or not rejecting greed. 
rsk The Vaibhāṣikas say that prāpr and aprāpti are things in and of themselves. 
Past dḍharmas can be the object of a threefold prāpti, past, present, and future. 
The same for present and future dharmas. 
There is good prāpti, etc., of good dharmas, etc. 
The prāpti of good, bad, or neutral dharmas is, respectively, good, bad, or neutral. 
The prāptis of the dharmas belonging to the spheres of existence are of their spheres. 
The prāpii of a dharma in Kāmadhātu is, itself, in Kāma dhātu; and thus following. 
There is fourfold prāpti of the āharmas that do not belong to the spheres of existence. 
In general, the prāpti of these dharmasthe pure dharmasis fourfold: it belongs to the three spheres, and it is pure. 
But there is Threefold prāpti of the dharmar which are neither Śaikṣa nor Aśaikṣa. 
These dharmasthe naivaśaikṣanāśaikṣas,vi.45bare the impure dharmas and the unconditioned dharmas; they are called this because they differ from the dharmas of the Śaikṣa and from the dharmas of the Aśaikṣa. In general, the prāpti of these dharmas is threefold. Their distinctions are: The prāpti of the impure dharmas is neitherśaikṣanor Aśaikṣa, 2. 
The prāpti of pratisakhyānirodha is Śaikṣa when this vrodha is obtained through the path of the Śaikṣas; it is Aśaikṣa when this nirodha is obtained through the path of the Aśaikṣas. 
The prāpti of the dharmas to be abandoned either through Seeing, or through Meditation, is destroyed, respectively, either through Seeing or through Meditation; it belongs then, from the point of view. 
There is twofold prāptś 
But the prāpti of pratisakhyānirodha obtained through the Path is pure and should not be abandoned. 
The same for the prāpt; of the Path.t We have established the general principal that the dharmas of the three periods are susceptible of a threefold prāpri. 
When it is past, the prāpti is past, and when it is future, the prāpti is futuṟe: 
The same for the prāpti of defiled rāpa. 
Is the tritemporal character of the prāpti of the good and the bad dharmas subject to any restriction, as is the case with the prāpt of the neutral dharmas? 
The prāpti of the rūpa of Kāmadhātu is not previous to this rpa. 
Aprāpti is undefiledneutral. 
Aprāpti of the dharmas of the past or the future is threefold. 
Aprāpti of past or future dharmas can be past, present, or future. 
Aprāpti of the dharmas forming part of the spheres of existence, and of the immaculate dharmas, is threefold Aprāpti of the dharmas of the sphere of Kamadhātu belong either to Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, or Ārūpyadhātu accordingly as the person endowed with this aprāpti belongs to such a sphere of existence. 
In fact, aprāpti is never pure. 
The nonpossession of the dharmas of the Āryans. 
When the Śāstra says that the state of Prthagjana is the nonpossession of the dharmas of the Āryans, which dharmas of the Āryans does it mean? 
To believe you, a person in possession of duḥkhe kṣāṅti would be a Prthagjana if he did not possess all of the other Āryan dharmas. 
the person of whom you speak, although not possessing the other dharmas of the Āryans, is not a Prthagjana because the nonpossession of these other dharrmas is accompanied by the possession of the kgāṇt;. 
This is quite evident, for, in the contrary interpretation, the Buddha the Blessed On, not possessing the dbarmas of the family of the Śrāvakas and Pratyeka buddhas , would be a Prthagjaṉa. 
But then the Śāstra would say The state of Prthagjana is the absolute nonpossession of the Āryaṉ dharmas and not . 
According to another opinion, the state of Prthagjana is the nonpossession of the first stage of the Path of Seeing, duḥkhe ḍharmajñānakṣēānti and its concomitant dharmas. 
Of which of these three types are you speaking in your definition of the state of Pṛthagjana? 
The best explana tion is that of the Sautrāntikas. 
To them, the state of Prthagjana is a series in which the dbarmas of the Āryans have not arisen. 
ktḥ How does nonpossession perish? 
It is abandoned through acquisition , and through passing to another stage. 
For example, the nonpossession of the Path, which constitutes the state of Prthagjana, is abandoned when one acquires the Path, and when one passes to another stage. 
The same holds for the nonpossession of the other dharmas. 
Nonpossession is abandoned when one produces the nonpossession of nonpossession, that is to say, when, changing ones stage of existence, one ceases to possess the state of Prṛthagjana; and when the possession of nonpossession is cut off, that is to say, when, acquiring the Path, one cuts off the state of Prthagjana. 
Does this mean that there is possession of possession and non possession, and that there is nonpossession of possession and non possession? 
Doesnt this doctrine leed to infinite progression? 
the mūladharma, its prāpti, and the prāpti of this prāp which is the prāpti of the prāptiprāpti of the first moment, plus three anuprāptis through the fact that one is in possession of the three aforementioned prāptis. 
In this third moment eighteen dharmas arise together, namely nine prāptis: the prāptis of the three dharmas produced in the first moment, prāptis of the sīx dharmas ptoduced in the second momenr, plus nine anaprāptis through the fact that one in in possession of the nine aforementioned 5rāptis. Thus the prāpts continue increasing in number from momment to moment. 
The prāpśy of present and future defilements , and of innate good dharmas with the dharmas that are associated and coexistent with them throughout beginningless and endless transmigration, aṟise, from moment to moment, in an infinite number. 
If one considers the series of one single being in the course of transmigration, those prāpts which arise at each moment are infinite in number. Considering all beings together, they are without measure, and without limit. Happily, they possess a great quality: 
What is genre or sameness of class designation? 
Sabhāgatā is that which causes resemblance between living beings. 
There exists an entity called sabhāgatā, a dharma by virtue of which living beings, as well as the dharmas that fall into the series of living beings , have resemblence between them. 
Living beings are differenciated according to their spheres of existence, the different stages of these spheres, their realm of rebirth , their wombs , their caste , their sex, the state of Upāsaka , Bhikṣu, Śaiksa, or Arhat, etc. 
There is, furthermore, sabhāgatā of dharmas that belong to living beings, dharmasabhāgatā, which in turn distinguishes the skandhas, the āyatanas and the dhātus: 
In the absence of a separate entity, namely sabhāgatā, how does one explain general ideas and expressions , sach as living beings, etc., applied to some beings that differ one from another? 
In this seame way, it is solely by reason of dharmasabhāgatā that the ideas and expressions, skundha, dhātus, etc., are justified.2 6. 
without there being transmigration, there is yet the abandoning of the sabhāgaiā of the Pṛthagjanas and the acqnisition of the sabhāgatā of the Saints; 3. 
If a certain entity called the genre of Prthagjana exists, for what purpose do we imagine the state of Pṛthagjana consisting of the nonṉpossession of the Āryadharmas ? 
although people do not know anything of sattuasabhāgatā they recognize the nondifference of the species of beings. 
Hence, what would be the use in supposing that a sabhāgatā exists? 
The Vaiśeṣikas admit a certain entity called sameness , by virtue of which there is produced, with regard to things, similar ideas and designations; they believe also in another entity, called difference , from whence proceeds specific ideas and designations with regard to different species. 
Ṭhe Vaibhāṣikas protest that their theory is not to be confused with that of the Vaiśeṣikas, who believe that genre or sameness a unique substance , exists in a multitude of individuals. 
By expressing itself in this way, the Sūtra does not teach the existence of a thing in and of itself called ṣabhgatā. 
What then does the Sūtra designate by the word sabhāgatā? 
By the expression sabhāgatā of humaṇns, etc., the Sūtra means a similarity in the manner of being; in the same way, sabhāgatā of rice, coṟn, beans, etc. 
This opinion is not admitted by the Vaibhāsikas. 
What is nonconsciousness ? 
Nonconsciousness is that which, among the Non conscious Ones, arrests the mind and its mental states. 
Among the beings who take birth among the NonConscious Ones, ie., the nonconscious gods, there is a dharma that arrests the mind and its mental states, and which is called nonconsciousness. 
By this harma, the mind and future dharmas are, for a certain time, hindered from being produced and do not have the power to arise. This āharma is similar to what arrests the water of a river, that is, to a dike. 
This dharma is exclusively Retribution. 
It is exclusively the retribution of nonconscious absoṟption. 
Where do these nonconscious gods reside? 
In the heaven of the Bṛhatphalas there is a raised place which is the dwelling of the NonConscious Ones, in the same way as the dhyānāntarikā, the dwelling of the Mahābrahmā gods, is raised within the heaven of the Brahmapurohitas. 
Are the NonConscious Ones called this because they are always nonṉconscious, or are they sometimes conscious? 
As it says in the Sūtra When they produce consciousness again, they die, like a person awakening after sleep. 
Dying in the nonconscious heaven, they are necessarily reborn in Kāmadhātu and nowhere else. 
In fact, the force of aśajñisamā patti , by which these beings are born among the Non Conscious Ones, is exhausted; they have not been in a positioṉ to practice asajñisamāparti: hence they die, as arrows fall to the ground when their impetus is spent. 
In this same way beings who are reborn in Uttarakuru necessarily possesses an action retributive in a heavenly realm of rebirth immediately after their existence in Uttarakuru. 
They are asarhjñisamāpatt, the nonconscious absorption, and nirodhasamāpaiti, the absorption of extinctioṉ. 
What is the nonconscious absorption? 
In the same way that āravṇjñika is a dharma that aṟrests the mind and its mental states, The same for the nonconscious absorption. 
The noncoṉscious absorption is an absoṟption in which the ascetic is nonconscious, or in an absoṟption free from consciousness. 
The word the same shows that this absorption, like āsajñika, arṟests the mind and its mental states. 
Through desire for deliverance. 
The ascetic falsely imagines that āsanhjñika, the nonconsciousness that constitutes the result of. 
As for the nonconscious absoṟption, it is Good. It produces as its retributive result the five sandhas of a non conscious god, who, as we know, is conscious at birth and at death. 
Without doubt, an ascetic can fall from this absorption after having produced it; but, he will produce it again and be reborn among the NonConscious Ones. 
Not by Āryans. 
The Āryans consider this absorption as a precipice, a calamity, and do not vaḻue entering it. 
On the contrary, Prṛthagjanas identify nonconsciousness with true deliverance; they have no idea of going out with respect to it; hence they cultivate the absoṟption that leads to it. 
When Āryans enter into the Fourth Dhyāna, do they obtain the prāpii of this past and future absoṟption, the same as oṉe obtains the prāpti of the Fourth Dhyāna of the past and the future as soon as oṅe enters into the Fourth Dhyāna? 
Having cultivated it many time previously, this absorption can only be realized through great effort; as it is not mind, It is obtained in one time period. 
One takes possession of this absorption, not in the past, not in the future, but in one time period, that is, in the present, as is also the case for the prātimokṣa discipline. 
On the other hand, since this absorption is not mind, it is impossible for one to acquire a future prāprś 
In the same way, the absoṟption that bears the name of mirodha or extinction. 
That is to say, the absorption of extinction is like āsaṅjñika, the nonconscious absorption: 
it is a harma that arrests the mind and its menta states. 
It is vlewed as tranquility; 1. 
Āṛyaṉs cultivate this absoṟption because they consider it as the absorption of tranquility. 
One cultivates the nonconscious absoxp tion because oṉe regards nonconsciousness as being deliverance. 
It belongs to the sphere of Bhavāgra, that is, one penetrates it upon leaving naivasajñānāsamjñāyatana absorption , whereas the nonconscious absorption belongs to the spbere of the Fourth Dhyāṇa. 
Good,; 3. 
It is good; it is not neutral ot defiled, for its oṟiginating cause is good. 
Of two retributions and neutral; 4. 
It admits of two types of retribution, being either retributive in the next existence, or retributive later. 
Its retribution is also unnecessary, for the ascetic who has practiced it can obtain Nirvāṇa in the present existence. 
Āryans 5. 
It is produced only by Āryans, not by Pṛthagjanas. 
These latter cannot produce it because they fear annihilation, and because this absorption can only be produced through the power of the Path: 
in fact, it is the ascetic who has seen Nirvāṇa who is determined to obtain it. It is obtained through effort. Although obtained by the Āryans, it is not obtained merely through the fact of detachment. 
It is only realized through effort. 
The Buddha obtains the absorption of extinction at the moment when he becomes a Buddha, that is, at the moment of kṣayajñāna. 
No quality of the Buddha is obtained through effort; all of his qualities are acquired through the simple fact of detachment: as soon as he desires it, the mass of qualities arise at will. 
How is it that the Blessed One, without having formerly produced this absorption , would become, at the moment of Bodhi , twofold delivered, that is, delivered from the obstacles of the defilements and delivered from the obstacles to absorption ? 
The Masters of the West maintain that the Bodhi sattva first produced this absorption in the state of Śaikṣa, and then obtained Bodhi. 
Why do we not adopt this opinion? 
But not previously. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr deny that the Bodhisattva produces the absorption of extinction before producing kṣayajñāna. 
For the Muṇi conquers Bodhi in thirtyfour moments. 
The School admits in fact that the Bodhisattva obtains Bodhi in thirtyfour moments, namely sixteen moments that constitute the comprehension of the Truths and eighteen morments that constitute the abandon ing of the defilements relative to Bhavāgra , ie., nine āṉantaryamārgas and nine vimuktimārgas. 
These thirtyfour moments suffice, for, before entering into the comprehension of the Truths, the Bodhisattva, still a Prṛthagjana , detaches himself through the worldly path from all spheres, with the exception of Bhavāgra. 
But these two absorptions take place in persons in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
From this text it results that the two absoṟptions are cultivated by beings of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
There is however this difference between the two absorptions: 
the first time, among humans. 
A person who has never produced the nonconscious absorption can produce this absorption either in Kāmadhātu or in Rūpadhātu; but it is necessary to be a human in order to produce the absoṟption of extinction for the first time. 
If, in this life, he does not attain āpñ2, nor attain it at the moment of his death; but after the destṛuction of his body, going beyond the gods of gross eating, he is reborn in a heavenly mental body; and thus reboṟn it is possible for him to then enter many times into the absoṟption of extinction and leave it. 
If a Bhikṣu who possesses it does not fall frorn it, and if he does not lose it, he wilf not be able to repeat his biṟrth in Rūpadhātu. 
According to another schoo1, the absorpton of extinction also belongs to the Fourth Dhyāna and is not subject to falling. 
This absorption does not belong to the Fourth Dhyāna, for the Sūtra teaches that one acquires nine absorp tions one after the other. 
the first proceeds from the idea of deliverance falsely identified with nonconsciousness; the second, from the idea of stillness; 3. 
The characteristic common to these two absoṟptions is the arṟesting of the mind and its mental states. Why is the first called absorption free from ideas and the second absorption of extinction of ideas and sensations ? 
In the same way paracitajñāna , knowledge of the mind of another, bears on the mental states of someone else: it receives this restṛictive name because its pteparation alludes only to the mind of another.? In the two absorptions, the mind is interrupted for a loṅg time. 
How, upon coming out of this absorption, can a new mind be born from a mind destroyed for a long time? 
The Vaibhāṣikas find no difficulty in this: 
When a person is born in Ārūpyadhātu, pe or matter is cut off for a long period of time : 
In the same way, the mind of leaving the absorption does not have for its cause the mind previous to the absorption: it is born from body possessing organs. 
these two dharmas are a mind and a body possessing organs. 
The Bhadanta Ghoṣaka regards this opinion as wrong. 
As the Blessed One teaches, By reason of the mental organ and the dharmas, mental consciousness arises; by the coming together of these three, there is contact, sensation, ideas, and volition arise at the same time. 
Hence, if one admits that the mind continues to exist in this absorption, sensation and ideas will not be arrested in it. 
The Sūtra says, By reason of sensation, there is thirst, and yet, although Arhats experience sensation, thirst does not arise in them. 
Hence, say the Vaibhāṣikas, the mind is interrupted in the absorption of extinction. 
this mind, being opposed to the arising of the mind, causes other minds to not arise for a certain time. 
This nonexistence of the mind was not realized before the mind of absorption; it ceases when the ascetic produces anew the mind. 
The same holds for nonconsciousness. 
Āsajñika is not a thing in and of itself that hinders the arising of the mind; but we designate by this term the state of nonconsciousness of the NonConscious gods, a state that results from a certain mind. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not agree with this opinion; they maintain that āsajñika and the two absorptions are things in and of themselves. 
What is the vital oṟgan? 
Jīvita is life. 
In fact, the Abhidharma says, What is the jṝvikendriya? 
The āyus of the three spheres of existence.. 
What sort of dharma is the āyus? 
The support of warmth and consciousness. 
If these three dharmas,life, warmth, and consciousness, mutually support one another and continue to exist by means of this mutual support, how do they come to an end? 
For if one of them does not perish first, then these three dharmas will be eternal and will not perish. 
The āyus is supported by means of actions; the āyus has been projected through actions and continues to exist as long as the projection of action allows it to do so. 
If this is so, why admit that warmth and coṉsciousness are supported by actions? 
If the consciousness were supported by action, all consciousness from the womb to death, would be retribution; and this is false. 
The āyus is necessary, for warmth is absent in Ārūpyadhātu. 
Sometimes you maintain that the consciousness is supported by warmth, and sometimes you rnaintain that it is supported by actions. 
But on the other hand, you have admitted that one should avoid the conclusion that all coṅsciousnesses, from the womb to death, are retṛibution. 
We do not deny the existence of the āyus. We only say that the yus is not a thing in and of itself. 
It is a certain power that the action of a previous existence places in a being at the moment of its conception, a power through which the sandhas renew themsleves for a deter mined length of time in this homogeneous series that constitutes an existence , in the same way a seed places a certain power in the sprout by which the plant develops to maturity. 
Would you say the the wind creates an obstacle to the saskāra? 
The wind which creates an obstacle is the same either far or near, and so the arrow would either fall at first, or it will never fall. 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that the āyas is a thing in and of itself. 
Does death take place solely through the exhaustion of life? 
The Prajñaptifāṣra sags, It happens that oṉe dies through the exhaustion of life without one dying through the exhaustion of merit. 
Four alternatives; 1. 
When life is exhausted, the exhaustion of actions that ripen in the objects of enjoyment has no efficacy for death; and vice versa. 
Consequently the third alternative should be understood as death because the two types of actions are exhausted.. 
The Jñānaprasthāana says, Should one say of the āyus that it is dependent on the series, or that it lasts once it has arisen? 
The āyus is of the first category for beings inKāmadhātu who are not in one of the two absorptions , but it is of the second category for beings in Kamadhātu who are in the two absorptions, and for beings in Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
What is the meaning of this passage? 
If the body cannot be damaged, then the āyur lasts all the time for which it has been produced, and one says that the āyas lasts once it has arisen. 
According to the Sūtra, there are four modes of existence: existence that can be destroyed by oneself and not by another, etc. 
Four alternatives: 
certain beings in Kāmadhātu, namely the Krīdāpradūṣika gods and the Manaḥpradūṣika gods destroy their own existence through their excess of joy or anger; we must also add the Buddhas who enter into Nirvāra; 2. 
existences destroyed by others: beings in the womb and in eggs; 3. 
existences that are neither destroyed by oneself nor by others: beings in the intermediate state, all beings in Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, and a part of the beings in Kāmadhātu: 
beings in hell , the inhabitants of Uttarakuru , petsons in the absorp tion of kindness , persons in the nonconscious absorption ; the Rājarṣi, that is, the Cakravarṛtin who has left the householderss life; a messenger of the Buddha; persons whom the Buddha prophesized would live a certain length of time: 
Dharmila, Uttara, Gaṅgila, the son of the merchant Yaśas, Kumāra, Jīvaka, etc.; the Bodhisattva in his last existence; the mother of the Bodhisattva pregnant with the Bodhisattva; the Cakravartin; the mother of the Cakravartin pregnant with the Cakravartin. 
Sāriputra, beings who are born in Naivasajñānāsajñāyatana. 
The School explains, Beings in Rūpadhātu and the first three stages of Ārūpyadhātu can destroy their existence by themselves, that is, by a course of action within their own realm, and by others, namely by a course of action belonging to the preliminary stages of a higher stage. 
Sometimes Scripture names the first term of a list the totality of which is alluded to, for example, The first sukhopapaiti , namely the Brahmakāyika gods. 
Sometimes Scripture names the last term, The second fukhopapatti, namely the Ābhāsvara gods. 
And we admit that, in the two above passages on the sukhopapattis, the Scripture designated all the terms of the list by naming only the first and the last. 
However the answer of the Blessed One to Sāriputra does not contain the word zadyathā. 
Their characteristics are arising, old age, duration, and impermaneṇce. 
These four dharmas, atising, old age, duration, and impermanance, are the chaṟacteristics of conditioned things. 
Does not the Sūtra teach the existence of some three conditioned characteristics of conditioned things? 
The Sūtra should enumerate four character istics. 
As the Sūtra says production in place of arising and disappeaṟance in place of imperma nence , in this same way it also says sthityanyathātva in place of old age. 
the power of its arising causes it to pass from the future into the present; old age and impermanence cause it to pass from the present into the past, and, after old age has weakened it, impermanence finishes it. 
Suppose there is a maṅṇ in a dark forest, and there are three enemies there who wish to kill him. The first causes this man to leave the forest; the second weakens him, and the third destroys his vital principle. 
Such is the role of the three characteristics with regard to conditioned things. Duration, on the contrary, sustains conditioned things and causes them to last; this is why the Sūtra does not count it among the character istics. 
Further, the unconditioned lasts eternally in its own nature: the characteristic of duration is not without resemblance to the persistence of the uncoṇditioned. 
in order to incite disgust with respect to duration, the Sūtra names it together with old age, like prosperity associated with black ears. 
Conclusion: there are four characteristics. 
They should also arise, last, grow old, and perish; they should then, in their turn, possess four characteristics: 
arisingofarising, etc., which will be the secondary characteristics of the dharma under consideration. 
These secondary characteristics, being condi tioned, have in their turn four characteristics, and so we have infinite progression. 
They have in their turn characteristics termed arisingof arising, duratioṉofduṟatioṉ, etc.; Four primary characteristics are as descṛibed above. 
The four secondary characteristics are arisingof arising, durationofduṟation, old ageofold age, and impermanence ofimpermaṅṇence. All conditioned things are conditioned by these primary charac teristics; these, in their turn, are conditioned by the four secondary characteristics. 
The primary characteristic refers to eight dharmas, the secondary characteristic to one dharma. 
in all eight dharmas. 
it arises through the secondary characteristic arisingof arising. 
In the same way a hen lays many eggs and each egg causes the birth of only one other chicken ; in the same way primary arising causes eight dharmas to arise, whereas arisingofarising causes only one dharma to arise, namely primary arising. 
Arising, duration, etc., are not entities, separate things in and of themselves. 
But, the Sūtra says The production of coṇditioned things is an object of consciousness. 
The Blessed One however said that it is the meaning, and not the letter, that is the recourse. 
Blinded by ignorance, foolish persons imagine that the series of conditioned phenomena is a self or belongs to a self, and, as a consequence, they are attached to this series. 
The Blessed One wanted to put an end to this erroneous imagination and to the attachment which results from it: 
he wanted to show that the series is conditioned, that is to say, produced through sucessive causes ; and he taught the three marks of that which is produced through successive causes, saying that Three savskṛalak saṉas of the saskṛta are the object of consciousness. 
If the Sūtra uses the word saskṛta twice, There are three saskrtalakṣaṇas of the sasṣkrta, this is in order that one should know that these three marks are not marks showing the presence of the saskrṛtas, as herons indicate the nearness of water; nor are they qualitative signs of the sarṅsṛta, as the marks of a young gitrl permit one to say that she is good or bad; no, when these marks are found on a thing, they show that this thing is a reskṛta. 
According to us, what one should understand by production or arising is the fact that the series begins; disappearance or imperma nence is the end or cessation of the series; duration is the series continuing from its beginning until its end; evolution or old age is the modification of the continuous series, the difference between its successive states. 
It is from this point of viewthat is, by considering arising, enduring, prolonging itself, and modifying itselfthat the Blessed One says to Sundarananda, who is perpetually attentive to his states of mind, Fine, my man! 
You know that your sensations arise, last, end, and disappear. 
We would then say, Arising is the beginning of the series, disappearance is its rapture; duration is the ṣeries itself; evoḻution is the difference between its successive states, And again, Arising is existence following upon nonexistence; duration is the series; impermanence is the rupture of the series; and evolution is supposed to be the difference between the successive states of the series. 
Since the dharmas are momentary, would you say that the dharmas will perish if duration is lacking? 
Consequently it is the series that the Sūtra refers to when it speaks of duration, and the definition of the Abhidharma is justified, What is duration? 
The saīskāraṣ arisen and not destroyed. 
The nature of the moment cannot be arisen and not be destroyed. Yet the Jñānaprasthāna says, Relative to one mind, what is production? 
It is arising. 
What is disappearance? 
It is death. 
What is evolution? 
It is old age. 
There is dissimilitude, as this results from the differnce in time of the slower or faster falling of a vajra that is or is not projected, and which is projected with or without force: 
When the dharmas succeed themselves in a homogeneous series, the difference is small; that is why, although they differ, they are considered as similar. 
Hence the last moment of a sound, a flame, or an Arhat, has neither duration nor transformation. 
In short, conditioned dharmas exist after having existed; after having existed, they no longer exist; the series of dharmas is their duration; dissimilarity of the series is their transformation. 
The dharma which is the thing characterized , would then be the characteristic also. What is wrong with that? 
The marks of a Mahāpuruṣa are not different or distinct from the Mahāpuruṣa himself. 
The horns, the hump, the fetlock, the hoof, and the tail of a cow, which are its marks, are not different from the cow. The primary elements do not exist apart from their individual characteristics, solidity, etc. 
In this same way, for the Vaibhāṣikas who affirm the momentariness of the dharmas, the rising of smoke is none other than the smoke itself Let us look at this a bit closer. 
Although I grasp the individual nature of visible things, etc., which are conditioned, yet as long as I do not know the fact that they did not exist previously, that they will not exist later, and that their series transforms itself, then I shall not know their quality of being conditioned. 
If we admit the reality of characteristics, then since they are giīven as simultaneous, we would have to admit that obe harma arises, lasts, grows old and perishes at one and the seme time. It is in vain that the Sarvāstivādins pretend that the characteristics do not exercise their activity at one and the same time; that arising engenders before being born itself, being still in a future state, and that once it is born it does not engender any longer; that duration, old age, and impermanence exercise their activity when they are present and not in a future state; and that, consequently, the last three character istics are active in a moment when the fitst is no longer active, so the four characteristics can be simultaneous without contradiction. 
One must examine whether a future dharma, supposing that it does exist, can be active. 
If future arising produces the operation of engendering, how can one say that it is future? 
In fact, accoṟding to the Vaibhāṣikas, a future ḍharma is one that does not exercise its activity. 
You would have to define present. 
For us, the kṣaṇa or moment is the time during which the characteristics have achieved their operation, Then explain why, in this hypothesis, duration, aṟising at the same time as old age and impermanence, accomplishes its operation of makiṇg last that which should last before old age and impermanence accomplish theit operation of making things age and destroying them. 
If you answer that duration, being stronger, accomplishes its operation first, then we would ask how duration is weakened later in such a manner that, encountering old age and impermanence, it ages and perishes, not alone, but with the dharma that it should have made last. 
You say perhaps that duration, having achieved its task, cannot perform it again, in the same way that arising, having engendered something, engenders no more. 
The comparison is not legitimate. 
The operation of arising consists of attracting the dharma that it should engender from the future and causing it to enter into the present; once the dharma has entered into the present, arising is incapable of making it enter therein again. 
Duration is capable of making that which lasts last indefinitely. 
We do not see what it is that old age and impermanence have to do. 
It is through duration that one dharma, once it arises, does not perish for a certain time, does not perish as soon as it arises. If duration, its task completed, neglects the dbarrma, it will quite certainly not last any longer; that is to say, it perishes in and of itself. 
We well understand the duration and impermanence of the dharma,A dharma, after having arisen, does not perish, A dharma, after having lasted, perishes. 
Old age is a transformation, a dissimilarity between two states. 
According to another Schoo1, it is with the cooperation of external causes of destruction, fire or a hammer, etc., that the characteristics of impermanence causes certain dharmas to perish, as wood or a pot. 
The same School admits that the mind and its mental states, like sound or a flame, perish immediately, without any foreign causes intervening, through the chacteristic of impermanence. 
Impermanence and duration accomplish their operation at one and the same time: a dharma lasts and perishes at the same tirme. This is inadmissable. We conclude that it is with regard to the series that the Blessed One teaches the characteristics of conditioned things. 
If arising engenders, in a future state, the dharma that it should engender, why do not all future dharmas arise at one and the same time? 
Arising engenders the dharma that it should engender, but not without the cooperation of causes and conditions. 
Isolated arising does not have the force of engendering the dharma that it should engender independent of the cooperation of causes and conditions. 
Do you pretend to know all the dharmas that exist? 
Aṇḍ if arising is nothing other than the dharma itself exisitng after having been non existent, the genitive the arising of warmth or the arising of sensation would not be justified; for this amounts to saying the warmth of warmth or the sensation of sensation. 
This is the same for duṟation, old age, and extinction. 
And again, in oṟder to justify the ideas of one and two, large and small, separate, associated and disassociated, this and that, existant, etc., you would admit, in agreement with the Vaiśeṣikas, a long series of entities: 
Hence you have not proven that arising is a thing in and of itself; you have not proven that this is not merely a designation of a dharma in so far as it exists after having been nonexistent. 
Many dharmaswarmth, sensation, etc.,.arise, that is to say, exist after having been non existent. 
We hold to the existence of the characteristic arising, which belongs to conditioned things and does not belong to unconditioned things, and we can easily explain this by virtue of the fact that unconditioned things do not arise, But if conditioned things arise withont arising, why do unconditioned things, space, etc., not arise? 
But how can unconditioned things arise, since they are eternal? 
we say, rather, that by virtue of the nature of things, none of the dharmas are susceptible of arising. 
Moreovet, according to you, all conditioned things equally possess the characteristic ariṣing that you refuse to unconditioned things: yet you admit that certain causes are capable of producing warmth but incapable of producing sensation. 
ō Should we abandon the Āgamas for the sole reason that there are persons who object to them? One does not renounce sowing for fear of deer, and one does not renounce eating dainties because of flies. 
Nāmam, name or word is understood as that which causes ideas to arise, for example the woṟds warmth, souṇd, odor, etc. 
Pada or phrase is understood as vākya, a discourse, a phrase allowing the development necessary for a complete sentence, for example the stanza, Impermanent are the sarsāras. 
Oṟ rather, one should understand pada as that which causes one to comprehend the different modalities of activity, quality, and time which concern a certain person: 
One does not make or one does not pronounce phonemes with a view to designating, or of giving an idea of the letters; but one makes or one writes the letters with a view to giving an idea of the phonemes, so that, when one does not understand them, one still has an idea of them through writing. 
nāmakāya color, sound, odor, etc.; padakāya The saskārar aṭe impeṟmanent, the dharmas are impersonal, Nirvana is tranquil. 
etc; and vyañanakāya ka, kha, ga, gha. 
krk Are not words, phrases, and phonemes voice by nature, and consequently sound ? Hence they form part of the rūpaskandha; they are not sanskāras disassociated from the mind as the Sarvāstivādins believe. 
Voice is vocal sound, and a vocal sound only; for example, a cṛy does not cause one to attain to or comprehend an object. 
But a word which moreover is a function of vocal sound, illumines, causes one to attain to, or signifies the object.ē What I call voice is not merely vocal sound, but a vocal sound that causes one to attain to an object, that is, a vocal sound with regard to which persons who are speaking are in agreement as to what a certain thing signifies. 
The sages have established the sound go in nine things, that is, caṟrdinal region, cattle, land, a beam of light, a word, a diamond, an eye, a haven, and water. 
The philosopher for whom it is the word which illumines the object should admit that the sound go has been endowed by convention with these different meanings. 
Then if a given object is signified to the hearer by a certain word, it is indeed vocal sound and nothing eise, that signifies it. What advantage is there in supposing the existence of an entity you call word? 
A word is either produced by the voice oṟ revealed by the voice. 
In the first hypothesis, since voice is vocal sound by nature, any vocal sound whatsoever, even the cry of an animal, would produce a word. 
If you answer that a word is produced solely through a vocal sound of a certain natuarethe articulation of sound, varṇātmakawe would say that this sort of vocal sound which is capable of producing a word would be quite capable of designating an object also. 
In fact, sounds do not exist at the same timeone has, for example, ripawhereas the word, which you define as a dharmna, an entity, cannot arise in parts. 
Then how can the voice, when it produces a word, produce it? 
the last moment of the vsjñapti, a coṟpoṟeal oṟ vocal act, creates avijñapti by reason of its previous moments. 
But, we would say, if the last moment of the sound of the voice creates the word, it would suffice to understand the last sound in order to attain or comprehend the object. 
It is not an evasion to suppose that voice engenders the phoneme , that a phoneme engenders a word, and that a word causes comprehension of objects. 
Moreover, the voice neither en genders nor manifests the phoneme, for the same reasons that allow that the voice neither engendets nor manifests a word. 
a word arises with its object, like the characteristic arising. 
In this hypothesis, no present word would designate a past or future thing. 
Moreover, a father, a mother, or other persons arbitrarily fix the word that is the proper name of a son, etc.: 
The Blessed One said, A stanza depends on words, and a poem depends on staḥzas. 
The Vaibhāṣikas admit āmakāya, padakāya, and vyañjanakāya, as saskāras disassociated from the mind, for, they say, none of these dharmas serve as a gate of understanding. 
Are they of retribution, of accummulation or of outflowing ? 
and Are they good, bad, or neutral? 
They exist in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu; they belong to living beings; they are outflowing; and they are neutral. 
They belong to living beings, being produced through the efforts of living beings and consisting of articulated sounds , etc. In fact, they belong to the person who speaks, not to the things that they designate. 
474 The same for genre, which is also from retribution, and which belongs to the three spheres of existence. 
Possession is of two types. It is of outflowing and of retribution. 
Its characteristics also. 
Its characteristics, arising, etc., are of two types, like possession. 
The two absorptions and nonpossession are only outflowings. 
The characteristics belong to all conditioned things, hence they belong to living beings and to nonliving beings. 
For the āsanjñika and the āyus, see i4ld and ttfsṭt We have seen that arising, in order to engender the dharma that it should engender, needs the cooperation of hetas or causes, and prayayas oṛ 
Kāraṇabetu is teason for existence; sahabhūhetu is coexistent cause; sabhāgahetu is parallel cause; sarprayuktakahetu is associated cause; sarvatragahetu is universal cause, and vipākahetu is retributive cause; such are the six types of causes that the Ābhidhārmikas recognize. 
With this exceptioṇ, that all of the dharmas are kāraṇahetu with regard to all other conditioned dharnas, because no dharma constitutes an obstacle to the arising of the dharmas susceptible of arising. 
Vices are produced among the ignorant; once the Truths are known, they are not produced, as the stars are not visible when the sun shines. 
Then it is false to say that all conditioned dharmas are kāraṇahetu because they create no obstacle to aṟiṣing. 
i We understand that the consciousness of the Ttuths and the clarity of the sun create no obstacle to the arising of the dharma which is arising , that is to say of the dharma, which, its causes being completed, continues to exist. 
In fact, when their lord does not oppress them, villagers say, We are fortunate through the actions of our master. 
Nirvāṇa, future dharmas, ot cteatures in hell ae as if they did not exist with regard to their being an obstacle to the arising of the conditioned things in question. 
Can one consider them as causes? 
They are causes; for, eren when the lord is incapable of harming them, the villigers express themselves as we have said; bat not about a nonexistent lord. 
in this sense, eye and color are the kāranahetu of the consciousaess of signt; as food is with regard to the body, the seeds, etc., with regard to the sprout, etc. 
If all the dharmas are the causes of other dharmas because they do not cause any obstacle, why do not all the dharmas arise together? Why, when one murder is committed, are not all creatures, like the murderer himself, guilty of the crime of murder? 
This objection is useless. 
In fact, all the dharmas ṛeceive the name of hāraṇahetu because they do not create any obstacle; it is not that they are all agents. 
According to other masters, all kāraṇahetus possess a real efficacy with regard to all dharmas. 
Fot example Nirvāṇa and the consciousness of sight: 
a mental consciousness, good or bad, arises having Nirvāṇa as its object ; from this mental consciousness there later arises a consciousness of sight; then Nirvāṇa has efficacy, albeit mediately, with regard to the consciousness of sight. 
tks 5Ocd. 
The dharmas that are causes one of the other, are called sahabhābetu. 
The same for the mind and its companions ; the same for the charṟacteristics, atising, etc. 
In the category of sahabhūhetu are then included all conditioned dharmas which are in a mutual relationship of causality. 
A dharma īs a fahabhūhetu of its secondary characteristics without being in a mutual relationship of causality with them: for the secondary characteristics are not the sahabhūhetu of their dharma. This is a case to be added to the definition. 
kiḥ What dharmas are called the companions of the mind? 
The companions of the mind are: the mental states; the two disciplines ; and the characteristics of the mental states, the two disciplines and the mind. 
These are all the dharmas associated with the mind , the discipline of absorption and pure discipline , and the characteristics, arising, etc. of all these, and also of the mind. 
From the point of view of time, of result, etc., and of goodness, etc. 
Result means pṇruṣakāraphāla and visayogaphala ; and et cetera refers to vipākaphala and niṣyandaphala. The companions have the same result, the same vipāka, and the same niṣyanda as the mind: 
The companions are good, bad, or neutral, like the mind which they accompany. 
There are then ten reasons why the companions are termed companions. 
The mind having the least nurmber of companions is a sahabhūhetu of fiftyeight dharmas: 
namely 1 the ten mahābhmikas with the four characteristics of each of them; and 2 the four characteristis and the four secondary characteristics. 
If, from these fiftyeight dharmas, the four secondary character istics of the mindwhich have no effect upon itare set aside, then we have fiftyfour dbarmas that are sahabhūhetu of the same mind. 
According to another opinion, only fourteen dharmas are sahabhñāhetu of this mind, namely its four characteristics and the ten mahābhūmikas. 
Certain Masters, in their reading of the Prakaraṇagrantha, omit the words, and of the dharmas associated with this belief. 
Accoṟding to the Vaibhāṣikas of Ksmiīr, these words figure in the text; or, if they aṟe rnissing, the context indicates that one should supply them and that the passage as it stands is incomplete. 
Aṇy dharma that is a sahabhūhetu cause is a sahabhū or a coexistant item. 
the secondary characteristics of the principal dharma are not a sababhūbetu regarding this dharma ; 2. 
the secondary characteristics of the companions of the mind are not a sahabhūhetu regarding the mind; 4. 
derived matter, blue, etc., susceptible of resistance and which has also arisen together, are not a sahabhūhetu amoṇg themselves; 6. 
no derived matter, even though arisen with the elements, is a sahabhūhetu with the elements; 8. 
possession , but are not sahabhūheku, because their results, vpāka or niṣyanda, are not identical. 
it arises either before the dhara, or after it, or at the same time as it. rek All this may be right, that is, what is a sahabhūhetu cause, a mutually coexistant cause, is a coexistant item, and the rest. Never theless, in the world, the relationship of cause to effect is well proven in certain cases: 
You should then demonstrate that dharmas arisen together can be ina cause and effect relationship. 
Now a lamp is the cause of its light and a sprout is the cause of its shadow. 
These examples are not proven. 
The relationship of cause and effect is proven by the existence and the nonexistence of what is called effect, similar to the existence and the nonexistence of what is called cause. 
When A is or is not, and when B is or is not, then A is considered as cause, and B is considered as effect. 
Granted this, if we examine the dharmas that we have defined as mutually coexistent and sahabhhetu, we see that they all exist when oṉe of them exists, and that none exist when one of them is absent. 
But how many simultaneous dharmas are the cause and effect of one another? 
We ask whether the three staffs stand up together through the force that the three staffs possess through arising together, or rather, if the force of the complex of previous causes which caused them to arise together does not now also cause them to arise supported one on the other. 
Further, there are things here other than the mutual force of support: there is a rope and a hook, and there is the ground. 
Śimilar dharmas are sabhāgahetu or similar causes. 
Similars are sabhāgahetu of similars. 
Nevertheless, different masters are not in agreement on this last point. According to some, neutral rpa is sabhāgahetu of the five neutral ṣbandhas, but the four sbkandhas,:sensation, etcare not sabhāgahetu of tūpa. According to others, four skandhas are sabhāghetu of the five; but rūpa is not sabhāgahetu of the four. 
From the point of view of the states of existence followed by the same species, each of the states of the previous existence is the similar cause of the ten states. 
corn is a similar cause of corn, not of rice. 
Are all similar dbharmas similar causes of similar dharmar? 
they are either in Kāmadhātu, or in one of the Four Dhyānas, or in one of the Four Ārūpyas. 
A dharma susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truth of Suffering is a sirmilar cause of another dharma susceptible of being abandoṇed through Seeing the Truth of Suffering, and not of the dharmas belonging to the other four categories; and thus following. 
In fact, only those dharmas are similar causes which have Arisen previously. 
An arisen dharma, that is to say, any previously past or present dharma is a similar cause of a later similar dharma, arisen or not arisen. 
A future ḍharma cannot be a similar cause. 
It rests on the Mūlasāstra, for the Jñānaprasthāna says, What is similar cause ? 
The root of good, arisen and previous, is a cause in the quality of a similar cause with regard to the later root of good and of the dbarmas associated with it, of the same category and stage. 
In that way, the roots of good of the past are a similar cause with regard to past and present roots of good,; past and present roots of good are similar causes with regard to future roots of good. 
This text does not contradict the first; for the Jñānaprasthāna does not refer to that which is a cause in the quality of a similar cause , but rather that which is a cause in the qualities of sahabhūhetu, sanñprayuktakahetu, oṛ 
vipākahetu. According to another opinion, that of the followers of the last place , the answer of the Jñānaprasthāṉa,There is never a time when this ḍhara is not a cause refers to sabhāgahetu, and they justify themselves as follows: A future dharma, in an arising state, is certainly sabhāgabhetu. Hence, taking into account a future dharmaiin its last place, the Jīñānaprasthāna can say that there is never a time when the dharma is not a cause, that it is always a cause, since, at a certain moment in the future, it is a cause. 
Furthermore, this explanation cannot be reconciled with the answer that the Jñānaprasthāna gives to another question, Is there a period in which the dharma that is an immediately antecedent condition of a certain ḍharma is not samanantara? 
If a future dbarma is not a similar cause , why does the Prakaraṇapāda teach that future satkāyadrṣti has satkāyadrṭi as its cause, and is in turn the cause of satkāyadrṣṭi? 
We read, in fact , with the exception of future satkāyadrṣti and the Truth of Suffering which is associated with it This reading, is coṛṟrupted. 
This Treatise says in fact, All the dharmas are determined from a fourfold point of view: cause, result, support , and object. 
If a future dharma is not sabhāgahetu, then sabhāgahetu did not exist at first, but then does exist. 
The condition of sabhāgahetu of the sabhāgahetu is new, that is, it exists after having been nonexistent; but the thing itself, the dravya which is a certain sabhāgahetu, is not new. 
What harm do you see in this future dharma being a similar cause in the same way that it is a retributive cause ? 
No, for the result of sabhāgahetu is an outflowing result of outflowing, a result similar to its cause , and this type of result does not suit a future dharma, because, in the future, there is no anteriority and posteriority. 
One cannot, on the other hand, admit that a past or present dharma already arisen is an outflowing of a future dharma, in the same way that a past dharma is not an outflowing of a present dharma,for a result is not anterior to its cause. 
Hence a future dharma is not a similar cause. 
If this is the case, then a future dharma would no longer be a vipākahetu, a retributive cause , for 1 a retributive result cannot be either simultaneous or anterior to its cause; and 2 because future dharmas have no eatlier or later periods of time. 
the cause is not the same. 
A similar cause and its outflowing result are similar dharmas.Now this is to suppose that they exist in the future, that they lack anteriority and posteriority, and that they are the mutual cause of one another, and as a consequences the results of one another: 
On the contrary, a retributive cause and a retributive result are dissimilar. Even if the anteriority and the posteriority were absent, a cause remains only a cause, and a result remains only a result. 
Its qnality of retributive cause results from the nature of the dharrna itself. 
The Path is of nine stages or spheresthe anāgamya, the dhyānāntara, the Four primary Dhyāṇnas, and the three inferior, ptimary Ārūpyas in the sense that an ascetic, abiding in these nine states of absorption, can cultivate the Path. 
Let us define the terms, inferior, equal, and superior Path. 
And thus following up to enumpādajñāna which, pot having a superior, can only be the similar cause of an equal Path, namely a future anutpādajñāna. 
, fraddhādhimukta and samayavimukta are, respectively, the similar causes of six, four, and two Paths; the Paths of dharmānusārin , dṛṣṭiprāpti and asamayavimukta are, respectively, the similar causes of three, two, and one Path. 
When a Path cultivated in a higher stage is the similar cause of a Path cultivated in a lower stage, how can it be the cause of an equal or higher Path? 
Does the rule of equal or higher results apply only to the pure dharmas, that is, to the dharmas that form part of the Path? 
What aṟe the dharmas acquired through effort? 
Those which arṟise through hearing, through reflection, etc. 
The dharmas of hearing in Kāmadhātu are similar causes of the dharmas of hearing and reflection in Kāmadhātu; but not of the dharmas of meditation, because these dharmas do not exist in Kāmadhātu, and because a dbarma is a similar cause of dharmas of the same sphere of existence. 
The dharmas of meditation in Rūpadhātu are similar causes of the dharmas of meditation in Rūpadhātu, but not of the dharmas of hearing in Rūpadhātu, because these are less good. 
The weakweak are the similar causes of dharmas of nine classes; the mediumweak, of dharmas of eight classes, with the exception of the weakweak; and thus following. 
The nine classes of the innate good dbarmas are similar cause of one another. 
The same holds for the defiled ḍharrnas. 
These four categories are, respectively, the similar cause of four, three, two, and one category. 
the minds capable of creating fictive beings constitute four classes, and are, according to their class, similar causes of four, three, two, or one mind capable of cteating fictive beings. 
from one similar cause realized with the greatest effort, there canṉot proceed a dharma less good, realized with less effort. 
1.1s there a pure dharma, already arisen, which is not the cause of a pure dharma not destined to arise? 
2.1s there, in a series, a pure dharma, previously acquired , which is not the cause of a pure dharma arisen later? 
Future duhkhe dharmajñānakṣānti has been obtained in the first moment of the Path are not the cause of duḥkhe dbarmajñāna already arisen. 
This is because a result cannot be anterior to its cause, and because a future dharma is not a similar cause. 
3.Is there a pure ḍharma, arisen previously, which is not the cause of a pure ḍharmna arisen later? 
For example, when one realizes an inferior result after having fallen from a superior result, the superior result was not the cause of this inferior result. 
Furthermore, possession of duḥkhe dharmajñāna which has previously arisen is not a cause of the possession of the dharmajñānakṣānti which will arise in the following moments , because these new possessions are less good. 
kṭk The mind and its mental states are only saṇīprayuk takahetu, causes through association. 
Is this to say that minds and mental states, arisen at different moments and in different series, are among themselves sanprayuke takahetu? 
Would you say that the mind and mental states of the same aspect and the same object, can be, furthermore, of the same time period? 
Consequently, the author adds Which has the same support. 
The mind and mental states which have the same support are, amoṅg themselves, sanprayuktakahetu. 
For example, a given moment of the organ of sight is the support 1 of a visual consciousness, and 2 of the sensation and the other mental states which are associated with this conscious ness. And the same for the other organs until vanas: a certain moment of the mental organ is the support of a mental consciousness and of the mental states associated with this consciousṅess. Whatever is saprayuktakahetu is also sahabhūhetu. 
Some dharmas are called saprayuktakahetu, mutual cause through association, because they function identically, that is, because there is amoṇg them the five similarities or identities defined above ii.34. 
The travel of the companions in a caravan is assured by the mutual support that they give one another; furthermore, they use the same food, the same drinks, etc. 
ss Former universals are sarvatragahetu or universal causes of the defiled dharmas of their own stage. 
meṇts , arisen previously, that is, of the past or present, and belonging to a certain stage , are the univerṣal cause of later defiled dharmas, of the same stage, which are defiled by nature, either through association or through their origin. 
Universals are only the cause of defiled dbarmas; they are the cause of defiled dharmas in their own category and in other categories : it is through their power that there arises, with their following, defilements belonging to categories different from them. 
hen would the defiled dbarmas of an Āryan ? 
Is there a dubkhasatya which has for its cause a belief in self aṇnd which is not in turn the cause of a belief in self? 
with the exception of the arisingold ageduration impermanence of the belief in a future selfs and its following, and of all other defiled dubkhasatya. 
If some bad dharmas have for their causes not only some bad dharmas but some neutral dharmas as well, how should one explain this bhāṣyam of the Prajñapti, Is there a bad dharma which has only a bad dharma for its cause? 
Yes; the first defiled volition that an Āryan produces upon falling from detachment. 
If the Prajñapti does not mention it, it is because it intends to name only the causes that have ṇot been abandoned. 
S Bad dharmas and impure good dharmas are retributive causes. 
Bad dharmaswhich are all impureand impure good dharmas are only retributive causes, because their nature is to Neutral ḍharmas are not retributive causes, because they are weak: 
as rotten seeds, even though moistened, do not grow. 
as intact seeds, not moistened, do ṉot grow. 
The dharmas that are neither neutral nor pure possess the two qualities necessary for retribution, the proper force, and the moisten ing of thitsr, the same as intact and moistened seeds. 
vipākahetu signifies either cause of vipāka or ctause which is vipāka. 
When one examines results, one must uṇderstand the word vpāka according to the first explanation; the meaning is result of retribution. 
How is that? 
In Kāmadhātu, 1 a retributive cause consisting of only one skandha can produce a single result: 
the mind and its mental states, good and bad, with their akṣaṇas. 
In Rūpadhātu, 1 a retributive cause consisting of a single skandha can produce a single result: 
a good mind, not of absorption , with its characteristics; 4 a retributive cause consisting of five s6aṉdhas can produce a single result: 
In Ārūpyadhātu, 1 a retributive cause consisting of a single skandha caṇ produce a single result: 
possession, nirodhasamāpatti , with their respective characteristics; 2 a retributive cause consisting of four skandhas can produce a single result: the mind and its mental states with their characteristics. 
Action that has the mental organ for its retribution necessarīly has two āyatanas for its retribution, namely the mana āyatana and the dharmāyatana. 
Action that has the organ of touch for its tetribution necessarily has three āyatanas fot its retribution, the oṟgan of touch, tangibles , and the dharmāyatana. 
Action which has either the eye, the ear, the nose, or the tongue for its retribution, necessarily has four āyatanas for its retribution: 
An action can have five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven āyataṉas for its retribution. 
of varied result and of noṉvaried result. The same holds for seeds: lotus, pomegranate, fig, millet, corn, etc. 
The retribution of an action can belong to a single time period or to three time periods; but the reverse is not true, for a result cannot be inferior to its cause. The retribution from an action lasting an instant can last numerous instants; but the reverse is not true, for the same reason. 
RṚRetribution is not simultaneous to the action which produces it, for a retṛibutive reṣult is not experienced at the moment when the action is accomplished. 
in fact, the retributive cause depends on the development of the series for the realization of its result. 
To which time period should a dharma beloṇg in order that it might be each of these six causes? 
the conditioned dharmas of the three time periods are kāraṇahetu; the anconditioned dharmas are outside of time. 
By reason of which results are they recognized as causes? 
Coṇḍitioned things and disconnection are results. 
The Mūlaśāstra says, What dharmas are results? 
If the unconditioned is a result, it should have a cause, from which cause one could say that it is the result. 
Furthermore, since you maintain that it is a cause , it should have a result, from which result one could say that it is a cause. 
Only conditioned things, have cause and result. 
The unconditioned has neither cause nor result. 
For we canot attribute to it any of the six causes, nor any of the five reṣults. 
Why not admit that the part of the Path which is called ānantaryamārga is the kāraṇahetu of the result of disconṉection ? 
We have seen that kāraṇaheṭu is a cause that does not create any obstacles to arising; but disconnection, being unconditioned, does not arise. 
Of what is it the result? 
īt is the result of the Path, for it is obtained due to the force of the Path : in other words, it is through the Path that an ascetic obtains possession of disconnection. 
The efficacy of the Path possesses diversity with regard to both obtaining and disconnection. 
Hence, although the Path is not the cause of disconnec tion , one can say that it is the result of the Path. 
Any unconditioned thing is kāraṇahetu, for it does not create an obstacle to the arising of any ḍharma,; but it does not have any result, for, being outside of time, it can neither project nor produce a resuit. 
In fact, the Sūtra does not say that a cause can be unconditioned; it says that a cause is only conditioned, All the hetus, all the pratyayas which have for a resuit the production of physical matter. 
Produced by impermanent hetus and pratyayas,how can physical matter. 
If a permanent thing, that is, an unconditioned thing is not a cause, it will not be an object as condition of the conciousness that it refers to. The Sūtra declares that the heus and the pratyayas which are capable of producing are impermanent. 
It does not say that all conditions of the consciousness are imperma nent. 
The Sūtra says that productive causes are impermanent: hence the Sūtra does not deny that an unconditioned thing is ēraṇahetu, that īs, a cause that does not create an.obstacle. 
The Sūtra admits the existence of an object as a condition ; but it does not speak of a kāraṇahetu, a cause that does not create an obstacle. It is not proven that an uncondi tioned thing is a cause. In fact, the Sūtra does not say that that which does not create an obstacle is a cause; but it does not contradict this. Many Sūtras have disappeared. 
says that disconnection is pratisakhyānirodha. 
This dharma, in its nature, is real, but indescribable; only the Āryans realize it internally, each for himself. 
The three dharmas that it refers to are not distinct and real entities like color, sensation, etc. 
What is called space is solely the absence of any tangible thing, that is, the absence of a resistant body. 
Persons say, in their obscurity, that there is space when they do not encounter any obstacle. 
What is called pratisanakhyānirodha or Nirvāṇa iswhen both the defilements already produced and the existence already produced aṟe destroyedthe absence of any other defilements or any other existence, and that by reason of the force of the consciousness. 
When, independent of the force of consciousness and by reason of the mere absence of causes there is an absence of arising dharmas, this is what is called apratisarkhyānirodha. 
For example, when premature death interrupts existence , there is apratisakhyānirodha of the dharmas which would have arisen in the course of this existence if it had continued. 
But, the future nonarising of suffering supposes consciousness ; it is then included within pratisakhyānirodha. 
Another School defines apratisakhyānirodha as later non existence of the dharmas which have arisen by virtue of their spontaneous destruction. 
In this hypothesis, apratisamkhyānirodha would not be eternal, since it is nonexistent as long as the dharma as cause has not perished. 
One cannot say that pratisakhyā is eaṟlier, or that the noṇarising of the nonarisen dharmas is later. 
Let us explain. 
If pratisarkhyā is absent, the dharmas would arise; but if pratisakhyā arises, the dharmas would absolutely not arise. The efficacy of pratisamkhyā with regard to their nonarising consists in this: 1 that before pratisakhyā, there is no obstacle to their arising; 2 but given pratisakhyā, the dharmas, the arising of which has not been previously hindered, do not arise. 
kskṅḵ If Nirvāga is simply nonarising , how does one explain the Sūtra which says, The cultivation of the five faculties,;faith, etc,has for its result the abandoning of past, present, and future suffering? 
In fact, this abandoning is nothing other than Nirvāṇa, and there can only be nonarising of a future dharma, not of a past ot present dharma. 
Our interpretation is justified by another text which says, Abandon desire relative to rāpa, to sensation. 
When desire is abandoned, 7pa, and consciousness will be abandoned and comprehended by you. 
It is in this manner that we should understand the abandoning of past and present suffering of which the Sūtra speaks when it speaks of the faculties. 
Or rather, past defilement is the defilement of a previous existence; present defilement is the defilement of the present exis tence; these do not refer to the defilement of a given past or present moment. 
The same for the eighteen rṣṇāvicaritas or modes of thirst: the modes that are related to a past existence are called past modes, those that are related to a present existence are called present modes, and those thar are related to a future existence are called future modes. 
in the same way as one says that an action is exhausted when its retribution is exhausted. 
The abandoning of future suffering and future defilement is the fact that they absolutely do not arise, given the absence of seeds. 
How does one otherwise understand the abandoning of past oṟ present suffering? 
There is no good reason to make an effort to destroy that which has perished or that which is perishing. 
9 We do not say that unconditioned things do not exist. 
Let us explain. 
Without doubt the sense of saya is not incorrect The Āryans see that which exists and that which does not exist in a not incoṟrrect manner: in that which is suffering, they see only suffering, and in the nonexistence of suffering, they see the nonexistence of suffering. 
What contradiction do you find between the nonexistence of suffeting and pratisakhyānirodha being a Truth? 
And this nonexistence is the Third Truth, because the Āryans see it and proclaim it imrmmediately after the Second Truth. 
But if unconditioned things are non existent, the consciousness that has space and the two extinctions for its object would have a nonthing for its object. 
What harm do you see in maintaining that uaconditioned things really exist? 
What advantage do you see in this? 
This advantage that the Vaibhāṣika doctrine is found to be safegarded. May the gods be charged with defending this doctrine, if they judge that it is possible! 
In fact, uaconditioned things are not known through direct perception , as is the case for physical matter, sensation, etc.; and they are pot known through inference , by reason of their activity, as is the case for the sense oṟgans. 
Furthermore, if urodha or extinction is a thing in and of itself, how do you justify the genitive, uhkhasya nrodhaḥ, the extinction of suffering, as the extinction of the defilement, or the extinction of the object of defilement? 
But we cannot conceive of any cause and effect relationship, of any effect and cause relationship, of a relationship of the whole to the part, etc., between the things, that is to say, the defilements, and its extinction conceived of as an entity in itself, which would justify the genitive. 
Yet we can specify extinction as being in a relationship with such things , for one takes possessioṇḥ of extinction at the moment when one cuts off the possession of a certain thing. 
The Sutra speaks of the Bhikṣu who has obtained Nirvāṇa in this life. 
If Nirvaṉa is nonexistence, how could he obtain it? 
The Sūtra says, The complete abandoning, the purification, the exhausting, the detach ment, the extinction, the abatemeat, the definitive passing away of this suffering; and the nonrebirth, the nongrasping, the nonappearanṇce of.apother sufferingthis is calm, this is excellent, namely the rejection of all padhi, the exhausting of thirst, detachment, extinction, Nirvāṇa. 
If this means asmnin sati, if Nirvāṇa exists, there is no appearance of suffering, then suffering would never appear, since Nirvāṇa is eternal. 
If this means asmin prāpta, Śit Nitvāṇa has been obtained, you would have to admit that future suffering wili not appear while the Pathby virtue of which you suppose that Nirvāṇa is obtainedeither is, or rather has been obtained. 
Consequently the comparison of the Sūtra is excellent, The deliverance of his mind is like the Nirvāṇa of a flame. 
That is to say, as the extinction of a flame is only the passing away of the flame and not a certain thing in and of itself, so too is the deliverance of the mind of the Blessed One. 
are still warranted by the authority of the Abhidharma wherein we read, What are the avastuka dharmas? 
They are the unconditioned things. 
The term avastuka signifies unreal, without selfṉature. 
vasṭu in the sense of any object of consciousness, for example All the dbarmas are known through different knowledges, each knowing its own object ; 3. 
The Vaibhāṣikas conclude: In the passage that concerns us, vas has the meaning of cause; avastuka signifies that which has no cause. 
Retribution is the result of the last cause. 
The last cause is the retributive cause, vpākahetu, because the retributive cause is named last in this list. The first result, vpākaphala , is the result of this cause. 
The predominating result is the result of the first. 
The first cause is kāraṇahetu or reason for being; the last result proceeds frorn it. This result is called adhipaja, arisen from predominence, or adhipata, beloṇging to predominance, because it is the result of the predominating cause. 
For example, the ten āyatanas are predominant with regard to the five sense consciousaesses; the collective action of living beings is predominant with regard to the physical world. 
The organ of hearing exercises an indirect pre dominence with regard to the visual consciousness, for, after having undetstood, a person experiences the desire to see. 
And thus following. 
for the result of these two causes is similar to its causes. 
The paruṣa or virile result, is the result of two causes. 
1n the ṣame way, in the world, a certain plant is called kākajaṅghā, because it resembles the foot of a crow; heros are called ṇatahastin, because they resemble an enraged elephant. 
Are taprayuktahetu and sahabhūhetu the only causes that result in virile activity? 
This result is, in fact, either simultaneous to, or immediately following its cause; but ṣuch is not the case with a retributive result. 
According to other Masters, a retributive cause also distantly ṛesults in virie activity, for example the fruits reaped by a laborer. 
Retribution is a neutral dharma. 
A nonneutral action is called this because it produces retribution; noṉneutral actions are bad actions and goodimpure actions. 
From actions of this nature there arises later,not at the same time, and not immediately afterwards,the result that one terms retributive result or matured result. 
Why not consider the dharmas that do not form part of living beings,mountains, rivers, etc,as retributive results? 
Now retributive results, by definition, are unique: 
another person never experiences the tetṛibutive results of actions that I accomplish. 
all beings experience this result in common, because the collectivity of their actions cooperate in their creation. 
If the result of the universal cause is an outflowing result, a result similar to its cause, why not give the universal cause the name of similar cause? 
When there is a similarity between a cause and its result from this last point of view, the universal cause is at one and the same time a similar cause. 
Four alternative cases present themselves: 
Extinction through intelligence is disconnection. 
Ā dharma is the result of the virile activity of the dharma through the force by which it arises. 
We say then that it is the result of the virile activity of the dharma by the force of which one obtains possession of it. 
Any conditioned dharma is the predominating result of conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the dharmas that are later than it. 
What difference is there between the result of virile activity and a predominating reṣult? 
For example, a created thing is the result of the virile activity and the predominating result of the artisan who created it; it is only the predominating result of what is not the aṟtisan. 
Five causes grasp their result in the present. 
Five causes grasp their results only when they are in the present: in the past, they have already grasped their results; in the future, they have no activity. 
The same holds for kāraṇahetu; bat the staṇza does not mention it, because kāraṇahetu does not necessarily have a result. 
Two produce their result in the present. 
these two causes in fact grasp and produce their results at the same time. 
Two produce their results in both the past and the present. 
The similar cause and the universal cause produce their results both when they are in the present and when they are in the past. 
How can they produce their outflowing results when they are in the present? 
The possession of the roots of good that the person who again takes up the roots of good acquires in the first moment, produces a result, but does not grasp a result. 
The possession of the bad dharmar that a person who obtains detachment from desire abandons at the last moment. 
The possession that a person who fell from detachment acquires in the first moment. 
The first possession that a fallen Arhat acquires. 
When an undefiledneutral similar cause produces its result, it grasps it , but it can grasp its result without producing it: for example, in the case of the last sandhas of an Arhat which have no outflowing. We have up to now considered the dharmas that are not subject to consciousness. 
If we consider the mind and its mental states in their sucessive moments, we can establish the four following alternatives for good similar causes: 
One cause produces its result in the past. 
The retributive cause produces its result when it is in the past, for this result is not simultaneous to, nor immediately following its cause. 
kskṣk Some other Masters, say that there are four results different from the five resuits that we have just mentioned. These four are: pratiṣṭhāphala, a base result: a ciṟcle of water is the result of the circle of wind and thus following to plants; which are the ṛesult of eaṟth; 2. 
the visual consciousness is the result of the organ of sight, of a visible thing, of light and of an act of attention ; 4. 
the first of these four results is included in the category of the predominent result; the other three are included in the category of virile result. 
kskiḥ We have explained causes and results. 
the other dharmas, that is, the neutral dharmuas, with the exception of the dharmas of retribution, and the good dharmas, with the exception of the first pure dharṇas. 
60 The mind and its mental states are: 
The associated cause is further excluded with respect to the dharmas that are not mind or mental states, The mind and its mental states, 1 when they are defiled, arise from five causes excluding the retributive cause; 2 when they are retṛibutive, they arise from five causes with the exclusion of the universal cause; 3 when they are different from these two categories and from the fourth, they arise from four causes, with the exclusion of ṭthe retributive cause and the universal cause; 4 when they are pure for the first time, they arise from three causes, with the exclusion of the aforemeṇtioned two causes and the similar cause. 
kik We have explained causes. 
What are conditions ? 
The pratyayas are said to be four. 
Where is this said? 
In the Sūtra, it says There are four conditions , namely causes as a condition , an equal and immediately antecedent condition , an object as condition , and a predominating influence as condition. 
The pratyaya that bears the name of hetu is five hetus. 
Excepting kāraṇahetu, the five remaining herus constitute hetn pratyayatā, causes as condition. 
The mind and its mental states that have arisen, with the exception of the last ones, are an equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
If one excepts the last mind and the last mental states of the Arhat at the moment of Nirvāṇa, all minds and mental states which have arisen are an equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
Of what dharmas are they the equal and immediately antecedent conditions? 
This type of condition is called samanantara because it produces equal and im mediate dharmas. 
Consequently orily minds and their mental states are equal and immediately antecedent conditions, for there is no equality between a cause and its result with respect to the other dharas, for example the material dharmas. 
In fact, after a rūpa of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, there can arise at the same time two rūpar, one of Kāmadhātu, the other from Rūpadhātu , oṟ two rpas, one from Kāmadhātu, the otheṛ 
The appearance of the rāpar is confused: now an equal and immediately antecedent condition does not produce confused results; hence material dharmas are not equal and immediately antecedent conditions. Vasumitra says: 
A second rūpa of accumulation can arise in the ṣame body, without which the series of a rpa of accumulation would be broken; hence pa is not an.equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
The earlier mind admits of a larger pumber of types of mental states, and the following mind, a lesser number; and vice versa. 
Is sensation then the equal and immediately antecedent condition of a single sensation? 
In this hypothesis, when a defiled dharma arises after an undefiled dharma, this defiled dharma does not proceed from an equal and immediately antecedent condition. It is a previously destroyed defilement that is the equal and immediately antecedent condition of the defilement that defiles this second dharma. 
In fact after possession in the sphere of Kāmadhātu, possession relative to the dharvmas of the three spheres of existence and to pure dharmas etc., can be produced at the same time. 
Why deny that the future dharmas are equnal and immediately antecedent coṇditions? 
Future dharmas are disparate: there is not, among themn, any eacly and later. 
Then how does the Blessed One know that such and such a future dharma will arise first, and that such and such a dharma will arise later? He knows the oxder of the arising of all that arises until the end of time. 
From such a type of action such a retributive result arises; such a dharma proceeds from such a dharma; and he sees the present: Here is such a type of action: such a retributive result shall arise in the future from this action; here is such a dharma: such a dharma shall proceed from this dharma. 
By means of inferences drawn from the past and from the present, the Blessed One immediately sees the dharma that resides, disparately, in the future, and he produces the consciousness, This man, having accomplished such an action, shall certainly receive such a future retribution. 
4 To believe you, if the Blessed One does not consider the past, then he does not know the future. 
According to other Masters, there is in the series of beings a certain dharma which is the indication of the results which will arise in the future, namely a certain sanskāra disassociated from the mind. 
The Blessed One contemplates it, and he knows future results without his having cultivated the Dhyānas and the Abhijñas for it. 
If this is the case, then the Blessed One wouid be an interpreter of signs; he would not be a seer. 
Consequently the Blessed One knows immediately and at his will all things, not be inference, and not by divination. 
This is the opinion of the Sautrāntikas, justified by the word of the Blessed One , The qualities of the Buddhas, the spheres of the Buddhas, are incomprehensible. 
If the future does not have any ea:lier or later division of time, how can one say, Only duhkhe dharmajñānakṣānti arises immediately after the Jaukika agradharmas, and not any other dharma and thus following until Kṣayajñāna arises immediately after vajro pamasaādhi ? 
If the arising of this dharma is bound to that dharma, then immediately after that, this arises, as a bud arises after the seed without any equal and immediately antecedent condition interveṉing. 
Why are the last mind and the last mental states of the Arhat equal and immediately antecedent conditions ? 
The case is not the same. 
The last mind of an Arhat is support: if a subsequent mind, which would be supported by this support, does not arise, it is through the lack of other causes necessary to its arising. 
Once this condition has grasped or projected a reṣult, nothing in the world can hinder this result from arising. 
Does a dharma which is cittasamanantara, that is, which has a certain mind for its equal and immediate antecedent condition, immediately follow this mind? 
There are four alternatives: 
The first moment of the two absorptions, and all minds and mental states of a coṉscious state, have the mind that they immediately follow for their equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
What is an object as condition? 
All ḍharmas are the objects of consciousness. 
For example, the visual consciousness and the mental states, sensation, etc., which are associated with it, have all visible things for their object; the hearing consciousṇess, sounds; the smelling consciousness, odors; and the touch consciousness, tangible things. 
When a dharmais the object of a mind, it is not possible that this dharma, at any moment, is not the object of this mind. 
This means that even if a visible object is not grasped as an object by the visual consciousness, it is an object, for, whether it is grasped or not grasped as an object, its nature remains the same, as fuel is combustible, even when it is not on fire. 
Is the mind determined in the same way with regard to its support , that is, its organ, the organ of sight, etc.? 
According to others, it is bound to its support in both the past and the present. 
kskṣk What is a predominating condition? 
AĀdhipatipratyayatā or predominating condition is kāraṇaheiu, the reason for being cause , for kāraṇahetu is a predominating condition. 
AIl the dharmas are an object as condition of the mental consciousness. 
Thus the dharmas, without exception, are predominating conditions as kāraṇahetu, not as an object as condition. 
Every dharma has all dharmas for its kāraṇahetu, with the exception of itself. 
Let us first examine cause as condition, that is, as five causes, with the exclusion of kāraṇahetu. 
Two causes exercise their activity with regard to a petishing dharma. 
Perishing means of the present. A present dharma is called perishing, in the act of perishing, because, having arisen, it is turned towards its destruction. 
Three, with regard to an arising dharma. 
An arising dharma means a future dharma, because a future dharma, not having arisen, is ṭurned towards arising. 
Two other conditions, in reveṟse order. 
it exercises its actīvity as do the two causes, namely with regard to a perishing dharma: this perishing dbarma is mind and mental states, the subjects of the consciousness , which, perishing,that is, of the present,;grasp a present object. 
The activity of predominent influence as a condition only consists in not creating any obstacle either to a past, present, or future ḍbarrna. 
The mind and its mental states arise by reason of four conditions. 
the eaṟlier mind and mental states, which have aṟisen not separated by other minds or mental states; 3. 
the five objects of which physical matter is the first, or, in the case of the mental consciousness, all the dharmas; and 4. 
all the dharmas, except the mind and its mental states whose arising is under consideration. 
The two absorptions, by reason of three. 
One must exclude the object as condition, because the absoṟption of nonconsciousness and the absoṟption of extinction do not grasp an object. 
two causes, sahabhūḥetu , and sabhāgahetu ; 2. 
the predominating influence as condition, as above. 
These two absorptions arise from an application, from an inflec tion of the mind: they then have the mind as an equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
thus they are not equal and immediately antecedent conditions of the mind leaving the absorption, even though they are immediately contigous to it. 
The other dharmas, by reason of two. 
The other dharmas, namely the other saskāras disassociated form the mind and the material haras, arise by reason of the causes as conditions and the predominating influence as condition. 
sksk Ali the dharmas that atise arise by reason of the five causes abd the four conditions that we have just explained. 
The world does not proceed from a single cause that is called God, or Puruṣa, or Pradhāṇna, or any other name., How do you prove this thesis? 
If you think that the thesis is proven through arguments, you betray your doctrine that the world arises from a single cause. 
If this were the case, then things do not arise from a single cause, since the desires are multiple. 
If this were so, then God is not the single unique cause of all things. 
The desires of God are simuitaneous, but things do not arise at the same time because they arise as God wishes them to ariṣe, that is, in succession. 
What advantage does God obtain from this great effort by which he produces the world? 
He is then not God, the Sovereign , in what concerns his own satisfaction, since he cannot realize it without a means. 
And if he is not sovereign with regard to his own satisfaction, how can he be sovereign with regard to the world? 
Fuṛther, do you say that God finds satisfaction in seeing the creatures that he has created in the prey of all the sufferings of existence, including the tortures of the hells? 
Well said, in truth, is the popular stanza, He is called Rudra because he burns, because he is excited, ferocious, teṛrible, an eater of flesh, blood, and marrow. 
If, modifying their position, they admit the existence of these causes, and pretend that these causes serve God as auxiliaries, this then is no more that a pious affirmation, for we do not maintain any activity of a cause besides the activity of the socalled secondary causes. 
Furthermore, God would not be sovereign with regard to auxiliary causes, since these cooperate in the production of the effect through their own efficacy. 
but creation, dependent only on God, would never have a beginning, like God himself, and this is a consequence that the Theist rejects. 
The primary elements are the cause of the derived elements in two ways. 
The four primary elements of earth, etc, are causes of the fout primary elements in the quality of similar causes , and of mutually coexistant causes. 
And of the derived elements, in five ways. 
The four primatry elements are causes of the derived elements color, taste, etcin five ways, in the quality of janana, niśraya, pratiṣṭhā, upastambha, and upabṛhaṇahetu. 
Upabṛhaṇahetu or growth cause, because the primary elements are the cause of the development of the derived elements. 
Derived elements are the cause of the derived elements in three ways. 
All the derived elements which have arisen, are, with regard to similar derived elements, sabhāgahetu. 
the eye is produced through retribution of actioṉ, etc. And the cause of the primmary elements, in one way. The actions of the body and voice produce the primary elements as a retributive result: they are then vpākahetu. 
First, we must distinguish twelve categories. 
Good, bad, defiledneutral, undefiledneutral minds in Kāmādhātu. 
Four types of minds belong to Kāmadhātu: good, bad, defiled neutral, and undefiledneutral. 
The two pure minds are those of the Śaikṣa and the Arhat or Aśaikṣa. 
In all, these constitute twelve minds. 
Nine types of minds can arise after a good mind in Kāmadhātu. 
Immediately after a good mind in Kāmadhātu there can arise nine minds, namely the four minds in Kāmadhātu; two minds in Rūpadhātu: good, when a ascetic entets into absoṟption, and defiledneutral, when a person who dies in Kāmadhātu with a good mind passes into the intermediate existence of Rūpadhātu ; a mind in Ārūpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind, when one dying in Kāmadhātu is reboṟn in Ārūpyadhātu; not good, for, since Ārūpya dhātu is estranged from Kāmadhtu by four estrangements, one cannot pass directly from Kāmadhātu into an absoṟrption of Ārūpya dhātu; the two pure minds, of Śaikṣa or of Aśaikṣa, at entry into the Understanding of the Truths. 
Such a mind can arise after eight types of rminds. 
A good mind can arise immediately after eight minds, narnely: the four minds in Kāmadhātu, two minds in Rūpadhātu, good and defiledneutral minds, upon leaving an absoxption. 
after the defiled mind, which is this absorption, he produces a good mind of a lower stage ; and two pure minds, of Śaikṣa or Aśaikṣa, upon leaving the Understanding of the Ttuths. 
A bad mind can arise after ten types of minds. 
A klśṣṭa mind, that is to say, a bad and a defiledneutral mind can arise after ten mindsexcluding the two pure minds, for a mind of rebirth into Kāmadhātu is defiled and can follow any kind of mind belonging to the three spheres of existence. 
Four minds can arise after a kli5z mind, namely the four minds of Kāmadhātu. 
An undefiledneutral mind can arise after five minds. 
An undefiledneutral mind can arise after five types of mind. 
Seven types of mind can arise after an undefiledneutral mind. 
the four minds in Kāmadhātu, two minds in Rūpadhātu, good minds, for, after the aforementioned mind of creation, a good mind reappears in Rūpadhātu, and a defiledneutral mind, when a person, dying with this mind, is reborn in Rūpadhātu the first mind of which is necessarily a defiledneutral mind ; a mind of Ārūpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind, when a person, dying with this mind, is reborn in Ārūpyadhātu. 
In Rūpadhātu eleven types of minds can arise after a good mind. 
Eleven minds, excluding an undefiledneutral mind in Ṛūpa dhātu, can arise immediately after a good mind in Rūpadhātu. 
A good mind can arise after nine minds, excluding the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu and an undefiledneutral mind in Ārūpyadhātu. A defiledneutral mind can arise after eight types of minds. 
A defiledneutral mind can arise after eight minds, excluding the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu and the two pure minds. 
Six minds can arise after a defiledneutral mind, namely the three minds in Rūpadhātu, and the good, bad, and defiledneutral minds in Kāmadhātu. An undefiledneutral mind can a:ise after three types of mind. 
An undefiledneutral mind can arise after the three minds in Rūpadhātu. 
Six minds can arise after an undefiledneutral mind, namely: the three minds in Rūpadhātu, the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu , and the defiled tnind in Arupyadhatu. 
As above, so too in Ārūpyadhātu, for these. 
An undefiledneutral mind in Ārūpyadhātu can arise after the three minds of this sphere. 
Nine minds can arise after a good mind, with the exception of a good mind in Kāmadhātu and an undefiledneutral mind in Kāma dhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
Such a can arise after six types of mind. 
A good mind can arise after six minds, namely the three minds in Ārūpyadhātu, a good mind ia Rūpadhātu, and the two pure minds. 
Seven minds can arise after a defiledneutral mind, namely the three minds in Arāpyadhātu, a good mind in Rūpadhātu, two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu, and a defiled mind in Ṛūñpadhātu. 
A defiledneutal mind can arise after seven minds, with the exception of the two defiled minds in Kāmādhatu, a defiled mind in Rūpadhātu and the two pure minds. 
A Śaikṣa mind can arise after four types of minds. 
A Śaikṣa mind, the mind belonging to the saint who is not an Arhat, can arise after four minds, namely a Śaikṣa mind and a good mind in each of the three spheres. 
Five minds can arise after a Śaikṣa mind, namely the four that have just been named and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
An Aśaikṣa mind can arise after five types of minds. 
Four minds can arise after an Aśaikṣa mind, namely an Aśaikṣa mind and a good mind of each of three spheres. 
And again, The twelve types of mind make twenty. 
How is this? 
By dividing the good mind of the three Dhātus into two, the acquired and the innate minds. 
A good mind of each of the three spheres is divided into two categories, 1. 
An undefiledneutral mind in Rūpadhātu is divided into only three categories, for Failpasthānika does not exist in this sphere. 
According to another opinion, there is a mental consciousness produced by the airyāpathika mind, which has the twelves āyatanas, from the organ of sight to the dharmāyatana, for its object. 
Twenty minds arise one after another, in conformity with the following rules: 
eight types of mind of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, namely two good minds, two kisṭa minds, and four undefiledneutral minds. 
seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñāphala. 
four minds of the same sphere, the two good minds and the two bliy minds; a mind acquired through effort and an undefiled mind of Rūpadhātu; a Saikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala; undefiledneutral minds of Rūpa dhātu and Arūpyadhātu. 
seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñāphala; a mind acquired through effort and an undefiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu; a Śaikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Followed by seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala. 
seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala, four minds of Rūpadhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and abhijñāphala, three minds of Arūpyadbhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort. 
six minds of the same sphere, with the exeption of a mind acquired through effort and abhñāphala; an undefiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu and of Arūpyadhātu. 
Followed by six minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and bhijñāphala. They follow seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñaphala. Abhiñāphala. 
Followed by two minds, abhiññāphala of the same sphere and a mind acquired through effort in Rūpadhātu. 
six types of mind of the sphere of Rūpadhātu, namely two good minds, one kdṣṭa mind, and three uṇdefiledneutral minds. 
good acquired through effort, good acquired through birth; and abhiñāphala; 10 a mind of Arūpyadhātu acquired through effort, and a Śaikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
four of the same sphere, excepting airyāpa thika and vipākaja, two of Kāmadhātu, acquired through effort and abhijñāphala, two of Arūpyadhātu, acquired through effort and defiledneutral; and a Śakṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Followed by nine minds: five minds of the same sphere, with the exception of an abhijñāphala mind; four minds of Kāma dhātu, two good minds and two klisṭa minds. 
five minds of the s same sphere, with the exception of an abhiññāphala mind; three minds of Kāmadhātu, an mind acquired through birth, an aryāpathika mind, and a vipākaja mind; three minds of Arūpyadhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired though effort. 
Followed by seven minds: four minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and an abhiñāphala mind; two minds of Kāmadhātu, a bad mind aṇd a defiledneutral mind; one mind of Ārāpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind. They follow five minds of the same sphere, with the exception of aṉn abhiñāphala mind. 
Followed by two minds of the same sphere, a mind acquired through effort and an abhi0ñāphala mind. 
four types of mind of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu, namely two good minds, a defiledneutral mind and a vipākaja mind. 
Followed by seven mind: four minds of the same sphere; a mind of Rāpadhātu acquired through effort; and a Śaīkṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Good Acquired through Birth. Followed by seven minds: four minds of the same sphere; a defiledneutral mind of Rāpadhātu; a bad mind and a defiled neutral mind of Kāmadhātu.ē It follows four minds of the same sphere. 
Followed by eight minds: four minds of the same sphere; a mind acquired through effort and a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu; a bad mind and a āefiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu. It follows ten minds: four minds of the same sphere; a mind acquired through birth, an airyāpathika mind, and an vpākaja mind of Rūpadhātu and Kāmadhātu. 
Followed by six minds: three minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort; a defiledneutral miad of Rūpadhātu; a bad mind and a defiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu. 
Four minds follow, of this same sphere. 
Followed by six minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres; an mind acquired through effort of Kāmadhātu; and a Śaiksa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. It follows four minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres; a Śaikṣa mind. 
Followed by five minds: the six minds which follow Śaikṣa with the exception of the Śaikṣa mind. 
It follows five minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres, a Śakṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa miṇd. 
A vipākaja mind is not favorable to a mind acquired through effort, because it is weak, and because it develops spontaneously. 
Airyāpahika ahd failpasthānika minds are not favoṛable to a mind acquired through effort because their reason for being is the creation of an attitude or a created thing. 
The mind of leaving can then immediately follow a mind acquired through effort. 
If a mind acquired through effort does not arise immediately after the vipākaja, etc., because these are not favorable to it, still less will it arise after a defiled mind which is contrary to it. 
Yet, when an ascetic is exhausted from the activity of the defilements, a mind acquired through effort arises from the fact that the ascetic lays hold of a perfect consciousness of this activity. 
The innate good mind of Kāmadhātu is sharp; hence it can arise after the two pure mminds and also after a mind in Rūpadhātu acquired through effort, but, as it develops spontaneously, it is not followed by these same minds. 
An innate good mind of Kāmadhātu, being sharp, can arise after a defiled mind of Rūpadhātu; but an innate good mind of Rūpadhātu, not being sharp, cannot arise after a defiled mind of Arūpyadhātu. 
Sāmānyalakṣaṇmanaskāra, an act of attention to common or general characteristics, to the sixteen aspects of the Truths, imperma pence, etc., and The conditioned dharmas are impermanent. 
onṉe can realize the Path after these three acts of attention, and, inversely, one can produce these three acts of attention immediately after the Path. 
it is solely after an act of attention to general characteristics that one can realize the Path; after the Path, one can produce the three acts of attention. 
As for the text quoted by the first Master, it should be understood in the sense that, after having subdued his mind by means of the contempla tion of repulsive things, an ascetic is capable of producing an act of attention to general characteristics, after which he realizes the Path. 
The text refers to this indirect action of the contemplation of repulsive things and so says, aśubhāsahagatam. 
Certainly, we indeed see that an ascetic who has entered into samyaktvaniyāma, onto the Path by relying on one of the thtee lower stages , can produce, upon coming out of the Path, an act of attention to general characteristics in Kāmadhātu and can be established in hearing or in reflection, because the stages in question are near; but, when an ascetic has entered samyaktvaniyāma by relying on the Second, Third, or Fourth Dhyāṇa, to which stage could the act of attention to general characteristics belong that he produces upon coming out of the Path? 
He will produce an act of attention to general characteristics in Kāmadhātu, because Kāmadhātu is too estranged from the higher Dhyānas. 
now an Āryan cannot again realize the nirvedhabhāgīyas, fot we cannot admit that he would for a second time realize the preparatory path, since he already possesses its result. 
for example, seeing that all saṣkāras are impeṟmanent, all dharmas are impersonal, Nirvāṇa is tranquil. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this opinion, because it is illogical. 
When one obtains the result of Arhat based on Anāgāmya , the mind leaving the absoṟption is either of this stage or of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. When one obtains the same result based on Ākiñcanya, the mind of leaving is either of this same stage , or of naivasajnānāsajñāyaśtana. When one obtains the same result by relying on any other stage, the mind of leaving is solely of this other stage. 
Two are possible in Ārūpyadhātu, the first and the fourth. 
But, after the Path, an act of innate attention of Kāmadhātu can arise, because it is sharp. 
How many minds are acquired when one manifests each of the twelve types of minds? 
With the defiled mind of each of the three spheres, there is obtaining of six, of sīx, and of two minds respectively. 
Obtaining the six minds with a defiled mind of Kāmadhātu a. 
Oṇe obtains a good mind of Kāmadhātu when one again takes up the roots of good with a mind of doubt, which is defiled ; or when one returns to Kāmadhātu by falling from the higher spheres. 
One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu when one falls from Ātūpyadhātu into Kāmadhātu. 
One in fact takes possession of a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu with a defiled mind of conception in Kāmadhātu. One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Ārāpyadhātu and a Śaikṣa miṇd when one falls from the quality of an Arhat thtough the mind of Kāmadhātu. 
Obtaining the six minds with a defiled mind of Rūpadhātu. One obtains one undefiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu and the three minds of Rūpadhātu when one falls from Ārūpyadhātu into Rāpadhātu. 
Oṉe obtains a defiledṉeutral mind of Ārūpyadhātu and a Śaikṣa mind when one falls from the quality of an Arhat through a mind of Rūpadhātu. 
One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Ārāpyadhātu aṇda Śatkṣa mind with the defiled mind of Arūpyadhātu when one falls from the quality of Arhat through a mind of Arūpyadhātu. 
There is the obtaining of three with a good mind of ṚRūpadhātu. 
One obtains three minds with a good mind of Rūpadhātu: this mind itself, and the undefiledneutral minds of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu, that is, the minds capable of cteating fictive beings relative to these two spberes. 
When one realizes the first Śaikṣa mind, namely dwhkhe dharma jñānakṣānti , one obtains four minds: the Śaikṣa mind itself, two undefiledneutral minds, one of Kāmadhātu and one of Rūpadhātu , and a good mind of Ārūpyadhātu; there is, by virtue of the Path, entry into the Path and detachment from Kāmadhātu and Ārūpyadhāta. 
One obtains the minds not specified above only when they manifest themselves. 
According to another opinion, without making any distinction among the spheres, it is said that The wise say that, with a defiled mind, one obtains nine minds; with a good mind one obtains six; and with a neutral mind one obtains a neutral mind. 
Concerning the good mind, one should correct this passage so that it reads one obtains seven. 
When a person again takes up the roots of good by means of Right View , he obtains a good mind of Kāmadhātu; when he detaches himself from Kāma dhātu, he obtains the minds capable of creating fictive beings of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu, which are two undefiledneutral minds; when he takes up the absorptions of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, he obtaias the good minds of these two spheres; upon entry onto the Path, he obtains a Śaikṣa mind; upon his entry into the result of Arhatship, he obtains an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Āt conception, in absorption, in detachment, in falling, and in the taking up again of the roots of good, one obtains minds that oṉe did not possess. 
The author wishes to explain the diverse topics of tnind that are produced in Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, aṅd Ārūpyadhātu, the realms of desire, physical matter, and no physical matter. 
Kāmadhātu consists of hell, the Pretas, animals, humans, and six gods. 
Kāmadhātu consists of four complete realms of rebirth and one part of the heavenly realm of rebirth, namely the six groups of gods, the Cāturmahārājikas, the Trāyastrirṅśas, the Yamas, the Tūṣsitas, the Nirmāṇaratis, and the Paranirmitavaśavartins; plus the physical world that contains these beings. 
How many places are there in Kāmadhātu? 
Twenty, through the division of the hells and the differences in the continents. 
The twenty places are eight hells : Sajīva, Kālasūtra, Saghāta, Raurava, Mahāraurava, Tapaṇa, Pratāpana, andAvici; four continents : Jambudvīpa, Pūrvavideha, Avaragodānīya, and Uttarakuru; and six heavenly abodes as above. 
Hence, from Avici hell up to the heaven of the Paranirmitavaśavartins, there aṟe twenty places which constitute, with the physical world which rests on the circle of wind , Kāmadhātu. 
Above is Rūpadhātu, of seventeen places The seventeen places of Rūpadhātu are above Kāmadhātu, made up of dhyānas which are each of three stages. 
But the fourth is of eight stages. 
The Third Dhyāna is made up of the Parīttaśubhas, the Apramā ṇaśubhas, and the Śubhakṛtsnas. 
These seventeen places constitute Rūpadhātu. 
In the heaven of the Brahmapurohitas there rises, they say, a lofty dwelling which is named the Heaven of Brahmā, inhabited by a single rulersuch as a teṟrace or a high placebut which does not constitute a stage. 
In fact nonmaterial dbarmas do not occupy a place: 
likewise the material dharmas when they are past or future, gviñāpt and the nonmmaterial dharmas, do not occupy a location. 
But It is fourfold through its mode of existence. 
Ākāśānantyāyatana, Vijñānāntyāyatana, Ākicanyāyatana, and Naivasajñānāsathjñāyatana constitute Ārūpyadhātu which is thus of four types. 
Where a person exists who possesses an absorption , here the existence in question begins; here too, at the end of this existence, the intermeditate being who is called to take up a new existence will be formed . 
What is the support of the mental series of beings in Ārūpyadhātu? 
Here the mental series exists supported by the nkāya and the vital organ. 
According to the Ābhidhārmikas, the mental series of beings in Ārūpyadhātu has for its support two dharmas disassociated from the mind, ṅkāyasabhāgatā, genre or genus, and jñvibendriya, the vital oṟgan. 
but what is the support of genre and the vital organ for nonmaterial beings? 
Among material beings, genre and the vital organ do not have the force necessary to support one another, but they have this force among nonmaterial beings, because they proceed from a ceṛtain absorption. 
Or rather, we say that the mind is supported by the mental states, and the mental states by the mind, in the way that you say that genre and the vital organ support one another. 
The series of minds of a new existence is projected by a certain cause ; if this cause is not free from attachment to physicalmatter, the mind will be reborn with matter, and its series will be supported by matter; if this cause is free from attachment to physical matteroas in the case for absorption which is the cause which projects an existence in Ārūpyadhātuthe mind willbe reborn and will exist without relation to physical matter. 
Or rather rpa is that which is susceptible to being struck , to resistance ; arāpa, by absence of rūpa, ārūpya, the fact of being such.Ārūpyadhātu is that which is associated with āripya. 
What is kāma? 
Concupiscence, the desire to eat by mouthfuls and sexual desire. 
Śāriputra said to an Ājīvika, The fine things of this woṟld are not kāmas; kāma is the desire that the imagination nourishes among humans. 
No,but merely thedharma with regatrd to which there develops, and in which there resides craving proper to this Dhatu, craving of Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, and ĀĀrūpyadhātu. 
What is the craving proper to each Dhātu? 
The craving thatdevelops, that resides in thedharmas of this Dhātu. 
To the owner of this horse. 
Or rather, craving proper to Kāmadhātu is the ctaving of a being who is not absorbed ; craving proper to Rūpadhātu, to Ārūpyadhātu is craving relative to the absorption of dhyāna, to the absorptions of ārāpya. 
now a mind of the sphere of Rūpadhātu cannot create odo1s or tastes because beings in Rūpadhātu are detached from both of these. 
Is this triple Dhātu unique? 
The triple Dhātus are infinite, like space; although there has not been any production of new beings, andalthough innumerable Buddhas convert innumerable beings and cause them to obtain Nirvāṇa, the beings of innumerable Dhātus are never exhausted. 
Horizontally,as the Sūtra proves, as when the cloudĪṣādhāra rains, there is no interval or discontibuity of the drops of water that fall from space, so too towards the East there is no interval or discontinuity of universes in a state of creation and of dissolution; as towards the East,the same towards the South, the West and the North. 
There is thena Kāmadhātu above Akaniṣṭha and an Akaniṣṭha below Kāmadhātu. 
rkiek Whoever is detached from one Kāmadhātu is detached from the Kāmadhātus of all the universes; the same for the other two Dhātus. 
Whoever produces the abhiñā or higher knowledge of magical power in the First Dhyāṇa, creates a magical being that can only be the Brahmaloka of the universe wherein the creator of this magical being is born; not in the other universes. 
In these Dhātus, there are five realms of rebirth that have been designated by their names. 
In Kāmadhātu there are the first four realms of rebirth and a part of the heavenly realm of rebirth; the other parts of the heavenly realm of rebirth exist in the other two Dhātus. 
The good, the bad, the physical world, and intermediate existence are included in the Dhātus. 
Whereas, as for the five destinies They are undefiledneutral, they are the world of beings, and they do not include intermediate existence. 
Intermediate existence is not a realm of rebirth. 
The Dharmaskandha says, What is the eyeelement ? 
The Sūtra itself says that intermediate existence is not included among the realms of rebirth: There are seven bhavas or existences: existence in hell, animal, Preta, heavenly, humanṉ, plus zrmabhava and intermediate existence. 
This Sūtra indicates the five realms of rebirth with their cause, namely action or karmabhava , and their access, namely intermediate existence through which a being arrives at a reams of rebirth. 
Śāriputra said, Venerable One, when the hellish cankers become active, one does and one accumulates actions which should be renumerated by hell. 
These action of the body, voice, and mind, tortorous, coṟrupted, tainted action have for retribution rūpa, vedanā, sajñā, saskāras and vñāna in hell When this retribution is realized, there is what is called hell. 
Venerable One, outside of these five dharmuas,one cannot maintain the existence of any being in hell. 
it is maintained thataction is separate from the five realms of rebirth, but this does not prove that it is excluded from them. 
Now the intermediate existence begins in the place where death has taken place. 
This is also the case for the existences of Ārūpyadhātu which then are not included among the realms of rebirth. 
We say then that intermediate existence is so called because it is intermediate between two realms of rebirth, but it is itself not a realm of rebirth. 
If it were a realm of rebirth it would not be iatermediate, and so it would not be called an intermediate existence. 
Śāriputra says that there is a being in hell when the retribution of hellish actions is realized; it does not say that the realm of rebirth is part retribution, part nonretribution. 
The text says that there does not exist any being in hell outside of these dharmas, rāpa, etc.. 
its intention is to negate the reality of any person passing from one realm of rebirth into another, not to affirm that the sandhas of the beings in hell are solely retribution. 
For the Vaibhāṣīkas, the realms of rebirth are exclusively undefiled neutral dharmas. 
eks In the three Dhātus with their five realms of rebirth, there is, in ascending orṟder, Seven abodes or types of consciousnesses , namely: 
According to the Sūtra : Material beings different in bodies and ideas, namely humans and certain gods, are the first vsjñānasthitis. 
What are these certain gods? 
The six gods of Kāmadhātu and the gods of the First Dhyāna except the prathamā bhinirvṛttas. 
They are of different bodies, because their color, their marks , and their figures are not identical. 
They are of different ideas, because their ideas, ideas of pleasure, displeasure, neitherpleasurenoṟdispleasure, are not iden tical. 
Material beings different in bodies but of similar ideas, namely the prathamābhinirvṛtta Brahmakāyīka gods, are the second vjñā nasthitis. 
All these prathamābhinirvṛtta gods ere of similar ideas, for all have the same idea of a single and same cause,Brahmā, who thinks, Theyare created by me, and the associates of Brahmā who think, We are created by Brahmā; there is diversity of body, for one is Brahmā, and the others his followers through their height, their greatness, their bodies, their speech, their clothing and their ornaments. 
being of great sight,who lasts so long,and so on to when he made the vow,May other beings be born here in my company!, we were born in his company.. 
We ask then where were these gods when they saw Brahmā? 
According to certain masters , they saw Brahmā when they were in Ābhāsvara Heaven. 
How then can they say,We have seen this being of great sight, who lasts so long? 
As a consequence,a third opinion,one would say: It is in the world of Brahmā itself that these gods remember the past of Brahmā. At the moment when they are born there, they saw him who being born before them, who lasts a long time. 
Material beings similar in body but of different ideas, namely the Ābhāsvara gods, are the third viñānasthii. 
There is no difference of color, mark, or figure among them: thus these gods have similar bodies. They have ideas of pleasure and of neitherpleasurenordispleasure: thus there is diversity of ideas. 
In this same way kings fatiguned with the pleasures of lust take up the pleasure of government ,and fatigued with dharma take up again the pleasure of lust. 
yet the gods of the ThirdDhyāna do not pass into sāmantaka, and always possess the sensation of pleasure. 
The Śubhakṛtsnas do not become fatigued with the pleasures of the Ābhāsvaras, since they are calm, whereas the pleasures of the Ābhāsvaras, being mental pleasures, trouble the mind and are not calmn. 
They quote the Sūtra : Beings that are born for a short time in Ābhāsvara Heaven know poorly the laws of the destruction of the universe. Whben the destruction of the universe takes place through fire, they see the flames risinganddestroying the palace of the worldof Brahmā: theyare frightened, grieved,confused,May theseflames not rṛiṣse up to here! 
But the beings who have lived for along time in Ābhāsvara Heaven know of these cosmic changesand reassure their rightenedcompanions, Do not be afraid, friend! 
Do not be afraid, friend! 
Already previously this fire, having burnt the Palace of Brahmā, disappeared. 
at the burning up of the worlds in the First Dhyāna, they have ideas of the arriving or the nonarriving of the flames amongst them, and they have ideas of fear and no fear. 
Material beings of similar bodies and ideas, pamely the Śubhakṛtsnas, are the fourth vñānasthiti. 
They have the same ideas, because they have the sensation of pleasure. 
In the First Dhyāna, there is uniformity of ideas, ideas defiled since they are associated with fṝavrataparāmarfa; in the Second Dhyāṇna, there is dīvetsity of ideas, namely good ideas of the Dhyāna proper and of its threshold absorption; and in the third Dhyāṇna, there is uniformity of ideas, ideas arisen from retribution. 
The first three Ārūpyas are the last three vijñānasthitis as it says in the Sutra. 
Why are not the rest vijñānasthii The rest reduce the vjñāṉa. 
The rest refers to the painful realms of rebirth , the Fourth Dhyāna, and the Fourth Ārūpya which is called Bhavāgra or the summit of existence. 
According to another explanation , vjñānasthiti is the place wheṟe those who are here desire to go, the place from whence those who are there do not desire to fall. 
These two conditions are absent in the painful realms of rebirth. 
As for the Fourth Dhyāṇa, all those who are in it desire to leave it: Pṛthagjanas desire to pass to the realm of the Asajñisattvas; Āryans desire t pass to the Śuddhāvāsikas. 
Bhavāgra is not a viṝñānasthiti because there is little activity of the viñāna in it. 
The seven vijñānasthitis, With Bhavāgra and unconscious beings, are the nine dwellings of beings. 
For creatures dwell therein as they will There are no other dwellings of beings, for elsewhere one lives without desiring it. Elsewhere refers to the painful realms of rebirth. Beings are brought there by the Rākṣasa which is Karma and live there without desiring it. This is not one of the dwellings in the same way that a prison is not a dwelling. 
kskṣḥ If one Sūtra says that there are seven vijñāṉasthii, according to another Sūtra There are four other sthitis. 
These four are: 
but it cannot grasp them as object under the impulse of craving; thus they are not considered as its abode or sthiti. 
But why is the fifth sandha, the consciousness itself , not considered as an abode of the consciousness? 
The Vaibhāṣikas observe that the sthii, that upon which,or within which one grasps is opposed to shāar, he who grasps. 
But another Śūtra says, There is delight and attachment with regard to this food which is the consciousness. If there is delight and attachment with regard to the consciousness then the consciousness rides in it and resides in it. 
On the other hand, you teach that the five sandhas constitute the sevenfold abode of consciousness ; why do you not add the consciousness to the fourfold abodes of consciousness? 
Further, the BlessedOne described the four abodes of consciousness as a field, and he describes the consciousness, accompanied by desire, as a seed. 
Do the four shitis contain the seven, and do the seven contain the four? 
The correspondance admits of four cases. 
First case; the consciousness is inctuded among the seven, but not among the four. 
the four skandhas of the painful realms of rebirth, the FourthDhyāna andBbavāgra,are inclnded among the four. 
Third case: the four samdhas are incladedamong the seven, and are also included among the four. 
We have said that the three Dhātus include five realms of rebirth, etc. 
There are here four wombs of beings, beings born from eggs, etc. 
Yomi ot womb signifies birth. 
Womb of beings born from eggs are those beings who arise from eggs, geese, cranes, peacocks, paṟrots, thrushes, etc. 
Womb of beings born from wombs are those beings who arise from a womb, elephants, horses, cows, buffalos, asses, pigs, etc. 
ombs of beingsborn fror moisture are thosebeings who arise fromṃ the exudation of the elements, earth, etc,worms, insects, butterflies, mosquitos. 
These are called wupapāduka, apparitional, because they are skillful at appearing , and because they arise all at once ; such as gods, beings in hell, or beings in an intermediate existence. 
Humans and animals are of the four types. 
Humans can be born from an egg, such as Śaila and Upaśaila who were born from the eggs of a ctane; the thirtytwo sons of , the mother of Mrgāra; and the five hundred sons of the King of Pañcāla. 
Humans can be born from moisture, such as Māṇḍhātar, Cāru Upācaru, Kapotamalinī, Ānṛapālī, etc. 
Apparational humans are hurnans at the beginning of the ccsmic period. 
Beings in hell, intermediate beings, and the gods are apparitional too. 
Pretas are also born from a womb. 
That they are born from a womb results from a discourse that a Pretī had with Maudgalyāyana, I gave birth to five sons a night, to five sons a day:Iate them and was not satisfied. 
The apparitional womb. 
But the Bodhisattva in his last birth evidently possesses mastery relating to arising. Why did he then choose to be born from a womb? 
by reason of their relationship with hirn, the great Śūākya clan enters into the GoodLaw; and, recognizing in him a member of the family of the Cakravartins, persons experience a great respect towards him; persons are encouraged seeing that, being a man, he has tealized this perfection. 
In fact nonBuddhists masters caluṃnaniously say that at the end of one hundred cosmic periods there would appear in the world such a magician who devours the world through his magic. 
Others explain that the Bodhisattva has takeṉ up the womb in order that his body remains as relics after his Nirvāṇa: 
through the adoration of these relics, humans and other creatures by the thousands obtain heaven anddeliverance. 
In fact, the bodies of apparational beings, not having any external seed , do not continue to exist after their deaths, like a flame which disappears without remnant. 
kṣkrk One question arises from another. 
If the bodies of apparitional beings disappear at their deaths, how can the Sūtra say, The apparitional Garuḍa seizes the apparitional Nāga in oṟder to eat it? 
Or rather he eats the Nāga as long as the Nāga is not dead: but he does not feast on the dead Nāga. 
What is an intermediate being, and an intermediate existence? 
Between deaththat is, the five rkandhas of the moment of deathand arisingthat is, the five skaṉdhas of the moment of rebirththere is found an existencea body of five seandhasthat goes to the place of rebirth. 
This existence between two realms of rebirth is called intermediate existence. 
We say that it is arising ; but it is not born. 
In fact as its etymology indicates , to be born is to aṟrrive. 
Intermediate existence , when itbegins, has not arrived at the place where it should go, namely to the place where the retribution of actions is manifested and achieved. 
According to other sects, there is a cutting off, a discontinuity between death and birth: but there is no intermediate existence. 
This opinion is false, as reasoning and Scripture prove. 
Being similar to the series of rice, existence does not reproduce itself after having been interrupted. 
The momentary dharmas exist in a series; when they appear in a placedistant from that in which they have been found, it is because they are reproduced without discontinuity in interrmediate places, such as the series that constitutes a grain of rice and which one transports to a distant village by passing through all the villages in the interval. 
In the same way, the mental series takes up birth after being reproduced without discontinuity from the place where death took place. 
But, one would say, a reflection arises on a mirror, on the water, etc., without being continuous to the image with which itforms aseries. 
Hence the elements of arisingdo notdependon the elements forming an uninterrupted series between the place of death and the place where they reappear. 
The existence of the reflection is not proved; should it be proved, the reflection is not similar; hence it does not serve as an example. 
The existence of the reflection is not proved. 
Shade and sunlight do not coexist in the same spot. 
Now, if one places a mirror inthe shade , in a shed situated close to a pond lit by the sun,one would see in this mirror the reflection of the reflection of the sun on the surface of the water. 
the two things are the surface of the mirror and the reflection of the moon. 
Such is the power of this complex, mirror and object, that it produces the seeing of a reflection, of an image resembling the object. 
Incomprehensible is the power of the dharmas and the variety of this power. 
It still caṇnot serve asan example in your reasoning, fot itcannot be compared to arising. 
For it does not form a series. 
Ṭhe reflection does not form a series with the object reflected, because the reflection arises supported by the mirror, and because the reflection is simultaneous to the object reflected. 
But on the contrary death and arising form a series, the second being later to the first and being produced in another place than the fisst without there being a catting off between them. 
It is by reason of two causes that a reflection arises, by reason of the mirror and of the obect. The principal of these two causes is the cause upon which it takes its support in order to arise, namely the mirror. 
But it happens that arising, or birth, proceeds from only one cause; and it never has a principal cause which is not death. 
Arising has no external support in the case of apparitionalbeings, because they appear suddenly in space. 
And these external elements cannot be the principal cause for the beings that arise from semen, blood, or mud, since these items are absent from the mind Reasoning thus proves the existence of an intermediate being since ariṣing proceeds from death without there being any discontinuity between these two existences. 
kḵkṣḥ Scripture also proves the existence of an intermediate being. 
The Sūtra says, There are seven existences : existence in hell , as an animal , as a Preta, as a heavenly being , and as a human , as well as karmabhava and antarābhava. 
If the school thatwe are combating does not read this Sūtra, at least they read the texts pertaining to Gandharvas. 
It is the Gandhaṭva. 
We read in the Sūtra,Three conditions are necessary for an embryo to descend, : 
What is the Gandharva if not an intermediate being? 
If our opponents do not read this Sūtra, An intermediate being is proved by the text relative to the Five. 
The Blessed One teaches that there are five types of Anāgāmins: 
Certain masters maintain that an antarāparinirvāyn is a saint who obtains Nirvāṇa after having been reborn among some socalled Antara gods. 
But they should then admit the existence of Upapadya gods, etc. 
By the Sūtra of the Seven Sapuruṣagatis. 
Given this text, it is pure fantasy to suppose that an antarāparinirvāyiṉ is an inhabitant of a heaven of the Antara gods, for these Antaras cannot be divided into three classes by reason of duration and place. 
In this way we would have three entarāparinirvāyins conforming to the definitions of the Sūtra and who obtain Nirvāṇa in the interval of the duration of their life, that is, withoutachieving the end of their life as gods of the heaven where they were reborn. 
Or rather, the first antarāparinirvāyn obtains Nirvāṇa as soon as he has taken possession of a certain divine existence; the second after having experienced a heavenly bliss; and the third, after having entered into company or conversation with the gods. 
On the other hand, there are saints in Ārūpyadhātu who obtain Nirvāṇa without having fully lived their lives to the end , end yet nno antarāparinirvāyins are there. 
Yet if our adversaries do not read this Sūtra, what can we do about it? 
The Master has entered Nirvāṇa, and the Good Law no longer has a leader. Many sects have been formed that change the meaning and the letter to their fantasies. 
We say that, for the masters who admit these Sūtras, the existence of an intermediate being or the shanāhas in the interval is proved both by Scripture and reasoning. 
This Sūtra says, The Māra called Dūṣin, fell, with his own body, into great Avīci Hell. Actions very grave and complete ripen before death itself. Māra then felt a retribution in this life before feeling a retribution in hell The text thus means that Māra was enveloped, while still alive, by the fires of hell, that he dies; and that he then takes up an intermediate existence which leads to hell where birth in hell takes place. 
Moreover, according to our doctriae, rebirth in hellis immediate; it is not preceeded by a birth as an intermediate being. 
We maintain that, by its nature, the intermediate being is arising because he is turned towards the birth that follows death; we do not say that he is born. 
You should explain the stanza, Your life is approaching its end, Ohḥ Brahmin; youare old and sick; you are in the presence of Yama; there is not for you any intervening dwelling and you have no provision. 
You think that this stanza shows that there is no intermediate existence. 
Once dead, you shall not reappear here; or rather, the text means that No one can retard the progress of the intermediate being that you are going to become on the way to the place of your rebirth in hell. 
The one who denys the existence of intermediary beings asks us upon what do we base ourselves inorder to for us tosay that such is the intention of this text, or that such is not its intention. 
What is the form of an intermediate being? 
Being projected by the same action that projects the prvakālabhava, an intermediate being has the form of this being, that is, the being of the realm of rebirth to come after his conception. 
Objection: In the womb of a dog, a sow, etc., there can die in its embryonic stage a being who should then be reborn in any one of the five realms of rebirth. Let us suppose then that this embryo is replaced by an intermediate being destined to go to hell. This intermediate being,if he has the form of a being in hell, willburn the womb of the dog. 
But even if one believes that intermediate beings bound for hell are incandescent, as their bodies are ethereal , they are not any more tangible than they are visible. 
Thus the wotnb is not burned; moreover the influence of actions is opposed to this. 
The dimensions of an intermediate being are those of a child of five or six years of age, but his organs are perfectly developed. 
The intermediate being of the Bodhisattva is similar to the Bodhisattva in the fullness of his youth; he is adorned with the major and minor marks; that is why, when this intermediate being comes to enter his mothers womb, he illumines a thousand universes with their four continents. 
But we know that the mother of the Bodhisattva saw in a dream a small white elephant enter her side. 
This was only an omen, because for a long time the Bodhisattva has been disengaged from animal rebirth. 
King Kṛkin also saw ten dreams: an elephant, wells, a pole, sandalwood, a park, a young elephant, two monkeys, cloths, and contests, which were omens. 
Furthermore, intermediate beings do not enter into the womb by splitting open the side, but rather by the door of birth: 
this is why the eldest of twins is the one born last. 
But how do you explain the stanza of the Bhadanta Dharma subhūti, Changing his body into that of a white elephant having six tusks and four feet, he enters the womb and lies therein in full consciousness as a Ṛṣi entering a forest? 
There is no reason to explain this text: it is neither Sūtra, nor Vinaya, nor Abhidharma; it is a personal composition. 
But if it demands an explanation, we would say that this stanza describes the Bodhisattva just as his mother saw him in a dream. 
An intermediate being in Rūpadhātu is complete in size and is dressed by reason of his great modesty. 
The Bodhisattva in his interdiate existence who, through the force of her vow, was clothed in her intermediate existence: 
she entered the womb and left it dressed, and she remained dressed until her Nirvāpa and crermation. 
But lacking modesty, other intermediate beings of Kāmadhātu are nude. 
This is before death, after conception. 
xpapattibhava, which is the skandhas at the moment of their entry into a realm of rebirth, at the moment of their prarisadhi ; and pārvakālabhava which is all the skandhas of the following moments untildeath, the last moment of the realm of rebirth and which will be followed by a new antarābhava. 
He is seen by the creatures of his class, and by the divine eye. 
He is seen by the intermediate beings of the class:heavenly, etc,to which hebelongs. 
He is also seen by the pure divine eye, thatis, by the divine eye that is obtained through higher knowledge , for this eye is very pure. 
He is not seen by a naturaldivine eye oradivine eye obtained through birth,such as the divine eye of the gods. 
According to other masters, a heavenly intermediate being sees all intermediate beings; a human intermediate being sees all intermediate beings with the exception of heavenly intermediate beings, and so on. 
endowed with the impetus which belongs to supernatural power that is, the movement through spacewhich issues from action . 
The Buddhas themselves cannot stop him because he is endowed with the force of action. 
His organs are complete. 
For, they say, when we splitopen a mass of red hot iron we find that some small animals are born inside it. 
A human intermediate being, ceasing to be such, will never become a heavenly intermediate being. 
Does an intermediatebeing of Kāmadhātu eat, like the other beings of Kāmadhātu, solid food ? 
Yes, but not coarse food. 
It eats odors. 
A Gandharva of low rank eats unpleasant odors; a Gandharva of high raDk eats pleasant odors. 
How long does an intermediate being exist? 
it s for this reason that, when the life of an intermediate being comes to an end, there is no death. 
There is a mass of meat as big as Mount Meru which, in the summer rains, changes into a mass of worms. 
There exists an infinite number of small animals having short life, coveters after odors and tastes; perceiving an odor, they remember the taste that was associated with it, and they eventually die, coveting these odors and tastes. 
Or rather it is only when the external causes necessary for the birth of worms is brought together in a great amount that the action which should produce exiṣtence among worms enters into activity with a view to their retribution. 
In the same way a certain being accomplishes actions which should be remunerated as a Cakravartin; these action will not enter into activity before the moment of the comsic period has come when human life is twentyfour thousand years in length. 
It is for this reason that the Blessed One declared that the retribution of actions is incomprehensible. 
The Bhadanta Vasumitra says: An intermediate being lasts seven days. 
If the complex of causes necessary to reincarnation has not been realized, then the intermediate being dies and is reborn. 
Other scholars say that it lasts seven weeks. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: As itdesiresbirth, it lasts only a short time and then its life is reincarnated. 
either old actions are such that a birth should take place in such and such a place, and should be of such and such a nature, and, in this case, these actions cause the complex of causes to be realized; oṛ 
rather this determination is absent, and, in this case, birth takes place in another place,and it is of another nature. 
According to others , if the causes have not come together, the intermediate being is born in conditions analogous to those where he would have been reborn. 
Cattle are not born during the rains, nor gods in autumn, nor black bears in winter, nor horses insumrmer. 
But on the other hand, there is no season for buffalos, etc. 
The intermediary being who, if it is the season of rains, would be reborn a cow, is reborn a buffalo; in the same way a jackal instead of a dog,a brown bear instead of a black bear, or an ass instead of a horse. 
We know in fact that existence and intermediate existence are projected by the same action. 
The mind troubled by defilements, goes, through its desire for sex, to the place of its realm of rebirth. 
When the intermediate being is male, it is grippedby a male desire with regard to the mother; when it is female, it is gripped by a female desire with regard to the father; and, inversely, it hates either the father, or the mother, whom it regards as either a male or a female rival. 
As it is said in the Prejñāpti, Then either a mind of lust,or mind of hatred iis produced in the Gandharva. 
When the mind is thus troubled by these two erroneous thoughts, it attaches itself through the desire for sex to the place where the organs are joined together, imagining that it is he with whom they unite. 
Then the impurities of semen and blood is found in the womb; the intermediate being,enjoying its pleasures, installs itself there. 
Then the skandhas harden; the intermediate being perishes; and birth arises that is called reincarnation. 
When the embryo is male, it remains to its right in the womb, with its head forward, crouching; female, to the left of the womb, vagina forward; with no sex, in the attitude in which one finds the intermediate being when it believes it is having sex. 
In fact,when an intermediate being possess all the organs, it then enters as a male or female and places itself as befitting its sex. 
When an intermediate being perishes, it has some organs and so constitutes what is called the firstembryonic stage,or alala.1n the same way the arising of a bud takes place at the same time as the destruction of its seed. 
The organs have different primary elements for their support, as is the case for the organs of leaf worms One would object that the phrase in the Sūtra, mātāpiraśuci kalalasabh is not explained in this hypothesis. 
But the word kalala is placed there to designate some other primary elements that arise reposing on the semen and blood: 
ksksk It is in this manner that beings who are born from wombs and eggs go to the places of their rebirth. 
Other go in their desire for odor or in their desire for residence. 
But how can one desire a residence in hell? 
He is tormented by the cold of rain and wind: he sees a place burning with hot fires and through his desire for warmth, he runs there. 
Orhe is tormented by the heat of the sun and hot winds: he sees a cold place of frozen fires, and through his desire for coolness, he runs there. 
According to the ancient masters, he sees these things in order to experience the retribution of actions that should be retributed in hell; he sees beings similar to him and he runs to the place where they are. 
Intermediate heavenly beingsthose who go towards a heavenly realm of rebirthgo high, like one rising up from a seat. 
Beings in hell hang from their feet. 
As the stanza says, Those who insult Ṛṣis, ascetics and penitents fall into hell head first. 
isk We have said that the intermediary beings who are reincarnated ina feminine womb go there troubled in mind, through their desire for sex. 
The Sūtra teaches that there are four ways to descend into, the womb. 
Here are the four garbhāvakrāāntis that the author teaches, in his Flpka in an order different from that of the Sūtra, Beings born from eggs are always troubled in mind. 
But can we say that a being born from an egg enters into a wmb? 
In the same way that the Sūtra says saskrtam abhisaskaroti, and, in the world, one says, to cook the rice porridge, or to grind the flour. 
What does the full consciousness and the absence of full con sciousness in the entering, in theabiding,and in the leaving consistof? 
A being with little merit enters because he thinks,The wind blows, the heavens rain; it is cold; it storms; people are in an uproar, and because, wishing to avoid these wearinesses, he believes that he is entering into a shelter, a thicket, a hut of roots and leaves, or rather he takes shelter at the foot of a tree or against a wall. 
Then he imagines himself resting in this thicket, in this hut, and eventually leaves it. 
A being who has full consciousness knows that he enters into the womb, that he dwells there, and that he leaves it. 
Three garbhāvakrāntisthe Cakravartin and the two Svayabhūs,by reason of their great purity of action, of kṇowledge, and of action and knowledge. 
The first has a greatoutflowing of merit and he ismade resplendent through actions; the second has knowledge obtained through in ṣtructioṉ, reflection and mediation; and the third has merit, instruction, etc.: 
kskḥ The nonBuddhists, who believe in an ātmean, say, If you admit that a being goes to another world, then the āan in which I beḻieve is proved. 
In fact the Blessed One said, Actions exist, and results exist, but there is no agent who abandons these skandhas here and takes up those skandhas there,independently of the casual relationship of thedharmas. 
Namely, if this exists, then that exists; through the arising of this, there is the arising of that; pratītya samupāda.. 
Only the skgndhas,conditioned by defilement and action, go reincarnating themselves by means of the series of inter mediate existences. 
We say that, in the absence of any āmean, of any permanent principal, the series of conditioned szndhas,made up of defilements and actions , enters into the mothers womb; and that this series, from death to birth, is prolongued and displaced by a series that constitutes intermediate existence. 
There is first the kalala; the arbuda arises from the kalala; the pesśin arises from the arbuda; the ghaṇaarises from the pesin; and from the ghana there arises the praśakhā, hair,bodybair, the nails,etc.,and the materialorgans with their supports. 
Then, when the embryo, this throne, is ripe, there arises within the womb winds arisen from the maturity of action which causes the embryo to turn and places it towards the portal of its birth: 
Sometimes, either through the unfavorable conditions of the mothers eating, or by reason of actions, the embryo perishes. 
Then an expert woman, after having anointed them with all sorts of drugs, puts her hands filled with a sharpened blade into this wound hideous, badsmelling, and wet withall sorts of impurities which is the womb. 
And the series of the embryo, by virtue of aparaparyāyavedanīya action , goes somewhere else. 
The mother and the servants take the newborn baby into their hands which are like knives and acids for this body now as sensible as an open wound. 
thus does he grow. By reason of this development, the organs mature and the defilements enter into activity, from whence actions arise. 
And when the body perishes, the series passes into another existence by reason of these defilements and actions, through the medium of the intermediate existence, as mentioned previously. 
In this way the circle of existence is without beginning. 
In order for it to begin, it would be necessary for the fitst iem to have no cause: 
Now the determination of time and place show that a seed produces a shoot, that a fire produces cooking: hence there is no arising that does not have causes. 
But birth, coming from causes, would not take place if its causes are destroyed, in the same way that a shoot would not arise if its seed is burned. 
kskṣk The series of rkandhas develops in three existences, Pratūyasamutpāda or dependent orgination has twelve parts in three sections or time periods. 
The twelve parts of dependent origination are ignorance , the saskāras, the consciousness, nāmarpa, the six āyatanṉas, coṇtact, sensation, desire, attachment, existence, birth, and old age and death. 
Two for the first, two for the third, and eight for the middle. 
Igroraṅce and the saiskāras existed in a past existence, birth and old age and death will exist in a future existence, and the eight other parts exist in the present existence. 
No, they are not. 
Why is this? 
Ignorance is, in a previous life, the state of defilement. 
All the defilements in factaccompanyignorance, andare activated through ignorance.In the same way, when one says that the king is coming, one understands that his courtiers are accompanying him. 
The sarskāras are, in a previous life, the state of action. 
The series of the previous life, which does good, bad, or neutral actions, constitute the samīskāras. 
The consciousness is the skandhas at conception. 
The five skandhas, in the womb, at the moment of reincarnation from this moment on, until the production of the six āyatanas. 
Nāmarūpa is made up of the five skandhas, in the womb, from arṟising, as long as the six organs are not manifested. 
Sīx āyatanarbefore coming together of the three or contact. 
Desire is the state of one who desires pleasure and sexual union. 
This state of thirst or desire ends when one begins, under the influence of this desire, to search out these pleasures. 
Upādāna orṟ attachmeṉnt is the state of one who runs around in search of the pleasures. 
Running around in this manner He does actions which will have for their result future existence : 
this is bhava. 
The part that receives the name of consciousness ina present existence is called 7ā:i in a future existence. 
Old ageanddeath lasts until sensation. 
How is pratīyasamupāda momentary? 
ksksk It is also said thatprarāṭyasamutpāda is both momentary and serial at the same time. 
Static pratītyasamutpādas made up of the twelve states embracing the five skandhas. 
Among these four, what is the type of pratītyasamutpāda that the Blessed One has herein the Śūra of the Twelve Partsthe intention to teach? 
According to the School, it is static pratīyasamutpāda. 
According to the School the Blessed One distinguishes the twelve parts only with respect to static pratīyasamuṭpāda. 
Because the Sūtra expresses itself in an intentional manner, whereas the Abhidharma teaches the characteristics of things. 
she Why does the Sūtra teach pratūyasamutpāda as only pertaining to living beings?In order to have aberration cease with regard to the past, the future, and the interval in between. 
And it is for thissame reason that it teaches apratīyasamutpāda in three sections. 
Ignorance or aberration relating to the past, as when one asks, DidI exist or not exist in the past? 
How and as what didI exist? 
Will I exist in the future? 
What is this? 
What are we? 
What will we be? 
165 ē This threefold aberration is destroyed by the teaching of the succession: ignorance. 
For its is said in the Sūtra, Whoever, Oh Bhikṣus, knows, through prajñā, praūyasamutpāda aṇd the dharmas produced through dependence, will not turn himself towards the past by asking if he existed. 
ṉ According to others, the last three terms of the middle section, thirst, attachment, and bhava,are also taught in order to cause aberration relating to the future to cease; for they are the causes of future existence. 
Why are cause and result taught at length in the section of present existencetwo parts of defilement, two parts of action, five parts of foundationwhereas, a similar exposition is absent for the past and future? 
In the future, one has two parts for result. 
In two sections, cause and result are abbreviated, for one can infer them from the teaching of the middle. 
Al useless descriptions should be omitted. 
teḥ But if pratītyasamutpāda has only twelve parts, transmigration would have a beginning, since the cause of ignorance is not indicated; and it would have an end, since the result of old age and death is not indicated. Thus one must add new parts, and to infinity. 
No, for the Blessed One has implicitly indicated the cause of ignorance and result of old age and death. 
Defilement arises from defilement, as attachment arises from desire. 
Action arises from defilement,as consciousness from attachment, or the saskārar from ignorance. 
A foundation arises from action, as vrñāṇa from the sa?skāras, or birth from existence. 
sensation from contact, or old age and death from birth. 
Defilement arises from a foundation, as desire from sensation. 
Since such is the manner of existence of the various parts of dependent orgination it is clear that ignorance has either adefilement or a foundation for its cause; it is clear that old age and death for its cause, and, in still another Śūtra, that incoṟrect jadgment has ignorance for its cause. 
But incoṛrrect judgment is not named in the Sūtra in question, the Pratīṭyasamutpādasūtra. 
How is incorrect judgment included in attachment? 
Indeed, it is associated with attachment, but it can as equally well be associated with ignorance or with desire. 
Let us admit that it may be included in attachment, but caṉ onedraw from this the conclusion that the Sūtra,by naming attachment, says that incorrectjudgment is the cause of ignorance? 
Another master speaks next. A Śūtra teaches that ignorance has incorrect judgment for its cause. 
A Sūtra teaches that incorrect judgment has ignorance for its cause and observes that it is produced at the moment of contact, By reason of the eye and a visible thing there is produced a defiledjudgment whicharises from error. 
A Sūtra explains the origin of desire, Desire arises by reason of a sensation which itself arose from a contact wherein there is ig norance. 
Hence the ignoṟrance that coexists with sensation proceeds from the incoṟrect judgment which is produced at the moment of contact. 
Hence ignorance is not without a cause; there is no reason to add a new term:.incoṟrrectjudgment, the cause of ignorance, arise itself from an ignorance designated as aberration. 
In fact, to the Arhats, sensation is ṉot a cause of desire: 
But, says the author, the idea that reasoning, supported on occasion by Sutras, permits omitting indispensable termsin the incorrect judgment in question, with the reciprocal causality of incocrect judḍgment and ignoranceleads to absutdity. 
The true answer to this objectionthat, since there is no indication of any other parts before ignorance and beyond old age and death, sasāra is without beginning or endis the following: 
In fact,doubt with reference to the question of knowing how present existence is conditioned by preceding existence, and how future existence is conditioned by present existence, is the only point that the Sūtra wants teach: 
thus it says, In order to cause error relating to the past, the future, and their interval to cease. 
The Blessed One said, I shall teach you, Oh Bhikṣus, pratītya samutpāda and the dharmas produced in dependence. 
Noṇne, according to the Abhidharma. 
How can futuredharmas which have notyet arisen,be termed produced in dependence, pratīyasamutpanna? 
We would ask you how future dbarmras which are not yet created are called conditoned ? 
Because they are thought by the volition which is termed ābhisaskārā, that is, executing a retribution. 
They are thought by a good mind with a view to acquiring them. 
But then Nirvāṇa itself willbe conditioned, for one desires to acquire it. 
Samutpāda is the cause, whereas samutpanna is the result. 
The part that is a cause is pratīyasamutpāda, because, there takes place arising from it. 
The part that is a result is praīyasaṃutpanna, because it arose; but it s also prasīṣyasamutpāda,because,from it, rising takes place. 
Allthe parts, being cause and result are at one and the same time both pratītyasamutpāda and pratītyasamutpanṇa. 
Without this distinction, nevertheless, there would be nondetermination and on fusion , for a part is not prañyasamutpāda through connection to the part through connection to which it is also pratīṭyasamutpaṉna. 
future dharmas ; 2. 
the last dharmas of the Arhat ;. 
the unconditioned dharmas,. 
to What is pratīyasamutpāda caṉot be pratīṭyasamuṭpanṇa, are these personal theses, fantasies, or the sense of the Sūtra? 
You say in vain that it is the sense of the Sūtra. 
You speak of a static pratṝyasamutpāda of twelve paṟts which are so many states made up of the five skandhas: 
this is in contradiciton to the Sūtra wherein we read, What is ignorance? 
This Sūtra is of explicit sense, clear ; you caṉṇṉot make it a Sūtra whose sense is yet to be deduced. 
Nothing proves that this Sūtra is of clear sense; the fact that itexpresses itself by means of a definition does not prove anything; for the Blessed One gives definitions which solely bear on the essential or major elements of the object to be defined. 
Certainly hair, etc., are still other dharmas,visible things, smells, etc,.but the Blessed One refers to their principal element, which is the earth element. 
This example proves nothing. 
In fact, in the Hastipadopamasūṭra, the Blessed One does not define hair, etc., by the earth element; he does not say What is hair, etc.? 
But he defines the earth element through the hair, etc.; and his definition is complete, for there is no earth element in the body which is not included in the description, hair, etc. 
In fact there is earth element in teaṛs, mucus, etc., as one caṅ see by another Sūtra. 
Why define ignorance as a state with five skandhas by introducing heterogeneous dharmas into ignorance? 
Thus a state having five parts is nota part. 
Whatare the prattyasamutpannas? 
Ignorṟance.. biṟth, and old age and death. 
Would one say that birth and old age and death are not future states? 
This thesis is trne or false according to the manner in which one interprets it.If one means to say that it is aiways by reason of ignorance, etc., that the saṛkāras, etc.,are produced,but not by reason of any other thing, and not without cause; that, in this sense, pratīyasamutpāda is stable, and eternal , we approve. 
If onne means to say that there exists a certain eternal dharma called pratīyasamutpāda, then this opinion is inadmissible. 
For wpāda, production or arising, is a characteristic of anything that is conditioned , an eternal dharma, as arising or pratīyasamupāda would be by supposition, cannot be a characteristic of a transitory or conditioned thing. 
what relationship can one suppose exists between an unconditioned arising and ignorance, etc., a re lationship that would permit one to say pratīpyasamutpāda of ignorance, etc.? 
Now one cannot imagine a harma that, existng before having been produced, goes first towards the pratyayas, and is then produced. 
Leṭ us ask them if that whicharises is presentor future. 
Do you say that a present thing arises? 
If it has not already arisen, how can it be present? 
Iif it has already arisen, how could itbe reborn without being reborn indefinitely? 
Do you say that a future thing arises? 
The meaning of the expression pratīyasamupādais as indicated in the Sūtra, Ifthat exists, then this exists; through the arising of that, there is the arising of this.. 
Thereupon one can say in verse, If you admit that it arises at fitst ṉonexistent, nonexistent it also goes to the prayayas.f you admit that it arises at first existent, arisen, it will continue to rearise; hence there is ṭegression ad infinitum; or rather we shall say that, for us also, it is preexistent to its arising. 
prati has a distributive meaning; sav signifies coming together; ya signifies good at leaving, that which does not last; and the root pad preceeded by 2 signifies appearance, arising. 
a visual consciousness arises By reason of the eye and visible things. 
kei Why does the Blessed One define pratītyasamutpāda in two ways, 1. 
In the first formula, it resultsthat the saskāras exist when ignorance exists; but it does not result that the saskāras come into existence through the sole existence of ignorance. 
According to another explanation, the Blessed One taught in this manner in order to refute the theory of noncausality , the thesis that a thing exists in the absence of a cause, and the theory of one nonarisen cause, such as Prakṛti, Puruṣa, etc. 
The first formula would permit us to say, If the āman exists as a support and if ignorance, etc. 
Through the production of ignorance, the saskāras are produced. 
According to another opinion, the first formula indicates duration, and the second indicatesarising; As long as the flux of causes asts, the fiix of results exists; by the sole productionof a cause, its result is produced. 
We observe that it is a question of arising; the Blessed One said in factr I shall teach you pratīyasamutpāda. 
Further, why would the Blessed Oṇne first teach duration and then arising? Another explanation : The formula: 
From the arising of that, this arises. 
But, ia order to express this sense, the Blessed One shouldhave said, If that exists, then this does not exist; and he should have first indicated the arising of the result. 
How do the saskāras exist by reason of ignorance? How does old age and death exist by reason of birth? Let us briefly answer this question. 
Given the force of the projection of action, the series of the consciousness, due to the series of the intermediary existence, goes into such and such a realm of rebirth, as long as it may be, in the manner in which a flame goes, that is, in a perpetual renewing. 
in thus understanding the consciousness, we are in agreement with the definition that the Pratīyasamuutpādasñra gives for the consciousness: 
The six groups of consciousnesses. 
With the consciousness as an antecedent, nāmarpa arises in this realm of rebirth. This is the five tkendhas,conforming to the definition of the Vibhaṅga: 
Then, through the development of nmarpa, there arises in their times, the six organs: 
Then, encountering their object,a consciousness arises, and, through the coming together of the three , there is contact, which is susceptible of being experienced agreeably, etc. From that, the threefold sensation, agreeable, etc., arises. From this threefold sensation, there arises a threefold desire; desire for kāmma or desire for agreeable sensation of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, in a being tormented by suffering; desire for rpa,or desire for agreeable sensation of the three Dhyāṇas and the sensation of indifference of the Fourth; all desire for Ārūpya. 
Then, from the desire relating to sensation, there arises a fourfold attachment : 
The kāmas are the five objects of pleasure. 
The views, sīxtytwo in number, are asexplainedin theBrahmajālasra.Śūais tejecting immorality ; vrata īs the vow to act like a dog, a bull, etc.; for example the Nirgranthas and their nudity, the Brāhmaṇas with their staffs and antelope hides, the Pāśupātas with their tuft of hair and their ashes, the Parivṛājakas with their three staffs and their nudity, and the rest: 
According to another opinion, āmavāda is both a view of soul and thoughts pertaining to a soul , for it is by reason of these two that one says ātman, that one affirms the existence of an ātman : 
It is said in fact, The fool, the ignorant, the Pṛthagjana, conforming to the manners of vulgar speech, thinks me, or mine; but there is not any me or mine. 
The Sūtra says, Ānanda, action that produces a new existence is the nature of bhava. 
By reason of bhava, and by means of the descent of the con sciousness, future arising is biṟth, which is made up of the five skandhas, being nāmarūpa in nature. 
Because of birth, there is old age and death as defined in the Sūtra. 
The nonvidyā, that which is not vidyā. 
Impossible; for the eye is also nonvidyā. 
It is an absence of vdyā, ignorance. 
This is also impossible, for an absence is not a thing and avśdyā must be a thing, since it is a cause. 
Thus Avidyāis aseparate entity , the opposite of vidyā or knowledge, like a nonfriend, the untrue, etc. 
Ṛa or satyais ttuth; nontruth is speech contrary to true speech; so too nonrighteousness , nonuseful and the nottobe done are the opposite of righteousness, useful, and duty. 
Further, Because it is declared to be bound , etc. 
, a latent defilement , a canker , a torrent or flood , and a yoke. 
Thus ignorance cannot be a mere negatiom; it cannot be everything that is not vidya, the eyes, etc. Yet the prefix aīthe privative ahas a pejorative sense. 
One terms a bad wife a nonwife , and a bad son, a nonson. 
Avidyāis bot bad prajñā,because this is seeing. 
Now avidyā or ignorance is certainly not seeing, for ignorance and seeing are two distinct yokes. 
This is impossible, Because views are associated with ignorance, In fact moha , which is defined as aviyā is among the mahābhāmika kleśas ; now all the mahābhūmika kleśas are associated with them, thus vṅdyā is associated with seeing which is prsjñā n nature, thus avidyā īs not prajñā,for two items of prajñā cannot be associated. 
The Sūtra says, The mind defiled by desire is not liberated; pr4j0ā defiled by ignoranceis not purified. Now prajñācannotbe defiledby prajñā. 
if desire isa defiement of the mind, then desire is not the mind; if ignorance is a defilement of prujñā, then ignorance is not prajñā. 
Good prajñā can be mixed with defiled prajñā, as when moments of good and defiled prajñ succeed one another. 
In the same way, when one says that a mind defiled by desire is not liberated, one is speaking of a mind that is not necessarily associated with craving, but which is oppressed by craving. 
When an ascetic avoids craving, , then the mind is liberated. 
In the same way prajñā, defiled by ignorance , is not pure: 
The scholar who maintains that ignorance is all the defilements is refuted at the same time. 
If ṟgnoṟance is allthe defilements, itcannot be named separately among the yokes , etc.; it is not associated with views and with the other defilements; Scripture should not say, The mind, defiled by desire, is not liberated, but rather, The mind defiled by ignorance. 
If you hold that ignorance is a separate dharma, and not merely a certain type of prajñā, you should define it. Ignorance is the nonsarprakhyāna.of the Four Truths, the Three Jewels, of action and its result. What is nonsaeprakhyāna? It is notsaūprakhyāna, nor absenceofsarprakhyāna, ia the same way that gvdyā is not nonvidyā oṟ absenceofvrdyā.It is then a ceṟtain separate dharma, the opposite of saprakhyāna. 
Forexample, the eye is defined as the pure pa that serves as a support for the eye consciousness because one does not know this invisible pa except through inference. 
As the Sūtra says, I know, I see through the perfectabandoning and the perfect knowledge of desire, of views, wayanās, attachments and latent defilements to the idea of self , to the idea of mine , to asmināna,? 
Because one cannot identify zayanā with any other defilement, since it is named separately from desire, views, and asmimṇa. 
As for nāmarūpa, rūpa has alteady been explained. 
Nāman are the skandhas that are not rāpa. 
The nonmaterial skandhar bend, , towards the object by reason of name , the organs, and the object. 
Ñ In this phrase, by reason of name, one takes the word nare in its popular sense, , as a designation, which designates and causes to be understood either a collection, cattle, hoṟses, etc., ora single thing, rpa, taste, etc. 
Why is sajñākaraṇa termed name? 
According to another explanation, the nonmaterial sbondhas are termed nāman, because, then the body dissolves, these skundhas bend, that is, go towards another existence. 
We have already explained the six āyatanas. 
There are six contacts. 
The first is the contact of the eye, and the sixth is contact of the maṇas oṟ mind They arise from the coming together of three things, an oṟgan, its object, and a consciousness. 
Opne can see indeed that there can be a coring together of the five material oṟrgans, with their objects and their corresponding con sciousnesses, for the three are simultaneous. 
manas is destroyed when a mental consciousness arises ; and the object of this con sciousness can be future: 
how can there be a coming together of the three? There is e coming together because the organ and the. 
Otherssay: Contact is a dharmma associated with the mind , distinct from any coming together. 
According to the ŚSūra of the Six Hexades, The six internal sources of consciousness , the six external sources of consciousness , the six consciousness, the six contacts, the six sensations, and the six desires. 
Every eye and visible thing is not the cause of a visual consciousness, as all visual consciousness is not the result of the eye and a visible thing. 
Five are contact through contact; the sixth is socalled through denornination. 
The contact of the eye, the ear, etc., have sapratigha oṟgans for their support ; thus they are termed praśgha sparfa taking their name from their support. 
The sixth, the contact of the mental organ, is called adhivaca nasasparśa. 
Now name is the object par excellence of contact associated with the mental consciousness. 
In fact it is said, Through the visual consciousness, he knows blue; but he does not know, It is blue; through the mental consciousness, he knows blue and he knows, It is blue. 
According to another opinion, one takes into account the fact that only the mental consciousness is activated withregard to its objects , or applies itself to its object,by reason of expression or speech : 
mental consciousness is thus adhvacana.The contact that is associated with it is thus called adhvacanasasparśa. 
The sixth contact is of three types: 
which are respectively pure, defiled, other. 
These are the contacts associated with vidyā, that is, with pure prañā, with avidyā, that is, with defiled nonknowledge; and with naivavidyānāvidyā, that is, with good, but impure prujñā. 
esicḥ In considering the contact of nonknowledge which is associated with all the defilements and which is always active, one distinguishes the two: 
Contacts of antipathy and sympathy which are associated with hatred and with desire. 
Contact in its totality, is threefold. Three contacts, leading to pleasure , etc. These are contacts that lead to the acquisition of pleasure, of suffering, and of neither pleasure nor suffering. 
These contacts are so called because they are beneficial to pleasure, to suffering, and to neither pleasure nor suffering ; oṟ rather because that is felt or can be felt . 
We have defined the sixfold contact, contact of the eye, etc. 
Five are bodily sensations and one is mental. 
The five sensations that arise from the contact of the eye and from the other bodily oṟgans, having for support the bodily organs, are bodily. 
its support is the rnind so it is mental or cwitasī. 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that sensation and contact are sitnul taneous, being sahabhūhetu, reciprocal causes. 
How can two things arisen together be that which produces and that which is produced ? 
Why would they not be? 
When two things arise together, how could the dharma which produces have any efficacy with regard to the dharma to be produced, which has already arisen? 
It says, By reason of the contact of the eye, there atises a sensation which arises from the contact of the eye; it does not say, By reason of the sensation which arises from the contact of the eye, the contact of the eye arises. 
And again the thesis that Two things arisen together can be cause and result is in contradiction to the characteristics of a cause. 
It is taken for granted that the dharma which produces another dharma is not simultaneous to this other dharma: 
a seed precedes its shoot; milk precedes dadhi; a bbow precedes the noise; and the znas precedes the mental consciousness . 
We do not deny that a cause is sometimes earlier than its result; but we affirm that a cause and its result can be sirmultaneous: 
the visual organ and color precede the visual consciousness; but the primary elements and derived matter, which are simultaneous, arise together from a complex of earlier causes. 
Contact and sensation are simultaneous, like the shoot and its shade. 
Āccording to another opinion, : Sensation is later than contact. 
for there is consciousness in the secondand third moment, but sensation only in the third. 
And all consciousness is not contact, for there is contact only in the first two moments. 
No.One sensation,having for its cause an earlier contact, exists at the moment of a later contact: 
thus all contact is accompanied by sensation. 
a sensation produced by earlier contact of color would exist at the moment of a second contact of sound. 
Now a sensation produced by a contact of color should have this color for its object, for a sensation cannot have an object different from the object of the consciousness with whichit is associated. 
Let us say then that consciousness is not altways contact, and that it is notalways accompanied by sensation. 
This rule establishes that ten dharmas,sensation, contact, idea, etcare associated with every mental state. 
Oṉ the Śāstra or Abhidharma. 
For the Blessed One said that recourse is to the Śūtra. 
; three other bhmis, good, bad, and neutral ; and threeother bhmis,of Śaikṣas, Aśaikṣas, and neitherŚaikṣanorAśaikṣa. 
are called mahābhmika ; those which are found only in a good bhūmi aṟe called kuśalamahābhūmika , those which are found only in a defiled bhūmi are called kleśamahā bhūmika. 
If sensation is later than contact, you have to take into account the Sūtra, By reason of the eye and visible things there arises visual consciousness; the coming together of the three is contact; together there arises sensation, ideas, volitioṉ. 
This Sūtra say that sensation, ideas and volition arise together; it does not say that they arise together with contact: we say that they arise together among themselves. 
Let us observe also that the word together is used, not only to indicate simultaneity, but also to indicate immediate succession. 
The Sūtra, for example, says, He cultivates the part of Bodhi called mindfulness together with compassion. 
But the Sūtra says, The dharmas of sensation, ideas, volition, and consciousness are mixed; they are not separate. Mixed signifies arisen together. From this Sūtra we conclude that there are no consciousnesses, seṅsations, ideas or volitions which are ṉot simultaneous. 
But what is the meaning of the word mixed, sasrṣṭa? 
We read in the Sūtra that you have just quoted, That which he feels , he thinks of ; that about which he thinks, he grasps an idea of ; that about which he grasps an idea of, he discerns. In other words, the same thing is the object of sensation, volition, and consciousness. 
Furthermore the Sūtra says, The coming together of the three is contact. 
How could. there be a consciousness without there being acoming together of the three? How could there be encounter of the three without there being contactD? 
Thus all consciousness is accompanied by contact and allcontact isaccompanied by sensation, etc. 
Let us return to our subject. 
We have explained, in summaty, mental sensation. This same sensation is of eighteen types by reason of the objects of the mind. 
Mental sensation is made up of eighteen types, because there are six upavicāras of satisfaction , six of dissatisfaction ,and six of indifference : 
How does one distinguish these eighteen? 
In considering their nature, their quality of being sensation, the upavicāras are three: 
What is the meaning of the expression manopavicāra? 
2.But why is the skha of the ThirdDhyāna , which is of the sphere of a single zanas, not placed among the anopavicāra? 
3.But, if thepavicāras are only of the sphere of the manas,you have to take into account the Sūtra which says, Having seen visible things through the eye, he considers the visible things which satisfy.The relationship is characterized, in the Sūtra, by the visual organ and by pavicāra. 
The Blessed One expresses himself in this manner because he takes into consideration the fact that the upavicāras can be produced by the five sense consciousnesses. 
in the same way, for example, that the zfwbhās ,whichare produced by the visual consciousness, are of the sphere of the wanas: 
II it were otherwise, a being in Kāmadhātu could not consider the visible things, sounds and tangible things of Rūpadhātu , anda being of Rūpadhgtu would not be able to consider the smells and tastes of Kāmadhātu; 4. 
It is not doubtful that, having seen a visible thing, one cannot consider the sound relative to odor and the three relative to taste, since odors and tastes do not exist in Rūpadhātu. 
Three, namely the dharmanopavicāras, ca have Ārūpyadhātu for their object, but not the fifteen others, since visible things, etc., do not exist in Ārūpyadhātu. 
ṅt In Rūpadhātu, one must distinguish the first two Dhyāṇas and the last two. 
In two Dhyānas, twelve. 
All have Kāmadhātu for their object. 
Eight have their own Dhātu for their object. 
Eight of them can have Rūpadhātu for their object, with the exception of the pavicāras of odor and taste. 
ā Two have Ārāpyadhātu for their object.9 Two can have Ārūpyadhātu for their object, namely the dharmo pavicāras of satisfaction and indifference. 
But, in the other two Dhyānas, six. 
Kāmadhātu is the object of six. 
There remains then the six pavicāras of indifference which have the visible things,sounds, odors, tastes, tangible things, anddharmnas of Kāmadhātu for their object. 
Of their own Dhātu, four. 
The highest Dhūtu is the object of one. 
kskḥ In Ārūpyadhātu,one must distinguish the preliminary absorption of Ākāśānantyāyatana and the absorption which follows it: 
In the preliminaty stage of Ārūpyadhātu In the Kārikā, the word urāpsāmanta signifies Ākāśānantyāyata nasāmantaka. 
four have Rūpadhātu for their object This is the opinion of the masters who think that the mind of this absorption is vyavacchinnālambana, that is, that it considers visible things, sounds, etc., separately. 
it considers the five skandhas of the Fourth Dhyāna without any distinction; for these masters, this absoṟption is thus made up of only one pavicāra which has for its object the Fourth Dhyāna, namely the dharmopavicāra of mixed objects. 
In this same absorption, in Ārūpyadhātu, there is only the dharmopavicāra. 
In Ārūpyadhātu itself, one, In the principle Dhāṭu, or Ārūpyadhātu itself, there is only one pavicāra, dharmopavicāra which has its own Dhūātu for its object. 
which has Ārūpyadhātu for its object. 
As we shall see, the mind, in the principle absorption of Ārūpyadhātu, does not grasp lower Dhātus for its object. 
All of these eighteen are impure. 
One can decide any other case on the basis of these principles. 
A being in one sphere of Dhyāna is in possession of a single upavicāra of Kāmadhātu, the dharmopavicāra of indifference associated with a mind capable of creating fictive beings. 
It is in this way that the Vaibhāṣikas understand the upavicāras; but we understand the Sūtra in a different way. 
One cannot say of one who is detached from an object, a visible thing, etc., thathe produces pavicāras with regard to this object. 
By distinguishing those states of satisfaction, dissatisfaction, and indifference on the basis of those which have craving for their principle component and those which have leaving for their principal component, we have the thirtysix points of the Master , so called because this distinction has been taughtby the Master. 
krk The divisions of the parts of existence called sensation, and which we have just described, are still very numerous. 
The others have been explained or will be explained later. 
The consciousness and the six āyatanashave been explained in the rsfīk We have said that pratīyasamutpāda is defilement , action and a substantial entity. 
It is explaiped that defilement is like a seed,a Nāga, a root, a tree, a husk of grain. 
As a stalk, leaves, etc., arise from a seed, so too defilernent arises from defilement, action, and a real, substantial entity. 
A pond where Nāgas live does not dry up; in thesame way the ocean of births where thisNāga which is defilement remains does not dry up. 
The tree whose root is not cut off continues to grow even through one cuts and recuts its greenery; in the same way, as long as this root, defilement, is not cut off, the realms of rebirth continue to grow. 
A tree gives forth fliowers and fruits at different times; in the same way it is not at one and the same time that this tree, the defilement, gives forth a defilement, action aṇd a substantial entity. 
Graiṇ, even though intact, does not germinate when it is stripped of its husk; in the same way action must be associated with this husk which is defilement in order to bear fruit in a new existence. 
Action is like grain with its husk, grass, flower. 
Action is like grain with its husk. It is like grass that dies when the fruit is ripe: in the same way, when the action has matured, it no longer matures any more. 
Īt is like a flower, the immediate cause of the arising of the fruit. 
The substantial entity is like food and drink. 
The series of the skandhas, in its continual process, is only a succession of the four existences that we have defined , namely inteṟmediate existence , existence as arising , existence in and of itself , and existence at death. 
37d Among the four existences, existence as arising is always defiled, and by all the defilements of the sphere to which it belongs. 
When arising takes place in a certain sphere , all the defilements of this sphere defile it. 
The other existences are of three types. Intermediate existence , existence in and of itself , and existence at death can be good, bad, or neutral. 
Three in the Ārūpyas. 
With the exception of intermediate existence. 
All four existences exist in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
Food by the mouthful of intermediate beings , the food of the gods, and the food of humans at the beginning of the cosmic age is subtle, because this food, like oil poured out into the sand, completely penetrates into the body and does not give forth any excrement. 
Oṟ rather the food of subtle beings is subtle, for example a being born from moisture , one newlyborn , etc. 
Food by the mouthfuls exists in Kāmadhātu; it consists of three āyatanas. 
Only beings free from desire with regard to this food arise in the two higher Dhātus; thus this food exists only in Kāmadhātu. 
In fact, odors, tastes and tangible things are put in the mouththat is, in piṇḍas or small ballsand then swallowed. 
This twofold operation is made by the mouth and the nose which separate the morsels. 
But how does one attribute the quality of food to odors, etc., which are also found in shade and warm light , in flames , and in the light ? 
But we think that, even though they are not swallowed, iike the others, since they contribute to the duration of a being, these odors are included in the category of subtle food; as for example bathing and unguents. 
But why is rāpāyatana,a visible thing not a food? 
Rāpāyatana is not food, for it comfo1ts neither its organ nor those delivered. 
If visible thing were to performn the function of food when one sees it, it would comfort persons delivered from the desire for mouthfuls of food, namely the Anāgāmins and Arhats, as odors, tastes, etc. 
In the three Dhātus, contact, volition, and coṉsciousness, when they are imputre, are food. 
Contact is what arises from the cooperation of the three ; mental volition is mental action ; and con sciousness is the consciousness skandha. 
Why are they not food when they are pure? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say, Food signifies that which makes existence grow; now if it were pure, it have the destruction of existence for its result. 
It refers to antarābhava, intermediate existence or being, which the Blessed One designated by five names: 
An intermediate being is called manomayau, because he is produced by the anas alone, and because he exists without being supported by any exterior element, semen, blood, flower, etc. 
He is called abhinirvrṣti,because his nsrvṛtti or arising is witha view toarising proper. 
That abhinirvrtti signifies an intermediate being results from the Sūtra After having realized a painful body, he will be reborn in a painful world; and also from the Sūtra that says, Such a petson has abandoned the bonds which cause abhiānirvṛtti, without having abandoned the bonds which cause papatti or existence. 
in a painful world; and also from the Sūtra that says, Such a person has abandoned the bonds which cause ubhinrvrtt, without having abandoned the bonds which cause upapatti or existence. 
There are four cases: 
According to another explanation, the bhātas are the Arhats: 
the word sabhavaiṣin designates all beings who desire , and who are as a consequence reborn. 
What are the foods that fulfill these two functions of causing to last and favoring ? 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the four foods perform these two functions. 
Food by the mouthful has for its result the reexistence of those who are attached to it. 
The Blessed One said, The four foods are the root of sickness, abcesses, and thorns. ; and are the condition of old age and death. 
Once upon a time there was a man, who in a time of poverty desired to go to another land. But he was exhausted by his hunger and his two sons were young. Feeling that he was going to die, he filled a sack with ashes, placed this sack on a wall,and encouraged his sons by telling them ṭthat this sack contained grain. 
The two children, through hope, lived a long time. 
But another man came and took the sack and opened it. The children saw that it was ashes, and their hope being crushed, they died. 
So too oṅce upon a time some merchants travelled by ship on the open sea; tormented by hunger and thirst, they saw in the distance a mass of foam andbelieved that it was a river; hope gave them the force to go to that place and prolong their life; but, arriving, they found out what it was, and their hopes being crushed, they died. 
We also read in the Sargīiparyāya, Large marine animals reach firm ground, lay their eggs on the beach, bury them in the sand, and go back to the ocean. 
If the mother forgets the eggs, they will perish. This edition cannot be correct, foṛ 
it is impossible that the mind of another would be food. 
Thus we should read, If the eggs think of their mother, they will not perish; but if they forget their mother, they will perish. 
Why did the Blessed One teach that the foods are four in number? 
Food by the mouthful makes the body grow, while coatact makes the mind grow. 
These two foods which cause that which is born to live, and which are similar to a wetnurse, are the major items for the duration of a being who is born. 
Mental volitionalaction which is active, projects a new existence; this new existence, thus projected, is produced from the seed which is the consciousness informed through action. 
Mental volitional action and the consciousness are thus the two foods which cause birth, which are similar to a mother, and which are the major items for the production of the existence of a being who has not yet been born. 
Is everything which is by the mouthful food? 
There are mouthfuls which ate notfood. Four cases: 
Is there contact, mental volitional action, and consciousness, which has for its result the growth of the organs and the increase of the elements, without this contact, etc., being food? 
ssksk That which consumed is harmful to one who has consumed it nevertheless receives the name of food. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, in fact, it is for two moments that the thing consumed performs the function of food: 
How many foods are there is the different ealms of rebirth, and in the different wombs? 
All are in all How can you say that there is, in the hells, food by the mouthful? 
The red balls of fire and molten copper are food. 
If this is the case, if that which is harmful is food, then the theory of the four cases is rejected, as well as the definitions of the Prakaraṇagrantha which says, What is food by the mouthful? 
These definitions, in fact, are applied to food insofar as it increases. 
But the objects of consummation which have for their result to diminish, nevertheless possess, in the hells, the characteristics of food: 
they dispel, at least for a time, hunger and thirst. 
Further, in the prādefika ells , food by the mouthful exists as among humans. Hence food by the mouthful exists in the five realms of rebirth. 
This explanation is inadmissable; for the expression a Prthag jana.. 
Were it to have such a value, we do not see why the Sūtra would teach that a gift made to an infinite number of Pṛthagjanas is more meritorious that one made to a smaller number, to one hundred Ṛṣis: 
According to thesecond opinion, the Pṛthagjana inquestion is the Bodhisattva close to Bodhi. 
infact a gift made to such a Bodhisattva is of incalcalable merit, and is of a merit superior to a gift made to one hundred ois of Arṟhats. 
Thus, say the Vaibhāṣīkas, this Prthagjana is the person who has obtained the socalled nrvedhabhāgīya roots of good. 
the wordjambuṣaṇḍagata,seatedunder the Jambu tree, refers to but one Bodhisattva, The Bodhisattva is a Pṛthagjana, detached from Kāmadhātu: 
we observe that, to proceed with these compaṛrisons, the Sūtra does not further speak of a fambuṣaṇḍagata. 
ksk We have seen what the pratīyasamutpāda of beings is, and how beings last. 
We have seen also how death results frm the exhaustion of life , etc. 
It remains for us to say which consciousness is present at the moments of death and birth. 
Breaking, taking up again, detachmeṇnt, loss of detach ment, death and birth are regarded as proper to the mind consciousness. 
It is through a single mental consciousness that the breaking and the taking up again of the roots of good take place; the detachment either from a Dhātu, or from a bhmi , and the loss of this detachmeṉt; and death and birth. 
it is useless to speak of it, Death and birth, with the sensation of indifference. 
The term yuea is the equivalent of cyati or death; the term xudbhava is the equivalent of wpapatti, arising. 
The mind consciousness, at death and at birth, is associated with the sensation of indifference, xpekṣa, that is, with the sensation that is neither agreeable nor disagreeable. 
This sensation is not active; the other sensations are active and, as a consequence, an aṛising and a dying consciousness cannot be associated with them, for, in this hypothesis, it would itself be active. 
Death and birth take place in the mind consciousness ,. 
There is no longer any death or birth for one without thought,. 
The state of nonthought is also incompatible with birth, for it is lacking any cause for the cutting off of the mind, and because there cannot be a birth without defilement. 
Concerning the death of the Arhat, He obtains Nirvāṇa in two neutral minds. 
At least according to the masters who believe that, in Kāmadhātu, a vipākaja mind can be indifferent ; but, for the masters of an opposing opinion , one caṉṉot obtain Nirvāṇa in an aryāpathika miṇḍd. 
Because this type of mind, being very weak, is suitable to the cutting off of the mind, that is, to the definitive cutting off of the mind. 
In which part of the body does the consciousness perish at death? 
When death or falling takes place at once, the kāyendriya perishes at the same time as does the manṅās. 
43c When death is gradual, the anas dies in the feet, at the mavel, in the heart, accordingly as the being goes below, among humans, among the Suras, or is not reborn. 
The consciousness of these beings dies respectively, in the feet, the navel, or in the heart. 
Aja,who is not reborn, is the Arhat: his consciousness also dies in the heart; but according to another opinion, ia the head. 
The consciousness dies through the de struction of the organ of touch, which takes place in a certain place. 
Towards the end of life, the organ of touch perishes bit by bit; at the end it remains only in a certain part of the body where it finishes by disappearing; in the same way water placed on a hot rock diminishes gradually and finishes by disappearing in a certain place. 
It is thus that gradualdeath takes place; in general, thedying person is afflicted by some sensations which break the vital parts. 
The vital parts are split by water, etc. 
Marmāṉṇi oṟ vital parts, are those parts of the body which canṉot be damaged without death ensuing. 
When one of the elements,water, fire or wind,is extremely troubled, the vital parts are as if they were split by terrible sensations which are like sharpknives. 
parts are split, we do not mean to say that they are split lke wood. Rather one should understand that they are henceforth incapable of activity quite as if they were split. 
Because there are only three doṛar, namely bile, phlegm, and wind, which are in order the elements of water, fire, and wind. 
The vital parts of the gods are not split. 
kḥrk The Blessed One classified beings who arise, last, and die, into three categories: 
An Āryan and one guilty of ānantarya transgressions are predestined, the first to health, the second to loss. 
What is an Āryan? 
He is an Āryan because he has gone far from evil, since he possesses disconnection from the defilements. 
But a person who acquires the mokṣabhāgīyas will also certainly obtain Nirvāṇa. 
The hellish, animal, and Preta realms of rebirth. 
A person who commits āṉantaryatraṇsgressions will cerainly be reborn in hell; he is thus predestined to loss. 
We have described the world of human beings; let us pass to a description of the receptacle or physical worṟld. 
Here is how it is thought that the receptable world is aṟranged: at the bottom there is a circle of wind, immeasurable, with a height of sixteen hundred thousand leagues. 
It is sixteen thousand yojanas thick; it is immeasurable in circurmference; and it is solid: 
a ahānagna could strike at it with his vafra and his vajra would break without the circle of wind being scratched. 
The cixcle of water, eleven hundred twenty thousand high. 
By the predominate actions of beings, there falls from massed clouds, upon the circle of wind, a rain the drops of which are like the shafts of a carriage. 
This water forms a circle of water, with a thickness of eleven hundred twenty thousand yojanas. 
How do these waters not flow over the edge? 
Some say that the waters are sustained by the force of theactions of beings, as food and drink which do not fallin the intestines before being digested. 
According toanother opinion, the waters are sustained by the wind, like grain in a basket. 
Then the water, agitated by a wind which the force of actions gīves rise to, becomes gold in its upper part, as churned milk becomes cream: 
Then, the ciEcle of waters is no more than eight hundred thousand leagues in height; the rest becornes gold. 
Then there is above the circle of water now reduced to eight hundred thousand yojanas, a sphere of gold, three hundred twenty thousand yojanas thick. 
47a The ciṟcle of water and gold have a diameter of twelve hundred three thousand four hundred and fifty leagues; triple for its perimeter. 
These two circles have the same dimensions. 
On the circular sphere of gold which thus rests on the water, 48b There are Meru, Yugandhara, Īṣādhara, Khadiraka, Mount Sudarśana, Aśvakarṇa, Vinataka, and Mount Nimin dhara; beyond are the continents; on the edge is Cakravāḍa. 
Nine great mountains rest on the sphere of gold. 
In the center there is Meru; concentrically, the other seven are atranged around Meru; Nimindhara forms the exterior rim that envelops Meru and the six inner wallmountainswhence its name. 
Beyond lie the four continents. 
49d Seven mountains are made of gold; the last is made of iroṉ; and Meru is made of four jewels. 
Yugandhara and the six mountains that surround it are made of gold; Cakravāḍa is made of iron; Meru has four faces which are respectively, from porth to west, made of gold, silver, lapis and cristal. 
Each of these substances gives its own color to the part.of space which faces it. 
Since the face of Meṟu which is turned towards Jambudvīpa is made of lapis, our heaven is thus similar in color to lapis. 
What is the origin of the different substances that make up Meru? 
The waters which have fallen on the sphere of gold are rich in different potentialities; under the action of the winds which possess different efficacies, they disappear and make room for different jewels. 
This thesis is not correct. 
Why is it not coṟṟect? 
The gold, silver, jewels and the land thus formed are brought together and piledin heaps by the winds which are produced by the force of actiohs. They meke up the mountains and the continents. 
Meru is immersed in the water to a depth of twenty four thousand leagues and rises above the water some eighty thousand leagues. 
The mountains have equal width and height. The mountains rest on the sphere of gold and are in the water to a depth of eighty thousand yoanas. 
Meṟu rises out of the water for the same number of yojanas, and is thus, both in and out of the water, one hundred sixty thousand Jojanas in beight. 
Yugandhara rises out of the water for forty thousand yojanas,Īṣādhara for twenty thousand yojanas and thus following until Cakravāḍa which rises out of the water for three hundred twelve yojanas and a half. 
The mountains are as wide as they extend out of the water. 
51c The seven Sītās, of which the first is of eighty thousand leagues, form the interval between the mountaims. 
cold, clear, light, tasty, sweet, not fetid, and harming neither the throat nor the stomach. 
The first,between Meru and Yugandhara, is eighty thousand leagues in width. 
In exterior circurmferance, to the shore of Yugandhara, it is triple this, thus two hundred forty thousand yojanas. 
The size of the other Sītās diminishes by a half: 
The seven Śītās are the inner ocean. 
The rest, that is, the water between Nimindhara and Cakravāḍa, is the great outer sea; it is full of salt water, and is three hundred twentytwo thousand yojanas wide. 
cṅ 53b There is Jambudvīpa, three sides of two thousand, in the form of a carriage, and one side of three and a half; eastern Videha, like a halfmoon, three sides like Jambu, and one side of three hundred fifty; Godānīya, of seven thousand five hundred, round, with a diameter of two thousand five hundred; and Kuru, of eight thousand, square, parallel In the outer sea, corresponding to the four sides of Meru, there are four continents : 
Eastern Videha or Pūrvavideha has the shape of a halfmoon; it has three sides of two thousand yojanas, thus of the same dimension as the long side of Jambu, and one side of three hundred fifty yojanas. 
Godānīya, which faces the western side of Meru, is round like the moon; it is seven thousand five hundred yoanṇas , and two thousand five hundred through the center. 
its sides, of two thousand yojanṇar each, form a circumferance of eight thousand yojanas. 
Such is the shape of the continents, and such is the shape of the faces of the persons who reside in them. 
There are eight intermediate continents: Dehas, Videhas, Kurus, Kauravas, Cāmaras, and Avaracāmaras, Śāṭhas and Uttaramaṇtrins. 
Dehas and Videhas are located on both sides of Pūrvavideha; Kurus and Kauravas on the sides of Uttarakuru; Cāmaras and Avaracāmaras on the sides of Jambudvīpa; and Śāṭhas and Uttaramantrins on the sides of Godāṇnīya. 
All of these continents are inhabited by human beings. 
Here, to the north of the nine antMountains, lie the Hirmavat; beyond it,but on this side of the Mountain of Perfume, is a lake deep and wide by fifty leagues. 
By going toward the north in this Jambudvīpa, one encounters three antMountains, ; then three other antMountains; then three other again; and finally the Himavat. 
Beyond that, this side of the Gandhamādana , liesLake Anavatapta from whence there flows out four great rivers, the Gaṅgā, the Śindhu, the Vakṣu and the Sītā. 
This lake, fifty yojanas wide and deep, is full of a water endowed with the eight qualities. Only persons who possess magicalpowers can go there. The Jambu tree is located near this lake. 
Our continent receives its name of Jambudvīpa, either from the tree, or from the fruit of the tree which is also called Jambu. 
xskṣk Where are the hells, and what are their dimensions? 
At the bottom, at twenty thousand leagues, is Avīci, of this same dimension; above; the seven hells; all eight have sixteen utsadas. 
Beneath Jambudvīpa, at a distance of twenty thousand yojanar, lies the great hell Avīci.It is twenty thousandyyojanas high and wide; its sun is.thus found forty thousand yojanas below the sun of Jambudvīpa. 
Suffering is interrupted in the other hells. 
In Sajīva, for example, bodies are first ctrushed and reduced to dust; then a cold wind revives them and gives them feeling: from whence the name of Sajīva; 2. 
Above Avīci areseven hells one above the other: 
According to another opinion, these seven hells are placed at the same level as Avīci. 
Each of the eight hells has sixteenuwṣsadas. 
There aṟe eight hells there that armed with swords, lances and javelins, who push back the damned who would getout. 
Whether they plunge iato the water oremerge,whether they go up or down the current,whether they travers in the twodirectioas or are tossed about, thedamned are boiledand cooked, as the grains of sesame or corn poured into a cauldron placed over the fire. 
The river encircles the great hell like a moat. The four wsadas are sixteen in number by reason of their difference of place, since they are iocated at the four gates to the great hell. 
According to Manoratha , after having been shut up in the hells, the damned then fall into the w5adas. 
Are the guardians of hell beings? 
They are not beings. 
Through the actions of beings, like the wind of creation.1 Then how do you explain what the Venerable Dhārmasubhūti said, Those who are angry, who take pleasure in cruel actions and transgressions, who rejoice in the sufferings of others, are reborn as Yamarākṣasas?11 The demons who torment the beings in hell are not termed Yamarākṣasas, the guardians of hell as you think; but rather the servants of Yema who, on the order of Yama, throw the damned into hell. 
TWhere does the retribution of the cruel acts take place that these guardians commit in the hells? 
Since the retribution of ṉantarya transgressions takes place in these hells, why would the retribution of the actions of the guardians not be possible here? 
But why are not the guardians, who are found in the midst of fire, burned? 
There are eight other hells, the cold hells, Arbuda, etc. 
These hells are called Arbuda, Nirarbuda, Aṭaṭa, Hahava, Huhuva, Utpala, Padma, and Mahāpadma. 
aṟa These cold helis are located under Jambudvīpa, on a level with the great hells. 
How is there place, under a single Jambudvīpa, for the hells which are indeed wider than Jambudvīpa? 
The continents,like piles of grain,are wider at their bases. The great ocean does not sink into a deep, steep cavity around the continents. 
The sixteen hells are created through the force of the actions of beings ; there are hells.the prādeśika hells,created through the force of individual actions, the actions of one being, of two beings,of many beings. 
Their variety is great; their place is not determined: river, rountain, desert, and elsewhere. The principal place of the hells is below. 
As for the animals, they have three places, the land, the water, and the air. 
Their principal place is the Great Ocean; the animals that are elsewhere are the surplus of the animals.1 The king of the Pretas is called Yama; his residence, which is the principal dwelling of the Pretas, is located five hundred leagues under Jambudvīpa; it is five hundred leagues deep and wide. 
The Pretas differ much one from another; certain of them possess supernatural powers and enjoy a glory similar to that of the gods; see the Avadānas of the Pretas. 
Upon the wind. 
The collective force of the actions of beings ptoduces the winds which create the moon, the sun and the stars in heaven.All these astral bodies revolve around Meru as if transported by a whirlpool. 
What is the distance from here to the moon and the sun? 
At midMeru lie the moon and the sun. 
The moon and the sun move at a level with the summit of Yugandhara. 
What are their dimensions? 
Fifty and fifty and one leagues. 
The disk of the moon is of fifty yojanas; the disk of the sun is of fiftyone yojanas. The smallest among the houses of the stars is of one krośa ;. 
The force of the actions of beings forms, smaller than and external to the house of the suṇ, a disk of firestone, hot and luminous; and, for the house of the moon, a disk of waterstone, cold and luminous. 
Their function, according to circuamstances, is to cause to arise and last the eye, the body, fruits, flowers, crops, and herbs; and to destroy them. 
In auniverse with its four continents there isa singlesun and a single moon. 
Yet the sun does not fulfill its functionat the same time in the four continents. 
Midnight it sets, midday it rises at the same moment. 
When it ismidnight in Uttarakuru, the sun sets inPūrvavideha, it is midday inJambudvīpa, and it rises in Godānīya, andso on. 
Ḷ By reason of the variety of the progress of the sun, the days and nights grow longer and shorter. 
61c The nights grow longer after the ninth day of the second quarter of the second month of the rains, and they grow shorter after the ninth day of the second quarter of the fourth month of winter. 
Reverse for the days. 
The nights grow longer from the ninth day of the clear quarter of Bhādrapada on, andgrow shorter from the ninth day of the clear quarter of Phālguna on. 
Reverse for the days: when the nights become longer, the days become shorter, and vice versa. 
The days and the nights grow longer and shorter gradually, in proportion to the sun going towatds the south or towards the north of Jambudvīpa. 
Why does the disk of the moon not appear completely full at the beginning of the bright quarter? 
The moon is covered by its shadow by reason of its proximity to the sun, and one sees it incompletely. 
This is the teachingof the Prajñāpti,When the house of the moon moves in the vicinity of the house of the sun, then the light of the sun falls on the house of the moon. Consequently, the shadow falls on the opposite side, and the disk appears incomplete. 
But, according to the ancient masters, the Yogācārins, the manner of its moving is such that the moon appears sometimes complete, sometimes incomplete. 
To what class of beings do the inhabitants of the houses of the sun, the moon and the stars belong? 
There are four terraces, the distance between them being ten thousand leagues,extending out sixteem, eight, four and two thousand leagues. 
The first terrace is ten thousand leagues above the water, the second ten thousand leegues above the firstandso on. They thus reach up to the middle of Meru. 
The first terrace extends out from Meru sixteen thousand leagues; the others, in their order extend out eight, four, two thousnd leagues. 
On the first terrace reside the Yakṣas Pitcher in their Haṇd: on the second, the Wearers of Crowns; on the third the Always Intoxicated : all these gods belong to the Cāturmahārājakāyikas. At the fourth terrace are the Four Kings in person with their attendants: 
these gods are called the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, the Four Great Kings. As the Cāturmāharājakāyikas inhabit Meru, so too they have villages and towns on the seven mountains of gold, Yugandhara, etc. 
The Thirtythree Gods are at the summit of Meru, the sides of which are eighty thousand. 
At the corners, four peaks which the Vajrapāṇis inhabit. 
In the middle, with sides of two thousand five hundred, with a height of one and a half, is a village called Sudarśana, of gold, with a varigated and smooth sun. 
3.In the middleof the plateau of Meru there is the royal city of Śakra, the chief of the gods, a city called Beautiful to Look At.Its sides are two thousand five hundred yojanas; its cir cumference is ten thousand; its height one yoana and a half; it is of gold; it is adorned with one hundred and one types of colors; and the same for its sun. 
In the middle of this city there is the palace of Śakra, the chief of the gods, called Vaijayanta: it makes all the other residences blush by its richness and its gems. 
Its sides are two hundred fifty yojanas. 
Such are the adornments of the city itself. 
At the four sides of these Parks, from a distance of twenty yojanas on, there are four fields of play with a marvellous sun, delightful and which appears to rival them. 
The magnolia tree called Pārijātaka is, for the Thirtythree Gods, the place par excellence for pleasure and for love; its roots go down fifty yojanas;. 
it is one hundred yojanas high; with its branches, leaves and petals, it covets fifty yojanas. 
The fragrance of its flowers spreads one hundred yojanas away with the wind, fifty against the wind. 
We say then that the fragrance does not go against the wind, that it perishes where it arises: 
Nevertheless, the fragrances become weak, weaker, entirely weak and are completely arrested, incapable of going as far as itdoes when the wind is favorable. 
Does the series of this fragrance have for its support only its own primary elements which constitute the fragrance? 
The opinion of the masters is not fixed on this. 
Yet the Blessed One said, The fragrance of flowers does not go against the wind, neither does the fragrance of good go against the wind; but the sapuruṣa goes in all directions. 
How do you reconcile this statement with the theory that fragrance goes against the wind? 
This statement refers to odors of the world of humans, which, it is quite evident, does not go against the wind. 
The Mahīśāsakas read, The fragrance go with the wind for a hundred yojanas; in the absence of wind, to fifty. 
8.In the southeast lies Sudharmā, the room where the gods come together in order to examine the good and the evil deeds committed by human beings. 
Such is the arrangement of the receptacle or physical world of the Thirtythree Gods. 
kṣkḥ Above, the gods reside in houses. 
The gods higher that the Thirtythree Gods reside in vmnas or aerial abodes. 
In all, twentytwo types of gods live in the physical world and occupy set residences. 
xxskt There are six gods who taste pleasure; they unite through coupling, an embrace, the touch of hands, a smile, and a look. 
The Cāturmahārājakāyikas, Trāyastriśas, Yāmas, Tuṣitas, Nirmā ṇaratis and Paranirmitavaśavartiḥs are the gods of Kāmadhātu. 
A small god or goddess appears on the knees, or from out of the knees of a god or goddess; this small god or goddess is their son or daughter: all the gods are apparitional. 
From five to ten years according to the category of the gods. 
Young gods grow up quickly. 
The gods of Rūpadhātu are complete and clothed. 
The gods of Rūpadhātu, from their birth, are complete in their development; they are boṟrn fully clothed. 
In Kāmadhātu, There are three arisings of the objects of desire: the gods of Kāmadhātu together with humans, 1. 
Theseare humans and certain godsnamely the first four classes of gods. 
There are beings whose objects of desire are created by themselves; and they dispose of these objects which they create. 
There are beings whose objects of desire are created by others but who themselves dispose of these objects created by others. 
These are the three arisings of the objects of desire. 
In Rūpadhātu, Thereare three arisings of pleasure: the nine spheres of three Dhyānas. 
The nine spheres of the first three Dhyānas are the three arisings of pleasure. 
The gods of the first three Dhyānas,for long periods, pass their time pleasantly through pleasure born from separation from the defilements, through pleasure consisting of joy atisen from absorption aod through pleasure free from joy.By reason of their absence of suffering, and by reason of their duration, these arisings are indeed arisings of pleasure. 
In dhyānāntara there is no pleasure consisting of joy. Is this an arising of pleasure? This is to be discussed. 
At what height are the twentytwo heavenly residences situated, starting from the Cāturmahārājikas to the highest gods of Rūpadhātu? 
In other words, to the extent that a residence is above Jambudvīpa, to that extent it is below its next higher residence. 
For example, the fourth house of the Cāturmahārājikas, the dwelling of the Cāturmahā rājikas themselves is forty thousand yojanas above here; to the extent that this residence descends to here, to that extent this residence ascends to the residence of the Trāyatriśas,. 
As many yojanas as there are from Trāyastrithśas to here, that many are there from Trāyastriśas to the Yāmas. 
the Akaniṣṭhas are above the Sudarśanas the same number of yojanas that the Sudarśanas are above Jambudvīpa. 
Above the Akaniṣṭhas, there are no more residences. This is.because this residence is higher than the others, no residence is superior to it, and so it is called 4niṣrha. 
Accoṟding to another opinion, this residence is called aghanisṭha, because agha signifies assembled matter, and this residence is the limit of this matter. 
kskṣk Can a being born in an inferior residence go to a higher house and see its superior beings? 
The gods do not see their superiors without magic or the assistence of another. 
When they possess magical powers, or when they are assisted by a being possessing magical powers or by a Yāma god, the Trāyastriśas can go to the Yāmas; and thus following. 
A being born in an lower residence can see a being born in a higher residence who makes a visit to an inferior residence,but not if this being belongs to a higher Dhātu, or to a higher hmi; in the same way that one cannot feel a tangible things ,because it is not of the sphere. 
According to another schoo1, if a being of a higher bhāmi so desires, lower beings can see him in the same way as they see a being of their own bhāmi. 
What are the dimensions of the houses of the Yāmas and the other According to one opinion, the houses of the four types of higher gods of Yāma have the dimension of the summit of Meru. 
According to others, the dimension of the First Dhyāna is the dimension of the universe with its four continents; that of the Second, the Third, and the Fourth Dhyāna is, respectively, the dimension of a small, medium and great chiliocosm. 
According to anothers, the first three Dhyāṇnas have, respectively, the dimension of a small, medium and great chiliocosm; the Fourth Dhyāṇna is without measure. kskṣk What is a small, a second, and a third chiliocoṣsm? 
One thousand fourcontinents, moons, suns, Merus, dwellings of the Kāma gods, and world of Brahmā, make up a small chiliocosm; one thousand small chiliocosms make a dichiliocosm, the middle universe; and one thousand dichilio cosms make a trichiliocosm. 
small chiliocosm is made up of one thousand Jambudvīpas, Pūrvavidehas, Avaragodānīyas, Uttarakurus, mmoonṅs, suns, Merus, dwellings of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas and the other gods of Kāmadhātu, and worlds of Brahmā. 
Oṉe thousand universes of this type make a dichiliocosm, a middle universe. 
Oṇṉe thousand universes of this type make a trichilomegachiliocosm. 
kṣk In the same way that the dimensions of the physicalworlds differ, in that same way the dimensions of the beings inhabitating them differ: 
The inhabitants of Jambudvīpa have a height of fout, or of three elbows anda half; those calledPūrva, Goda and Uttara, by doubling each time. 
The bodies of the gods of Kāmadhātu increase,by quarters of krosśa, until a r052 aṇḍ a half. 
The Cāturmahārājakāyikas are a quarter of a rosa in height; the height of the other gods of Kāmadhātu increases successively by this same quarter: 
The Brahmakāyikas, who are the first gods of Rāpadhātu, are a halfyojana in height; the Brahmapurohitas, one yojana in beight; the Mahābrahmans, one yojana and a half in height; and the Parīttābhas, two yojanas in height. 
Apramāṇābhas are four, Ābhāsvaras, eight, and the same until the Śubhakṛtsans, who are sixtyfour yojanas in height. 
For the Anabhrakas, one doubles this number but subtracts three: they are then one hundred twentyfive gojanas in height. 
One continues doubling, from the Puṇyaprasavas on who are two hundred fifty yojanas in height, to the Akaniṣṭhas, who are sixteen thousand yojanas in height. 
Life, amoṇg Kurus, is one thousand years in length; in the two continents, it diminishes twice by half; here, it is in determinate: 
The lifespan of beings in Godānaīya is half the lifespan of beings in Uttarakuru, thus five hundred years in length; the life of beings in Pūrvavideha is two hundred and fifty years in length. 
In Jambudvīpa, length of life is notdetermined, sometimes it islong, sometimes short. 
At the end of the cosmic age or kalpa , at its minimum, it is ten years; whereas the lifespan of humans at the beginning of the cosmic age is incalculable: ōne cannot measure it by counting in thousands, etc. 
79a Fifty human years make a dayandnight for the lowest gods of Kāmadhātu, and these gods live a life of five hundred years. 
Fifty human days make a day in the life of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, whose lifespan is of five hundred years of twelve month of thirty days. 
For the Trāyastrithśas, one day equals one hundred human years, and their lifespan is one thousand years in length; for the Yāmas, one day equals two hundred human years and their lifespan is two thousand years in length; and so on. 
But there is no sun or moon above Yugandhara; how is a day of the gods determined, and how are the gods illumined? 
Day and night are marked by the flowers which open or close, like the kumuda and the padma in the world of humans; by the birds that sing or that are silent; and by sleep which ends or begins. 
80b There is no day and night for the gods of Rūpadhātu; their lifespans are calculated in lpas whose number is fixed by the dimensions of their bodies. 
The gods of Rūpadhātu whose bodies are half a yojana in height the Brahmakāyikaslive a half kalpa; and thus following to the Akaṇniṣṭhas, whose bodies are sixteen thousand yojanas in height, and whose lifespan is thus sixteen thousand apas in length. 
In Ākāśānantyāyatana, a lifeṣpan is twenty thousand kalpas in length; fifty thousand kapas in length in Vijñānānantyāyatana, sixty thousand kapas in length in Ākircanyāyatana, and eighty thousand in Naivasajñānāsajññāyatana or Bhavāgra. 
But to which kalpas does this refer: 
to intermediate kalpas ,to kalpas of destruction , to kalpas of cteation , or to great kalpas. 
From the Parīttābhas on, they refer to the great kalpas; below they refer to half great kapas.In fact, there are twenty amtarakaḻpas during which the world is created; then twenty entarakalpas during which the world lasts; and then twenty amtarakalpas during which the world is destroyed. Thus the life of Mahabrahma Iasts sixty intermediate antarakalpas: 
these sixty make a kalpa and a half; half a great kalpa is considered to be a kalpa. kḥik What is the length of a lifespan in the painful realms of rebirth? 
82.In six hells,Sajīva, etc.,a day and night has the length of the life of the gods of Kāmadhātu; with such days, life as for the gods of Kāmadhātu. 
A day in the six hells,Sajīva, Kālasūtra, Saghāta, Raurava, Mahūraurava, and Tapana,is equal in this order to the life of the gods of Kāmadhātu, the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, etc. 
The damned in Sajīva have, like the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, a life of five hundred years of twelve months of thirty days; but each of these days has the length of the total lifespan of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas. 
In Pratāpana, a lifespan of a half nabkalpa; in Avīdi, a likespan of one antaḥkalpa. 
In Pratapana, a lifespan lasts one half of an ansarakalpa; in Avīci, oṉe antarakalpa. 
The animals that live the longest time live one anarakalpa; these aṟe the great Nāga Kings, Nanda, Upananda, Aśvatara, etc. 
The Blessed One said, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, eight great Nāga Kings who live a kalpa and who sustain the eaṟth. 
The days of the Pretas have a length of one human month; they live five hundred years made up of days of this length. 
Life in the Arbudas is the time of the exhaustion of avāha, by taking a grain of sesame every one hundred years; the others by multiplying each time by twenty. 
The Blessed One has indicated the length of a lifespan in the cold hells only through comparisons, If, Oh Bhikṣus, a Magadhan vāha of sesame of eighty khāris were full of sesame seeds; if one were to take one grain each one hundred years, this vāha would be empty before a lifespan of beings born in the Arbuda hell would end: 
And, Oh Bhikṣus, twenty Arbudas make, Oh Bhikṣus, one Nirar buda. 
With the exception of Kuru, there is death before their time. 
Nevertheless certain persons are sheltered from premature death, namely the Bodhisattva who, in Tusṣita, is no longer bound to birth; a being in his last existence ; one who has been the objectof a prediction by the Blessed One; one who is sent by the Blessed One; a Śraddhānusārin and a Dharmānusārin ; a woman pregnant with the Bodhisattva or with a Cakravartin, etc. 
We have explained the residences and the bodies by measuring them in terms of yojanas,and lifespans by measuring them in terms of years; but we have not explained yoanas and years. 
An atom , a syllable , and an instant is the limit of matter, of words, and of time. 
A paramāṇu īs the limit of physical matter ; so too a syllable is the limit of words, for example, go; and an instant, the limit of time. 
What is the dimension of an instant? 
If the right conditions are present, the time that it takes for adharma to arise; or rather the time that it takes for a dharma in progress to go from one paramāṇu to another paramāṇu. 
According to the Ābhidhārmikas,there are sixtyfive instants in the time that it takes a healthy man to snap his fingers. 
jṇu, aṇu, loharajas, abrajas, faśarajas, avirajas, gorajas, chidrarajas,likṣā,that whichcomes out of thekā, yava, and aṅñguliparvan, by multiplying each time by seven; twenty four añguls make one hasta; four hastas make one dhanus; five hundred dhanus make one krośa, the distance a hermitage should be located; and eight krośas make what is called one yojana. 
88b One hundred and twenty kṣaṇar make one tatkṣaṇa; sixteen tatkṣaṇas make one lava; we obtain a muhrta or hour, an ahorāa or one day and night, and a wmāsa or month, by multiplying the preceeding termby thirty; a sarvatsara or yeat, is of twelve months by adding the narātras. 
Thirty muhrias make oṉe day and night; a night is sometimes longer, sometimes shorter, and sometimes equal to a day. 
There are four months of winter, of heat, and of rain; twelve months which, with the days called narāras, make a year. 
The ānarātras are the six days which, in the course of the year, one should omit. 
When one month and a half of the cold, hot, rainy season has elapsed, the learned omit one narāra in the balfmonth that remmains. 
We have explained the year; we must explain the kalpa or cosmic period. 
There are different types of kapa: 
There is a distinction between a small kalpa , a kalpa of disappearance , a kaḷpa of creation ,aṇda great kalpa. 
A kalpa of disappearance lasts from the nonproduction of the damned to destruction of the receptacle world The period thatextends from the mmoment when beings cease being reborn in hell until the moment when the world is destroyed is called a savartakalpa, a kaḻlpa of destruction. 
Destruction is of two types: 
When no being is reborn in helleven though beings in hell continue to diethe period of twenty small kapas during which the world lasts is terminated; and the period of destruction begins. 
When not a single being remains in the hells, the destruction of: beings in hell is achieved, and the world has been destroyed to that extent: if a being of this universe has committed any actions which should be retributed in hell, the force of these actions causes him to be reborn in the hell of another universe not in the process of destructioṉ. 
o too is the destruction of animals and Pretas. 
The animals that reside in the greatocean disappear first; those that live with humans will disappear at the same time as do humans. 
Among humans of Jambudvīpa, a person enters by himself, without a teacher, by reason of dharmatā, into the First Dhyānṇa. 
Calm is the pleasure and joy that arise from detachment! 
Understanding these words, other persons also enter into absorption and, after their death, pass into the world of Brahmā. 
When, by this continual process, there does not remain a single person in Jambudvīpa, the destruction of the persons of Jambudvīpa is finished. 
When a single human being no longer remains, the destruction of humans is finished, and the world has been destroyed to this extent. 
The same then holds for the gods of Kāmadhātu, from the Cāturmahārājakāyikas to the Paranirmitavaśavartins, who enter into dhyāna and are reborn in the world of Brahmā, and who successively disappear. 
When a single god no longer remnains in Kāmadhātu, the destuction of Kāmadhātu is finished. 
Calm is the pleasure and joy that arise from absoṟption! 
Understanding these words, other gods of the world of Brahmā enter into the Second Dhyāna and after their death, are reborn in the heaven of the Ābhāsvaras. 
When a single being no longer remains in the world of Brahmā, the destruction of beings is finishedand the world has been destroyed to that extent. 
Then, by reason of the exhaustion of the collective action which has created the physical world, and by reason of the emptiness of the world, seven suns successively appear, and the world is entirely consumed from this sphere with its continents to Meru. 
Even though it is well understood that the flame that burns these houses is a flame of Rūpadhātu, the destruction of Kāmadhātu has not yet taken hold of Rūpadhātu. 
The period that extends from the moment when beings cease to be born in the hells until the moment when the physical world has been destroyed is what is called a saṃvartakalpa, a kalpa of disappearance. 
The kalpa of cteation lasts from the primordial wind uṇtil the production of hellish beings. From the primordial wind until the moment when beings arise in hells. 
The world, which has been destroyed as we have seen, stays destroyed for a long timeduring twenty small kapas. There is only space where the world once was. When, by reason of the collective action of beings, there appears the first signs of a future physical world; when some very light winds arise in space, then this period of twenty small apas during which the world remained destroyed is finished; and the period, also of twenty small kalpas, during which the world is created, begins. The winds come gradually and, finally, constitute a circle of wind; then there arises all of the receptacles as we have just described: 
But this is only after the circle of wind arises. The physical world is thus created, and the world is now created to this extent. 
Then a being, dying in Ābhāsvara, is born in the mansion of Brahmā which is empty; other beings, dying one after the other in Ābhāsvara, are born in the heaven of the Brahmapurohitas, the Brahmakāyikas, the Paranirmitavaśavartins and the other gods of Kāmadhātu; inUttarakuru, Godānīya, Videha, andJambudvīpa; among the Pretas and animals; and in the hells. 
When a being is born in the hells, the period of creation, of twenty small kalpas, is finished, and the period of duration begins. 
During the nineteen small apas that complete this period, untilthe appearance of the beings in hell, the lifespan of humaṇs is infinite in length. 
A small kapa, in the course of which a lifespan, from infinite, becomes a lifespan ten years in length. 
Humaṇs, at theend of the period of cteation, have an infinitely long lifespan; their lifespan diminishes when creation is achieved, until it is not more then ten years in length. 
The eighteen ēapas which are of angmentation and of diminution. 
A lifespan, which is now ten years in length, increases until it is eighty thousand years in length; then it decreases and is reduced to a length of ten years. The period in the course of which this increase and this decrease takes place is the second small kabpa. This apa is folowed by seventeen similar ones. One, of augmentation. 
The twentieth small apa is only of increase, not of decrease. The lifespaṉ of humans increases from ten years to eighty thousand years in length. 
They go to a lifespan of eighty thousand. 
But not beyond. 
The time required for the increase and the decrease of the eighteen kalpas is equal to the time that the decrease of the first kalpa and the increase of the last take.In this way then the world stays created for twenty kalpar. 
The world remains created fox twenty small kalpas thus calculated. 
As long as this period of duration lasts, During the same length of time, the world is in the process of creation, in the process of disappearance, and in a state of disappearance. 
The creation, the disappearance, and the period when the world disappears lasts a total of twenty small kapas. 
There are not, during these three periods, any phases of increase and decrease of lifespan, but these periods are equal in length to the period during which the world remains created. 
Four times twenty small kapas make eighty: 
These eighty make a great kalpa. 
This is the extent of a great kalpa. 
Of what does a kalpa consist? 
The kalpa is by nature the five sandhas. 
hi It is said that the quality of Buddhahood is acquired through cultivation that last three asakhyeya kalpas. 
To which among the four types of kalpas does this refer? 
93d The quality of Buddhahood results from three of these. 
But the wordasakhya signifies incalculable; how can one speak of three incalculables? 
What are these sixteen places? 
One, not two, is the first place; ten times one is the second place; ten times ten is the third; ten times one hundred is the fourth. and so on, each term being worth ten times the preceeding: prabheda , lakṣa , atakṣa, koṭi, madhya, ayuta, mahāyuta, nayuta, mahānayua, prayuta, mahāprayuta, kakara, mahākahara, bimbara, mahābimbara, akṣobhya, mahākṣo bhya, vivāha, mahāviuvāha, utsaṅga, mahotsaṅga, vābana, mahāvāhana, tibha, mahātitibha, hetu, mahāhetu, karabha, hākarabha, ināra, mahendra, samāpta , mahāsamāpta , gati, mahāgati,nimbarajas,mahānimbarajas,mudrā, mahāmuārā, bala, mahābala, sajña, mabhāsajñā, vibhūta, mahāvibhūta, balakṣa, mahābalakṣa, and asakhya. 
In this list eight numbers have been lost. 
A great kalpa successively numbered to the sixteenth place is called an asanhyeya; if one begins again, one has a second, and a third asanvkhyeya. 
An asakhyeya does ṉot receive its name from the fact that it is incalculable. 
ksk:t But why do the Bodhisattvas, once they have undertaken the resolution to obtain supreme Bodhi, take such a long time to obtain it? 
Because supreme Bodhi is very difficult to obtain: one needs a great accumulation of knowledge and merit, and of innumerable heroic works in the course of three asankhyeya kaḻpas. 
For the good of others, because they want to become capable of pulling others out of the great flood of suffering. 
But what personal good do they find in the good of others? 
The good of others is their own good, because they desire it. 
Who believes this? 
Dont we see that ceṛtain petsons, confirmed in the absence of pity, find pleasure in the suffering of others even when it is not to their benefit? 
In a few words, there is a certain category of persons, who, indifferent to what concerns them personally, are happy through the wellbeing of others, and are unhappy through the suffering of others. them, to be useful to others is to be useful to themselves. 
A stanza says,An inferior person searches out,by all means, his personal wellbeing; a mediocre person searches out the destruction of suffering, not wellbeing,because wellbeing is the cause of suffering; an excellent person, through his personal suffering, searches out the wellbeing and the definitive destruction of the suffering of others, for he suffers from the suffering of others.! 
During what periods do the Buddhas appear, during a period of increase or during a period of decrease? 
They appear during the decrease to one hundred. 
The Buddhas appear during the period of the decrease of lifespan, when the length of life decreases from eighty thousand years to one hundred years in length. 
Why do they not appear when life decreases from one hundred to ten years? 
In the final period of the decrease of lifespan, the leṉgth of life becomes bad, base; being corrupted, it is called a kasāya or corruption; the same for the other corruptions. 
During what periods do the Pratyekabuddhas appear? 
Acrording to another opinion, there are also Pṛthagjanas who have realized, in the vehicle of the Śrāvakas, the nrvedhabhāgīyas ; in the course of a subsequent existence, by themselves, they will realize the Way. 
The masters who follow this opinion find an argument in the Pārvakathā where they read, Five hundred ascetics cultivated painful austerities on a mountain. 
A monkey who had lived in the company of Pratyekabuddhas imitated the attritudes of the Pratyekabuddhas in front of them. 
It is clear, say these masters, that these ascetics were not Āryans, Śrāvakas; for, if they bad previously obtained the result of the Śrāvakas, namely liberation from rules and rituals , they would not have given themselves up later to painful austerities. 
The Pratyekabuddhas who are like a rhinoceros live alone. 
The Rhinoceros has cultivated for one hundred great kapas in his preparation for Bodhi,. 
He obtains Bodhi without the help of the teaching or āgama, but alone.He is a Pratyekabuddha because he himself brings about his salvation without converting others. 
he can remember the teachings of the ancient Buddhas. 
He is no longer deprived of pity, for he manifests his supernormal power with a view to being of service to beings. 
He can no longer say that beings are unconvertible in the period in which he lives, for, in this periodthe period of decrease of lifebeings can detach themselves from Kāmadhātu by the worldly path. 
The Cakravartin Kings appeer from the periodwhen the lifespan of humans is infinite to the petiod when their lifespan is eighty thousand years in length; not when life is shorter, for then the world is no longer a suitable receptacle for their glorious prosperity. 
They ate calledCakravartins,because their nature is to reign. 
There are four types of Cakravartin Kings, Suvarṇcakravartin, Rūpyacakravartin, Tāmracakravartin,and Ayaścakravartin, acgordingly as their wheel is of gold, silver, copper, or iron: 
The Cakravartin whose wheel is iron reigns over one continent, the Cakravartin whose wheel is copper reigns over two continents, and so on. 
A Sūtra,in fact,speaḵs only of a Cakravartin King having a wheel of gold, by reason of his greater importance,When, to aking of royaland coṉsecrated racewho, even in the days of his youth, on the fifteenth day, having washed his head, having undertaken the obligations of youth, ascends accompanṅied by this ministers tothe terrace of his palacethere appeats in the east the jewel of a wheel having a thousand rays,a wheelhavinga rim, havinga hub, complete inall ways, beautiful, not made by the hand of an artisan, all in gold?this king is a Cakravartin King. 
Two Cakravartins, the same as two Buddhas,do notappear at the same time. 
The Sūtra says, It is impossible in the present, or in the future, for two Tathāgatas, Arhats, perfect Buddhas to appear in the worldwithout one preceding and theother following.It is impossible.It is the rule that there is only one. 
Does this mean in a great Trisāhasra universe , or in all the universes? 
According to one oōpinion, the Buddhas do not appear elsewhere because the coexistence of two Buddhas would create an obstacle to the power of the Blessed Ones. 
Further, we read in the Sūtra, Śāriputra, ifsomeone comes and asks you if there now exists someone, a Bhikṣu or a Brāhmin, who is equal to the ascetic Gautama with regard to Samyaksabodhi, what would you answer him? 
If someone were to interrogate me thus, Oh Venerabie One, I would answer him that there does not exist now anyone, Bhikṣu or Brāhmin, who is the equal of the BlessedOne. 
And why would respond in this manner? 
Because I have heard and understood of the Blessed One, that it is impossible, both in the present and in the future, for two Blessed Ones, Arhats, perfect Buddhas to appear in the world without one preceding and the other following,. 
How then are we to understand what the Blessed One said in the Brahmasūra, I exeṛcise my power even over a great Trtisāhasra universe? 
According to other schools, the Buddhas appear at the same time, but in many universes. 
Here are their arguments. 
Oṉe sees that many persons apply themselves at the same time to the preparations. 
Certainly, it is not proper that many Buddhas should appear at the same time in the same spot ; but, on the other hand, nothing prevents many Buddhas from appearing at the same time: 
thus they appear indifferent universes. 
The universes are infinite in number, so even if the Blessed One lives an entire kapa, he cannot go about in the infinity of the universe as he does here; all the more so if he only lives a human lifetime. 
The Sūtra says, When Cakravartin Kings appear in the world, the seven jewels also appear: 
Do these jewels which are living beings.the jewel of elephants, etc.,.arise through the actions of others? 
There are many differance between the Cakravartin Kings and other men, notably that these Kings possess, like the Buddha, the thirtytwo marks of the Mahāpuruṣa. 
But the marks of the Buddha outweigh those of the Kings in that they are better placed, more brilliant, and complete. 
Did humans have kings at the beginning of the kalpa? 
Humans at the beginning of the cosmic age were similar to the beings of Rūpadhātu. 
The Sūtra says, There are visible beings, born of the mind, having all their members, with complete and intact organs, of fine figure, of beautiful color, shining by themselves, travelling through the air, having joy for ther food, and living a long tirne. 
Yet there appeared the Jjuice of the eaṛth, the taste of which bad the sweetness of honey. 
One being, of greedy temperament, having perceived the smell of this juice, took pleasure in it and ate it, the other beings thendid the same. 
This was thebeginning of eating byBmouthfuls. This eating made their bodies become coarse and heavy and their luminosity come to anend: and then darkness appeared. And then there appeared the sun and the moon. 
Because of the attachment of beings to taste, the juice of the earth gradually disappeared. 
Prhivīparpaṭaka dīsappeared and a forest creeper appeared and beings then became attached to it. 
beings then developedorgans of excretion and sexual organs; they then took different forms. 
Beings with sexual differences, by reason of ther previous habits, were seized by this ctocodile which is wrong jadgment; they conceived an active desire for pleasure and so had sexnual intercourse. 
One cat rice in the morning for the morning meal, and in the evening for the evening meal. 
One being, of lizy temperament, made provisions. 
Then they distributed the fields.One was the owner of one field; one seized the goods of another. This was the beginning of robbery. 
ĪIn order to prevent robbery, they came together and gave a sixth part to an excellent man in order thathe protect the fields: this man was given the name kṣerapa or guardian of the fields, and, as he was a kṣetrapa, he received the name of kṣarriya. 
Because he was very esteemed by the multitude , and because he charmed his subjects, hebecame the RājaMahāsarhmata. 
This was the beginning of dynasties. 
Those who abandoned the householders life received the name of Brahmiṇs. 
Then, under a certain king, there were many bandits and thieves. 
The king punished them by the sword. 
Then, through the development of the courses of action, life shortened to a length of ten years. 
A small kalpa terminates when a lifespan is ten years in length. 
What happens then? 
In the period when the alpa draws to its end, their lifespans being reduced to ten years in length, persons, full of forbidden craving and slaves of unjust greed, profess false doctrines. The spirit of wickedness arises in them: they conceive thoughts of hatred; as soon as they see one another, as a hunter who sees game, everything that falls into their hand,a piece of wood, aconite plants,.becomes a sharp weapon, and they massacre one another. 
In the period when the kalpa draws to its end, their lifespans being reduced to ten years, persons, full of forbidden craving and slaves to unjust greed, profess false doctrines. 
The famine of the boxes is called this for two reasons. What is today a samudgaka, was in this period called ceñca; and cañcu is the same as cañca. 
Persons, overwhelmed with hunger and weakness, die all in a group; and, with a view to being useful to petsons of the future, they place seeds in a cecw. 
The famine of the white bones is called this for two reasons. Bodies become dry and hard, and when they die, their bones soon become white. 
Persons gather up these white bones, boil them and drink them, The famine of tokens is called this for two reasons. 
Beings, in houses, eat according to the indication of tokens, Today it is the turn of the master of the house to eat; tomorrow it is the turn of the mistress of the house. 
And, with the tokens, persons search out grains in the empty earth; they are boiled in much water, and drunk. 
Scripture teaches that person who have, for a single day and night, undertaken abstention from murder, or have giīven one myrobalan fruit or a mouthful of food to the Saṅgha, will not be reborn here in this world during the period of knives, sickness, or famine. 
Killing lasts sevendays, sickness lasts seven months and seven days, and famine last seven years, seven months and seven days. The coṇjunction cz in the stanza shows that one rnust add the different lengths of time. ākā The continents of Videha and Godānīya do not know the three calamities: 
There are three destructions: through fire, water, and wind. 
through fire, by reason of the seven suns; through water, by reason of the rain; and through wind, by reason of the disorder of the wind element. 
Certain nonBuddhist masterssay that the atoms are eternal, and that, as a consequence, they remain when the universe is dissolved. 
But we have explained that the seed of a new universe is wind, a wind endowed with special powers which have their beginning in the actions of creatures. 
Further,a Sūtra of the Mahīśāsakas says that the wind brings the seeds in from another universe. 
What then is the efficacy of a seed with regard to its shoot? 
The seed has no efficacy with regard to the eneration of the shoot, except that it provokes the aggrega on of the atorns of the shoot. 
Different does come from different, but according to certain rules, as sound arises, or the products of cooking, etc. 
Your examples are not valid. 
Your example does not prove this, for it is not, itself, proven. 
but, a.mat is the vṝaṇa threads themselves disposed in a certain manner and which take the name of mat; cloth is threads disposed in a certain manner. 
When an organ is in relation with a thread, the cloth is not perceived. 
Now, if the clothexists why would it not be perceived? 
for how would you prove that the parts of a cloth are a thing other than the threads? 
in this hypothesis, it would suffice to see the fringe inorder to see the cloth. 
You say that, if one does not see the cloth when one sees the fringe, it s because the central parts, etc.,are not in relation with the organ: 
this is to acknowledge that the whole is not perceived; and this is to aaknowledge too that the idea of cloth or of mat has for itssole object the pazts of thecloth or the mat.How do we have, from all evidence, the idea of a ciccle from the cicle formed from the circular ttajectory of a brand? 
Farther, cloth cannotbea thing other than thread, for, in the hypothesis where it would be otherwise, when the threads are different in color, different in nature, and different in disposition, one could not attribute either color, or nature, or disposition to the cloth. 
You say that the cloth is different in color: this is to acknowledge that different creates different; farther, to suppose that one of the sides is not variegated, in looking at it one would not see the cloth, but rather would see it variegated. 
But do you dare say that the cloth, made of threads of different dispositions, is of different dispositions? 
Consideragain the entity which is the light of fire: its heating and illuminating power yvaries from beginning to end; one cannot recognize in it either color or tangible qualites. 
For us, the atorns,although suprasensible,become sensible when they come together: 
the Vaiśeṣikas also attribute the power to create coarse bodies to the united atoms; the factors of visual consciousness should be united in order to produce a consciousness; and persons who suffer from ophthalmia see masses of hair, not hairs one by oṉe. 
What one understands by atom is physical matter , etc., it is thus certain that atoms perish at the destruction of the universe. 
An atom is a thing in and of itself ; a thing in and of itself is distinct from physical matter, etc.; and physical matter can perish without an atom perishing. 
for no one distinguishes, This is earth, water, fire: these are the attributes of earth, namely, its color, its taste, etc. 
Further, when wool, cotton, opium juice, or incense is burned, one no longer has the idea of wool, cotton, etc., with regaṛd to its ashes: 
But, in fact, if we were to recognize the unfired jug in the fired jug, it is because its figare remains similar: 
In fact, who would recognize the jug if one does not see in it certain characteristics observed initially? 
100c Three Dhyāṇnas, beginning with the second, are, in order, the top of the destructions; by reason of thecommunity of the nature of destructions and the vices of the first three Dhyānas. 
everything below it is burned; the Third Dhyāna is the limit of the destruction by water: 
everything below it is dissolved; the Fourth Dhyāṇna is the limit of the destruction by wind: everything below it is dispersed. 
The top of the destruction is the name of that which remains when the destruction is finished. 
The heaven of the First Dhyāna then perishes by fire; in fact, the vice or imperfection of the First Dhyāna is vitarkavicāra; these burn the mind and are thus similar to fire. 
This is why the Sūtra teaches that the sensation of suffering is destroyed by the suppression of all solidity of the body. 
The ThirdDhyāna perishes by wind: in fact, it has inbreathing and outbreathing, which are wind,for its vice. 
Why is there no destruction by the earth element as by the fire elermeṇnt, etc.? 
What one calls the physical world is earth, and as a consequence can be opposed by fire, water, and wind, but not by earth itself. 
The Fourth Dhyāna is not subject todestruction, because it is free from agitation. 
The Buddha said in fact that this Dhyāna, being free from internal vices, is nonmovable. 
The exteṟrnal vices have thus no hold on itand, as a consequence, it is not subject to destruction. 
According to apother opinion, the nondestruction of the Fourth Dhyāna is explained by the force of the Śuddhāvāsakāyika gods whose abode it is. 
These gods are incapable of entering into Ārūpyadhātu, and are also incapable of going elsewhere. 
The receptacle world of the Fourth Dhyāṇa is not eternal, but by this fact, it does not constitute a sphere; like the stars, it is divided into diverse residences; these different mansions, the abodes of beings, arise and perish with these beings. 
kskōk What is the order of succession of these three destructions? 
Seven by fire,one by water; and when seven destructions by water have thus taken place, seven by fire followed by the destruction by wind. 
After seven series of seven successive destructions by fire, de struction is then done seven times by water; the eighth series of seven destructions by fire is folllwed by onedestruction by wind. 
The physical worlds, in fact, lastby reason of the duration of the gods who are reborn therein by the force of their absorptions. 
There are fiftysixdestructions by fire, seven by water, and one by wind: 
this is what justifies the declaṟation of the Prajñāpti that the Śubhakrtsṇa gods live sixtyfour kalpas. 
Karma OR Homage to the Buddha Who created the variety of the world of living beings and the receptacleworld which we have described in the preceding chapter? 
The variety of the world arises from the actions of living beings. 
But, in this hypothesis, how does it happen that actions produce at one and the same time, pleasing things,;saffron, sandalwood, etcon the one band, and bodies of quite opposite qualities on the other? 
The actions of beings whose conduct is a mixture of good and bad actions produce bodies resembling abscesses whose impurities flow out through the nine gates,and, in order to serve as a remedy to these bodies, they also produce objects of pleasing eṉjoyment, colors and shapes, odors, tastes and tangibles. 
The sūtra says that there are two types of action, volition and the action after having been willed. 
These two actions form three actions: bodily action, vocal action, and mental action. 
If one were to regard its support, there is nothingbut an action, for allactions are supported on a physical support, a body. 
If one were to regard its origional cause, we have only mentalaction, for allactions have their origin in the mind. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that the three types of action are established by reason of all of these three causes, support, nature and original cause, in this order. Volition is mental action: 
Volition is called mental action; that which arises from volition, namely action which has been willed, is made up of the two other actions, bodily and vocal action. 
These two actions are informative and noninformative. 
Bodily viñapti is such and such a shape of the body by reason of a volition According to others, bodily vijñapti is dis placement, for it takes place when there is movement, and not when there is no movement. 
What is understood by momentary ? 
Kṣaṇa means to perish immediately after having acquired its being; ksaṇika īs a āharma that has kṣaṇa, as a daṇḍika is one who has a staff. 
A conditioned thing does not exist beyond the acquisition of its being; it perishes on the spot where it arises; it cannot go from this spot to another. 
Consequently bodily vñapti is not movement. 
It is proven that they are momentary, since they necessarily perish; for the destruction of conditioned things is spontaneous; it does not come from anything; it does not depend on a cause. 
Therefore destruction does not depend on a cause. 
hence a conditioned thing perishes as soon as it arises; if it did not perish immediately, it would not perish later, since it would then remain the same. 
It is absutd to say that a certain thing changes, becoming another thing, staying the same thing that you say shows its modified characteristics. 
In fact, people do not directly perceive the destruction of kindling by reason of fire. 
You admit that the destruction of the flame is spontaneous. 
Therefore it is inference that should determine this question. 
We have already said that destruction,being a negative state, cannot bpe caused. 
We would further say that if desttuctin is the eftect of a cause, nothing would not perish without a cause. If, like arising, destruction proceeds from a cause, it would never take place without a cause. 
Now we hold that intellgence, a flame, or a ṣound, which are momentary, perish without their destruction de pending on a cause. 
Some contradictory thoughts:doubt and certainty, pleasure and suffering, love and hate,do not displace one another; and the same holds for noncontradictory thoughts. 
And if you suppose that they do contradict one another, then how can weak dharmas destroy strong dharmas of the same typeas when weak thoughts or sounds immediately follow strong thoughts or sounds? 
This explanation is inadmissible. 
Now we cannot admit that dharma and adharma eṇter into activity and cease being active from moment to morent. 
If one holds that the destruction of the kindling, etc., has for its cause the relationship of this kindling with fire, one would then be forced to acknowledge that a cause that engenders is at the same time a cause that destroys. 
The same cause that produces the firstcolor destroys this firstcolor, or, at leastif you object that it refers to a new relationship with fire, since the fire is momentarythe cause that destroys the first color is similar to the cause that produces it. 
Now it is impossible that a certain cause would produce a certain effect and that later this same cause,ora parallel cause, would destroy this same effect. 
Let us use another example. 
Some ask why water diminishes when it is beated if a relationship with fire is not destruction of the water? 
By reason of its relationship with fire, through the foce of the fire, the heat elementwhich is present in water increases and, increasing, causes the mass of water to be reborn inquantities more and more reduced, until being totally reduced, the water ceases renewing itself. 
itself. This is what a relationship with fire does to water.1 9.Let us conclude. The destruction of things is spontaneous. Things perish in and of themselves, because it is their nature to perish. 
As they perish in and of themselves, they perish upon arising. As they perish upon arising, they are momentary. 
Hence bodily viñaptiis not displacement, movement; rather bodily viñapti is shape. 
The Sautrāntikas say that shape is nota distinct thing,a thing in and of itself. 
For theSautrāntikas, shape does not exist as a substance, but only as a designation. 
When there arises, in one direction,a large mass of color, this mass is called long. 
When, by comparison, a mass of color is small, it is called short. 
When a color arises in a great quantity in the four directions, it is called square. 
When it arises equally in all directions, it is called circuler. 
Shape is thus not a thing in and of itself, a npa. 
If shape were a thing in and of itself, It would be perceived by two organs. 
Thus if length, or any other shape, were a thing in and of itself, it would be perceived by two organs. 
Now, according to the scriptural definition, rūpāyaana, the visible physical matter, is perceived by only the eye. 
When we have the idea of length after having touched something, we are not perceiving shape through touch; we remember the shape, because it is associated with a tangible. 
It is the same when we see the color of fire,for we then remember heat ; and when we smell the odor of flower,we then remember its color. 
If a similar remembrance is produced without there having been an invariable association betweena tangible and its shape, one would in this same manner remember color after having touched something. 
If shape were a real thing, that which, in the cloth, forms part of a long line cannot at the same time form a part of a short line. 
color rpa necessarily exists in the octuple atom, etc. 
hence thisidea does not proceed from a rūpa shape existing in the thing. Therefore what we designate as long is number of real things,.atoms of color,aṟranged in a certain manner. 
If you maintain that the expressions, long, etc. 
but since the existence of these atoms has not been proved, as the existence of the atoms of color has been proved, how could they be united and arranged? 
If a shape is not distiact in color, if a shape is nothing other than a certain color, then shapes would not differ when their color is the same: now somne jugs of the same color have different shapes. 
Somne ants, all similar, arrange themselves in a straight line or in a ciccle, and so present different shapes. In the same way the shapes of jugs differ without their color differing. 
But, in darkness or at a distance, one sees the shape of an object,a columṉ, a person, etc., without seeing its color. 
This army is arranged in a circle Oṟ rather it happens that one does not clearly distinguish either color or shape; one only knowsthrough the mental consciousnessa mass. 
Bodily action is theaction which has for its object thebody: 
There are two types of volition. 
First, the initial or preparatory stage,wherein one produces a volition which is pure volition, I must do such and such an action; this is what the Scripture calls cetanākarman, action which is volition. 
And if viñapti does not exist, then vjñapti,noninformation of the sphere of Kāmadhātu,does not exist. From whence there would be a great number of difficulties which will be enumerated later. 
Now however you woūld have it that the vijñapti,ift it exists,would depend, like the projectionof the evjñapti, on the force of the thought: 
for it is itself nonintelligent. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that shape exists in and of itself, and thatbbodily vijñapti is shape. 
Vocal vijñapti is vocal sound. 
Sound whidch is discourse by naturethat is, articulated sound is vocaḻ viñapti. 
Scrīpture says that rāpa is of three types and that there is a pure vpa; there is increase of merit; and there is a course of action for him who is not concerned with himself, etc. 
A scripture says that there are three types of rpa: Rpa is embraced within a threefold rpa: there is visible rūpa susceptible of destruction ; there is an invisible rpa susceptible of destruction ; and there is an invisible r7p, free from destruction, and this latter can only be the gvjñapti. 
The BlessedOnesaid in a scripture that there is pure rpa: 
What are the pure dharmas? 
All rūpa of the past, the future and the present. all consciousness of the past, future, present, concerning which there arises neither affection nor antipathy: these are the pure dharmas.. 
Now, apart from avjñapti, there exists no rpa which can be invisible and free from destruction, and no rāpa which is pure. 
A scripture says that there is an increase of merit, . , There are seven mateṟial meritorious works,. when a believer, son oṟ daughter of good family, who is endowed, walks, stands still, sleeps or is awake, his merit increases with intensity, without ceasing;merit continues adding to itself. What are these seven material works? 
avjñapti, could merit increase even when the mind is not good, or when one is without thought? 
4.1f avijñapti does not exist, he who does not himself act, who gives orders to others, will not be endowed with a course of action. 
The Blessed One said, Monks, the dharmas, the external sources of consciousness not included within the eleven āyatanas, are invisible, and are free from destruction. 
He did not say that the dharmāyatana īs nonrūpa. 
For a person who has assumed the vows of religion is still a Bhikṣu or Bhikṣuṇī, when his mind is bad or neutral. 
A scripture teaches that the renouncing of sin is a dike which arrests immorality. 
Let us examine them one by one. The Sūtra teaches that rāpa is of three types. The Yogācārins say that in the Dhyānas,through the force of absorption,a rpa arises which is the object of the absorption, that is, which is perceived by the person in the absorption,. 
The scripture says that there is a pure rpa.The Yogācārins maiṇtain that thepa that arises through the force of the absorption is pure, since the absorption is pure. 
But other masters, maintain that the rpa of the Arhats and external rpa, , are pure because they are not a support of the vices. 
To this one can object that the scripture expresses itself What are the impure dharmas? 
AlI that which is organ of sight, all that which is visible. 
Further, if the visible and the other āyatanas are exclusively impure, why would the scripture specify, The impure and pādānaprovoking rūpas,. 
The scripture says that merit increases. 
It is in this sense that the text says, Merit increases in an intense and uṉ interrupted manṇner, rmerit adds to itself. 
But how does one explain the increase of merit in the case of noṇmaterial meritorious work? 
by reason of the repetition of volitions having for their object. Even during dreamms these volitions are linked together. 
But according to other masters, in the case also of material meritorious works, merit proceeds from the repetition of a volition having for its object But this opinion is inadmissible in light of the scripture which says, When an energetic Bhtkṣu, endowed with morality, possessor of good dharmas ,eats the alms of a donor, he then enters into and dwells in the absoṟption called Śinfinites , and by reason of this fact there is certainly produced for the donor an outflowing of merit, and outflowing of good and prosperity. 
This holds likewise when one acts for oneself; when the course of action is achieved, at this moment the series undergoes a transformation. 
This transformation is called course of action, and consequently the person whose series is transformed is endowed with the course of actionfor the effect receives the name which belongs more properly to the cause ,and this transformation is called bodily or vocal accordingly as it results from an action of the body or the voice. 
It is by virtue of these same principles that the partisans of evijñapti consider the avjñapti as a bodily or vocal course of action. 
A person is touched by the sin of murder by reason of a tritemporal volition with regard to the skandhasr which constitute a living being , that is, when he thinks, I shall kill; I kill; he is killed. 
Nevertheless all this exercise of volition, I shall kili, I kill, he is killed applies only to the person who kills: 
The response to this objection is as has been given above: 
there is an invisible rpa free from destruction, forming part of the dharmāyatana: 
this is not the avijñapti; this is a ppa which is the object of the absorption and which arises from the force of the absorption. 
The Way, say the Vaibhāṣikas, would not have eight parts. 
How does the saint,when he has attained the Way, possess correct speech,action, and livelihood? 
A cause takes the name of its result; thus speech, action and livelihood are designated as avijñapti. 
There is no vājñapti; but the saint, when he finds himself in the Path, takes possession of a certain intention and of a certain peṟsonality so that,whenhhe comes out of this contemplation, by reason of the force of these two factors he henceforth produces correct speech, actions and livelihood. 
One gives to the cause the name of their result; and we can thus affirm that the Path possesses eight parts. 
Āccording to another opinion, the parts of the Path solely consist of poṉncommission. 
The person who is in absorption acquires, through the force of the Path, definite absolute abstention. 
This abstention, which is ac quired having the pure Path as its support, is pure. 
Nonpossession of clothes, of food, etc., is not a thing. 
Discipline is volition which, after it has been translated into the positive action of abstaining from transgression, into the pledge of no longer cornmitting transgression, arrests bad actions anddisciplines the body and the voice: 
When one is obliged not to comrmit transgression, one remembers this obligation, shame is present, and one constrains oneself in such a manner that one does not violate morality. 
In your system, on the contrary, ifimmorality is dammed up by an aviñapti independent of memory, then even a persoa who has a faulty memory would not be able to commit a transgression, since the avijñapti is always there. 
Let us stop this discussion here. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that there exists a certain substantial thing , sui generis, which is avrñaptirūpa. 
for it isimpossible thatone and the same complex of four primary elements would produce both a subtle, derived pa,the avjñapti, and at the same time a gross, derived rūpa, the vijñapti. 
From the firstmoment, the vjñapti of Kāmadhātu arises derived from past primary elements. 
In the same way, the hand that has hurled the wheeland the ground that the supports the wheel, are the causes,respectively, of the prevṛzti and the anuvṛtti of the movement of the wheel. 
ftrk To which sphere,:Kāmadhātu and the Four Dhyānasṣdo the primary elements belong, from whence the bodily and vocal actions of the different spheres derive? 
elements of Kāmadhātu, aṇd so on to the bodily and vocal actions of the Fourth Dhyāna which derives from primary elements of the Fourth Dhyāṇṉa. 
The avijñapti is a derived rūpa exempt from mass , nonextended ; thus it cannot be a support of the mind and of mental states; thus it is axepātta, not integral to the sense oṟganisrm. 
Not absorbed or, in other words belonging to Kāmadhātu, it derives from primary elements which are an outflowing, and which are integral to the organism. 
These primary ekements are differentiated, because each of the seven avñaptis, the renouncing of killing, etc., which form the Prātimokṣa discipline, derive from a distinct group of the four primary elements. 
Arisen from absorption, it derives from nondifferentiated primary elements, not integral to the organism, and increase. 
In the same way that the mind which engenders these renouncings is a unity, the primary elements upon which the renouncings are based constitute a unity. 
Does bodily vjñapti, by arising, destroy or not destroy the preexistent bodily figure which is retribution ? 
That it destroys it, is impossible; for it is contrary to the principles of the Vaibhāṣikas that a rpa, retribution by nature, continues again, after having been interrupted. 
If on the contrary, bodily vsjñapt does bot destroy the previous figure, two figares,:the first of retribution, the second of out flowing,;would be found to coexist in one and the same spot. 
If this is the case, the part by means of which a bodily vrñapti is produced would be greater than has existed previously, being pene trated by new primary elements from whence this viñapti derives. 
If the part has not been penetrated by these new elements, one could not say that the vñap is cteated by the whole part. 
The avijñapti is never neutral. 
In fact, neutral volition is weak; it is not capable of engendering a powerful action as is the vrñapti, which continues reproducing itself after its initial cause has disappeared. 
Other action are of three types. Other actions, namely volition and the vñapti, can be good, bad, or ṉeutral. 
Bad action exists in Kāmadhātu. 
Not in the other spheres, for, in the other spheres the three roots of evil , and noṉshame and imprudence , are missing. 
Avṣjñapti also exists in Rūpadhātu. 
in Kāmadhātu as well as in Rāpadhātu; not in Ārūpyadhātu, for the primary elements are missing there. 
Only where body and voice exist, do we find is the discipline of the body and voice. 
There are no pure primary elements and yet there is a pure aviñapti.Pure avijñapti derives from the primary elements of the sphere wherein the person arises who produces the pure vijñaptin the same way, when a person arisen in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu enters into an ārūpya absoṟption, he produces an avijñapti of Ārūpyadhātu deriving from the primary elements of Kāmadhātu or Rūpadhātu. 
On the contrary, an avājñapti of Ārūpyadhātu cannot derive from the primary elements, of a different type,of Kāmadhātuor Rūpadhātu. 
Further, turning away from all āēpasince any idea of rūpa is absent in itan ārūpya absoṟption is not capable of producing an avijñapti, which is rūpa. 
Morality exists in opposition to immorality. 
Vijñapti exists in the two spheres where there is vcāra, There is vñapti, bodily and a vocal action, only in the spheres of Kāmadhātu and the FirstDhyāna, where there is vicāra. 
The vjñapti termed njvrta is also missing in Kāmadhātu. 
of the anivṛtāvyākrta class exists only in the world of Brahmā. 
It is reported that Mahābrahmā produced a false vocal action: in his assembly Mahābrahmā boasted falsely, in order to avoid the inquires of the venerable Aśvajit.2 ksek. 
But if vocal avjñapti is absent above the First Dhyāna, how can sound exist in the Second Dhyāna and above? 
In fact the beings who are born in these Dhyānas do not call fortha good or defiled mmind of a lower sphere, by which mind they would be able to produce a good or defiled vijñapti.For the good mind of a lower sphere is of an inferior oṛder; and the defiled mind has been abandoned. 
But defend the first opinion. 
Why is the vjñapti, whatever it may be, absent above the world of Brahmā? 
Why is the vzjñapz of the defiledneutral class absent in Kāmadhātu? 
such a mind is absent in the Second Dhyāna and above. 
The nvṛtāvyākṛṣta mind gives rise to a vtjñapi of the same characteristics, since this mind belongs to the class to be abandoned through Mediation. 
Is it solely by reason of the nature of the mind which gives rise to themgood or bad naturethat the ḍharmuas are good or bad? 
Deliverance is absolute good. 
Nirvāṇa, being the cessation of all suffering, is perfectly tranqnil andhappy; hence it is absolute good. 
The roots, respect and fear, are good in and of them selves. 
The three roots of good, respectand fear , independent of their associations and of their causes, are good in and of themselves. 
That which is associated is good through association. 
Actions, etc. 
Having their origin in dharmas good in and of themselves or good through association, bodily action, vocal action, prāptis, nirodhasamāpatti, asajñisamāpatt , are good by reason of their original cause. 
How can prāptis be good when they have their origin in a mind which is not good? 
The roots of evil,the absence of shameand imprudence are bad in themselves. 
The dharmas associated with these principles are bad in themselves. 
Having their origin in the roots, etc., and in the dharmas associated with these roots, etc., bodily action, vocal action, their characteristics and the prāptis of the baddharmuas, are bad by reason of their original cause. 
But putting oneself in the point of view of retribution, the impure dharma which is not defined as to how it should be retributed is called undefined, or neutral , and the impure dharma which produces an agreeable retribu tion, is called good. 
Two entities are neutral in the absolute sense. 
The two unconditioned things , namely space and apraṭisakhyānirodha, are, without ambiguity, neutral. 
Thus the avjjñapti produced by the absorption is not good; or rather, if the Vaibhāṣikas maintain that it is good, they should consider as good the divine eye and the divine ear which they regard as neutral. 
Īt has been said above that the mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing does not give rise to vsjñapr.Yet the Blessed One said, From bad views there proceeds bad resoḻution, bad speech, bad action, bad livelihood. 
This Sūtra does not contradict this theory. 
In fact That which gīves rise is of two types, which are known as hetusamutthāna aṅd tatkṣaṇasamutthāna. 
The atkṣaṇasamutthāna is second mover because it is contemporary to the action. 
If the ratkṣaṇasamutthāṇna is absent, the action will not take place, even if it was projected dies. 
how is there vjñapti for a person free from a mind which undertakes the discipline? 
The vññapti is clearer in him who is endowed with the mind, which is at the moment of the vūñapti, the second mover mind. 
The mind which is abandoned through Seeing is alone the agent of the viñapti, because it is the cause of the mental process which gives rise to the vñapti. 
this latter is put into motion by a thought turned inward, 2. 
because, to suppose that it is a seoond movet, it would then follow that the rūpa created by it would also be abandoned by this Seeing; And this hypothesis is in contradiction to the Abhidharma ī40cd. 
For he who maintains the thesis of the abaṇndoning of pa through Seeing would not admit that rūpa is not contradicted by vidyā. 
which has its origin ina thought to be abandoned through Seeing is, itself.also, to be abandoned through Seeing, then the primary elements which serve as a substrate to this rpa, to this viñapti, will be, themselves also, abandoned through Seeing, for they take their origin from the same thought. 
We deny this consequence.n fact, the primary elements in qestion are not good or bad by reason of the thought which gives rise to them, whereas this is the case for the vñapti. 
this is impossible. 
Hence the Sūtra quoted above does not invalidate our thesis: 
The manas susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation is twofold. 
The five sense consciousnesses are exclusively mover. 
There is no rule on this subject: 
From a good agent, etc., a mover of three types. 
A good, bad, or neutral mover can come from a good agent. 
The same for a bad or neutral agent. 
Or good. 
Or rather, it happens that a good mover comes out of a neutral agent, whereas a neutral mover never comes out of a good agent: 
the teaching of the Buddhas is not subject to diminution. 
Accoṟding to other Schools, the mind of the Buddhas is never neutral: 
This is why the Sūtra says, The Nāga is absorbed when he walks, when he stands still, when he dreams, and when he is seated. 
The Sūtra expresses itself in this manner because the mind of the Blessed One does not disperse itself towards objects without his wishing it. 
We have seen that the mind susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation is at one and the seme time agent and mover, and can be good, bad, or neutral. 
That which arises from retribution is neither of the two. 
The vjñapt through which a person under takes thePṛātimokṣa discipline will not be good, if this person, while he is receiving the ordination, has a bad or neutral mind. 
The vñapti is of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation.It is not of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing, for example, the thought the soul exists, for, in this case, another agent arises between the promoter and the action , a thought susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation, turned inward, accompanied by vicāra and by vitarka, through which, for example, one preaches the existence of a soul. 
But if the action is not good, bad, or neutral by reason of the mover, the explanation that you have given of the Sūtra does not hold. 
This is enough on this point which has been defined above. 
Avijñapii is threefold, discipline , undiscipline ,anddifferent from either discipline or undiscipline. 
savara, discipline, so called because it constrains the flix of immorality, because it destroys or arrests the flux of immorality; 2. 
There are three types of discipline: the discipline called Prātimokṣa: 
the discipline produced through dhyāna is morality of the sphere of Rūpadhātu; and 3. 
pure discipline, which arises from the Path, pure morality. 
The Prātimokṣa is of eight types. 
It includes the discipline of the Bhikṣu, the Bhikṣuṇī, the Śik ṣamāṇā, the Śrāmaṇera , the Śrāmaṇerikā, the Upāsaka , the Upāsikā, and the Upavāsastha. 
These eightdisciplines are the Prātimokṣa disciplines: 
thus, from the point of view of the names given to them, the discipline of the Pṛātimokṣa is of eight types. 
In substance however, the Pṛātimokṣa is of four types. 
In facī, the disciplipe of the Bhikṣuṇī does not differ, does not exist separately from the discipline of the Bhikṣu; the discipline of the Śikṣamāṇā and the Śrāmaṇetikā do not differ from the discipline of the Śrāmaṇera; and the discipline of the Upāsikā does not differ from that of the Upāsaka. 
The name changes with the gender. 
Liṅga is yyañjana, that which dīstinguishes men and women. 
It isby reason of gender that the names, Bhikṣu, Bhikṣuṇī, etc., differ. 
When their gender is modified, the Bhīkṣu becomes a Bhikṣuṇī; the Bhikṣuṇī, a Bhikṣu; the Śrāmaṇera, a Śrāmaṇerikā; the Śrāmaṇerikā, like the Śīkṣamāṇā,becomes a Śrāmaṇera; the Upāsaka,aṉ Upāsikā; and the Upāsikā, an Upāsaka, Now one cannot admit that a person, by changing his gender,abandons the former discipline and acquires a new one; the change of gender cannot have this inflaence. 
They are not mixed, for in the parts that are common to them allUpāsakas, Śrāmaṇeras and Bhikṣus all renounce killing, stealing, ilicit sexuality, lying, intoxicating liquorsthe three dis ciplines have some distinct chaṟacteristics. 
Their differencs lie in the difference of the occasions of transgression. 
In fact,the person who undertakes the observation of a greater number of rules, avoids by this action itselfa greater number of occasions of intoxicationpride and of nondiligence ; he avoids, by this action, a greater number of occasions of transgression, killing, etc. 
Consequently the three series of renouncings are not identical with one another. 
If it were otherwise, ṭthatis,īf the disciplines of Upāsaka andŚrāmaṇera were integral to the discipline of aBhikṣu,then the Bhīkṣu who renounces the discipline of a Bhikṣu would renounce at the same time all three disciplines; a thesis that is not admitted. 
But they do not contradict one another. 
Thus the fact that a Bhikṣu who renounces his quality of Bhikṣu remains in possession of the discipline of Upāsaka and Śrāmaṇera is explained. 
How does one become an Upāsaka, an Upavāsastha, a Śrāmaṇera, or a Bhikṣu? 
By undertaking the renouncing of the five things to avoid, of the eight, the ten, of all the things to avoid, one obtains the quality of Upāsaka, Upavāsastha, Śrāmaṇera, and Bhikṣu. 
By undertaking the renouncing of these same items and, further, goldand silver, which make ten,one places himself in the discipline of a Śrāmaṇera. 
These make ten items, for one counts scents, garlands, and unguentsseparately from dances, songs, and music. 
By undertaking the renouncing of all the actions of the body and the voice which should be avoided, one is a Bhikṣu. 
kṣk The Pṛātimokṣa discipline is Morality, good conduct, action and discipline. 
Etymologically, because it cools , as it says in the stanza, Happy is the undertaking of morality, because morality does not burn. 
Good conduct, because it is praised by the wise. 
Action , because it is action by naṭure. 
How can aviñapti be action? 
Without doubt, the aviñapti makes the disciple, endowed with shame, to abstain from transgression; it is thus not doing. 
According to others,avifñapti is action because it is thecause and the effect of an action. 
The expression Prātimokṣa discipline designates all Pṛātimokṣa discipline since its origin. 
The Prātimokṣa is the first vñapti and the firstavijñapt; these are courses of action. 
The expression Prātimokṣa designates the first vrñapti and the fitst gvijñapti of the undertaking of the discipline. 
The Prātimokṣa is called prāimokṣa, for through it there takes place pratimokṣaṇa, that is, the abandoning of transgression: 
Eight persons possess the Prātimokṣa. 
Eight persons, theBhikṣu,Bhikṣunī. 
Does this mean that nonBuddhists cannot possess a morality that they have undertaken? 
They can possess a morality, but they cannot possess the Prāti mokṣa discipline. 
Which arises from dhyāna , that īs, which arises from dhyāna or by means of dhyāna. 
In the same way, when one says, There is a field of rice or a field of wheat in this village, one means the village and its environs. 
kḥ The Āryans possess pure discipline. 
The Āryans,the Śaikṣas and Aśaikṣas,possess pure discipline. 
We have seen, in the definition of sahabhhetu , that two disciplines accompaṅy the mind. 
The last two disciplines are concomitants of the mind. 
According to the same principles, one would establish four cases relative to putre discipline which is not abandoning, to abandoning which is not pure discipline, etc. 
The Blessed One said, Good is discipline of the body, discipline of the voice, discipline of the mind, discipline in all things; and again, He lives disciplined through the discipline of the organ of sight. 
What is the nature of these two disciplines, discipline of the mind, and disciplipe of the organs? 
He who is in Prātimokṣa always possesses avsjñapti of the present moment, as long as the does not reject the gvijñapti. 
As we have said previously the person who dwells in thePrātimokṣa discipline ,always possesses presentavjñapti as long as he does not reject the avñapti which coṉstitutes this discipline. 
After the first moment, he also possesses avijñapti. 
As he who dwells in the Prātimokṣa discipline, So too is he who dwells in undiscipline. 
He who dwells in undiscipline , always possesses avijñapti of the present moment as long as he does not reject it; He who possesses discipline aṟisen from dhyāna always possesses past and future avsjñapti. 
He who possesses the discipline arisen from dhyāna always possesses avsjñapti of the past, and vijñapti of the future as long as he does not lose i1,. 
From the first moment when he acquires the discipline of dhḥyāna, he takes possession of the discipline of former dhyānas, either of this existence, or of a previous existence, that he had lost. 
The Āryan, at the first moment, does not posses past avijñapth. 
The Āryan possesses pure avijñapti, which constitutes his pure discipline, in the manner in which he who possesses the discipline arisen from dhyāna possesses the avijñapti arisen from dhyāna: 
he possesses his past and future vjñapti; but with the difference that, when in the first moment of the Way he takes possession of pure avijñapti fr the first time, he cannot, evidently, possess pure avsjñapti of the past. 
But when he leaves the absorption, he does not As for the intermediary The intermediary, at the first moment, possesses,. 
Afterwards, of the present and the past. 
krḥṣḥ Can a disciplined petson possess bad avijñaptiz Can an un disciplined person possess good avijñp? 
As long as he is endowed with faith or with very active defilements, the undisciplined person possesses good zvsjñapti, and the disciplined person possesses bad gvñapti. 
As long as there continues, in anundisciplined person, the strength of faith by which, accomplishing actions such as the worship ofa Stūpa, he has created goodavsjñapti; as longas there continues, ina disciplined persoṉ, the power of the defilements by which, accomplishing actions such as killng,hitting,binding,he has created badavjñapti, goodo bad avijñapii coṇtinues. 
At the moment of the action in question, the agent possesses avij ñapri of the present; then he possesses aviiñapti of the present and of the past. 
AIl those who accomplish a bodily or vocal action whether they aredisciplined, undisciplined, or intermediaries, so liong as they are accomplishing this action, possess it in the present. 
From the second moment onward, they possess vijñapti of the past, until the moment when they give it up. 
From the secondmmoment onward, that is,after the first moment. 
By reason of the weakness of the mind which gives rise to it. 
But then the possession of this mind too will not be prolonged. 
Thus the vijñapti producedby a neutral mind is weaker than this mind itself; the possession of the vjñapti is not prolongued, whereas the possession of the mind is prolongued. 
What is undiscipline ? 
Undiscipline, bad conduct, immorality, action, course of action. 
1.It is undiscipline,because there is no constraining of the body and voice. 
2.It is bad conduct,because it is blamedby wise men, and because it produces painful results. 
It is immorality, because it opposes morality. 
It is an action, as it is created by the body and the voice. 
It is a course of action, as it is included in the principal action. 
The Āryan possesses a single vijñapi when he has not produced, or has abandoned, the vijñapti. 
wWhen an Āryan has changed his existence or when he has not created vijñapi , or when he has lost the ufñapti , he pssesses only avijñapti , and not vsṝñapt;. 
The discipline that arises from dhyāna is acquired by one thought of the sphere of the dhyāna. 
Āryan meaṉs pure, forming part of the Way. 
That which is called Prātimokṣa, through paravijñapana, etc. 
Another is the Saṅgha, through the acquisition of the disciplines of Bhīkṣu, Bhīkṣuṇī, or Śikṣamāṇā; or a person , the acquisition of the five other prāimokś 
According to Viṇaya scholars of the Vaibhāṣika School, there are six types of ordination. In order to include them all within his definition, the author says, . 
Ordination by oneself, in the case of the Buddha and.the Pratyekabuddhas. 
Through entry into thePath , in the case of the Five, that is to say of Ājñatakauṇḍinya and his companions. 
Through the summons, Come, Oh Bhikṣu!, in the case of Ājñata. 
By recognizing the Blessed One as master, as in the case of Mahākāśyapa. 
By satisfying the Blessed One through ones answers, as in the aase of odāyin. 
By accepting the special obligation of monks and nums, as in the case of Mahāprajāpatī. 
8.By an official action as the fifth, that is,ordination beforea Saṅgha of five Bhikṣus, as in frontier lands. 
By ten Bhikṣus, as in Madhyadeśa. 
By repeating three times the formula of Refuge, as in the case of the sixty Bhadravargas, ordained in a group. 
When one undertakes the Prātimokṣa dsciplne, for how long a tiṃe does one undertakes it? 
One undertakes the discipline for a lifetime or for a day and a night. 
wThe first seven categories of the Prātimokṣa discipline are undertaken for a lifetime; the fasting discipline is undertaken for a day and a night. 
Because there are two limits of time, the period of a lifetime, and the period of a day and a night. 
As for the forthnight and the other durations of time, they consist in additions of day and night periods. 
What is the dharma that we term time ? 
When it is light in the four continents,it isdaytime; when it is dark it is night. 
But if a petson assames the duties of a faster for more than a day and a night,for five days, or for ten days,.what obstacle would this be to his producing in himself many disciplines of the fast? 
It needs be that there wouldbe an obstacle since the Blessed One, in a Sīūtra, says that one undertakes the fast for a day and a night. 
He thought that persons in whom the senses are difficalt to subdue would be well capableof undertaking the fast for a day and a night.But, in truth, nothing is wrong with producing the discipline of the fast for more than one day. 
As the Blessed One does not speak of the fast as lasting any longer, the Vaibhāṣikas do not admit this manner of viewing the matter. 
There is undiscipline for a day and a night. 
Undiscipline never last longer than a day and a night, like the discipline of the fast,for it is produced by the acceptance of transgression for ones entire life. 
How is this? 
For, says the School, one does not undertake it thus. 
No one undertakes undiscipline in the manner in which one undertakes the fast, by saying, I wish to remain a day and a night in undiscipline. 
In the case of the fast, the intention is not for always; nevertheless one obtains the discipline through the force of the action which consists of saying, I wish to remain a day and a night in the discipline of the fast, and one accomplishes this action because one desires to acquire this discipline. 
Āccording to the Sautrāntikas, undiscipline does not exist in and of itself apart from volition. 
Undiscipline is the intention tō commit evil, that is, a certain volition with the traces which allow this volition. 
How should one undertake the discipline ofa day anda night, or the discipline of the fast? 
One should undertake the fast in a humble attitude, speaking after, with ornaments removed, until the morrow, complete, the morning, from another. 
1.In a humble attitude,squatting or kneeling; with the hands joined in kapotaka or in the position of eñal;; except in the case of sickness. 
Without a respectful attitude, discipline is not produced. 
2.The candidate does not speak before the ordainer or the giver, the person who gives the fast; nor at the same time. 
In this way, it is from another that oneundertakes the fast; otherwise, there would be neither receiving nor a thing received. 
The candidate does not wear any ornaments; he wears his normal dress, because he does not draw forth vanity from it. 
When these rules are not observed, one has nevertheless done a good action ,but one does not obtain the discipline of the fast. 
When the rules are observed, the fast is even more useful for the person who commits transgressions by day and by night. 
The fast is termed pavāsa, because, embracing a way of life conforming to that of the Arhats, he places himself near the Arhats. 
It has for its end procuring an increase of the roots of good of persons who have only small roots of good. 
As it procures an increase of good, the Blessed One said, It is called poṣadha. 
ksks Why is the discipline of the fast undertaken with eight parts? 
Part of morality , part of vigilence , parts of ascetic vows , have respectively four, one, three parts. 
Four parts:the renouncing of killing, stealing, adultery and lyingconstitute the parts of morality by which what is transgression by nature is abandoned. 
One part, the renounxing of intoxicating drinks, constitutes the rule of vigilence by which nonvigilence isarrested, For even if a person who has undertaken morality drinks intoxicating liquor, he will be noo vigilent. 
Three parts,:the renouncing of high beds, music,etc.,and meals at forbidden times,constitute the rule of asceticism, for they are favorable and conform to disgust. 
When one drinks intoxicating liquor,one loses ones mindfulness of what one shouldand should not do. 
When one uses high and wide beds, when one attends dances, singing and music, the mind becomes arrogant. 
In both cases, one is not far from violating morality. 
When one observes the rule of eating at the proper times, and when one avoids eating outside of this time, one retains a mindfulness of the obligations of the fast, and disgust is produced. 
In the absence of the eighth rule, mindfulness and disgust would be absent. 
This interpretation is not in accord with the Sūtra, ; for, according to the Sūtra, immediately after the renouncing of meals at forbidden times, the faster should say, By these eight rules,I imitate the rule,I conform myself to the rule of the Āryams, the Arhats.1ī ii. 
Then what would the fast be, distinct from its rules, and yet embracing eight parts? 
The expression, a fast having eight parts should be understood in the same way as the expressions, a part of a carriage, a fouṟpart army , or a powder made up of five parts. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the abstaining from food at forbidden times is at one and the same time the fast and a part of the fast.In the same way that Right Views are at one and the same time the Pathand a part of the Path ; in the same way that Investigation into the Dharmas is at one and the same time Bodhi and.a part of Bodhi ; and in the same way way that Samādhi is at one and the same time dhyāna and a part of dhyāna. 
Would you say that earlier Right Views, etc., are parts of later Right Views, etc.? This would be to admit that the first moment of the Path does not have eight parts. This would be to admit that the last moment of the parts of Bodhi is itself not a part. 
Is the possession of the discipline of the fast kept only by Upāsakas? 
The Mahānāmasūtrasays,Oh Mahāṇāma, the layman with white clothes, male and possessing the male organ, who, after having taken refuge in the Buddha, in the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, pronounces these words, Consider me as an Upāsaka: only through this does he become an Upāsaka. 
Does this mean that one becomes an Upāsaka by only taking the Three Refuges? 
The Kaśmīreans affirm that one cannot be an Upāsaka when one does not possess the Upāsaka discipline. 
But does this not contradict the Sūtra? 
The discipline of the Upāsaka is produced in him by the mere acceptance of the quality of the Upāsaka, when he says, Consider me, from today onwards,for the rest of my life,as a prāṇāpeta Upāsaka. 
Yet, in order that he understands the points of the rule , One explains them to him, as is also the case for a Bhikṣu. 
You are to abstain from this, from that. 
If all Upāsakas place themselves within the discipline of the Upāsaka, why did the Blessed One describe four types of Upāsakas, the Upāsaka of one rule , of two rules , of three or four rules 0adbhhyaskārīn, and of five rules ? 
In what way does it contradict the Sūtra? 
You say that one acquires the discipline by the mere, fact of accepting the quality of a prāṇāpeta Upāsaka, Consider me. 
But, such is not the text of the Sūtra. 
You hold that you are authorized by another Sūtra, which has, From today, for the rest of my life,, risking my life , having taken refuge, believing perfectly.Now this text refers to persons who have seen the Truths, who have acquired the faith of intelligence , and who, as a consequence, adhere to the Good Law even at the price of their lives: 
We are incapable of abandoning the Dharma, even in order to save our lives. 
This text does not give a definition of the Upāsaka discipline. 
Further, the expression prāṇāpeta, npoṉ which you establish your theory, is nowhere to be found, either in the Mahānāmasūra, nor the Dṛṣṭasatyasutra. 
Who could admit a similar expression the sense of which is lacking in precision? Who,based on faith in this expression, would admit that the Upāsaka has undertaken the five renouncings before he has undertaken them ritually? 
f the expression ekadeśakārṣnṉ designates a person who violates the discipline, thequestion raised in the Sūtra is not justified, nor its answer. 
In fact, who is it that, being acquainted with the discipline of an Upāsaka and knowing that it is made up of five rules, would be incapable of explaining, He who does not violate a rule observes a rule and so on. 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: If one were an Upāsaka without possess ing the discipline of an Upāsaka, one could also as well be a Bhikṣuor a Śrāmaṇera with an incomplete discipline. 
How can we know the extent, the number of the rules of the disciplines of the Upāsaka,theŚrāmaṇera,or theBhikṣu? 
Now the Master speaks of the Upāsaka not possessing the discipline in its entirety; but he does not speak of an incomplete discipline of the Bhikṣus or of the Śrā maṇeras. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr do not admit this opinion. 
When a person takes refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, what does he take refuge in? 
He who takes the Refuges takes refuge in the afukṣa dharmas which form the Buddha, in the two types of dharmas which form the Saṅgha, and in Nirvāṇa. 
He who takes Refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the dharmasr of the Arhat which form a Buddha, the ḍharṇeas which are the causes of the designation Buddha, that is, the dharmas by reason of which, as principle cause, a certain person is called a Buddha; or rather the dharmas by the acquisition of which a certain person,understanding all things, is called a Buddha. 
Thus one does not take refuge in the material body of the Buddha which is, in fact, the material body of the Bodhisattva. 
Does one take refuge in all the Buddhas or in one Buddha? According to the nature of things, and in the absence of an explicit declaration, in all the Buddhas. For the Buddhas have always followed the same path, a worldly path and a transworldly path.1 ii. 
He who takes Refuge in the Saṅgha takes refuge in both the Śaikṣa and the aśaikṣa ḍharmas, of the nonAṟhat and of the Arhat, which form the Saṅgha, that is,the dharmuas through the acquisition of which the Eight Saints become a Saṅgha; becoming unanimous they cannot be divided with regard to that which concerns the Path. 
Does one take refuge in all the Saṅghas or in one Saṅgha? 
Without doubt, the Buddha said to the two merchants, Also take refuge in the Saṅgha which shall exist in the futre, but the Master expressed himself in this manner in order to exhault the qualities of the Jewel of the Saṅgha which would soon be visible to the merchants. 
He who takes Refuge in the Dharma takes refuge in Nirvāṇa, that is to say, inpratisakhyānirodha. He takes refuge inall Nirvāṇa, for Nirvāṇa has for its unique characteristic the cessation of the defilements and suffering of oneself and others. 
If the Buddha is none other than the afxikṣa dharmas, the dharmas pertaining to an Arhat, how could the fact of wounding the Buddha with a bad thought constitute a mortal transgression ? 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: When one wounds the materialelements which are the supportof these dbarmas, these dharmas themselves suffer injury. 
But the Śāstra does not say that the Buddha is solely ikṣadharmas.It says that the Buddbha is thedharmas that form a Buddha, that is to say, either the worldly or transworldly dharmas which are the object of the designation Buddha, are the Buddha. 
Hence the objection taken from wounding the Buddha is without value. 
If it were otherwise, if the Buddha was only asukṣadharmas, and if the Sañgha were only fxikṣaand aśaikṣadharmas,a person whose mind is presently worldly would not be able to be either a Buddha or a Saṅgha. 
And by virtue of these same principles, one would have to say that a Bhikṣu is only morality, the discipline of a Bhikṣu. 
In the same way that one who honors Bhikṣus, honors the morality which makes up the Bhikṣus. 
According to another opinion, one who takes refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the eighteen āveṇikadharmas of the Buddha. 
What is the nature of the undertakings of the Refuges? 
They are vocal vñaptś. 
What is the meaning of Refuge ? 
The Three Refuges are so named because, by going to them for refuge one obtains definitive deliverance from all suffering. 
The Blessed One said in fact, Tormented by fear, persons most frequently take refuge in mountains, in forests, in woods, and in sacred trees. This is nota good refuge, the supreme refuge; it is not by taking refuge in these that one is delivered from all suffering. 
But one who takes Refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, when one sees through wisdom the Four Noble Truths,Suffering, the Arising of Suffering, the Extinction of Suffering, and the Holy Eightfold Path which leads to Nirvāṇa,this is the good refuge, this is the supreme refuge; by taking refuge in this, one is delivered from all suffering. 
This is why the undertaking of the Refuges is the enterance to the undertaking of all the rules of discipline. 
Sexual misconduct is much censured in the world because it is the coṟṟuption of anothers wife, and because it leads to retribution in a painful realm of rebirth. 
householders do not leave the world because they are not capable of difficult things. 
The Āryans possess akaraṇasavara with regard to sexual misconduct, that is, they have obtained definite abstention from it; in fact, in their future existence, they will be incapable of violating this precept. 
As a consequence, the rules of discipline of the Upāsaka contain only the renuniation of sexual misconduct: 
it is inadmissible in fact that the Āryaṇns, in a susequent existence, would be capable of violating the discipline of an Upāsaka which could happen if this contained the renuncation of all sexual activity. 
Has the man who marries after having undertaken the Upāsaka discipline, undertaken renouncing with regard to the woman whom he marries? 
Ī They have acquired it as they have accepted the discipline; they have not accepted it with regard to some persons. 
They have acquired it as they have undertaken the discipline. 
They undertake it by saying, I renounce sexual misconduct, that is, I renounce all sexual activity with all prohibited females; they do not undertake it by saying, I shall refrain from all sexual activity with such persons. 
Consequently, they do not violate the discipline by getting married. 
kṣṅk Among the transgression of speech, why does the renouncing of lying constituteone of the rulesof the Upāsaka,whereas the renouncing of other transgressions of speech are omitted? 
Because, having violated any other rule he would lie. 
Consequently the Upāsaka should renonnce lying, thinking, I shall coṉfess what I transgress. 
kḥ Why are not the transgressions of disobedience included in the discipline of the Upāsaka? 
Oṉe renounces strong liquor, which is a transgression of disobedience, Why should the Upāsaka renounce a single transgression of disobedience and not others? 
In order that the other rules may be kept. 
One who drinks strong liquor will not keep the other rules. 
ī.The Ābhidhārmikas maintain that strong liquor does nothave the characteristic of being a transgression by its nature. 
A transgression by its nature is committed only by a person whose mind is defiled: 
now it happens that, as a remedy, one can drink strong liquor in a quantity where it is not inebṛiating. 
But the mind of one who drinks knowing that such a quantity is inebriating is defiled; the mind is not defiled when one drinks knowning that such a qnantity is not inebriating. 
the Blessed One answered, Except, Upāli, by transgression of nature. 
Aṇd, the Blessed Oṉe did not permit strong liquors to sick Śākyans: 
Those who recognize me as their master should not drinkaṇy strong liquor, even a drop on the point of a blade of grass. 
The Āryans, even in a following existence, do not drink strong liquor, not any more than they would commit the other traṇṉsgressions of nature, killing, etc. 
though solely a transgression of disobedience, it is forbidden to the ill, and this witha view to preventing theupleasant consequence of strong liquor, because its inebriating quantity is undetermined. 
M 2.Ifthe Āryans certainly abstain from strong liquor,itis not because it is a transgressionby its very nature,but because they are filled with the force of modesty; , this is because strong liqtor makes mindfulness fail, even if they do not drink a dtop, this is because the inebriating quantity is not determined,as for poison. 
one does not say I renounce the pramādasthāna which is killing, and that isbecause theother transgressions are transgressions by their very ṉature. 
As a consequence of strong liquor, there is continual activity of a series of bad thoughts; from whence, there is either projection of a new action retribuable in hell, or else the entry into activity, at the moment of death, of an old action. 
Ata certain moment, the liquor is no longer inebriating; at a ceṛtain moment, it is no longer that; this is why the word adya has been added. 
One acquires the discipline of Kāmadhātu relative to all actiops, relative to the two types of beings and to the two types of actions, relative to things of the present. 
The discipline of Kāmadhātu is the Prātimokṣa discipline. 
This discipline is relative to the transgressions by nature and to the transgression of disobedience, both of which are capable of relating to living beings or to nonliving beings. 
This discipline is relative to thingsskandhas, āyatanas and dhātusof the present, for the things of the past and of the future are neither living beings, nor nonliving beings. 
One acquires these two disciplines relative to actions themselves, not relative to preparatory actions or to consecutive action, and not relative to the transgression of disobedience; and relative to the skandhas, āyatanas aṅd dhāṭus of the past, present and future. 
I can abstain from a future action relative to a person or to a thing existing at the present time, but I caṉnot abstain from a past or future action. 
From this last point of view, four alternatives can be distinguished. 
he who, through a strong, or mediocre, or weak mind, has acquired the discipline of the Upāsaka, the Upavāsastha or the Śrāmaṇera.2. 
There is a person abiding in the disipline,disciplined with regard to allbeings and relative to all the parts, but not disciplined by reason of all causes: 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, relative to all the parts, by reason of all the causes: 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, disciplined by reason of all the causes, but not disciplined relative to all the parts: 
he acquires the discipline through a good mind having for its object all beings. 
The Prātimokṣa discipline includes the absence of the fivefold reṣṭriction: 
with regard to beings, I renounce transgressions with regard to certain beings; 2. 
with regard to place, I renounce committing transgressions in a certain place; 4. 
with regard to time, I renounce transgressions for a month; 5. 
with regard to circumstances, I renounce transgressions except in the case of a quarreL He who undertakes such undertakings does not acqnire thediscipline; rather, he does a good action similar to the acquisition of the discipline. 
The Vatbhāṣikas givea different explanation.If the discipline was acquired only with regard to beings who are within range, the discipline would be liable to augmentation and to diminution: 
For the discipline that oneundertakes with regard to grass neither increases nor diminishes when new grass arises, nor when old grass dries up. 
Grass exists after having been nonexistent,and no longer exists after having existed. 
But when living beings enter into Nirvāṇa, they no longer exist, exactly like grass, so the discipline acquired with regard to living beings is subject to diminution. 
If one objects,In the case where the Prātimokṣa discipline wouldbe acquired with regard to all beings, then the discipline of later Buddhas would be reduced in comparason with that of former Buddhas, for it would not be relative to beings who have alteady entered into Nirvāṇa, to former Buddhas and their disciples, we would reply: 
all the Buddhas disciplineall beings; and if former Buddhas were to exist again, later Buddhas would be disciplined by them. 
Undiscipline, with regard to all, relative to all parts, and not by reason of all causes. 
Onṇe acquires undiscipline with rgard to all beings and relative to all courses of action. 
One is not undisciplined by reason of all causes, un discipline being undertaken by aweak,mediocre,or strong mind.Let us suppose that an undisciplined person has undertaken his undiscipline with a weak mind and commits a murder with a strong rmind: 
his undiscipline remains weak, but he is adorned with a strong vijfñapti, with a strong murder. 
The butchers of sheep, birdcatchers, the butchers of pigs, fisher maṉ, hunters, bandits, exceutioners, jailers, elephant hunters, the slaughterers of dogs, and the vāgurikas are all undisciplined. 
ii.We understand that discipline, undertaken with the intention of universal benevolence, would be acquired with regard to all beings. 
But the butchers of sheep do not have the intention of maltreating their parents, their children, or their servants; they would not want to kill them, even at the price of their lifes. How, , can one say that they are undisciplined with regard to all beings? 
But they do not kill their parents who have become sheep knowing that they are their parents! 
Furthermore, if their parents obtain the quality of an Āryan, these parents will not be reborn as sheep or as animals: hence the butcher is not undisciplined with regard to them. 
But, he who does not have the intention of killing the sheep who bave become his children is certainly not undisciplined in their regard. 
Because his intention is perverted. 
For the Vaibhāṣikas, nondiscipline is never incomplete, that is, relative only to certain parts; nor is it partial, that is, including restrictions in the practice of a certain transgression. 
Persons born in other families acquire undiscipline when they adopt such a style of life, thinking We too shall live in this manner. 
One acquires the other gvijñaprisby reason of the field, of undertaking, of an action seriously undertaken. 
Ceṟtain persons axe a field of sucha nature that by offering thema garden, etc., one reduces v;jñapti. 
2.One produces viñapti by undertaking vows, for example,I shall not eat unless I have paid homage to the Buddha, I shall give alms food on the fast day, for a fortnight, for a month, for a year, etc. 
The stanza calls the Prātimokṣa discipline derna because it subdues the six organs. 
through the cutting off of the roots of good. 
The discipline of fast is iost through these four causes and, further, when night come to an end. 
According to the Sautrāntikas, the discipline of the Bhikṣu and the novice is also lost through any one of the four patanyas, or transgressions involving a falling away. 
Through the disappearance of the Good Law, say some other masters. 
The Kaśmīreans believe that the transgressor possesses morality and immoraltity, in the manner thata person can have riches and debts. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr say: A monk guilty of a grave transgression, that is,of apaanīya,does not lose hisBhikṣu discipline.It is notadmissible that one loses the entire discipline by destroying only a part of the discipline. 
He who comrnits a transgression other than a patanya is not immoral. 
as a person who has both riches and debts; but when this transgressor has confessed his transgression, he is no longer immoral,but solely moral: as a person who has paid his debts. 
But the Blessed One has said, He is not a Bhikṣu, he is not a monk; he no longer belongs to the sons of Śākya; he falls from the quality of Bhikṣu; his quality of monkhood is cut off, falen, eṟased, tumbled down, annihilated. 
In this text Bhikṣu signifies a true Bhīkṣu: 
this means that, when one part of the discipline, the part which is the root of the discipline, is cut off, the rest of the discipline is incapable of growing. 
The Master excludes persons guilty of paanāya from all com merce with the Bhikṣus, he prohibits them from participating with them for even one mouthful of food, he forbids them from even setting one foot into the monastery. 
What indeed can be the Bhikṣu quality of this criminal? 
For the BlessedOne said, Cunda, there are four monks and not a fifth: 
Does one not speak of burning wood, of a driedup pond, of a parrotṇose , of rotten seed, of a ciṛcle of fire, or of a dead being? 
We do not say that any Bhikṣu guilty of unchastity is a pārājka, a fallen or destroyed Bhikṣu. 
But whoever is a pārājña is no longer a Bhikṣu.It is the idea of hiding the crime which is decisive here: 
If a pārājñka is no longer a Bhikṣu, why is he not again admitted to ordination? 
his mental dispositions are ruined and overturned by the excess of imprudence. 
Also, even if he had renounced the rules , he cannot be ordained again. 
If a similar Bhikṣu is aBhikṣu, we pay homage to this quality of Bhikṣu. 
When the Good Law disappears, all ecclesiastical acts become impossible, and as a consequence also all acqnisition of the discipline. 
How does one lose the discipline of dhyāna and the pure discipline? 
The good of the sphere of dhyāna is lost through a change of state and through falling. 
The same for the good of Ārūpyadhātu. 
By obtaining a result, the Āryan abandones the good dharrmas of the path of the candidate ; 2. 
when he falls, he abandons the result or the path of a superior result. 
Undiscipline is lost through the acquisition of discipline, through death, or through hermaphroditism. 
Death and hermaphroditism are, respectively, the abandoning and the overturning of the person through which undiscipline had been undertaken. 
An undisciplined person who rejects the tools of his work,dagger and net, even with the intention of no longer committing murder, does not by this cut off his undiscipline if he does notundertake the discipline. 
Iiness does not improve without medicine, even though one may avoid the causes of illness. 
Does an undisciplined person who undertakes the discipline of the fast remain undisciplined when he departs from the fast, or rather, does he find himself in the intermediary state, neitherdisciplinednor undisciplined? 
a mass of iron turṇed red retuṟns to its original state. 
kii How does one lose avjñap which is neither discipline nor undiscipline ? 
This avijñapti is lost by reason of six causes: 
Good nonmaterial action, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, is lost through the cutting off of the roots, and througharisingina superior sphere.ē We have explainedhow material action, namely bodily action, vocal action, and the avjñapati, is cat off. 
Good nonmaterial action of Kāmadhātu is lost thorough the cutting off of the roots of good, and through birth in Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
That which is defiled and nonmaterial is lost through the arising of its opposite. 
xc What beings are susceptible to discipline and to undiscipline? 
Humanswith the exception of the two categories of eunuchs, hermaphrodites, and the Kurusare susceptible of undiscipline; the same for the discipline which pertains also to the gods. 
Undiscipline exists only among humans. 
One must furthermore except ṣaṇḍhas and paṇḍakas, hermaphrodites and beings in Uttarakuru. 
, and from the Vimaya, One must expel such a person. 
Because they possess, to an extreme degree, the defilements of the two sexes; because they are incapable of the reflection necessary to combat these defilements; and because the vigor of respect and fear is absent in them. 
Why are they not susceptible to undiscipline? 
The Uttarakurus are lacking the undertaking of any discipline, from whence there is an absence of the Prātimokṣa discipline; and they lack absorption, from whence there is an absence of the other two disciplines. 
Neither discipline nor undiscipline can arise in the bodies, or in the persons, of eunuchs, hermaphordites, and beings in the realms of painful rebirth, for these bodies are similar to soil saturated with salt wherein there can neither grow wheat, nor bad herbs. 
The Sūtra says, OhBhikṣu, there isa Nāga boṟṉ froman egg which, each eighth day of the fortnight, leaves its dwelling, and comes to undertake the eightfold fast.. 
Discipline exists thus solely among humans and among the gods. 
The three disciplines exist among humans. 
These three are the Prātimokṣa discipline, discipline arisen from dhyāna, and pure discipline. 
Discipline of dḥyāna exists among the gods of Kāma dhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
So too the pure discipline, with the exception of the gods of the intermediate dhyāna and the Asajñisattvas; and also in Ārūpyadhātu. 
It exists in Rūpadhātu with the exception of the dhyānāntarikas of beings arisen in intermediate dhyāna, and the Asajñisattvas; and in Ārūpyadhātu. 
The gods of Ārūpyadhātu never in fact manifest this discipline, since discipline is matter, rpa; but they can possess it.19 Following the exemination of action, the author now defines the diverse categories of action which are taught in different Sūtras. 
keṭk There are three actions, g0od, bad, and neutral. 
Good action is salutary, bad action is pernicious, and action differing from good and bad isdifferent from the salutary and the pernicious. 
Such is the definition of good action, etc. 
Good action is salutary, because it is of agreeable retributionandas a consequence it protects one from suffering for a time ; oṟ rather, because it brings about the attainment of Nirvāṇa and, as a consequence,definitively protects one from suffering. 
There are three actions: meritorious action, demeritorious action, and nonagitated action. 
There are three actions: action of agreeable feeling, action of disagreeable feeling,and action of neither disagreeable nor agreeable feeling. 
Meritorious action is a good action in Kāmadhātu; non agitated action is a good action above there. 
Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is called meritorious action, because it purifies, and because it produces an agreeable retribution. 
Good actionabove there, that is to say, of the two higher spheres, is called nonagitated. 
The Blessed One said in fact that the first three Dhyānas are agitated, but he is saying this from the point of view of the corrupted characteristics of these dyānas ; their vices are what agitate them. 
But why term that which is agitated nonagitated? 
t Because, with regard to that which concerns its retribu tio, action of the domain of the higher stages does not vary. 
Action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is agitated in its retribution. 
The place of retribution is not fixed: 
one action which produces, naturally, a certain realm of rebirth, can be retributed in another one; an action which produces a heavenly realm of rebirth can be rettibuted in another heavenly realm of rebirth. 
In fact t happens that actions which produce power, a good figure, beauty, or objects of enjoyment, instead of being retributed in a heavenly realm of rebirth, are retributed in a human, animal, or Preta realm of rebirth through the efficacy of certain causes. 
But no cause can make an action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu be retributed in any but the sphere which is proper to it. 
Bad action is demeritorious. This is well known in the world and there is no good reason to insist on what is well known in the world. 
Good action, up to the Third Dhyāna, is of agreeable feeling. 
it thus has Kāmadhātu and the first three Dhyānas for its domain. 
Above, it is of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation. 
Agreeable and disagreeable sensation do not exist above the Third Dhyāṇṉa. There only remains the sensation of indifference, which is the only retribution of good action retributed above the Thitrd Dhyāṇna. 
Bad action is of disagreeable sensation. 
The ārkā says here below in order to indicate that this action exists only in Kāmadhāta. 
kṣksk Is the result of all these actions only sensation? No; they also have the apparatus of sensation as their result. 
According to some, intermediary action also exists below. 
Ḷ According to others, intermediary actionthat is,action which has for its retribution neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensationalso exists below the Fourth Dhyāna, Since there is no retribution with regard to dhyānāntara. 
These two opinions are in contradiction to the Śāstra , Does it happen that an action is solely mental sensation? 
Yes, the retribution of a good action which was free from vsitarka. 
The Śāstra says in the same place, Does it happen that there is at oṉe and the same time retribution of the three types of action? 
There can take place at the same time: 
the retribution of an action of agreeable sensation, namely of materialdharmas, ; the retribution of an action of disagreeable sensation, namely the mind and the mental states ; the retribution of an action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation, namely thedbarmas dissociated from the rnind,. 
Now, the three types of action cannot be retributed simultaneously outside of Kāmadhātu, for the retribution of action of disagreeable sensation takes place only in Kāmadhātu. 
Is the action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation good or bad? 
It is good, but of weak force. 
But didnt you say that good action, up to the Third Dhyāṇna, is of agreeable sensation ? 
ksk:k But how can one say that action is of agreeable sensation? 
One expresses oneself in this way because action is favorable to agreeable sensation; or rather, because its retribution is agreeably sensed. 
There are five ways of being vedanīya, sensed, ex perienced: of itself, through sensation, as an object, by being retributed, and by the fact of its presence. Sensation, by its nature, is feeling. Agreeable sensation is agreeable experience, etc. 
Contact is feeling because it is associated with sensation: 
contact of agreeable sensation, etc. 
The six objects of the six organs are feeling in the role of object , Seeing color with the eye, he experiences, he feels the color, but he does not feel the color with affection. 
hence when agreeable sensation is functioning, there is no other sensation through which one would feel it. 
Thus if one says that this sensation is to be felt , this is because it is present. 
Determinate action is of three types, to be experienced in the present life, etc.1 Determinate action is: 
By adding indeterminate action, this makes, from the point of view of the modality of retribution, four types. 
According to one opinion, action is of five types. 
By dividing indeterminate action into two categories: that which is indeterminate with regard to the period of its retribution, but whose retribution is in any case certain; and that which is indeterminate with regard to its retribution, which can be not retributed. 
Action experienced in the present life is action which ripens or is retributed in the same existence in which it was accomplished. 
Action experienced after being reborn is action which is retributed in the existence which follows that in which it was accomplished. 
Action experienced later is action which is retributed ina latet existence, from the third existence on. 
But, some other masters, , cennot admit that a very strong action has a weak retribution. Consequently, the retribution of an action experienced in the present life can continue into other existences; yet, as this retribution begins in the present life, this action i said to be experienced in the present life. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this way of looking at it. 
There is, they say, some actions whose results are near, and some actions whose results aṟe distant. 
In the same way flax bears its fruit after two and a half months, but wheat and godhāma after six months. 
Others distinguish four alternatives. 
The Dārṣṭāntikas distinguish four cases: Action determined with regard to the period of its retribution, but indeterminate with regard to its retribution. 
If this action is retributed, it will certainly be retributed at such a moment, but it is not necessarily retributed: 
But actions defined in SŚcripture as to be experienced in this life, etc.,are always of certain retribution; action defined as indeterminate may not be retributed. 
Does it happen that a person produces or projects all four types of actions at one and the same time? 
Suppose thata man has murder, stealing, and lying committed by another person; he himself commits adultery; and that these four actions, which belong respectively to the four types, are committed at the same instant. 
Three types of actions project existence. 
How many types of action can be produced in the different spheres of existence and in the different realms of rebirth? 
Fourfold production throughout. 
In the three spheres of existence and in all of the realms of rebirth the four types of good or bad action can be produced. 
Good action, in the hells, is solely of three types. In the hells, one can produce good action to be experienced in the next existence, good action to be experienced in a later existence, and good action which is indeterminate; but no good action to be experienced in the present existence, for there is no agreeable retribution in the hells. 
When he is firm, the Saint does not produce, in the stage from whence he is detached, any action to be experienced either in the next existence or in a later existence. 
In fact,the Pṛthagjana incapable of fallingaway is not reborn, in the next existence, in the stage from whence he is detached; end a Saint incapable of falling away is never reborn at this stage. 
Both produce, relative to the stage wherein they are born, actions to be experienced in the present existence, and indeterminate action. 
Even when they are subject to fallingaway, that is to say,susceptible of losing the results obtained, these Saints do not produce action to be experienced in the next existence, nor in a subsequent existence, either in Kāmadhātu or in Bhavāgra. 
The intermediate being, in Kāmadhātu, produces twenty two types of actions. 
The embryo passes through five states,kalala, arbuda, pesin, ghana, and praśākhā.A hbuman being passes through five states,as an infant,an adolescent, a grown person, a mature person, and an old person. 
These actions bear their results in the present existence. 
The eleven determinate actions of the intermediate being belong to the category to be experienced in the present existence. 
The intermediate existence and the ten states which follow it are projected by a single action. Thus one does not distinguish en action to be experienced in the intermediate existence: this is projected, in fact,by the action itself which is to be experienced in the life which follows the intermediate existence. 
By virtue of what characteristics is an action determinate, that is to say, necessarily retributed? 
Action accomplished through intense defilement or through intense faith, with regard to the field of qualities, continually, and the murdering of a father and a mother, are determinate. 
Action accomplished through intense defilement, action accom plished through intense faith, action accomplished with regard to a field of qualities, and action continually accomplished, are determinate. 
Field of qualities signifies either the Three Jewels, or certain persons, namely the possessors of the results, or Saints , and the possessors of certain absorptions. 
Actioṉ accomplished with regard to these fields, even in the absence of an intense thought of defilement or of faith, or of continuity, is determinate, whether it is good or bad. 
The same for the murder of ones father or mother, with whatever intention it was committed. 
By virtue of what characteristic is an action experienced in the present existence? 
Action bears result in the present existence by reason of certain characteristics of the field and the intention. 
for example, the Bhikṣu who becomes a woman through having insulted the Saṅgha, You are nothing but women! 
for example the eunuch who delivered bulls from the danger of being castrated, and so regained his own sexuality. 
as a consequence, action retributable in this stage, but in another existence,whether it is good or bad, changes its nature and becomes retributable in the present existence. 
Action determinate with regard to retribution. 
This refers to action having a necessary retribution, but in determinate with regard to the period of its retribution: this action will be retributed in the present life. 
As for action nondeterminate with regard to the retribution itself, it will not be retributed if one detaches himself from the stage where it could have been retributed. 
Which field confers on an action which is in a relationship with it, the quality of being necessarily retributed in the present existence? 
In general, it is the Saṅgha of Bhīkṣus having at its head the Buddha; to enumerate its persons, there are five types of persons: Persons who have left either nrodha, or maitri, ot araṇā, or Seeing the Truths, or the result of Arhat: 
The person who leaves the absorption of extinction : in this absoṟption he has obtained an extreme tranquility of thought, for this absorption is similar to Nirvāṇa. 
When he leaves it,it is as if he had gone to Nirvāṇa and has returned from it. 
in this absorption, his series is endowed with the intention of increasing the wellbeing of an infinite number of beings; when he leaves it, his series is penetrated with an intense and measureless merit. 
The person who leaves the result of Arhat, that is to say, who has just acquired the result of Arhat; he has just achieved the abandoning of all the defilements which are abandoned through Meditation on the Truths. His series is pure, since his personality has just been renewed. 
This is why good or bad actions, well or badly done, with regard to these five persons, bear a result in the present existence. The Paths of Meditation through which one obtains the results of Sakrdāgāmin and of Aṇāgāmin, are incomplete in themslves and in their result. 
Can the retribution of a certain action be excusively mental senṣation, and not bodily sensation ? 
And can the retribution of a certain action be bodily sensation, and not mental sensation? 
Sensation, the result of good action free from viarka, is exclusively mental. 
Sensatioṉ, which is the result of a bad action, is exclusively physical. 
A sensation, the result of retribution of a bad action, is painful; painful mental sensation is what is termeda sensation of dissatisfaction. 
But if dīssatisfaction,or painful mental sensation, is not retribution, in which consciousnessvisual consciousness, etc., mental conscious nēssis mental trouble or troubleofthemind, which is painful sensation, produced? 
Mentaltrouble is produced in the mental consciousness. 
The five sense consciousnesses cannot be troubled because they are free from imagining, inquiry and memory, and mental trouble is the imagining of that which does not exist. 
It arises from the retribution of actioṇ. 
The person who troubles and deranges the mind of another through curses and formulas; the person who causes another to drink poison or alcohol when he does not want to drink it; the person who frightens game,either in the hunt, or by setting the jungle on fire, or by the hollowing out of traps; and the person who, by whatever means, troubles the memory and the presence of mind of another, will have his own mind troubled, deprived of the aid of his memory through the effect of the retribution of these actions. 
Through fear, the attack of demons, irritation of the elements, and fear. Demon beings, with hoṟrible features, will approach such a person: seeing them, the person is frightened and his mind is troubled. 
Furious at the evil conduct of humans, demon beings willhit them in their vital parts. 
the wind, heat and liqnid will be irritated. 
We do not say that trouble of the minda troubled mindis retṛibution of action, but that it arises from the retribution of action. 
the troubledmind proceeds from it; t thus arises from retribution. 
Onessays that the mind s troubled when,by reason of the disequilibrium or the irritation of the humors, which results from action,.the mind is deranged, anarchic, devoid of mindfuiness. 
The mind troubled without being disturbed: the mind undefiled but troubled; 2. 
the mind defiled, but tranquil; 3. 
the mind troubled and disordered;. 
Among beings in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of the Kuṟus. 
Among the gods of Kāmadhātu, there are two madnesses; all the more so is there madness among humans, Pretas, and animals. 
Beings in hell always have troubled minds: their vital parts are incessantly hurt by thousands of different torments; they are crashed down by suffering; they do not recognize themselves, so they do not distinguish that which they shoulddo and that which they shouldavoid. 
We give as an example a being in hellwho laments by saying, Ah! The mind! 
With the exception of the Buddha, the Āryans are not free from trouble of the mind: 
for determinate actions where retribution could produce trouble of the mind are retributed before they have obtained the Path, and indeterminate actions will not bear their results due to : the fact that the Path is obtained. 
Neither terror, nor the attack of demon beings, nor fear can trouble the mind of the Āryaṇms, for theyare above the five fears, they do no disobedient actions which excite the fury of demon beings,for they cmpletely know the nature of things. 
ṅtk The Sūtra teaches that there are three ctookednesses, crookedness of the body, speech, and mind; and thus three corruptions and three stains. 
What is termed crookedness, corruption, stains, is action arisen from hypocrisy, hatred, and attachment. 
Action of the body, speech, and mind which arises from hypocrisy, proceeds from crookedness, and is called crookedness ; action which arises from hatred, proceeds from hatred, and is called coṟruption; and action which arises from attachment, proceeds from staiṉ, and is termed stain. 
Action is of four types, white, black, etc. 
black, of black retribution; white, of white retribution; blackwhite, of blackwhite retribution; neither black nor white, without black or white retribution; and that which destroys the other actions. 
60.Bad actions, good action of Rūpa, good actions of Kāma, are, respectively, black, white, blackwhite; action which destroys the other actions is pure action. 
Bad action, being defiled, is absolutely black; retribution, being painful, is black. 
2.Good action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu, not mixed with the bad, is absoḻutely white; its retribution, being agreeable, is white. Objection: 
Why not say the same for good action of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu? 
But the Sūtradescribesaction of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu as white and of white retribution. 
Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, being mixed with the bad, is blackwhite; its retribution is mixed, so it is thus blackwhite. 
There is no action which is blackwhite, nor any retribation which is blackwhite, which would be a contradiction. 
Butbad action is also mixed with whiteaction, hence bad action should be defined as blackwhite. 
Bad action is not necessarily mixed with good action; whereas, in Kāmadhātu, good action is necessatrily mixed with bad, because, in this sphere, the bad is stronger than the good. 
Pure action destroys the other three types of action. 
Not being defiled, it is not black; not being retributiion, it is not white. 
It is nonwhite. 
And one reads in the Treatise, What are the white dharmas? 
The good dharmas and the neutral dharmas? 
Pure action does not have any retribution, for it is not of the domain of the spheres of existence; in fact,it aṛrests the process of existence. 
Does any pure action destroy all the actions of the first three categories, black, white, or blackwhite? 
A volition may be of twelve types, namely the volition of the dharmakṣāṇtis andof the first eight paths of abandoning in the detachment of Kāmadhātu: such is the action which destroys black action. 
Four volitions correspond to the four dharmakṣāntis of the Path of Seeing the Truths; eight voiitions correspond to the fitst eight paths of abandoning in thedetachment of Kāmadhātu: inall twelve volitions,all pure actions which destroy bad actions. 
The volition of the ninth is the action which destroys blackwhite action. 
The volition which corresponds to the ninth path of abandoning in the detachment of Kāmadhātu is the pure action which causes the abandoning of blackwhite action and black action, for at this moment one abandons, in its entirety, good action of Kāmadhātu and the ninth and last category of bad action. 
The volition of the ninth and last path of abandoning which produces detachment of Kāmadhātu with regard to each dhyāna is fourfold volition which destroys white action. 
But you attribute the power to destroy whiteblack and white action solely to the ninth path of abandoning. Why is this? 
Therefore as long as the last category of defilement which can grasp it as its object is not destroyed, this gooddharma is not considered abandoned. 
According to others, the action which should be experienced inhell is black action; action which should be experienced elsewhere in Kāmadhātu, in addition to hell, is black white action. 
Infernal retribution is produced exclusively through bad action: as a consequence, action which should be experienced in hell is black action. 
Retribution in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of hell, is exclusively produced by goodbad action. Accoṟding to others, arisen in Kāma, actions are black when they can be abandoned through Seeing the Truths; they are blackwhite in the contrary case. 
According to other masters action which is abandoned through Seeing the Truths, not being mixed with the good, is black. 
AIl other actions of Kāmadhātu, namely action which is abandoned through Meditation, is blackwhite, that is, good mixed with bad. 
k The Sūtra says, There are three silences, silence of the body, voice, and of the mind. 
60 Afaikṣa, that is, an Arhats, actions of the body, voice and mind, are, in this order, the three silences. 
Silence of the body and silence of the voice is bodily and vocal action which belongs to the Arhat. 
Silence of the mind is the mind or thought which belongs to an Arhat; this is not mental action. 
Why is this? 
Because the mind is the true Silent One, the trne Muni. 
Because the Arhat is the true Silent One through the cessation of all muṟrmnuring of his defilements. 
The Sūtra says, There are three purifications, purification of the body, purification of the voice, and purification of the mind. 
The threefold good practice in its entirety is the threefold purification. 
All the good practices of the body, pure or impure, are a purification of the body, because, either for a time or in a definitire manner, they efface the impurity of the defilements and bad practices. 
This teaching has for its goal the instruction of persons who take a false silence for silence, and a false purification of purification. 
The Sūtra says that there are three bad practices. 
The bad actions of the body, speech and mind are regarded as being the three bad practices. 
Bad actions of thebody are the bad practices of the body and so on. 
Even though greed, wickedness, anger and false views are not actions, they constitute a threefoldbad practice of the mind. 
Further, there are three bad practices of the mind which, by their nature, are not mental action: greed, wickedness or harm, and false views. 
The Dārṣṭāntikas say that greed, wickedness and false views are, in fact, mental actions, for the Sacetanāyasñra considers them as actions. 
Because these produce a painful retribution, and because they are condemned by good persons, these practices of the body, speech and mind are bad; they are thus termed bad practices. 
The opposite of bad practice is good practice: good actions of the body, speech, and mind; further, nongreed, nonwickedness and right views. 
How can false views or right views by regarded as bad, or good??2 In fact, the firstdoes not contain an intention to do evil, and the second does not contain an intention to do good to another. 
By taking, among these practices, the most evident, one defines the ten coutses of action, good and bad respectively. 
The Sñtra defines ten courses of actin: good coutses of action, by taking the most important,.:which are the easiest to seefrom among the good practices;and bad courses of action,by taking the gravest from among the bad practices. 
What practices, bad or good, are not included in the courses of action? 
, ate not incuded among the coutses of action, because these practiees are not extremely grave, Among the bad practices of thebody are courses of action which deprive another of his life, of his goods, or of his wife: one must absoḻutely abstain from them. 
One part of the bad practice of the mind, volition, is also excluded from the bad courses of action. 
The good courses of action do not include 1. eithera part of the good practice of the body: preparatory or consecutive; abstention from inebriating drinks,etc.; alms, worship,etc. 
or one part of the good practice of speech, affectionate words, etc.; 3. 
Among the courses of action, Six bad courses of action can be exclusively gviñapti. 
When one has it committed by another, he does not procure the same pleasure. 
ksksk Among the good courses of action, Seven good courses of action are of two types. 
Seven courses of material actions, that is, of the body and the voice, aṟe of two types, viñap and avijñapti. 
The sāmamtakas are vijñapti. 
The sāmantakas or preliminaty actions are actions which prepare for the courses of action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
They may or may not be avij ñapti. 
If not, then no. 
Consecutive actions are, on the contrary, necessarily gvijñapti:They are viñapti whenṉ,having accomplisheda course of action, one continues to commit actions analogous to the course of action. 
A maṇ, desiring to kill an animal, rises from his bed, takes some silver, goes to the market, feels the animal, buys the animal, leads it, pulls it, makes it enter, mistreats it, takes a sword, strikes the head once or twice: as long as he does not kill it, the action preparatory to killing lasts. 
At the strokeby which he deprives the animal of its lifethat is,at the moment when the animal diesthe vñapts of this moment and the aviñapti which is simultaneous to this viñapti, are the course of action proper. 
For it is by reason of two causes thatone is touched by the transgression of murder: by reason of the preparatory action and by reason of the achievement of the result. The moments that follow, the moments of viñapti cteated by the killing, are the consecutive action; the series of the moments of viñapti are also consecutive action: 
moments that constitute pulling the hide off the animal, washing it, weighing it, selling it, cooking it, eating it, and congratulating oneself on it. 
There is no reason to distingnish preparatory and consecutive action for greed, wickedness and false views: 
Or is the vjñapti and the avjjñapti of the moment when the animal is in rtabhava, that is, when it is dead? 
If you accept the first hypothesis, a person would be guilty of the transgression of killing when he kills at the very moment when the killed animal dies: but your system does not admit this. 
And in the second hypothesis, you have rightly said that, at the stroke by which he deprives the animal of its life, the viñapti of this moment and the svjñapti simultaneous to this vifñapti, are the course of action proper. 
This Śāstra says, Can it be the case that a living being has already been killed but that murder has not yet occured? 
Yes, when the living being has already been deprived of life, but when the prayoga has not yet disappeared. 
Now you contradict this explanation since, placing the course of principle action at the moment when the animal dies, it is indeed the course of principal action which, according to you, has not disappeared at the moment when the animal dies. 
And how is that? 
Why would it not be? 
Because it is ineffective. The Vaibhāṣikas: 
A man desires to kill his enemy; in order to assure the success of this enterprise, he takes the goods of another and offers an animal in sacrifice; as a means to this same end, he committs adultery with the wife of his enemy in order to make her an accomplice; through lying, malicious, injurious, and frivolous words, he causes a falling out between his enemy and his friends who would be able to defend him; he coveṭs the goods of his enemy; he wishes to do evil to his enemy; he nourishes false views with regard to the murder that he wants to commit. 
But, greed, wickedness and false views are never preparatory actions, for they are not the beginning of an action; nor are they preparatory actions, for they are solely a production of the mind. 
killing arisen from desire, killing arisen from hatred, and killing arisen from ignorance, and thus following to, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, three types of false views. 
What are these different killings, etc.? 
killing in order to seize a ceṛtain part of an animal; killing in order to seize some goods; killing for pleasure; killing in order to defend oṉeself, or ones friends. 
Killing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
Killing arisen through ignorance. 
To consider the sacrifice as a pious action andso to kill, when a king, according to the authority of the legalists kills through duty, The first of the meritorious actions of the king is to punish evildoets; when the Persians say, One should kill ones aged and sick parents; when one says, One should kill serpents, scorpions, and ryambuka flies , etc., because these creatures are poisonous; one must kill game, cattle, birds, and buffalos in order to nourish oṇeself.? 
murder committed by a person who denys a future life and whom nothing can stop. 
Either one steals the object desired, or one steals in order to then gain possession of another object, to acquire honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Stealing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
A king, upon the authority of the legalists, seizes the goods of evildoers.The Brāhmins say, All things have been given to the Brāhmins by Brahmā; and it is through the weakness of theBrāhmins that the Vrṣalas enjoy it. 
Consequently, when a Brāhmin steals, he takes that whichbelongs to him; he eats what is his, wears what is his, and gives what is his. 
And yet, when Brāhmins take, they indeed have the notion of the goods of another. 
Stealing provoked through false views is also stealing from ignorance. 
Sexual intercourse with the wife of another, either through love, or in order to obtain honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Illicit sexuality arisen through hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
The Persians, etc., have intercourse with their mothers and other forbidden womer.. 
And such too are those that say, Women are like rice mortars, flowers, fruits, cooked food, ladders, roads, and ferryboats: they are there to be used. 
Lying and other vocal transgressions arisen from ignorance and from hatred, as above. 
Lying arisen from ignorance. 
Malicious words and other vocal transgressions arisen from ignorance. 
How do greed, wickedness and false views arise out of desire, etc.? 
Greed and the other two mental courses arise from the three roots because they appear subsequent to these roots. 
When they appear immediately after desire, they arise from desire; kck We have explained the bad courses of action in their relationship with the roots. 
As for the good courses of action, Good actions, with their preparatory and consecutive actions, arise fron nondesire, nonhatred, and nonignorance. 
This good mind,being necessarily associated with the three roots, arises from the three roots. 
Ñ The renouncing of a preparation of a bad course of action is a preparation of a good course of action; the renouncing of the action proper which constitutes a bad coarse of action is itself a good course of actioṉ; the renouncing of a consecative action of a bad course of action is a consecutive action of a good course of action. 
From the moment when the novice enters into the nānāvasa, salutes the Saṅgha,addresses his request to the Upādhyāya, uṇntil the first or second karmavācana, this is the preparatory actior. 
At the achievement of the third armavācana there takes place a viṝñapti, and an avijñapti simultaneous to this vēupti, which constitute the course of action itself. 
Killing, wickedness, and injurious words are achieved through hate. 
Solely by hate. They are achieved when one thought of murder, or one thought of violence manifests itself. 
Adultery, greed, and stealing are achieved through desire. 
Adultery is illicit sexuality. 
False views, through ignorance. 
The others, by the three. 
The courses of action, which have just been divided into four sections, three , three, one and three, have respectively for their Object: 
living beings, objects of enjoyment, nāmaripa, and ṉāmam. 
Living beings are the objects of killing, wickedness and injurious speech; the objects of enjoyment are the objects of adultery, greed and stealing; nāmarūpa, that is, the five skandhas, atre the object of false views; nāman, that is,thenāmakāya is the object of lying and the other two transgressions of the voice. 
When one has decided to kill someone, and if the murderer dies either before the intended victim, or if he dies at precisely the same momentas the victim,is therea principal courseof action for the author of the murder?Jf one dies before or at the same time, there is no principal course of action. 
When a person has made the preparation for killing, can itbe that, at the moment when the result of this preparation is achieved, thiśs person is not touched by the transgression of killing? Answer: 
Yes, when the murderer dies before or at the same time. 
as long as the victim is living, the murderer is not touched by the trans gressioṅl of murder; and when the victim dies, he no longer exists if he died at the same time or before. 
The bodythe personalityby whom the preparation had been accomplished, the body of the murderer, is destroyed; the murderer takes up a new body which belongs to another niāyasabhāga : 
this body did not make the preparation, is not prayoktar and, as a consequence, cannot be touched by the transgression of murder. 
When many persons are united with the intention to kill, either in war, or iathe hunt,or inbanditry, who is gnitty of mutder, if only one of them kills? 
As soldiers, etc., concur in the realization of the same effect, all are as guilty as the one who kills. 
Having acommon goal, all are guilty exactly as he who among them kills, for all mutually incite one another, not through speech, but by the very fact that they are united together in order to kill. 
But is the person who has been constrained through force to join the army also guilty? 
Evidently so,unless he has formed the resolution, Even in order to save my life, I shall not kill a living being. 
What does he do in order that he who kills should commit the course of actin? 
Murder is to kill another, consciously, without making an iiA When a personkills by thinking, I am killing such a one, and kilis this same person, and not another through error, then there is murḍder. 
But is there murder when a person kills, doubting if he hits a living being or a thing, or if he hits another? 
How can therebe murder, or destruction of the prāṇa , since the skandhas are momentary? 
Prāna, the vitalbreath, is a wind whose existence depends on the body and the mind. 
This prṇa is annihilated by a murderer in the same way in whichone annihilatesa flame or a sound of a bell, that isto say, by obstructing the continuation of its reproducing itself. 
Or rather, prūṉa is the vital oṟgan : when a person creates an obstacle to the arising of a new moment of the vital organ, he annihilates it, and is touched by the transgression of killing. 
But to whom do you attribute the vital organ? 
Who do you say is dead when life is absent? 
Let us observe that the Blessed One said, When life, heat and consciousness leave the body, it lies abandoned, like a piece of wood, deprived of feeling One says that the body lives when it isendowed with the organs; and that the body is dead when it is devoid of them. 
kesk According to theNirgranthas, transgression results for the doer from killing, even comrmitted without knowing it, or without desiring it,in the way that contact with fire results inburning. 
But if this is the case, then one is gnilty when one sees, or touches, without wanting to, the wife of another; he who trims the hair of the Nigranthas is guilty; the master of the Nirgranthas is guilty since he preaches terrible austerities; he who gives the Nirgranthas food which provokes cholera and death is also guilty. 
The mother and the embryo which are both the cause of suffering,are guilty; guilty aiso is the person killed, for he is bound to the action of killing as the object killed: and fire burns its own support. 
But on the other hand, he who has murder committed by another is not guilty, for one is not himself burned when one has another person touch the fire. 
Since you do not take intention into consideration, wood and other materials, even though lacking consciousness, are guilty of murder when a house collapses and living beings perish. 
Stealingtaking what is not givenis to appropriate to oneself the goods of another through force or in secret. 
The plunder of a Stūpa is to take a thing that has not been given by the Buddha: 
for, at the moment of Nirvāṇa, the Blessed One accepted, appropriated to himself all the gifts made to Stūpas. 
According to others, this is to take a thing which has not beengiven by the guardians of the Stūpa. 
To take a thing that does not have an owner is to take what is not given by the ruler of the country. 
To take the goods, the robes, etc.,of an deceased monk, is to take what is not given by the Saṅgha of the parish,? 
in the case when an ecclesiastical action has not been done; in the opposite case, this is to take what is not given by all the disciples of the Buddha. 
Illicit sexuality, fourfold, is intercourse with a woman with whom one should not have intercourse. Intercourse witha forbidden woman, that is, the wife of another, onesmother, onesdaughter, or ones paternal or maternal elations; 2.Intercourse withones own wife through aforbidden way;3. inan unsuitable place: an uncovered spot, a cuiya, an araṇya 4. 
when the wife is pregnant, when she is nursing, or when she has takena vow. 
when she has taken a vow only with the consent of her husband. 
Opinions differ on whether there is a coutse of action when one takes the wife of a certain one for the wife of another one. 
For some, yes, for it isthe wifeof another who was the objectof the preparatory action; it isalso the wifeof another thatone enjoys. 
With regard to the master of the land, who is not disposed to tolerate it. 
As for the master of the country himself,if his spouse, when she has undertaken a vow, is forbidden to him, all the more reason are nuns so forbidden. 
Lying is discourse held, with differing thoughts, with a person who understands the meaning, 1. 
Lying is discourse held, with thoughts different from the sense expressed, with a person who understands the meaning. 
When the person addressed does not understand, such discourse is only frivolous words. 
2.Discourse is sometimes made up of numerous syllables. Which will be the course of action? 
The last syllable, which is viñap and which is accompanied by avijñapti.Or rather, the syllable whose hearing causes the meaning to be understood. 
How should one interpret the expression arthābhijña, a person who understands the meaning? 
addressed capable of understanding the meaning? 
The person who knows the language and in whom auditory consciousness has arisen is capable of understanding the meaning. 
ksksk The Sūtra teaches that there are sixteen yocal actions, eight of which are bad: 
tosay that one has seen what one has not seen, to say that one has heard, cognized, or known what one has not heard, cognized, or known,; to say that one has not seen when one has seen; and to say that one has not heard, cognized, or known when one has heard, cognized, or known; and eight are good: 
What is the meaning of the words seen , heard , cognized , and known ? 
75.What is perceived through the visual consciousness, through the auditory consciousness, through the mental consciousness, and through three consciousnesses, is called, in order, seen, heard, cognized, and known. 
What is perceived through the visual consciousness receives the name of seen,..what is perceived through the consciousness of smell, taste, and touch, receives the name of known. 
How do you justify this last interpretation? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that odors, tastes and tangible things, being morally neutral, are as dead ; this is why they are called mmākā. 
The Sūtra says, What do you think,Oh Mālakīmātar, the visible objects that you have not seen, that you have not seen formerly, that you do not see, about which you do not think Would that I could see them, do you have, by reason of them, any longing, lust, desire, affection, attachment, appetite, or searching out? 
Oh Mālakīmāta:, with regatd to the subject seen, you will only think, Śit is seen, with regard to the subject heatd, cognized,and known, you will only think, it is heard, cognized, known. 
If it were otherwise, the experience relative to smells, tastes and tangible things would notbe refered to inthis teaching of the Blessed Oṇne. 
Then what should one thus understand by seen, heard, mata and cognized? 
According to the Śautrāntikas, that which isimmediately perceived by the five material organs, is seen, dṛṣṭ4; that the consciousness of which is transmitted to us by another, is heard, frux; what is admitted by reason of correct reasoning, is zaśa,known; and what is perceived by the mental organ is cognized, vñāta. 
thus the argument of the Vaibhāṣikas does not hold. 
According to former rnasters, seen is what is perceived by the oṟgan of seeing; heard is what is perceivedby the organ of hearing and what one learns from another: known is what is personally accepted or experienced; and cognized is what one feels in and of oneself. 
Does he who, by means of his body and not by means of speech, causes to be understood what is not in his mind, comrmit lying? 
Can one be touched by the transgression of killing, without acting, without attacking bodily? 
Can one be touched by the transgression of lying without vocal action? 
Question: Can one be touched by the transgression of murder, by the transgression of lying, without either bodily or vocal action? 
Yes, for example the Ṛṣis, guilty of murder through their anger,Ś and a Bhikṣu, guilty of lying through his silence in the confession ceremony. 
Malicious or slanderous speech is the discourse of a person with a defiled mind with a view to dividing. 
The discourse that one has, with.a defiled mind, with a view to dividing others and creating enmity, is malicious speech. 
Discourse pronounced with a defiled mind, outraging, understood by him whom one addresses, addressed to him whom one wants to address, is injurious speech. All defiled discoutse is inconsiderate speech. The Kārikā has all defiled. ; but it refers here to discourse. 
All defiled discourse is inconsiderate speech; one who utters it is thus aninconsiderate speaker; but the Kārīkā has bhinnapralāpitā in place of sabhinnapralāpa. 
According to others, inconsiderate speech is the defiled discourse which differs from the others. 
For example, boasting, singing, declamations; for example, bad commentaries. 
For example, a monk boasts about himself in order to obtain alms, etc.; through frivolity some others sing; in the course of plays or dances, the dancers, in order to entertain the public, hold inconsiderate discourse; adopting the doctrines of bad philosophers, nonBuddhists read bad commentaries. 
But is it not true that, in the period of a Cakravartin King, there are songs that do not have inconsiderate words? 
In this period, songs are inspired by a spirit of detachment, not by sensuality. 
Oṛ, according to another opinion, there is, in this period, inconsiderate words, since one speaks of āvāha, of vivāha, etc.; but this inconsiderate speech does not constitute the course of action of this ṉame. 
Greed is the desire to appropriate to oneself, by illigitimate means, the goods of another. 
To desire to appropriate to oneself the goods of another in an illegitimate manner, in an unjust manner,by force or secretlyWould that the goods of another were mine! 
According to another opinion, 2bhihyā means all desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, for the Sūtra of the Five Nīvaraṇas, on the subject of kāmacchanda, expresses itself thusly, Having abaṇdoned abhidhyā. 
But, say other masters, Cakravartin Kings and the Uttarakurus are not guilty of the course of abhdhyāactioṉ,and yet they are not delivered from desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātn. 
Wickedness is a hatred of living beings. 
False view is the opinion that there is neither good nor bad.t As it is said in the Sūtra, There is no gift, no sacrifice, no oblation, no good action, nobadaction. there are no Arhats in the world. 
False view, as this Sūtra shows, consists of negating action, its reṣults, and the existence of Āryans. 
Three are courses of action; seven are also action. 
Greed, wickedness and false views are courses of actioncourses of action that one terms volition. 
In the same way one should understand the good courses of action, the renouncing of killing, etc., non etc. 
Why are not preparatory and consecutive actions considered as courses of action ? 
Because preparatory action is accomplished with a view to the action proper; and because consecutive action has for its roots the action itself. 
And finally, courses of action are actions the augmentation and dirinution of which have for their result the augumentation or the diminution of things and living beings. 
How then do they explain the fact that the Sūtra gives the name of course of action to greed etc.? 
This is a question they must answer. 
Greed, wickedness and false view are mental actions and they are pathways leading to bad realms of rebirth; or rather they are both courses of action, for greed sets into motion wickedness and false view, and vice versa. 
kīk The ten bad courses of action are in complete contradiction with the good dharmas. 
The view of negation cuts off the roots of good. 
They are the roots of evil which cut off the roots of good, the roots of evil which are initially adandoned when one acquires detachment from Kāmadhātu. 
In the same way that one says that bandits burn a village because it is they who light the fire that burns the village. 
What roots of good are cut off? 
The innate roots of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
The roots of good of the sphere of Kāmadhātu are cut off when one cuts off the roots of good; for one who cuts off the roots of good of Kāmadhātu is not endowed with the roots of good of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
If this is so, how should one understand this text of the Prajñāpti, What cuts off this persons roots of good of the three spheres?. 
This text means that, at this moment, the aoquisition of the roots of good of the superior spheres become distant, because this person, who was formerly fit for these acquisitions, ceases to exist through the cutting off of the roots of good of Kāmadhātu. 
for one who cuts off the roots of good has already fallen from the acquired roots of good. 
What is the objectof the false view which cuts off the roots of good? 
The false view which negates cause and result. 
Negation of cause is to think, There is neither good nor bad action. 
Negation of result is to think,There is no retribution, no result of good or bad action. 
In fact, the negation which bears on the pure or the higher spheres is weak, because it is in relation with these objects only by association. 
kskḵ Some say that the nine categories of the roots of good, weakweak roots of good, weakmedium, weakstrong, mediumweak, etc., are cut off all at once through one moment of false view, in the same way that the defileaments which are abandoned by Seeing into one Truth are, in all their categories,abandoned through the Seeing of this Ttuth. 
this means that the strongstrong root of good is cut off by a weakweak false view, and thus following to the weakweak root of good which is cut off by a strongstrong false view. 
They are those which are abandoned lastly to the cutting off of the roots of good; those through the absence of which a person is termed onewhohastherootsof. 
The roots of evil through which one cats off the roots of good? 
As long as the last category of the roots of good, the weakweak, is not cut off, it can determine the reappearance of the others. 
According to certain masters, the abandoning of discipline preceeds the cutting off of the roots. 
But the Vaibhāṣikas say that the discipline is lost when one loses the mind of which this discipline is the result. 
What beings are capable of cutting off the roots of good? 
The catting off takes place among humans. 
Only humans cut them off; not the creatures in the painful realms of rebirth; for their discernment , whether defiled or not, is not firm; not the gods, for the reṣult of action is manifest to them. 
And only humans of the three continents cut them off, bot those of Uttarakuru, for they do not possess bad āśayas. 
According to another opinion, only humaṉs in Jambudvīpa cut off the roots of good. 
Men and women cut off the roots. 
According to another opinion, women do not cut off the roots because their will and their application are weak. 
But this is in contradiction with the text, Whoever possesses the female organ necessatily possesses eight organs. 
By virtue of thesesame principles,eunuchs, etc.,do not cut off the roots of good, because they are counted among the sensualists, and because their discernment, like that of the creatures of painful realms of rebirth, is not firm. 
What is the nature of the cutting off of the roots of good? 
When the possession of the roots of good is obstructed in rearising, in continuing, then ten nonpossessions , or nonendowed ments arise. 
When aprāpi has arisen, there is a catting off of the roots of good. 
It can happen that a person whose roots of good have been cut off produces, relative to cause and result, either doubt or insight into their existence, which is Right View. 
When Right View has arisen, then one says that the roots of good have arisen, because the possession of these roots is henceforth present. 
The roots arise in their nine categories; but they willonly gradually manifest themselves, in the same way that one initially regains ones health and then, gradually, ones strenṇgth. 
Other persons who have cut off the roots of good can take them up again in this life,but not one guilty of an āvantarya transgression who has thus cut off the roots of good. 
It is with regard to this transgressor that it is said, This person is unfit to again take up the roots of good in this life; but he certainly will take them up either by dying in hell, or bybeing born. 
By being born means to be found in an intermediate state. By dying meanms disposed to die. 
The roots of good are taken up by being born since they have been cut off by the force of the cause; and by dying, since they have been cut off by the force of a condition. 
Same difference when they have been cut off by ones own force, or by the force of another. 
The person who is āfayavipannathat is to say, lost by the fact of his false viewcan take up again the roots of good in the present existence. 
ānantarya transgressiontakes up the roots again only after the destruction of his body.. 
One can cut off the roots of good and not be destined to hell. Four cases: 
With regard to the painful realms of rebirth, volition can coexist at most with eight courses. 
Volition caṇ coexist with one course of action, as when either greed, anger, or a false view manifests itself, without any material course of action having taken place; or rather the person who has prepared one of the material courses of action finds himself to have a nondefiled, that is,a good or neutralmind, at the moment when, on his instigation, this course of action is perpetuated. 
Volition can coexist with two courses of action, as when a person with an angry mind kills; or when a person who is prey to greed steals, or commits adultery, or speaks in an inconsiderate manner. 
Volition can coexist with three courses of action, as when a person with an angry mind kills and steals at the same time. 
But havent we seen that stealing is only achieved by desire alone ? 
Oṟ rather, when the mind is in the prey of greed, etc., at the moment when three material courses are completed. 
Volition can coexist with five, six, or seven courses of actioṉ, as when the mind.is in the prey of greed, etc., at the moment when four, five, or six material courses of action are completed. 
Volition can coexist with eight courses of action, as when a person has made the preparatoṟy action of six courses of action, murder, etc.; at the moment when these six courses of action are completed, he is in the prey of greed and commits adultery. 
Concerning good courses of action, volition can coexist with ten. 
The ten good courses of action can be simultaneous to volition. 
Volition does not coexist with one, eight, or five couṟses of action. 
Volition can coexist with three courses of action, as when the mental consciousness is associated with Right View and when the seven good material courses of action are absent. 
When, with a bad or neutral mind, one undertakes the discipline of an Upāsaka or a Śrāmaṇera which embraces four material good courses of action, non killing, etc. 
Ī Volition can coexist with six courses of action, as when, the five consciousnesses being good, one undertakes the same disciplines: 
Volition can coexist with seven courses of action. When, with a good mental consciousness, one undertakes the same discipline, add Right View. 
Oṟ rather, when, with a bad or neutral mind, one undertakes the discipline of Bhīkṣu: 
One undertakes the discipline of a Bhikṣu, the five consciousnesses being good: 
when one undertakes the discipline of a Bhikṣu with a good mental coṉsciousness, except in the case of ṣzyajñāna and anutpāda fñāṇa; and all volition concomitant with the discipline of dḥyāna and pure discipline when this volition is not associated with hbṣaūn oṟ anutpādajñāna. 
ākik What are the courses of action which exist, either in fact or as potentiality, in the different realms of rebirth?Inconsiderate words, injurious words, anger, of two types, exist in hell. 
Inconsiderate words exist in hell, forbeings in helllament; injurious words, for beings in hell mutually reproach one another; and anger, because they hate one another for the duration of their lives. 
Greed and false views, as potentiality. 
Three exist in Uttarakuru. 
But, in fact, greed is absent there, for no one has anything of his own; in the saṃme way anger is absent, because they are soft, and because there is no cause for displeasure; so too false views are absent, because there is no bad āfaya. 
The seventh course exists there in fact also. 
Because bad āśzya is absent there; because the duration of ones life is determined there ; and because no one possesses any property or object of property, or women, and also through its lack of usefulness, killing and the other courses of action are absent in Uttarakuru. 
They take the women with whom they desire to enjoy pleasure by the hand and go to a tree. 
If sex with this woman is allowable, the tree covers up the couple with its branches; in the contrary case, the tree does not cover up the couple. 
The ten bad courses of action exist elsewhere in Kāma dhātu. 
The ten bad courses of action exist in fact in Kāmadhātu with the exception of hell and Uttarakuru. 
Concerning animals, Pretas and gods, the bad courses of action are not necessarily connected with undiscipline ; with regard to humans, the bad courses of action are either necessarily connected, or not necessatily connected to undiscipline.. 
The gods do not, amongst themselves, kill one another, but they kill beings belonging to other realms of rebirth, Pretas, etc. 
According to another opinion, the gods also kill bycutting the head or the body. 
Three good courses of action exist everywhere, as potentiality and in fact. 
Everywhere, in the three spheres of existence and in the five realms of rebirth, nongreed, nonanger and Right Views exist both as potentiality and in fact. 
In the Ārūpyas, among the Unconscious Ones, seven courses of action exist as potentiality. 
Amonghe beings of Ārūpyadhātu aṇd the Asāmjñisattvas , the seven good material courses of action, bodily and vocal, exist solely as potentaility. 
In fact, Āryans who are born in Ārūpyadhātu possess the past and future discipline of pure morality, and the Unconscious Oṇes possess the discipline of hyāna under the same conditiops. 
The past pure discipline that the Āryan who is in Ārūpyadhātu possesses, has for its base of support the stage or stages which he has produced and destroyed; the future pure discipline that he will possess, has on the contrary the five stages for its base of support. 
For the rest, good courses of action also exist in fact, with the exception of beings in hell and the Uttarakurus. 
The rest, that is, in the other spheres of existence, and in the other realms of rebirth. 
Good or bad, the ten courses of action have a threefold result. 
Through each bad cou1se of action practiced , caltivated , developed , a traṉsgressor is reborn in hell. Such is the retributive result. 
But, one would say, a human existence, even if it is short, is the retṛibution of a good action. 
How can one regard it as an outflowing result of murder? 
We do not say that this existence is the result of murder; we say rather, that a murderer will have a short life by reason of the murder; murder is the cause which rends a human existence short, an existence otherwise caused by a good action. 
Is it by reason of killing that a murderer is reborn in hell and then only enjoys a short human life? 
It is called outflowing by reason of the resemblance between the cause and its effect. 
Why is the result of the courses of action threefold? 
One who commits murder causes the victim to suffer, causes him to die, and destroys his vigor: 
The result is threefold, because one makes him suffer, because one makes him die, and because one destroys his vigor. 
Because one causes suffering, there is a retributive result, that is, suffering in hell; because one makes him die, there is an outflowing result, that is, his life is short; and because one destroys his vigor, there is a predominating result, that is,external things are of little vigor. 
Is this to say that wrong livelihood is separate from wrong speech and wrong action? 
Bodily action and vocal action arising from hate and ignorance are, respectively, wrong actrion and wrong speech. 
Consequently, since the mananer of livelihood is, as long as one lives, difficult to purify, the Blessed One, with an end that one should apply himself to purifyiDg it, made a separatecategory of wrong livelihood. 
There is a stanza,! The layman purifies his views with difficulty, for he is always in the prey of multiple views; the monk purifies his manner of livelihood with difficulty, for his subsistance depends on others. 
If one says that it is solely action issued from attachment to the resources necessary for life,no; for this is incontradiction with the Sūtra. 
If someone thinks that to dance, to sing, etc.,for ones own pleasure is not a wrong manner of livelihoodbecause wrong manner of livelihood is only bodily and vocal actions inspired by attachment to the means of subsistance,we would answer: 
In fact, the Blessed One, in the Śīūaskandhikā, taught that looking at elephant fights, etc., isa wrong manner of livelihood. 
And why? 
Because this is to enjoy bad objects. 
We have seen that there are five results, predominating results, results of virile activity, outflowing results, retributive results, and disconnection or liberation. How many results are included in the different types of action? 
Impure, in the path of abandoning, action embraces the five results. 
The path of abandoning is so called because it has abandoning for its goal, or because the defilements are abandoned due to it. 
thedharmas that this action gives rise to, namely the path of deliverance , the coexisting dharmas, the future dharmas of which this action causes one to obtain possession, and the abandoning itself; and 5. 
a predominating result: all the conditioned dharmas with the exception of the action in question, and with the exception of the dharmas already arisen. 
Pure, it includes four results. 
The rest of pure action and neutral action, three results. 
The good,bad, neutral dharmnas, constitute four, two, and three results of good action. 
Good, bad, neutral dharmas, constitute, respectively two, three, and four results of bad action. 
Two results,.virile activity and predominating results of bad action,aṟe good dharmas. 
Three resultsby ornitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharmas. 
Four resultsby omitting disconnective resultsare neutral dharmas. It is admitted then that an outflowing result of bad dharmas can be made up of neutral dharmas. 
How is this? 
namely of the universal defilements which one abandons through the Seeing of Sufferingand Arising, and of the defilements of the rāga class, etc., which one abandons through the Seeing of Suffering. 
The same dharmasgood, bad, nēutral harmasmake up two, three, and three results of neutral action. 
Two results.virile activity and predominating results,are good dharmas. 
Three resultsby omitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharnas. 
In fact some bad dharmas of the five categories , to be abandoned through Seeing the Truth of Suffering, etc.,arean outflowing resultof two neutral dharmas, namely of satkāyadrṛṣṭi and antagrāhadrṭi. 
Three resultsthe same as aboveare neutral. 
All the āharmas or some dharmas of all types, that is, past, present and future, cen constitute four of the results of past action. 
Some future dharmas constitute four results of median action. 
There are two which are median dharmas. 
For action not yet arisen, there are three results made up of future dharmas. 
An action of a certain stage produces four resultsby exclding disconnectonwhich are dharmas of its own stage. 
Some pure dharmas belong to a stage different from that of the the action which constitutes three results of this action: virile activity, predominating result and also outflowing tesult, after the rule gīven in ii53. 
constitute three results of Śaikṣa actioṉ. 
914 Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitute one result, three results, and two results of Aśaikṣa action, etc. 
NeitherŚaikṣanorAśaikṣa dharmas are predominating results and virile activity of this action. 
Some Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitte two results, two tesults, and five results of actrion diffeting from the two preceeding. 
Some neitherŚaikṣanorAśaīkṣa dharmas are five results of this action. 
Dharmas susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths , susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation ,and not susceptible of being abandoned , constitute three results, two results, one result of action susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths. 
Some bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: excluding disconnection. 
Some apraheya harmas are predominating results of this action. 
The samedharmas constitute two, four, and three results of action susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation. 
Bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: excluding disconṉection. 
The same ḍharmas constitute, respectively, one result, two results, and four results of action not susceptible of being abandoned. 
Some bhāvanābeya dharmas are predominating results and virile activity reṣults of this action. 
Some apraheyadharmas are four results of this action: omitng the retrṛibutive result. The text has yathākramam, respetctively, the same as the above passage has anukramaṉ in the sense of yathākraman.It repeats here respectively: 
the Treatise speaks of proper action , improper action , and neitherpropernor improper action. 
Some say that improper action is defiled action, because this proceeds from a wrong judgment. 
when a person walks, stands still, eats, or dresses himself in a manner other than that which he should, this actionwhich is undefiledneutralis improper, for this person acts contrary to received usage. 
Action which differs from proper action and improper action is neitherpropernorimproper action. 
Does one action project one birth or many births? 
Do many actions project one birth or many births? 
According to the system of the School One action projects one arising. 
He who comes into an existence is said to be born. 
This thesis is in contradiction with what the Sthavira Aniruddha says, Through the retribution of this single alm , after baving been born up to seven times among the Thirtythree Gods, I am finally born in the family of the rich Śākyaṇs. Answer: 
Aniruddha, through this alm, obtained a great prosperity; he obtaineda memory of his past lives; and he accomplished many new meritorious works. 
It is thus that a person who had acquired a sum of one thousand by means of a single penny, could say, It is through one penny that I have acquired this fortune. 
one result appeared to each volition. 
The same way that a painter with one stroke delineates the outline of an image, and then fills in this image: 
so too, even though their quality of being a human is the same, certain humans have perfect organs, major and minor members; certain humans are beautiful through the excellence of their hue, figure, shape and power, whereas, in certain humans this or that is lacking. 
However Neither the two absorptions of unconsciousness nor the prāptis project. 
Even though they are retribution, the two absorptions of un consciousness do not project an existence, because they do not coexist with action. 
The Blessed One said that there are three āvaraṇas oṛ 
What are the three obstacles? 
dnantarya actions; chronic defilements; and bad realms of rebirth, and Asajñisattvas and Kurus, are the threefold obstacle. 
The obstacdle which consists of action are the five mortal transgressions: 
matricide, patricide, the kiling of an Arhat, schism, and wounding the Tathāgata with thoughts of hatred. 
The obstacle which consists of the defilements is chronic defilement. 
Defilement is of two types, chronic and violent: chronic defilemet is continual defilement, and violent defilement is strong defilement. 
Chronic defilement constitutes an obstacle, as is the case, for example, among eunuchs. 
Defilements which surge up from time to time, even if their impulse is strong, can be overcome, but not continual defilement, even though it is at rest. 
The obstacle which consists of retribution is the three painful realms of rebirthexistence in hell, animal existence, and Preta existenceand one part of the good realms of rebirthhuman existence in Uttarakuru, and heavenly existence amoṅg the Un conscious Ones. 
That which causes an obstacle to the Way and to the roots of good preparatory to the Way, wṣmagatas, etc. 
Actions which necessrily produce painful realms of rebirth, etc., which produce birth in eggs, birth in sweat, birth as a woman, or an eighth birth, form obstacles. Answer: Only actions easily discernible by others and by the agent himself:and that from five points of vieware mentioned here. 
from five points of view, action which is mortal transgression is easy to discern. 
Among the obstacles, the gravest is the obstacle of defilement, followed by the obstacle of action. 
For these two obstacles rend one incapable of health, not only in the present existence, but also in the next existence. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , the obstacle of defilement is the gravest because it produces the obstacle of action; the obstacle of action is heavier than the obstacle of retribution because it produces this obstacle. 
Or rather a person guilty of a mortal transgression is reborn, after this life, immediately in hell; the gailty person is thus entara, one without intermediate ; thus the dharma the possession of which makes the guilty one an nantara is called ānantarya, like one terms śrāmaṇya the dḍharma which makes someone a Śrāmaṇa. 
Mortal transgressions exist in the three continents. 
And, among humans, only men and women can commit mortal trans gressions: 
For the same reasons that rend eunuchs, etc., incapable of indiscipline ; and, further, because their parents, having given to the eunuch only an incomplete body and having only a mediocre affection for their son, are mediocre benefactors; because, on the other hand, the eunuch does not experience a strong respect for his parents the destruction of which would render him guilty of a mortal transgression. 
For the same reasons, a human born of demon parents does not commit a mortal transgression in killing them. 
The other two obstacles exist in the five realms of rebirth. 
Birth in Uttarakuru is an obstacle of retribution for humans; birth among the Asajñisattvas is such for the gods. 
Four are bodily action; one is vocal action; three are killing; one is lying; and oṉe is the preparation for murder, for the Tathāgatas cannot be killed by the attack of another. 
As much as it is a person who divides the Saṅgha, the schismatic is not in possession of the schism. 
On the the contrary It is the Saṅgha which possesses the schismn. 
The transgression of schism is lying; it belongs to the schismatic. 
The schismatic possesses the transgression of schism, which is This lyingarises at the same time as the schism itself;, it consists of vocal vjñapti and avijñapti. 
Suffering growsby reason of supplementary transgression. 
Who is capable of dividing the Saṅgha? 
A Bhikṣu who is an intellectual, who is virtuous, divides. 
It is a Bhikṣa who divides, not a layman, not a nun, etc. 
This Bhikṣu should be an intellectual, not a sensualist; he should be viṛrtuous, not immoral: for the words of an immoral Bhikṣu lack authority. 
Where does schism take place? 
Elsewhere. 
Schism is impossible where the Master is to be found, for the Tathāgata cannot be conquered and his word is full of authority. 
kṣks Who does the schismatic divide?, Fools. 
According to another opinion, the schismatic can no longer divide possessors of kṣāati. 
kōkḵ What does the Saṅgha do that it is divided? 
A night of the same day. 
The schism that we have just described, and which is a mortal transgression, Is what we understand by breaking the WheeL The Wheel of the Law of the Blessed One is then broken, because the progress of the Path is hindered As a consequence there is, at the same time, both bbreaking of the Wheel and a division of the Saṅgha. 
Where is breaking of the Wheel produced? 
In Jambudvīpa. 
By nine or more. 
The Saṅgha susceptible of being divided counts at a minimum eight Bhikṣus; the ninth monk necessatry is the schismatic. 
when, in one parish , the monks divide themselves in order to perform ecclesiastical actions, posadha, etc. 
Ritual schism in three continents. 
This schism supposes eight Bhikṣus or more. 
kiik At six periods, the schism of the breaking of Wheel cannot take place. 
The breaking of the Wbeel is impossible at the beginning; at the end; befoṟe the abscess; before a pair; when the Sage is extinguished; or when a parish has not been delimited. 
in these two periods the Saṅgha is penetrated by a single sentiment.Ś In the interval, breaking is impossible before the appearance of an abscess: 
as long as a pair of excellent disciples has notappeared, because the Saṅgha should not pass a night in a state of division, and because this pair of disciples has for its task the reestablishment of harmony. 
Breaking is impossible when the Sage is extinguished, for, once the Master has entered into Parinirvāṇa, a schismatic would have no opponent. 
Finally, when a parish has not been delimited, for oṉe says that the Saṅgha is divided when there two parties in one parish. 
All Buddhas do not have their Wheels broken as does Śākyamuṇi: this depends on their former actions. 
Why are the trensgressions enumerated above, matricide, etc., mortal transgressions to the exclusion of other transgressions? 
Matricide and patricide are mortal transgressions because they destroy a benefactor. 
How does the murderer destroy them? 
By killing themn. 
The murder of an Arhat and the last two mortal transgressions are mortal transgressions because an Arhat, the Saṅgha and the Buddha are fields of qualities. 
ksksk But if the gender of the mother and father changes,does the quality of mother and father no longer exist within the mother and father? 
It is said in fact , Caṉ a petson be guilty of a mortal transgression killing a man who is not his father, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his mother whose gender has changed. 
Can a person be guilty of a mortal transgression by killing a woman who is not his mother, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his father whose gender has changed. 
When the embryo of a woman falls out and when another woman deposits it in her womb, which of these two women is reputed to be the mother whose murder constitutes a mortal transgression? 
The mother is the woman from whose blood one is born. 
she is the one who gives the child liqguid to drink, who nourishes it, and who raises it. 
kskokḵ There is no mortal transgression if, wanting to kill ones mother a person kills someone else; there is no mortal transgression if, wanting to killanother person, a person kills his mother. 
For example, a man who kills his mother stretched out ona bed where hebelieves there isa man asleep, and the child of the laundryman who kills his father wanting to kill a mosquito, do not become guilty of mortal trans gressions. 
If a man kills his mother and another person with the same stroke, there are two avijñaptis, an avijñapti of simple murder, and an evijñapti of a mortal transgression; but the vñapti is solely of the mortal traṉsgression, by reason of the force of the mortal transgression. 
Yet, according to Ghoṣaka , there are two vijñaptis, fot a viñap is made up of atoms. 
The person who kills an Arhat without knowing him to be an Arhat, thinking only to definitely kill such a person, does not have any discrimination with respect to the person to be killed. 
The person who kills his father, when his father is an Arhat, is guilty of only one mortal transgression,namely thekilling of an Arhat: for the father and the Arhat make up only a single person. Objection: 
Tell Śikhaṇḍin that he has committed two mortal transgressions, patricide and the murder of an Arhat. 
Rudrāyaṇa means that his son commmitted a mortal transgression through two causes of mortal transgression; or rather Rudṛāyaṇa said two mortal transgression in order to doubly condemn the conduct of his son. 
Does the person who, with a bad mind, cause the blood of the Tathāgata to fiow, necessarily commit a mortal transgression? 
No, when he only had the intention of striking the Buddha. 
Is a person guilty of a mortal transgression when he injures to death a person who becomes an Arhat after being injured? 
In fact, the preparation for murder had for its object a person who was not an Arhat. 
Can a person who made preparation for a mortal transgression, obtain detachment and its result by arresting it? 
Detachment and its results are impossible for one who has made preparation for a mortal transgression. 
A person who enters the Pathafter havingdone the preparation for anṇy other evil deed, will not produce this deed, by reason of the absoḻute contradiction between his new personality and the deed. 
What is the gravest of the mortal transgressions? 
Lying with a view to schism is considered the gravest transgression. 
A person who, knowing what is Dharma and nonDharma, lies with a view to dividing the Saṅgha and teaching falsely, by this makes himself quilty of the gravest transgression among all misdeeds. 
In fact, he wounds the Dharma body of the Tathāgatas, he creates an obstacle to temporal wellbeing and to the deliverance of creatures. 
This is why the retribution for this crime lasts a cosmic age and takes place in Avīci. 
Among the other mortal transgressions, the fifth, the third and the first are, in descending order, the heaviest. Patricide is the lightest. 
The Blessed One said that mental daṇḍa is the most culpable of the threedaṇdḍus; he saidalso that false view is the gravest among all the transgressions. 
Oṇe must understand that, among the mortal traṇsgressions, schism is the gravest transgression; that mental deṇḍa is the gravest among the three actions; and that false view is the gravest among the bad views. 
Or rather schism is the gravest transgression if one considers the extent of its retribution; vanodaṇḍa, if one considers the number of persons destroyed by it; and false view, if one considers the roots of good which false view alone cuts off. 
Among the good actions, which bears the greatest resuit? 
Among the good worldly dharmmas, a volition for Bhavāgra bears the greatest result. 
This action is the most fruitious of good worldly actions, for its retribution is a perfect tranquility for twentyfour thousand cosmic periods. 
TThis is anderstood from the point of view of its retributive results. 
From the point of view of its disconnective result the most fruitious action is volition associated with Vajropamasamādhi , for this volition has for its tesult the cutting off of all the bonds. 
This is why the Kārikā says, Among the good worldly dhar ksksk Is itonly througha mortal transgression thata person is necessarily rṛeborn in hell? 
106 To defile ones mother, to defile an Arhantī; to kill a predestined Bodhisattva; to kill a Saikṣa; and to steal the goods of the Saṅgha are transgressions similar to mortal trans gressions; the fifth is the destruction of a Stūpa. 
to defile ones mother, to defilean Aṛhantī , to killa predestined Bodhisattva ; to kill a Saint who is not an Arhat ; to rob the Saṅgha of its means of substance ; and to destroy a Stūpa. 
kik Other actions embracing retribution are impeded in three cir Zcumstanhces: 
When, upon leaving the stage of mrdhānas, he obtains the stage called patience , the actions which should be retributed in painful reelms of rebirth, being impeded, remain below, because he passes beyond the state of retribution of these actions. 
In the same way the creditors of the man who is about to emigrate from his country rise up. 
The same for the actions which should be retributed in Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu when he obtains the quality of Arhat. 
We have seen that the killing of a Bodhisattva is a quasimortal traṉsgression. Since when is one a Bodhisattva? 
From what momenton does one receive the name of Bodhisattva? 
Starting from the moment when he begins to cultivate actions which have for their retribution the thirtytwo marks, he is predestined. 
How is this? 
From this moment onward, he always Has good realns of rebirth; he is born into noble families; he possesses all the organs ; he is a male; he remembers his past lives; and he does not desist. 
One says that he is srgati , because his rebirth realms. are excellent, for he is born among gods and humans. 
He is born in the wealthy families of Kṣatriyas, Brāhmaṇas, and Grhapatis, not in humble familes. 
He is always male, never female, and, even more so, never non sexual. 
in fact, with an end to being useful to all cteatures, he is not cast down by all sorts of sufferings, or by any outrages. 
He is called the slave not purchased by the world,indeed the Bodhisattva: 
this greatsouled one, who yet possesses the most sublime prefections , acts through pure compassion; he acts without egoism, like a dog, in the presence of all creatures; he bears, on the part of all creatures, outrages and bad treatment; he assumes all fatigaing and painful tasks. 
In Jambudvīpa, being a male; in the presence of the Buddhas, thinking of the Buddhas; having their origin in reflection; in the course of one hundred supplementary cosmic ages. 
The Bodhisattva cultivates actions which ripen in the marks solely in Jambudvīpa, not elsewhere, for the inhabitants of Jambudvīpa are of lively intelligence; he is a male and not a female, for he has already gone beyond the state of female; and he is only in the presence of Masters, for his volition has the Buddhas for its object. 
These actions have their origin in reflection, not in hearing or in the absorptions. 
Nevertheless the Blessed Śākyamuni, through the purification of his energy, leaped over nine of these cosmic ages and caṟried out the actions ripening in marks in the coutse of ninetynine cosmic ages so that, in this way,one hundred werecompleted. 
This is why, speaking to Aśibandhaka, he said, Oh village chief, remembering ninetyone cosmic ages from now, I do not see any family that has been impoverished or inconvenienced by the giving of cooked foods. 
Former masters say It is when he finished the first cosmic age that the Bodhisattva abandoned the four defects and obtained the two qualities. 
Of the marks Each arises from one hundred merits. 
What is the measure of each of these one hundred merits? 
According to some, it is equal to the merit which has for its result the pleasure of allbeings, with the exception of the Bodhisattva close to Bodhithat is to say, accomplishing actions which ripen in marks. 
According to others, only the Buddhas know the measure of this ṛnerit. 
k How many Buddhas did the Blessed One venerate when he was a Bodhisattva? 
In the course of the first asamkhyeya kalpa, he venerated seventy five thousaṇd Buddhas; seventysix thousand in the course of the second; and seventyseven thousand in the course of the third. 
Who were the Buddhas at the end of each sakhyeya kalpa? 
In the period of the perfect and complete Buddha Ratnaśikhin, he completed the first asekhyeya kalpa; in the period of the Blessed Dīpakara he completed the second; and in the period of the Tathāgatha Vipaśyin he completed the third. 
Of all the Buddhas that he venerated The first was Śākyarnuṇi. 
It was an ancient Śākyamuni , a peṛfect Buddha, under whom the Blessed One, the then Bodhisattva,formulated for the first time the vow of Bodhi by saying, Mey I too become a Buddha in all ways similar to yon! 
This Śākyamuni, as ours, appeared during a bad age of the world; also his Law lasted only one thousand yeats. 
How did the Bodhisattva complete each Pāramitā ? 
He completed Giving by giving everything to evetyone, out of compassion. 
Morality and Patience were completed by his not being irritated, even when his limbs were broken, although he was still tied to desire: 
Energy, by praising Puṣya. 
The Blessed One, when he was a Bodhisattva, saw the Tathāgata Puṣya who had become incandescent in the interior of a cave in a mountain. 
He praised him for seven days and seven nights, standing, rṛepeating the stanza,Neither in heaven nor on earth, nor in this world, ṉor in the abode of Vaiśravaṇa, nor in the palace of the Marus, nor in other celestial abodes, nor in any of the ten directions, would one find, Oh Chief of Men, an ascetic who is your equal, even if one were to traverse, if one wished, the entire worṟld, with all of its people, with its mountains and with its forests. 
Then, according to this School, he was found to have fulfilled the virture of Energy and nine cosmic ages were passed over. 
Absoṟption and Intelligence, immediately before. 
At the moment of Vajropamasamādhi, immediately before Bodhi, he accomplished the virtues of dhyāna and prajñā. 
The Pāramitās receive the name of pāramitā because they have aṟrived at the other shore of the other shore of the totality of the perfectons proper to each of them. 
ksksk The Sūtra teaches that there are three items of meritorious work , which coṉsist of Giving, Morality, and Meditation. 
Three are merit, action, occasions of the exercise of action, as in the case of deeds. 
These three,;Giving, Morality, and Meditation,:each according to its nature, are merit, action, or occasion of exercise, either in combination, or in isolation; the same way that the deeds are either at one and the same time actions and deeds, or only deeds. 
this mediation is merit; it is also an occasion for the exercise of a meritorious action, namely that of a volition associated with compassion; 2. 
the volition in question is merit and action. 
the other dharmas concomittant to this Meditation are solely merit. 
xṅ What is Giving, dāna? 
Without doubt, dāna in general is what is given , but here Giving is what gives. 
But one gives through fear, or with the hope of reciprocity, or through attachment, etc.: now this does not refer to this type of giving. Consequently, in order to specify, the author says, Giving is what gives. 
Through the desire to render homage or service. 
What is it that gives? 
It is bodily and vocal action and that which produces this actio. 
As the stanza says,When a person, with a goodmind gives what belongs to him, then one says that the good skandhas give. 
The puṇyakriyāvastu which consists of Giving has great joys as its result. 
Giving is beneficial to oneself, to others, to both or neither. 
A gift made to a Caitya is not useful to another; but it is useful to him who gives when he is an Āryan not detached from desire, or a Prthagjana detached or not detached. 
The gift that a detached Āryan makes to anotherwith the exception of the case when this gift ripens in the present existenceis pot useful to this Āryan, for the Āryan who is detached has definitively passed beyond the sphere where the retribution of the gift could have taken place in a later existence. This gift is only useful to another. 
The gift thata nondetached Āryan makes to another, to a detached or nondetached Pṛthagjana, is useful both to himself and to another. 
The gift that a detached Āryan makes to a Caityawith the exception of the case when this gift willripen in the present existence is not useful either to himself, or to another. This gift has for its effect only the expression of homage and recognition. 
We have said, ina general manner, that giving produces great joys: 
Giving is excellent by the excellence of the giver, of the object given, and of the field. 
The giver is excellent through his faith, etc. 
When the giver is excellent, the gift is excellent; when the gift is excellent, its result is excellent. 
He gives with respect, etc. 
Such a giver gives with respect, by his hand, at the right timne, without doing evil to anyone , to ones master, or to other benefactors. 
A field is excellent through its qualities. 
The BlessedOṉe said, A retribution one hundred thousand times greater than a gift made to a person who upholds the necessities. 
and so on. 
Among all the gifts,The best is the gift from a delivered person to a delivered person. 
The Blessed One said that a gift given by a detached person to aṉother detached person is the best of material gifts. 
Or a gift from the Bodhisattva. 
Or rather, the gift that a Bodhisattva gives for the welfare of all beings; this gift, although given by a nondetached person to other nondetached persons, is the best gift. 
The eighth among the eight gifts that the Blessed One taught. 
What are the eight gifts? 
a gift through fear; 3. 
a gift made because my fathers and my grandfathers gave ceti dāṇam, compare Jāpaka, 444.52, vol. 
Some ancient masters explDain this as an immediate gift to those who are near, who approach one. 
A gift through fear is a gift that a person makes who sees that the object is going to perish: Better it should be given, he thinks. 
Even though they are not Āryams, offerings made to ones father and mother, to a sick person, to a preacher, to the Bodhisattva in his last birth are without measure. 
A Bodhisattva in his last birth means a Bodhisattva in his last existence. 
In order to appreciate the lightness and the gravity of actions, one should, in short, take into consideration six causes: Accordingly as these causesconsecutive, field, adhisṭhāṇa, preparation, volition, or intentionare small or large, action also is small or large. 
the deed itself. 
to project the thought, I shall do this or that to them; then I shall do this or that.t It happens that an action can be grave only by reason of its consecutive action, for example, when this confers on the retribution the character of necessity. 
for example, tokill ones father and mother is a grave action but to steal from ones father and mother, to lie to them, etc., is not grave by comparison. 
Action is termed accumulated by reason of its intentional character, by its completion, by the absence of regret and opposition, by its accompaniments, and by its retribution. 
By reason of its intentional character:Action done volḻuntarily or intentionally is accumulated action; action done involuntarily or unconsciously, and action not done in haste, even if it is voluntary, is action that is done. 
Some go to painful realms of rebirth thtrough misdeeds; some by two; some by three ,; some through one deed, through two, through three..through ten. 
When an action isbadand has a bad escort: 
it is By reason of its retributin: 
Action is accamulated which necessarily gives forth retribution. 
The same for good action. 
We have seen that a gift made to a Caitya by a person not detached from desireis a gift of benefit for him who made it. 
The merits of the gift are of two types: merit produced by abandoning, that is, the merit which results from the sole fact of abandoning; 2. 
merit produced by its enjoyment, the merit which results in joy in the object given, by the person who receives. 
The merit of a gift to a Caitya is merit produced by abandoning. 
How can the gift produce merit when no one receives it? 
We would answer this objection by asking why would the gift produce merit whensomeone receives i,and why itwould not produce merit when no one receives it? 
If the satisfaction of a person who receives is a condition for merit, you then deny that the Immeasurable Mediations and the Meditation of Right View are meritorious. 
The gift to a Caitya thus produces merit, Even though no one receives it, as is the case with compassion, etc. 
In the case of the Meditation on Compassion, no one receives, n0 one is satisfied, and yet merit arises for the compassionate person, through the very force of his thoughts of compassion.In the same way, even though the Excellent Being has passed away, a gift to a Caitya made with devotion to him is meritorious by reason of the thought of the believer himself. 
Should we conclude then that material offerings and worship are superfluous? 
When a person who has the intention of killing his enemy, contintes his bodily and vocal actions on the dead body of his enemy which this intention provokes, thinking,This is my enemy, that is to say, he thinks, This enemy is not yet dead, he obtains dermerit very much greater than he would have through merely the intention; in the same way, even though the Master has passed away, the person who does actions of giving and worship inspired through devotion obtains a much greater merit than he would have only through devotion. 
If a seed given to a good field bears an agreeable result, should we think that it bears a disagreeable result if given to a bad field? 
Even seeded into a bad field, the gift bears agreeable results, for there is never opposition between the result and the seed.i From the seed of the vine, there arises solely the sweet fruit of the vine; from the seed of the vmba there arises only the sour fruit of the vwba: 
even seeded into a bad field, the seed bears the result which is appropriate to it.In the same way, this seed which is the gift of a person who has the intention of being useful to another, even if placed into a bad field, can only produce an agreeable result. 
Bat, through the evil of the field, the result will be small or almost nil. 
We have explained meritorious work which consists of Giving, together with its related questions. We must now explain meritorious work which consists of the Precepts. 
Immorality is bad rpa. 
Bad rūpa is calledimmorality. 
The renouncing of immorality, which is morality, is f two types. Renouncing is vijñapti, the action by which one renounces, and avijñapti, the fact of abstaining. 
Morality is not solely the renouncing of immorality.It is,farther, the renouncing of that which is prohibited by the Buddha. 
The morality that we have just described, in short, is Pure, when it is endowed with the four qualities. 
Morality endowed with the four qualities is pure; itis impurein the contrary case. 
Not troubled by immorality, by the causes of im morality; it takes as its support the opposite of immorality and Not troubled by immorality we have described; not troubled by the causes of immorality, that is,by the eśar and upaklefas ,it takes as itssupport the opposites ofimmorality, becausejt relies oa the four smrṛtyupasthānas ; and it relies on peace, not on rebirth in celestial realms, because it is directed to Nirvāṇa. 
According to another opinion, morality is of four types: the morality of fear, which one observes from the fear of the loss of the resouEces necessary to life, from fear of a bad reputation, froṃ fear of chastisement, from fear of bad realms of rebirth; 2. 
mercenaty morality, which one observes from attachment to agreeable realms of existence, to pleasures, to honots; 3. 
a morality suitable to the parts of Bodhi, which persons who possess Right View possess, with a view to their deliverance; and 4. 
pure morality, which, being free from stains, is free from vices. 
We have explained morality. 
Good absoṟption or good in absorption, is bhāvanā, meditation, soaking in, or impregnation. 
What do we understand by samāhita, absorbed? 
Why does good absorption receive the name of bhāvanā? 
Because it perfumes, impregnates the mind. 
Good absorption impregnates the mind to an extreme degree, because it grasps the qualities of this good, in the same way as sesame seeds are impregnated by fliowers in their grasping the odor of these flowers. 
We have said that the result of giving consists of joys. 
What result does one obtain from the precepts and from meditation? 
Essentially, the precepts have heaven for their result; meditation has disconnection for its reṣult, Giving also has heaven for its result, but the precepts are the principle, normative cause of it. 
kīfik The Sūtra says that four persons produce Brahmin merit, brāhmapnṇya. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , this is the merit which has been defined above in order that we might know th measure of theaction which has the marks of theBodhisattva for its result. 
The ancient masters said: Four possess Brahmin merit, because they are happy in the heavens for a kalpa. 
The merit of sucha measure thatone is happy inheaven for a apa is the Brahmin merit, for the lifespan of theBrahmapurohitas is a alpa. 
And in another Canon, one reads, He engenders Brahmin merit, he is happy in the heavens for a alpa. 
The gift of the Dharmas is the correct teaching, not defiled, of the Sūtras etc. 
The gift of the Dharma is to teach, correctly and with a mind not defiled, the Śūtra and the other parts of Scripture. 
Consequently, those who teach the Dharma either falsely, or with a defiled mind, through a desire or gain, for respect,and for reputation, destroy the great merit which would otherwise fall to them. 
cṅtk We have explained the three types of good according to the distinction of the three items of meritorious work. 
Furthermore, Good is threefold, merit, Nirvāṇa and penetratiorn Good merit, or good favorable to merit is the good which leads to an agreeable retribution. 
The good which is deliverance is the good which, when it arises, becomes a dharma of Parinirvāṇa. 
It is recognized that whoever, understanding the sermons concerning the defects of Sasāra, the nonself, and the qunalities of Nirvāṇa, has his hairs stand on end and who pours forth tears, possesses the mokṣgabhāgīya rtoot of good; in this same way, one knows that there was a seed in the khalabila, when, in the rain, one sees a plant put forth shoots. 
The good of penetration is fourfold, urmagatas, etc.; it will be explained later. 
What is the nature of what is popularly caled writng, carving , eloquence, poetry , and calculation? 
Threefold action is bodily, vocal, and mental action. 
Writing and carving are bodily actions, industrious, together with what gives rise to this action, namely the collection of the mind and its mental states. 
Eloquence and poetry are vocal actioṉs, Consequently, writing, carving, eloquence, and poetry, are by their nature, the five sēanṇdbas. 
kīk Now let us explain some synonyms: 
Defiled dharmas are sāvadya, nivrta, and hṇa. 
Good and pure dharmas are praṇīta. 
Praṇīta, excellent, s a synonym for śubha, that s, kuśala, good,and of amala, immaculate oOr anāsrava. 
Good conditioned dharmas are sevya. 
Sevya, to be cultivated is synonymous with good and con ditioned. 
All the other dharmas are inferior. 
Deliverance is the highest. 
These is nothing which outweighs Nirvāṇa. 
The Latent Defilements O.. 
There are, in all, six. 
attachment, and then anger, pride, ignorance, false views, and doubt. 
The words and then serve to show that it is by reason of attachment that the others take up their abode in the object. 
1d These six make sevenṉ through the division of attachment. 
If one says that kāmarāga is an anuśaya, one then contradicts the Sūtra which says, The person who does not long dwell with his mind in the prey of attachment to pleasure; who, when the wrapping of attachment is about to be produced, knows well how to depart from it, for this person the wrapping which is attachment, perfectly destroyed of its life force, is abandoned along with its anzśaya. 
But such a theory is in contradiction to the Abhidharma which teaches that kāmarāgānuśaya is associated with three sensations, that of pleasure, satisfaction, and indifference. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, kāmarāgānusaya is an anuśaya called āmarāga; it is the attachment itself which is ṉśaya; and the same for the other defilements: 
Because they defile the mind, because they hinder, because they are in contradiction with good, and yet because good appears, the anufayas are not disassociated from the mind., This means that because of the aenuśayas, the mind is defiled; good which has not arisen is hindered from arising, and one falls away from good already arisen; consequently the enufayas are not dharmas disassociated from the mind. 
No, for if the anufayas were disassociated from the mind, they would always be present; and, consequently, if we suppose that they have a similar effect, then good would never be able to arise. 
What is called aenuśaya is the kleśa itself in a state of sleep, whereas the paryavasthāna is the klefa in an awakened state. 
The sleeping keśa is the nonmanif ested klefa, in the state of being a seed; the awakened kleśz is the manifested kesa, the kleśa in action. 
And by seed one should understand a certain capacity to produce the eśz, a power belonging to the person engendered by the previous kleśa. 
In this same way there exists in a certain person the capacity of producing a consciousness of memory, a capacity engendered by a conscious ness of preception; in this same way the capacity to produce rice, which belongs to the plant, the shoot, the stalk, etc., is engendered by the rice seed. 
The masters for whom the seed of the keśa is a certain dharma distinct from the leśu itself, disassocated from the mind and called an enusśuya, must admit a ḍharma existing in and of itself, disassociated from the mind and the cause of memory. 
In other words, at the moment of the agreeable sensation, there is active rāga, awakened desire; when this sensation ends, desire becomes dormant: 
then there is only the anuśaya of desire, dormant desire, the seed of future awakened desire. 
What is attachment to existence? 
Attachment to existence arises from the two Dhātus. 
Attachment to Rūpadhātu and to Ārūpyadhātṭu is called bhavarāga, attachment to existence. 
It is so called because it is turned within, and in oṟder to avoid the idea that these two Dhātus are deliverance. 
shk According to the Abhidharma , these six anuśayas make ten. 
There are five views: a belief in a self , false views , a belief in the extremes , the esteeming of views , and the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices : thus there are ten anmu ayas. 
By dividing views into five, there are six eṉuśayas, for a total of ten nusfayas; five which are not views by nature, namely desire, anger, ptide, ignorance and doubt; and five which are views, satkāyadrṣṭi, etc. 
In addition the Abhidharma teaches that these ten anśayas make up thirtysix anuśayas in Kāmadhātu, thirtyone śayas in Rūpadhātu, and thirtyone anusayas in Ārāpyadhātu: in all ninetyeight anuśayas. 
Thirtytwo of the thirtysix anufayas of Kāmadhātu are abandoned by Seeing the Truths. 
With the exception of three or two views, ten, seven, seven, eight anusśayas are abandoned in Kāmadhātu by the Seeing of Suffering and the three other Truths respectively. 
All of the above mentioned zśayas are, in Kāmadhātu, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering. 
Seven are abandoned through the Seeing of Arising and through the Seeing of Extinction, with the exception of a belief in a self, a belief in the extremes, and the esteeming of morality and aṣcetic pṛactices. 
Eight are abandoned through the Seeing of the Path, with the exception of satkāyadrṣṭi and antagrāhadrṭi This makes thirtytwo anxśayas abandoned through Seeing, because the mere Seeing of the Truths suffices to abandon them. 
Four are abandoned through Meditation. 
In this way sakāyadṛṣṭi, the view of self and of things pertaining to a self, is unique, being susceptible of being abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering; and the same for antagrāhadrṣṭi, the belief in extremes. 
False views is of four types, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering, Arising, Extinction, and the Path; the same for the esteeming of bad views and doubt. 
The esteeming of morality and ascetic practices is of two types, being susceptible of being abandoned through 1. the Seeing of Suffering and 2. the Path. 
Desire, anger, pride, and ignorance are of five types, being abandonṇed through the Seeing of each of the Truths, and through Meditation. 
What is the characteristic or definition of the aenuśayas susceptible of being abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering? 
When it is possible to abandon the object of an anuśaya through the Seeing of a certain Truth, it is said that this anuśaya can be abandoned through the Śeeing of this Truth. 
There are thus twelve views, four doubts, five desires, five angers, five ignoṟances, and five prides: in all thirtysix anuśayas in Kāmadhātu. 
The same, with the exception of the angers, for Rūpadhātu. 
The same sorts of anuśayas, with the exception of the five angers, make up the thirtyone gnufayas of Rūpadhātu. 
The same in Ārūpyadhātu. The same thirtyone. 
In this way, there are ninetyeight. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say that the six enuṝayas make ninetyeight through the differences of their aspect, their mode of expulsion , and their sphere of existence. 
When they arise in Bhavāgra , the aṇṉuśayas which are struck by the kṣāntis are abandoned through Seeing and through Meditation. 
Among the anuśayas which are struck by the kṣāntis, those which are in Bhavāgra are abandoned only by Seeing, for only anvayajñānak ṣāntis causes them to be abandoned. 
Āryans abandon them solely through Seeing, and not through Meditation, by means of the dharmajñānakṣāntis or the anvayajñānakṣāntis accordingly as they belong to the 7śayas of Kāmadhātu or of the higher spheres, whereas Prthagjanas abandon them only through Meditation, and not though Seeing, for these z7śayas can be abandoned through a worldly knowledge. 
The anuśayas which are not struck by the kṣgāntis are only abandoned through Meditation. 
The anṇfayas which are struck by the knowledges , at whichever stage they belong, are only abandoned through Meditation, whether they belong to an Āryan or to a Pṛthagjana. 
Some other masters maintain that nonBuddhists cannot abandon the anuyas abandoned through Śeeing. 
there are among them some persons who conjure up systems concerning the past, eternalists, partiaḻ eternalists, or followers of chance. 
Kāmadhātu cannot be, with regard to that which concerns it, the object of defilements of Rūpadhātu, because ṣuch persons are detached from Kāmadhātu. 
The Vaibhāṣikas explain this difficulty by saying that those who are detached lose when they produce a view, in the manner that Devadatta lost his rddhi. 
The view of self and things pertaining to self, the view of eternity and annihilation, the view of negation, the view that holds as high that which is low, and that which holds for cause and Path that which is not cause and Path: these are the five views. 
To believe in a self and in things pertaining to self is satkāyadrṣṭi it is termed sat because it perishes, and kāya because it is an accumulation or multiplicity. 
The expression satkāya is put forth in order to discard the idea of permanencethis is why one says snx:and in order to discard the notion of a unitythis is why one says kāya. 
Also it is only the belief in a self or in things pertaining to a self that receives the name of sakāyadrṛṣṭi, for according to a declaration of the Blessed One, Oh monk, any monk or Brahmin who in this world believes in a self, what he considers to be a self is only the five upādānaskandhas. 
To believe in the eternity or in the annihiliation of what one believes to be a self, is antagrāhadṛṣṭi, a view that grasps extremes, for this is to falsely believe in the extreme thesis of eternity or annihilation. 
The view that consists of negating that which really exists, the Truth of Suffering, etc. 
All falsely conceived views are false views, but only mhyādṛṣṭi receives this name because it is the most false of all, as the worst odor is called the bad odor. 
What does hna mean? 
It refers to everything that is impure, because the Śaints abandon it. 
It would be best to say dṛṣṭyādiparāmarśa,esteeming that which is low, beginning with erroneous views. 
The view which considers as cause that which is not cause, ot as the path that which is not the Path, is called sīavrataparāmarśa: 
namely, to consider Maheśvara, Prajāpati, or any other entity which is not a cause of the world as a cause of the world; to consider the rituals of suicide,entering into fire or drowningas a cause of a heavenly rebirth when they do not in fact procure heaven; or to consider morality and ascetic practices as the only path to deliverance when they are themselves not the only path to deliverance, nor the knowledges of the Sātṅkhyas and the Yogins which are not a path to deliverance; and so too the rest. 
Here too, the word ādi is omitted. 
These are the five erroneous views. 
1n this hypothesis, the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices is abandoned through the Seeing of the Truth of Arising, since it admits of error with regard to cause. 
The erroneous view that suicide through fire or drowning produces a heavenly rebirth, and the erroneous view that morality and ascetic practices produce by themselves purity, have nothing to do with the false conceptions of permanence and petsonality. 
a person who adopts the habits of bulls , the habits of deer, or the habits of dogs, shall obtain purity, deliverance, and escape; he shall obtain the absolute going beyond of the happiness and suffering , and he shall reach the place beyond happiness aṇd suffering. 
One should know that all these types of considering as cause that which is not truly cause is the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, which is abandoned through Seeing the Truth of Suffering. 
Furthermore, we would ask what is the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices which is abandoned through Seeing the Truth of the Path? 
Moreover we do not see how the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices could be relative to a dharma to be abandoned through the Truth of the Path: 
How could a person who entertains wrong views or doubt relative to the Path, thinking There is no Path, or Is there, or is there not, a Path?, imagine to obtain purification through this wrong view or through this doubt? 
If this person, taking up the path of deliverance imagined by the Sākhyas, etc., says, This is the path; the Buddhist Path is not the path, then this nonBuddhist imagines that he obtains purification through the path of the Sākhyas, and not through wrong views relative to the Path. 
Furthermore, when a person imagines that he obtains purification through a wrong view abandoned through the Seeing of Arising or Extinction, why is his esteeming of morality and ascetic practices not abandoned through the Seeing of these same two Truths? 
There are four erross: to hold that which is impermanent to be permanent, that which is suffering to be happiness, that which is impure to be pure, and that which is not a soul to be a soul or self. 
What is the nature of these four errors? 
He who sees a self prevailing within the five wpādānaskandhas sees mine But we think that the view of self has two parts: 
Are not the other defilements errors because, in order for there to be error, a combination of three characteristics is indispensable? 
What are these three characteristics? 
The view of annihilation and false views are not affirmations or erroneous attributions , since they are directed towards the absence of existence. 
there is no total error in this, since morality and practices do contribute to purification. 
The other defilements do not admit of reflective judgment, and as a consequence are not complete errors. 
cik But the Blessed One said, To consider the impermanent as permanent is an error of idea , an error of thought , and an error of view , and thus following for happiness, purity, and the self.Now neither ideas nor thoughts admit of reflective judgment. 
Thought and idea are termed eṟṟor by reason of view. 
Why does not the same hold for sensation and the other mental states associated with view? 
Because one says in worldly language error of idea, and error of thought, but not error of sensation. 
A Srotaāpaṇṇa abandons all these errors ; for the Seeing of the Truths which brings about the abandonment of views also brings about the abandoning of the ideas and thoughts associated with these views. 
Four, namely the errors of idea and thought relative to happiness and purity, are abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths through Meditation. 
In fact the Āryans, who by definition have abandoned all the anuśayas that one abandons through Seeing the Truths, certainly possess ideas of happiness and purity, since, when they are not detached, they produce an attachment to pleasure. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not consider this reasoning as conclusive. 
From the fact that these Āryans have ideas of happiness and purity, you conclude that they have error relative to happiness and purity. 
attachment to pleasure relative to a woman or relative to themselves evidently presupposses the idea and the thought of a being. 
Moreover one reads in the Sūtras, The Āryan Śrāvaka teaches true seeing and knowing: this is the Truth of Suffering. At this moment the errors of idea, of thought and of view relative to the impermanent taken for the permanent, are abandoned by them, and the rest. 
But the Sthavira Ānanda said to the Āryan Vāgīśa, Your mind is burned by the error of your ideas.How do we explain these words if one admits the thesis of the Vaibhāsikas? 
As a consequence the Śaikṣa has not completely abandoned the eight errors of idea and thought. 
It is the same for pride. 
There are seven types of pride : 
to think, I am superior, I am equal, relative to an equal, or to a superior. 
to think, I am superior relative to a superior. 
when the mind prides itself by taking the five xpādānaskaṇdhas for its self and mine. 
to think, I am slightly inferiot relative to that which is greatly superior. 
this is the pride of someone who has no qualities whatsoever but who believes that he has some. 
Which of the seven types of pride make up these nine types? 
These nine types come from three māṇas, namely māna, adhimāna and ūnṉamāna. 
We see that although we think I am a bit inferior relative to some one greatly superior, this is indeed 2ṉamāna, for the mind prides itself in this thought; but how can this type of zāṉa He is not worse that I be a locus of pride? 
This is indeed a locus of pride, since one esteems oneself relative to a group of excellent persons which one regards as superior, even though one is really vastly inferior to them. 
tśst How are the seven types of pride abandoned? 
They perish through Seeing and Meditation. 
Must we believe that, among the Āryans, the anśayas which are abandoned though Meditation and which have not yet been abandoned, are presently active? 
10c The paryavasthāna of killing, etc., is abandoned through Meditation; The paryavasthāna of killing , refets to the defile ment, kleśa, by which one voluntarily commits murder. 
The thirst for nonexistence, etc. 
Vibhavatṛṣṇā, the thirst for nonexistence, is also aban doṅned through Meditation. 
The word et cetera shows that one should add a part of bhavatṛṣṇā, the thirst for existence, to vibhavatṛṣṇā, for example the desire Would that I could become Airāvaṇa, King of the Nāgas!. 
Among the Āryans the various types of pride, etc., and egotism, and bad regret, are impossible. 
Because they are nourished by views. 
Māṇna and armitā,egotism, are nourished through wrong views; the desire for nonexistence is nourished through the view of annihilation; and a part of the desire for existence is nourished through the view of eternalism. 
Even though bad regret is abandoned through Meditation, it does not become active among the Āryans, because it is nourished by doubt. 
Among the ninetyeight guuśayas, how many are universal? How many are not univeṟsal? Universal ṉufayas are 1. 
the erroneous views and doubts which are abandoned through the Seeing of Suffer ing and Arising, 2. 
the five erroneous views which are abandoned by the Seecing of Suffering; wrong views and the esteeming of views abandoned through Seeing of Arising; and two doubts and two ignorances abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Seeing of Arising. 
n t These eleven anxfayas are called universal, going every where, because they grasp the entire Dhātu as their object. 
We do not say that the universals have the entire Dhātu for their object all at once, but rather they have the Dhātu in its five categories for their object: 
As their object is mixed, they are abandoned through Meditation. 
Or rather, they are abandoned through Seeing, for they exist through the efficacy of the view. 
We have seen that eleven eu7fśayas are universal in their Dhāṭu, in the sphere of existence wherein the person is born in whom they are found: Among them, nine, with the exception of the two views, bear on the superior. 
When some beings in Kāmadhātu produce the opinion that Brahmā is a being, the opinion that he is permanent, they then entertain a belief in a self and a belief in extremes with regard to a thing belonging to a different, superior Dhātu. 
With the exception of the prāptis, dharmas coexist ant with the universal anuśfuyas are also universals. 
Future universal aenṉuśayas are not universal causes. 
kckṣk Among the ninetyeight zṉ5ayas, how many have a pure dharma for their object, that is, the Third and Fourth Truth, the Truth of Extinction and the Path? 
Wrong views, doubt, and the ignorance which is bound to them, and independent ignorance, abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path, make six anuśayas whose object is pure. 
Except for the six,that is, the three 4754yas abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction, namely wrong views, doubt, and the ignorance associated with them or independent of them, and these same three gzṉuśayas abandoned through Seeing the Path,all the other ehuśayas have impure dḍharmas for their object. 
The extinction of their own bhāmi is the object of the anuśayas which have extinction for their sphere; the Path with its six or nine bhūmis, is the object of the aenuśfayas which have the Path for their sphere, for the Paths depend on one another. 
When they are in the realm of Kāmadhātu, the three anuśayas which have the Path for their object bear on the totality of the Path as well as on a portion of the dharmajñāna , with its six bhūmis . 
When they are of the realm of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu , these same anuśayas bear on the totality of the Path, and on a part of the enṉvayajñāna , with its nine bhūmis. 
In fact the Paths are mutually dependent. 
Although Zharmajñāna aṇd anvayajñāna are mutually depend ent, because guvayajñāna is not opposed to Kāmadhātu, the three anuśayas of the realm of Kāmadhātu which have the Path for their object do not have the Path which forms part of the envayajñāna for their object. 
Dharmajñān in its entirety is not opposed to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, for the dharmajñāṇṉa of Śuffering and Arising are not opposed to these two Dhātus. 
And dharṃajñāna is not opposed to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyad hātu in their entirety , because the first two dharmajñānas are not opposed to these Dhātus, and because the first category of the anuśayas of these two Dhūtus, namely those which one abandons through Seeing, are not opposed by any dharmajñāna. 
tsftk Why do not lust , anger , egotism , the esteeming of bad views , and the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices bear on pure dharmas, on the Extinction of Suffering or on the Path? 
The latent defilement of lust should be aban doned; but if it has pure dharmas for its object, it will not be tejected; in the same manner, the aspiration after good dharmas should not be rejected. 
Anger does not, because pure dharmas do not do evil. 
Egotism and the two esteemings do not, because pure dharmas are calm, pure, and excellent. 
One cannot pride oneself on Extinction or the Path, for they are calm. 
the pure dharmas are really purification, so one cannot have a false conception of purity , with regard to them. 
ksk Among the ninetyeight anṉuśayas, how many become anuśaya from the fact of being an object?! 
the enuśayas that one abandons through the Seeing of Suffering become anuśayana in the dharmas that one abandons through the Seeing of Suffering. the anuśayas that oṉe abaṉdoṅs through Meditation become anuruśayana in the dharmas that one abandons through Meditation. 
Not the ṉ2ś4yas that bear on the pure ḍharmas or a higher sphere, because their object is not made ones own and opposes the anuśayas. 
We would remark in fact that the desire that seeks either the pute dharmas or a higher sphere is not the enuśaya called desire, but rather an aspiration for good dharmas. 
in the same way that one says that if a person who has a cold takes a bitter medicine, there is no increase in the cold due to the medicine. 
Any znṉnuśaya which is associated with a certain dharma.becomes anuśayana through association with this dharma. 
Yes, universal anuśayas which have a superior bhūmi for their object. 
Among the ninetyeight dḥyānas, how many are bad , and how many are morally neutral, that is, without retribution ? All the higher dhyānas are morally neutral. 
All the nuśayas beloṉging to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu are neutral. 
In fact, all defiled dharmas, when they bear retribution; bear painful retribution. Now suffering does exist in these two spheres, for no causes for doing evil to others are present there. 
The belief in a self, a belief in extremes, and ignorance are neutral in Kāmadhātu. 
In Kāmadhātu, a belief in a self, a belief in the extreres, and the ignorance which is associated with them, are neutral. 
In fact, these anuśayas are not in contradiction to giving and other good deeds. 
One thinks, May I be happy in the future!, and one give gifts and observes the precepts. 
This is why the Bleesed One said, Among the doctrines of the Tīrthikas, the best is that which says, I do not exist, things of mine do not exist; I shall not exist, things pertaining to me shall not exist. 
ĪŪ These two viewsa belief in a self and a belief in the extremesare only aberrations relative to things which constitute the pseudoperson; they do not being about harm to another: 
But these different reasonsbecause they are not in contradic tion to giving, etccould be applied to the desire for heaven and to egotism , which should thus also be neutral; but the School does not admit this. 
Some ancient masters also say, An innate belief in a self, which is to be found among the savage animals and birds, is neutral. But a cogitated belief in a self is bad.. 
The other anṉuśayas, here, are bad. 
Lust, anger and māḍi, in Kāmadhātu, are roots of evil. 
All lust , all anger , and all māḍi belonging to Kāmadhātuwith the exception of the delusion which is a belief in a self and the belief in the extremesare, in this order, the three roots of evil, greed, anger, and ignorance. 
A belief in a self and a belief in the extremes are not roots of evil, for a root of evil is only that which is bad and is only a root of evil. 
The other anuśayas are not roots of evil. 
ktk How many dharmas are neutral roots? How many are not? 
Three roots, desire, ignorance, and mat aṟe neutral. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kāśmīr hold that desire, ignorance, and prajñā which are neutral, of whatever type they are up to and including the prajñā which arises from retribution, are neutral roots, The others are not roots, because their modality is of duality and elevation. 
Doubt caṉṉot be regarded as a root, being twofold and mobile by nature. 
Egotism , being an elevation of the mind, is not a root, since it consists of elevation, the opposite of a root. 
For in this world roots are firm and reach downward. 
desire, views, egotism, and delusion which are neutral; in fact there are three contemplations based on ignorance. 
kiḵsk Are the fourteen undefined points of which Scripture speaks so called because they are neutral in the sense that we have just studied? 
that is, this type of question is called neutral, not answered, because it should be set aside, or rejected. 
Categorical response, as for death; a distinguishing response, as for rebirth; a response by a question, as for superiority; and a response by rejecting the question, as for nonidentity. 
If oṉe asks, Do all beings die, one should aṉnswer in a categorical manner, They do. 2.If one asks, Will all being be reborn? 
one should answer by distinguishing, Beings endowed with defilements will be reborn; being freed from defilements will not be reborn. 
If one asks, Is a person superior or inferior?, one should answer by the question, In comparison with whom? 
If he answers, In comparison with the gods, one should answer, He is inferior. 
If one answers, In comparison with beings in the painful realms of rebirth,one should answer, He is superior. 
If one asks, Are the skandhas the same thing as a satva or living being, or are they different?, this is a question that is to be rejected because the thing called a living being does not exist. 
In the same way one would reject the question, Is the child of a sterile woman white or black? 
In the same manṉner as if one were to ask, Is consciousness But, says the author, to someone who asks in a categorical manner Is a person superior or inferior?, it is not suitable to respond categorically, He is superior or He is inferior; one should thus respond by distinguishing: 
which do you desire that I should teach you?. 
If he answers, Teach me the past dbarmas, one should distinguish, The past dharmas are numerous: 
rāēpa, vedanā, sajñā, saskāras, and vijñāna. 
If he asks, Teach me concerning rpa, one should distinguish, There are three rāpas, the good, the bad, and the neutral. 
If one asks, Teach me concerning the good, one should distinguish, There are seven types of good rāpa: abstention from killing. and abstention from idle words. 
If one asks, Teach me abstention from killing, one should distinguish, It is of three types, arisen from the three roots of good, nongreed , nonanger , and nonignorance. 
If one asks, TIeach me the abstention from killing arisen from nongreed, one should distinguish, It is twofold, vijñapi and avijñapt;. 
The same question, put by a falsehearted person, is a question to which one should respond by another question. 
which do you desire that I teach you? 
One the other hand, through this counterinterrogation, one explains to the questioner concerning his questions: 
the venerable Mahāsāghikas read a Sūtra which says, Bhikṣus, there are four responses to questions. 
What are these four? 
There are some questions which one should reply categori cally.; there are some questions which one should reject. 
What is the question to which one should respoṇd categorically? 
What is the.question to which one should respond by distinguishing? 
When someone asks what retribution in sensation a voḻuntary action requires. 
What is the question to which one should repsond by a question? 
When someone asks if re;ñ4 is the soul of a person, one should counterinterrogate, My friend, what do you think of the soul?, and if he answers, My friend, I think that the soul is coarse, one should respond that the ra;jñā is other than the soul. 
What is the question to be rejected? 
When someone asks if the world is eternal, noneternal, eternal and noneternal, neither eternal nor noneternal; if the number of persons is finite, infinite, finite and infinite, neither finite and infinite; if the Tathāgata exists after death. ; or if the vital principle is other than the body. 
Within a certain person, aṅ zṉuśaya or latent defilement attaches itself to a certain object; this person is bound to this object by this anuśaya. 
We must examine to what object a person is bound by a past, present, or future grufaya. 
From this point of view the anuśayas ot kleśas are of two types: specific kleśar, namely lust, anger, egotism; and general kleŚśas, namely views, doubt, and ignorance. 
One is bound by lust, anger, and egotism, past and present, to the object from whence they have been produced without their having been abandoned. 
When the specific klefas have arisen with respect to a certain objectan object past, present or future, an object abandoned through Śeeing, etc.and is thus found in the past or in the present, when they have not been abandoned, the person in whom they are produced is bound to this object by these specific kDesa5. 
One is bound to any and all objects, past, present, and future, , by these same specific future kleśas, since they belong to the manovijñna. 
One is bound to future objects through future lust and anger which differ from the preceedingthat is, nonmental states in a relationship with the five sense consciousnesses. 
The five coṅsciousnesses, in fact, cognize only objects contemporaneous to them. 
Not destined to arise, one is bound everywhere by the same. 
One is bound to all the objects of the three time periods and the five categories, according to the case, by the other, general kleśaswhich, having for their object the five xpādānaskandhas, are produced within all and relative to allin whatever period the said kefśas belong. 
Do the kleśas, and past and future objects, really exist? 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that past and future dharmas really exist; conditioned things nevertheless are not eternal for they are endowed with the characteristics of conditioned things. 
Why is this? 
Because the Blessed One has said it. 
The Blessed One taught in his own words the existence of the past and the future, Monks, if past 7pa did not exist, the learned holy Śrāvakas would not take into consideration past r2pa. 
If future rūpa did not exist, the learned holy Śrāvakas would not delight in future rpa. 
It is because future 7pa exists that the learned holy Śrāvakas. 
Because mental consciousness preceeds from two. 
What are these two? 
The organ of sight and a visible thing. 
Now if the past and futute dharmas do not exist, mental coṅsciousness which has them for its object would not arise by reason of these two. 
If past and future things do not exist, there would be consciousness without an object; thus there is no conciousness without an object. 
If the past does not exist, how can good and bad action give forth a result? 
In fact, at the moment when the result is produced, the retributive cause is past. Therefore, because of the proofs from Scripture and reasoning quoted above, the Vaibhāṣikas affirm the existence of both the past and the future. 
The masters who call themselves Sarvāstivādins, belivers in the existence of all, maintain that the past and the future exist. 
He who affirms the existence of the dharmas of the three time periods is held to be a Sarvāstivādin. 
There are four types of Sarvāstivādins accordingly as they teach a difference in existence , a difference in characteristic, a difference in condition, and mutual difference. 
A gold vase which one breaks is an example which shows the difference of figure: its figure is modified, but not its color. 
milk becomes whey; its taste, force, and digestibility change, but not its color. 
In the same way, when a future dbharma passes from the future into the present, its future existence is abandoned, and its present existence is acquired, but its nature remains the same. 
When it passes from the present into the past, its present existence is abandoned, and its past existence is acquired, but its nature remains the same. 
The Bhadanta Ghoṣaka defends Zakṣaṇānyathātva, that is, the time periods differ through the difference in their characteris tics. 
When it is past, it is endowed with past characteristics ,but it is not deprived of its present and future characteristics; when it is future, it is endowed with its future characteristics, but it is not deprived of its present and past characteristics; and when it is present, it is endowed with its present characteristics, but it is not deprived of its past and future characteristics. 
Example: a man attached to one woman is not detached with respect to other women. 
A dharma, going through the time periods, having taken up a certain condition, becomes different through the difference of its condition, not through a difference in its substance. 
Example: a token placed on the square of ones, is called one; placed on the square of tens, teṉ; and placed on the square of hundreds, one hundred. 
The Bhadanta Buddhadeva defends anyonyathātva, that is, the time periods are established through their mutual relation ships. 
For example, the same woman is both a daughter and a mother. It is in this manner that these four masters maintain the existence of all. 
The first, professing transformation may be refuted along with the Sākhyas.9 In the thesis of the second master, the time periods, past, present, and future, are confounded, since the three characteristics are found everywhere. 
The example moreover is lacking any similarity to the problem, for, within the man in question, there is active lust with respect to one woman, but there is only the possession of lust with respect to other women. 
In the thesis of the fourth master, the three time periods exist at the same time: a past ḍharma, for example, is past in relation to that whch preceeds it, future in relation to that which follows, and present in relation to what preceeds and what follows. 
The third is the best. 
when a dharma does not accomplish its operation, it is future; when it is accomplishing it, it is present; and when its operation has come to an end, it is past. 
If the past and the future exist as things, they are present: 
why are they thus qualified as past and future? 
But then if giving forth a result is an action, then sabhāgahetu causes, etc. 
give forth their result when they are past, and so one arrives at the conclusion that they accomplish their action in the past and so would be as a consequence in the present. 
Thus the time periods are confounded. 
What is opposed But, if it always exists, why doesnt a dharma always exercise its activity? 
Then, being unconditioned , it is eternal , and how can you theṅ say that a dharma is future when it does not exercise its activity, or past when it not longer exercises it? 
These objections would hold, if activity were other than the dharma itself. 
If activity is the same as the dharma, ahd if the dharma always exist, its activity would also always exist. Why and how does one say that sometimes it is past, sometimes future? 
How is it not justified? 
In fact a conditioned dharma which has not arisen is called future; that which, having arisen, is not destroyed, is called present; and that which is destroyed is called past. 
If, in the past and future, a dharma exists with the same nature as when it is present, Existing in the same manner, how can it be nonari sen or destroyed? If the unique selfnature of a dharma continues to exist, how can this dharma be nonarisen or destroyed? 
What is it that it is lacking later, through the absence of which it is qualified as destroyed? 
Consequently, if one does not admit that the dharma exists after having been nonexistent and no longer exists after having existed, the three time periods cannot be established or proved to exist. 
The argument that, possessing the characteristics of conditioned things , conditioned things aṟe not eternal even though they exist both in the past and in the future, is pure verbiage, for, if it always exists, a dharma is not susceptible either of arising or of perishing. 
With regard to the argument that the Blessed One taught the existence of the past and the future since he said Past action exists, and future results exist, we would also say that the past exists, and that the future exists. 
Past is that which was existent; future is that which, given its cause, will exist;: 
Who says that they exist like the present? 
They exist with the nature of the past and the future. 
He said the past exists in the sense of the past was; he said the future exists in the sense of the future will be. 
The word is is a nipāka, in the same sense as the expressions, There is previous nonexist ence of the lamp, there is later nonexistence of the lamp, and again, This lamp is extinguished, but it was not extinguished by me. 
It is in this same way that the text says the past exists, and the future exists. 
To understand otherwise, being in the past, the past would not now be the past. 
We see that the Blessed One, addressing the Lāguḍaśikhīyaka ascetics, expressed himself in this way, Past action, which has been destroyed, which has perished, and which has ceased, does exist. According to the proposed explanation, the sense would be, This action was. 
When the Blessed One says that past action exists, he had in view its power of giving forth a result, a power which was placed in the series of the agent through action which has now passed away. 
To understand otherwise, that is, if past action actually exists now in and of itself, how can it be considered as past? 
The Blessed One said in the Paramārthaśūnyatāsñtra,The eye, Oh Bhikṣus, arising, does not come from any place; perishing, it does ṇot remain in any place. 
In this way, Oh Bhikṣus, the eye exists after having been nonexistent and, after having existed, disap pears. 
If a future eye existed, the Blessed One would not have said that the eye exists only after having been nonexistent. 
The expression, It exists after having been nonexistent signifies after having been nonexistent in the present , that is, after having been nonexistent as present. 
3, As for the argument that the past and the future exist, since the consciousness arises by reason of two things, should one understand that since the mental consciousness arises by reason of a mental organ and past, present, or future dharmas, these dharmas are a necessary condition for the mental consciousness to arise to the same extent as is the mental oṟgan, that is, in the quality of generating condition ? 
Evidently Nirvāṇa, which is contradictory to all arising, cannot be a generating cause. 
It is enough that the dharmas are a condition for the arising of a consciousness in their qualtiy of being an object: let us admit that it is thus for future and past dharmas. 
And in what manner are they taken as objects? 
In fact, a person who remembers a past visible object of a past sensation, does not see this is; but he remembers this was; the man who foresees the future does not see the future as existing, but he foresees it as coming into existence. 
If a dharma which one remembers is, in fact, the one grasped by the memory, it is presently manifested; if it is not one that one grasps through the memoty, then the memory conscious ness certainly has a nonexistent object. 
The eye, Oh Bhikṣus, arising, does not come from aany place. 
not being combinations of atoms , we do not see how they can be, in the past or in the future, atoms in a state of dispersion. 
In fact, moreover, one remembers the sensation as it was experienced when it was present; one foresees it as it will be experienced when it will be present. 
If, past and future, it is such that one grasps it through memory or prevision, it would be eternal. 
If that which does not absolutely exist can be the object of consciousness, then a thirteenth āyatana could be the object of consciousness. 
Then what is, according to you, the object of a consciousness which says, There is no thirteenth āyatanṉa? 
Then this object is only a name; the thing designated, the object, does not exist. 
Furthermore, what will be the presently existing object upon which the consciousness of the previous nonexistence of sound bears? 
The object of this consciousness is the sound itself Then, anyone who is in quest of the nonexistence of sound should make a noise! 
No, for the sound of which there is previous nonexistence, exists in a future state, and it is this sound in its futuṟe state which is the object of the previously nonexistent conṅsciousness. 
But if future sound, of which there is previous nonexistence, exists in fact, how can there be the idea that it does not now exist? 
Or, if there is a difference between future and present sound, and the idea it does not now exist bears on this difference, then you recognize that the distinctive characteristic of the present exists after not having existed. 
If a nonexistent thing can be an object of consciousness, how could the Bodhisattva in his last existence say, It is impossible that I know, that I see that which does not exist in this woṟld? 
Let us add moreover that ideas certainly have existent and nonexistent things for their object, for the Blessed One explicitly said, From the moment when I said to him, Come, Oh Bhikṣus! 
he will know that which is as is and that which is not as not, that which is not the highest as not the highest, and that which is the highest as the highest. 
The Sarvāstivādins also deduce an argument from the result of action. 
But the Sautrāntikas do not admit that a result arises directly from a past action. 
But the masters who affirm the teal existence of the past and the future should also admit the eternity of the result: 
what efficacy can they attṛibute to the action? 
If you say that arising itself pteexists, how can you attṛibute the efficacy of a thing to that same thing? 
What should we understand by the action of making something present? 
Consequently, the sarvāstivāda, the doctrine of the existence of all, of the Sarvāstivādins who affirm the real existence of the past and the future, is not good within Buddhism. 
Good sarvāstivāda consists in affirming the existence of all by understanding the word all as Scripture understands it. 
How do the Sūtras affirm that all exists? 
Or rather, the all that exists is the three time periods. 
But if the past and future do not exist, how can one be bound by a past or future kleśa to a thing which is past or future? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: The past and the future truly exist. 
As regards that which cannot be explained, one should know that The nature of things is indeed profound; certainly, it cannot be proven through reasoning.. 
One can say that that which arises differes from that which perishes: 
in fact, that which arises is the future; that which perishes is the present. 
Time also arises, for that which is arising is embraced within time, it has time for its nature; and a dharma arises from time, by reason of the multiplicity of the moments of future time. 
When a person abandons an object through the disappear ance of the possession that he had of this object, is there for him disconnection from this object through the cutting off of the possession of the defilements which bears on this object? 
And inversely, when there is disconnection, is there abandoning? 
When that which is to be abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering is abandoned, the ascetic remains in connection with it from the fact of the other universal defilements; when the first category is abandoned, he remains in connṉection with it from the fact of the other defilements which have it as their object. 
In the Path of Meditation wherein one sucessively expells nine categories of defilements, when the first category is abandoned and not the others, these other categories of defilements, which bear upon the first category, continue to bind. 
How many aṉrśayas attach themselves to each object? 
The Vaibhāṣikas give a summary exposition of this. 
In general one can say that there are sixteen types of dharmas, objects to which the anuśayas attach themselves: for each sphere there are five categories ; plus the pure dharmas. 
The conscious nesses are of the same sixteen types. 
When we know which dharmas are the objects of which consciousness, we are then able to calculate how many znuśayas attach themselves to these dharmas. 
Abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and Arising, abandoned through Meditation, the dharmas in Kāmadhātu are the sphere of three consciousnesses of this sphere, of one consciousness of Rūpadhātu and the pure consciousness. 
The three consciousnesses of Kāmadhātu are abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering, through the Seeing of Arising, and through Meditation. 
The same three categories of dharmas in Rūpadhātu are the object of three consciousnesses of Rūpadhātu, three of Kāmadhātu, one of Ārūpyadhātu and the pure con sciousness. 
The same categories of dbarmas in Ārūpyadhātu are the objects of three consciousnesses of the three spheres and pure conscousness. 
The dharmas abandoned through the ŚSeeing of Extinction and the Path are all the objects of the same consciousnesses with the addition of the consciousness of their own category. 
The dharmas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction are objects of the five consciousnesses as above, plus the consciousness abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction: in all six consciousnesses. 
The dharmas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Path are objects of the five consciousnesses as above, plus the consciousness abandoned through Seeing the Path: 
The dharmas of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu are abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path: they are the objects, respectively, of nine and eleven consciousnesses. 
The pure dharmas are the object of the last three consciousnesses of the three spheres and of pure conscious ṉess. 
They are the objects of ten consciousnesses, the conscious nesses of the three spheres abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path, through Meditation, and the pure consciousness. 
Such are the sixteen types of dharmas, objects of sixteen types of consciousness. 
How many anufśayas attach themselves to the consciousness which has agreeable sensation for its object? 
The consciousness which has agreeable sensation for its object is of twelve types: 
belong to Kāmadhātu, for categories of consciousness ; belong to Rūpadhātu, five categories; belong to Ārūpyadhātu, the consciousness abandoned through Seeing the Path and the one abandoned through Meditation; and the pure consciousṉess. 
four categories of Meditation; gṉuśaya of the sphere of Kāmadhātu; 2. 
the anuśayas of the sphere of Rūpadhātu which have conditioned things for their object; 3. 
The mind is termed sānuśaya, having anuśaya, from the fact of the anuśayas. 
Those which lodge in it are the nonabandoned anuśayas, whose object is not abandoned , and which are associated with the mind in question. 
Those which do not lodge in it are the abandoned anusayas which are associated with the mind in question. 
The defiled mind is sṇuśaya in two ways; the nondefiled mind solely from the fact of the gṉ5ayas which lodge therein. 
k:g In what order are the ten nṉusuyas produced ? 
At first, bound by ignorance , a person is in confusion with respect to the Truths: 
he does not take pleasure in the Truth of Suffering; he does not admit it. 
From this state of confusion, there arises doubt; he undertands the two thesis; he doubts whether suffering is true, or if noṉsuffering is true. 
From whence false views; From doubt there arises false views: by reason of false teaching and false reflection, he comes to the judgement This is not suffering. 
From whence a belief in a self; From false view there arises the view of personality; for, not recognizing the skandhas as suffering, he considers these skandhas as constituting a self. 
From whence a belief in the extremes; From whence there is the view of the two extremes, for a person, believing in a self, becomes attached to the idea of the eternity or the anṇihilation of the self. 
From whence the esteeming of mṃorality and ascetic practices; From this there is an esteeming of morality and practices considered to be a means of purification. 
From whence lust and pride relative to ones own views; From this there is attachment to ones own views, and pride and pleasure in these views. 
And hatred with respect to another: 
According to other masters, there is hatred for ones own opinions when one changes them; for lust and the other anṇuśayar which are abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths are those which have for their object the person himself and his own views. 
Such is the order. 
Kleśas arise from the nonaban doning of the znazśaya, from the presence of their object, and from erroneous judgment. 
The same holds for the other kleśas With complete causes. 
For, according to the School, a kleśz can arise through the mere force of its object; as in the case of the Arhat who is subject to falling away. 
In a Sūtra, the Blessed One said that the ninetyeight aṉuśayas, with the ten wrappings of attachment , are made up of three cankerous influences , the cankerous influence of objects of pleasure , the cankerous influence of existence , and the cankerous influence of ignorance ; four floods , the flood of the objects of pleasure , the flood of existence , the flood of views , and the flood of ignorance ; four yokes , the yoke of the objects of pleasure , the yoke of existence , the yoke of views , and the yoke of ignorance ; and four clingings , clinging to the objects of pleasure , the clinging to views , the clinging to morality and ascetic practices , and the clinging to a belief in a self. 
In Kāmadhātu, the defilements, with the exception of ignorance, but with the wrappings of attachment, consti ṭute āśravaś; The kleśas of Kāmadhātu, with the exception of the five ignorances, plus the ten wrappings make up fortyone things: 
In Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, only the aṉuśayas themselves constitute the cankerous influence of existen ce,1 But there are, in the two higher spheres, two wrappings, namely torpor and dissipation. 
With the exception of ignorance, it is the other connections , bonds , anuśayas, upakleśas and wrappings of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
They both present the threefold common characteristics of being morally neutral, of being turned inward , and of belonging to the spheres of absorption: they are thus united into a single cankerous influence. 
From the above, it results that the gvidyās, the ignorances, of the three spheres,in all fifteen things, constitute the cankerous influence of ignorance. 
Why do the ignorances constitute a separate cankerous influence? 
In the manner in which the cankerous influences are explained, So too for the floods and the yokes. 
But views constitute a separate flood and a separate yoke by reason of their acuteness. 
The floods and the yokes are explained in the same manner. 
The cankerous influence of the objects of sensual pleasure without views, is both the flood of the objects of sensual pleasure and the yoke of the objects of sensual pleasure; so too the cankerous influence of existence, without views, is both the flood of existence and the yoke of existence. 
According to the School1, it is by reason of their characteris tic of sharpness that views constitute a separate flood and a separate yoke. 
They are not a separate cankerous influence, because, without companions, they are not favorable to installation. 
The flood of the objects of sensual pleasure is made up of five lusts, five hatreds, five egotisms, four doubts, and ten wrappings: in all twentynine things. 
The flood of existence is made up of ten lusts, ten egotisms, eight doubts: in all twentyeight things. 
The flood of views is made up of the twelve views of the three Dhātus: in all thirtysix things. The flood of ignorance is made up of the five i ignorances of the three Dhātus: in all fifteen things. 
So too the zpādānas , by placing ignorance and by dividing the drṛṣgis into two. 
Clinging to the belief in a soul is made up of the yoke of existence plus the ignorances of the two higher spheres, that is, ten lusts, ten egotisms, ten ignorances, and eight doubts: in all thirtyeight things. 
The clinging to views is made up of the yoke of views without the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices: in all thirty things. 
Clinging to morality and ascetic practices is made up of the six remaining things. 
Why distinguish the presumption of morality and of ascetic practices from the other views and make it a separate clinging? 
Because it is in opposition to the Path and deludes the two classes of devotees: 
But why doesnt ignorance constitute a separate clinging? 
Ignorance is not the grasper; like clinging, it is mixed with the other anuśayas. 
Ignorance has nonintellection for its characteristic; it is not at all sharp; thus it does not grasp; therefore, say the School, it is only mixed with the other defilements as is clinging. 
But, we would say, the Blessed One said in the Sūtra, What is the yoke of the object of sensual pleasure ? 
In another Sutra, he says that chandarāga is a clinging. 
They are atomic, for their mode of existences is subtle, being difficult to know. 
They fix and they flow, they carry away, they attach, they seize: such is the etymology of the words āsravas, etc. 
The anuśayas fix, seat beings in transmigration; they flow from the highest heaven to Avīci ; they flow out by the six organs which are as wounds. 
The anuśayas carry away ; they are thus called oghas or floods. 
The anuśayas cause beings to be attached ; they are thus called yogas or yokes. 
The anuśayas seize ; they are thus called uwpādānas or clingings. 
By means of the auśayas, the mental series flows into the objects; the anfayas are thus āsravas or cankerous influences. 
In conformity with the comparison of the Śūtra In the same way that one makes great efforts in order to steer a boat against the current but when these efforts begin to weaken, the boat is carried with the stream;.4 2. 
When they are very violent, the nuśayas are called oghas; in fact they carry away, as in a flood, those who are bound to them, and who necessarily yield to their impulses. 
When they do not enter into activity with an extreme violence, the anufayas are called yogas, because they yoke one to the very many sufferings of transmigration; or rather because they adhere with obstinance. 
The anuxśayas are called upādānas, because, through their action, one clings to things of the senses, etc. 
wrappings.1 There are said to be five types by reason of their division into connections, etc. 
Anunayasayojana or the attachment of affection is lust of the three Dhātus. 
Drṣṭisamyojana or the attachment to views is made up of the first three views ; parāmarśasayojana, the attachment to esteeming, is made up of the last two. 
Does it happen that a person is attached through the connection of affection, and not through the connection of views, to the dharmas associated with views , while dṛṣyanuśaya, the latent defilement of views, is not active with respect to these dharmas? 
Within him arises a connection of affection with respect to the dharmas associated with the views of esteeming views and esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, dharmas which are abandoned through the Truth of Extinction and the Path. 
This person will be attached to these dharmas through the connection of affection, but not through the connection of views; for he has abandoned the universal connection of views which is abandoned through the Truths of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, and there does not exist in him any nonuniversal connection of views which bears on these dbarmas or which is associated with them. 
Nevertheless latent defilement of views is active with respect to these dharmas, for the two drṣṭis which are esteeming and which have not yet been abandoned, are active through association. 
Why does one makes one connectionthe connection of viewsout of the first three views, and another connection,.the connection of esteemingout of the last two? 
Two views constitute separate coṇnection by treason of their equal number of things, and by reason of their common characteristic of esteeming. 
Why do envy and avarice make up two connections, while the other wrappings are not distinct connec tions ? 
Envy and avarice are each a connection because, among the wrappings, they are at one and the same time com pletely bad and independent. 
The Blessed One said moreover, that, among the connec tioas, Five are inferior. 
Namely a belief in a self, the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, doubt, desire for the objects of sensual pleasure and anger. 
Inferiot means that which is in relation to, that which is favorable to the inferior part , that is, to Kāmadhātu. 
Two cause one not to get out of Kāmadhāātu; three cause one to return there. 
According to another opinion, it is by reason of the three that one does not leave the state of being inferior, namely a Prthagjana; and it is by reason of the two that one does not get out of the inferior sphere, that is, out of Kāmadhātu. 
This is why these five connections are termed inferior. 
Three, because they make up the gate and the root. 
He also indicates the root, for a belief in the extremes is set into motion by a belief in a self, the esteeming of views by the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, and false views by doubt. 
Others say: Three are indicated because three things create an obstacle to arriving at deliverance: a nondesire to go, error with respect to the Path, and doubt with respect to the Path. 
In the same way that, in the world, these three things form an obstacle to progress to another place, in this same way they form an obstacle to progress towards deliverance: 
a belief in a self, which inspires a fear of deliverance and causes one not to desire to arṟive at it; b. 
the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices through which, having recourse to another path, one becomes deluded about the Path; and c. 
doubts, doubt about the Path. 
The Blessed One, wishing to teach that the Śrotaāpanna has completely abandoned these three obstacles, says that he has abandoned three coṉṉections. 
In the same way that the Blessed One characterized five connections as inferior, in this same way Five are superior, namely two lusts, those which arise from Rūpadhātu and from Ārūpyadhātu, namely dissipation, pride and ignorance. 
Three, namely all lust, all batred, and all ignorance. 
Why are only these three called bonds? 
There are three bonds by reason of sensation. 
There are three bonds by reason of the three sensations. 
Lust creates aṉuśayana, that is, becomes lodged in and grows in agreeable sensation, both by taking it as its object and by associatioṇ; hatred in disagreeable sensation; and ignorance, andbut not in the same mannerlust and hatred, in the sensation of indifference. 
htk The anuśayas have been explained above. 
The kleśas are upakleśas because they defile the mind. 
Defiled mental states, forming part of the saskāras kandha, but different from the kleśas, are also upakleśas without being kleśas. 
There are eight types of wrappings: disrespect, absence of fear, envy, avarice, dissipation, regret, torpor, and languor. 
The system of the Vaibhāṣīkas admits ten, by adding Also anger and hypocrisy. 
Disrespect and absence of fear, ii.32. 
Envy or mental dissatisfaction concerns the prosperity of another. 
Avarice is tenacity of the mind, which is opposed to either spiritual or material giving . 
Languor is a compression of the mind which rends it incapable of commanding the body. 
Anger is icritation of the mind with respect to living beings and to things , an iṟritation distinct from that of regret, anger or hostility. 
Hypocrisy is hiding ones faults. 
These three pakleśas proceed from lust. 
From out of ignorance there proceeds torpor, languor, and absence of fear. 
These three proceed from ignorance. 
From out of doubt there proceeds regret and aṅger; from out of hatred there proceeds envy. 
It is thus that these ten wpaklefas are an outflowing of the kleśaṣ.1 are the kleśamalas? 
Cheating is the dhbarma that causes one to delude another. 
The drunkenness of pride, as ii. 
Esteeming evil is what which causes one not to accept remoṇstrañces. 
Enmity is aversion. 
Hostility is what is translated into deeds and words harmful to another. 
Crookedness is an outflowing of view, for it is said in a stanza, What is crookedness? 
tkīk How are they abandoned? 
Disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, languor, and dissipation are abandoned through Seeing and Meditation. 
They are abandoned through Seeing the Truth through which the kleśa to which they aṟe associated is abandoned. 
And so too the alas, being autonomous. 
Above, the wpakleśas are neutral. 
Above Kāmadhātu, the pakleiasto the extent that they exist thereare neutral. 
Cheating and crookedness exist in Kāmadhātu and in the First Dhyāṇna. 
These two upakleśas exist in two spheres, Kāmadhātu and Ṛūpadhātu. 
Since Brahmā tried to deceive. 
We cannot doubt this, for Mahābrahmā attempted to deceive the Āyuṣman Aśvajit by giving him an inexact definition of himself. 
Toṟpor, dissipation, and pridefulness exist in all three spheres. 
The others in Kāmadhātu. 
Of the sixteen pakleśas, ten wrappings and six alas, eleven exist only in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of cheating, crookedness, torpor, dissipation, and pridefulness. 
Those that are abandoned through Śeeing the Truths are of the spheres of the manovijñāna, plus pride and languor. 
Kleśas and upakleśas which are abandoned through Seeing are supported by the manovijñāna alone; so too pride and languor which are abandoned through Meditation; for these two, in their totality , are of the sphere of the manas. 
Plus the autonomous pakleśas. 
In the same way, the antonomous pakleśas are abandoned through Meditation. 
The others have the six consciousnesses for their support. 
lust is abandoned through Meditation, as are hatred and ignorance, as well as the pakleśar which are associated with them, disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, and dissipation, and those which are included in the kleśamahābhāmikas . 
With which sense organs are the kleśas and the wpakleśar associated? 
Lust is associated with pleasure and satisfaction. 
Hatred with the contrary. 
Hatred is associated with displeasure and dissatisfaction, for lust and hatred have respectively happiness and dejection for their aspect, for both of them belong to the six consciousnesses. 
Moha with all. 
Being associated with all the kJefas, ignorance is associated with the five sensations. 
The view of negation with dissatisfaction and sensation. 
False view is associated with dissatisfaction amoṇg those persons who have done meritorious actions and who regret that their actions are without result; it is associated with satisfaction among traṅsgresSots. 
If one who aspires to certitude doubts, then he is dissatisfied. 
The others with satisfaction. 
The others, that is, the views with the exception of false views and egotismare associated with satisfaction, for they have the aspect of happiness. 
Those arisen in Kāmadhātu. 
All are associated with indifference. 
All these anuśayas are associated with the indriya of indiffer ence, for, says the School, there is necessarily indifference when the series of the efa is going to be broken. 
In the higher stages, they are associated with their own seṇsations, to be determined according to the stage. 
In the higher stages, the aṉuśayas are associated with the sensation which are proper to them, to the extent that these sensations exist there. 
In the stagethe First Dhyānawhere there are four consciousnesses, seeing, hearing, touch, and mental consciousness, the anufayas which are produced with each of these conscious nesses are associated with the sensations proper to this conscious ness: 
Regret, envy, anger, hostility, aversion, and the esteeming of evil are associated with dissatisfaction. 
These wpakleśas are associated with the indriya of dissatisfac tion because they have dejection for their mode and they belong to the sphere of the manas. 
Avarice, with the contrary. 
Avarice is assocated with the śndriya of satisfaction; it has happiness for its mode, for it proceeds greed. 
Crookedness, cheating, hyprcrisy, and languor are associated with one and the other. 
In the Third Dhyāna, pridefulness is associated with the indriya of pleasure; below, with the ndriya of satisfaction; above, with the ndriya of indifference. 
All are associated with indifference. 
In the way that there is no restriction in the association of the kleśfa and the wpakleśas with ignoranṅce, so too with indifference. 
The four others with five. 
FPour wrappingsnamely disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, and dissipationare associated with the five sensations, because the first two are azkxśalamahābhūikas, and the last two are kleśamahābhūmikas. 
Does this refer to the torpor, dissipation, and doubt of all the three Dhātus, or only of Kāmadhātu? 
The Sūtra says that the hindrances are exclusively bad; consequentlyThe hindrances exist in Kāmadhātu. 
Why do torporandlanguor and dissipationandregret coṉstitute, as groups, two hindrances? 
Two make up a single hindrance, because they have the same opposites, the same nourishment, and the seme reṣult, Opposite, that is, opposition or counternourishment. 
What is the nourishment of torporlanguor? 
What is the counternourish ment? 
Why does the Sūtra distinguish five hindrances? 
But, one would say, if this explanation is correct, dissipation regret, which hinders absorption, should be listed, in the list of the hindrances, before torporlanguor. 
Other masters give another explanation. 
How do they explain this? 
The monk on his rounds perceives an agreeable or disagreeable object, and considers it as such; when he returns to the monastery the enjoyment and the aversion which proceed from this agreeabledisagreeable imptression, first hinder his entry into absorption. Then, when the monk has entered into absorp tion, as he does not correctly cultivate calm and insight , there is then produced torporlanguor and dissipationregret which, in this order, hinder his absorption and his discrmination. Finally, when he has left the absorption, doubt hinders his reflection on the dharmas. 
It is in this way that there are the five hinderances. 
It is not an absolute principle that the efa5 are abandoned by a knowledge of their object. 
They are abandoned in four ways. 
Destruction by a knowledge of the object, by the destruction of the keśas of which they are the object, and by the abandoning of the object. 
The kJeśfa5 beating on the bhūmi to which they belong, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, or having a pure object, abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering and the Path , are abandoned through a knowledge of their object. 
The universal kleśas in another sphere, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, are aban doned through the destruction of the kef of which they are the object. 
These klesas are of the object of a universal kleśa in its own sphere: 
The kleśas having an impure object, abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of ŚSuffering and the Path are abandoned through the abandoning of their object. 
These keś25 have for their object the kesśa which has a pure object. By the destruction of those, these are also destroyed. 
kski With respect to the keśas abandoned through Meditation, There is destruction through the arising of the opposition. 
When a path is opposed to one category of kleśa, this path, by arising, causes this category of defilement to be abandoned. 
Which path is opposed to which category? 
How many types of oppositions are there? 
abandoning, maintaining, removal, and disgust. 
The Uninterrupted Path is a prahāṇaprasipakṣa, aṉ opposition which results in abandoning. 
The next path, viśeṣamārga is the dGrībhāvapratipakṣa, opposition by which the possession of the klefa previously cut off, is found to be removed. 
According to others, the Path of Deliverance is itself the opposition of removal , for the possession of the klesa is also removed from it. 
The path which consists of considering a sphere of existence as bad and which finds disgust in it is the path of opposition through disgust. 
opposition through disgust is the Preparatory Path ; 2. 
opposition through abandoning is the whole of the Uninterrupted Path; 3. 
opposition through which the proceeding path is maintained is the Path of Deliverance; and 4. 
The klesa is supposed to become abandoned through separation from its object, The klesa, in fact, cannot be separated from its samprayoga, ; but it can be separated from its object in such a manner that it no longer rearises bearing on this object. 
A future klesa can be separated from its object, but how can a past kleśa be? 
Would you say that the exptession ālambanāt prahātavyaḥ, to be abandoned through vyaḥ, to be abandoned through perfect knowledge of the object? 
A personal kleśa is abandoned through the cutting off of prāpti or the possession of this kleśa which exists in the personal series. 
As for the klesa of another, or for rāpa in its totality , or for the undefiled dharmas, these diverse things are abandoned through the abandoning of the personal lefa which takes them as its object How many types of separation are there? 
although the primary elements arise togethet , they are separated one from the other by the fact of their different ṉatures. 
one is separated from immorality by the precepts. 
Separation of place by difference of place: the oceans of the East and the West. 
as the past and the future. One says that the past and the future are separated: 
from what are they separated? 
How can the past which has just perished and the future which is about to arise be separated from the present? 
It is by reason of the difference of time period that, according to us, the past and the future are separated; not by reason of the fact that they will be distant in the past or in the future. 
For if this were the case, the present would also be separate, for it constitutes a different time period. 
This argument would hold for the past and the future ; but how can space, which one cannot possess , be near? 
We say that the past and the future are separated from one another because they are separated by the present; the present is near because it is neaṛ to the past and future; an unconditioned thing is near because it is not separated or hindered by anything. But then the past and the future will be at one and the same time far and near, being far from each other and near to the present. Here is the correct explanation. 
The future is separated from the unique, self characteristics of the dharmas, because it has not attained them; the past is separated from them because it has fallen away from them. 
The kleśa is destroyed through the Path which is its path of abandoning. 
In six moments: 
Opposition here means the Path of Deliveraṅce. 
Results means the four results of the religious life, the result of Srotaāpaṇṇna, etc. 
Perfection of the faculties refers to ndriyasaeāra. 
for certain klefas, according to the case, in six moments; but in decreasing number down to two for others. 
jñānaparijñā, perfect knowledge consisting of knowledge, which is pure knowledge; and prahāṉaparijñā, perfect knowledge which produces abandoning, which is abandoning itself, for the effect is designated by the name of its cause. 
srī Does all abandoning constitute one perfect knowledge? 
There are nine perfect knowledges. 
That is, The destruction of the first two types of Kāma consititute one perfect knowledge. 
That is, the destruction of the first two types of klesa of Kāmadhātu, the eśas abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering. 
The destruction of the two types consists of two. 
The abandoning of the keśas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering consitiutes one perfect knowledge; the same for the abandoning of the keśaṛ 
As the abandoning of the keśas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths constitutes three perfect knowledges, In that same way, above, there are three perfect knowledges. 
The same for the two higher spheres taken together, the abandoning of the kefas abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering consitutes one perfect knowledge; the abandoning of the kleśas abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering constitutes the second perfect knowledge; and the abandoning of the keśuṛ 
Thus there are six perfect knowledges for the abandoning of the kteśar which belong to the three spheres and which are abandoned by the Seeing of the Truths. 
The abandoning of the cankerous influences of Rūpadhātu, which is called rparāgakayaparijñā perfect knowledge consist ing of the destruction of attachment to Rūpadhātu constitutes one perfect knowledge. 
The third perfect knowledge is the total abandoning of the cankerous influences of Ārūpyadhātu, which is called sarvasarāy ojanaparyādānaparijñā,perfect knowledge consisting of the annihilatioṉ of all the bonds. 
Six are the result of the patiences. 
The first six perefect knowledges, which consist of the abandoning of the kleśas abandoned through Seeing the Truths, aṟe the result of the patiences. 
The others, the results of the knowledges. 
The three perfect knowledges, the first of which is the perfect knowledge which consists of the abandoning of Kāmadhātu, are obtained through the Path of Meditation; thus they are the result of the knowledges. 
Because the patiences are the associates of the jñānas or knowledges: in the manner in which the associates of a king improperly receive the name of king; or rather, because a patience and a knowledge have the same result. 
All are the result of aṉāgamya; five or eight are the result of the dhyānas. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, five are the result of the mauladhyānas or the principal absorptions , namely, those which consist of the abandoning of the kleśas of the sphere of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
According to the Bhadanta Ghoṣaka, eight are the result of the principal absorptions. 
his abandoning of the efas of Kāmadhātu abandoned by Seeing, and his taking of possession of disconnection from these kesas, should be consid ered as the result of the path of Seeing, for it is pure. 
The perfect knowledge consisting of the destructin of attach ment to Rūpadhātu is the result of the sāmantaka, ot pteparatory stage of Ākāśānan tyyataṉa. 
One is also the result of three ṉaulārāpys. 
The perfect knowledge which consists of the annihilation of all the bonds is the tesult of the three principle Ārūpyas. 
All are the result of the Āryan Path. 
The nine perfect knowledges are obtained through the pure path. 
Two of the worldly path. 
Three through dharmajñāna, The last three are the result of dharmajñāna inciuded in the Path of Meditation, for this knowledge is opposed to the keśas of the three spheres abandoned through Meditation. 
Five or six, from one and the other groups. 
Śix are the result of the ḍharmajñāna group, namely those which are the result of the dharmakṣāntis and the dharmajñānas;, five are the result of the xvayajñāna group, namely those which are the result of anvayakṣāntis and the anvayajñānas. 
The expression group is to be understood for the kṣāntis and the jñānṉas. 
Why is not all abandoning considered a perfect knowledge ? 
With regard to abandoning,the result of the patiences : 
There is perfect knowledge by reason of the pure acquisition of disconnection, the partial abandoning of Bhavāgra, and the destruction of two causes. 
The abandoning which includes these three characteristics receives the name of perfect knowledge. 
With respect to the three perfect knowledges which consist of the abandonings, the results of knowledge , they are thus called by reason of these three characteristics and by reason of a fourṟth: 
By the reason of the fact that one passes over a sphere. 
One who is to be found in the Path of Seeing of the Truths is either not endowed with perfect knowledge, or is endowed with from one to five perfect knowledges. 
A Prthagjana has no perfect knowledges. 
In the Path of ŚSeeing, the Āryan is not endowed with any perfect knowledge until samnṇdaye dharmajñānakṣānti ; he is endowed with one perfect knowledge in saudayena vayajñāna and śsamudayenvayajñānakṣnt, with two in sama dayenvayajñāna and nirodhe dharmajñānakṣānti, with three in nirodhe dharmajñāna aṇd nirodhenvayajñānakṣānti, with four in nirodhenvayajñāna and mārge dharmajñānakṣānti, with five in mārge dharmajñāna aṅnd mārgenvayajñānakṣānti. 
Abiding in Meditation, with six, with one, or with two. 
As long as one has not obtained detachment from Kāmadhātu, the Āryan, after mārgenvayajñānaor when, having obtained it, one has fallen away from itpossesses six perfect knowledges in the Path of Meditation. 
The Arhat who obtains the qualtiy of Arhat is endowed with a single perfect knowledge of the annihilation of all the bonds. 
Falling away through one defilement of Ārūpyadhātu, he finds himself in the condition of an Āryan who obtains detachemnt from Rūpadhātu: 
One reduces the perfect knowledges to a single unit where there is detachment from one sphere and the acquisition of a result. 
One loses one, two, five, or six perfect knowledges; in this same way one obtains them, but never five. 
The saint who falls away from the quality of Arhat or from the detachment of Kāmadhātu loses one perfect knowledge. 
The Anāgāmin detached from Rūpadhātu who falls away from the detachment of Kāmadhātu loses two perfect knowledges. 
When the saint who has arrived at the sixteenth moment is detached from Kāmadhātu before entering into the Path of Seeing, he loses five perfect knowledges, for at this moment he obtains the perfect knowledge that he has abandoned the cankerous influences of Kāmadhātu. 
When one is not detached from Kāmadhātu before entering into the Path of Seeing, that is, when he is an āṉapārvaka he then obtains the sixth perfect knowledge which he will lose, with the five others, when he acquires detachment from Kāma dhātu. 
One who falls away from a single detachment of Ārūpyadhātu, obtains two perfect knowledges. 
One who falls away from the result of Anāgāmin obtaeins six perfect knowledges. 
9, Sayukta, TD 2, p. 
We have said how the abandoning of the defilements receives the name of perfect knowledge. 
It has beenṉ said that the defilements are abandoned through Seeing the Truths and through Meditation. 
We have explained in detail that some of the defilements are to be abandoned through Seeing, and others through Meditation. 
The Path of Meditation is of two types; the Path of Seeing is pure. 
The Path of Seeing is opposed to the defilements of the Three Dhātus; it eliminates in one single stroke the nine categories of the defilements to be abandoned through Seeing; it is thus exclusively transworldly; now such a power does not belong to a woṟldly path. 
The Four Truths have been mentioned. 
By saying The pure dharmas are the Truth of the Path. 
By saying Pratsakhyānirodha is disconnec tion, we have designated the Truth of Extinction. 
Namely suffering, origin, extinction, and path. 
The word namely indicates that the nature of the Truths is indeed as has been mentioned in the First Chapter. 
Other wise there would be the occurance of first mentioning the cause and then the result. 
Sometimes dharmas are arranged in the order in which they arise; this is the case for the applications of mindfulness, the smrṛtyupasthānas and for the Dhyāṇnas. 
The Truths are mentioned in the order in which they are comprehended. 
Why are they comprehended in this order? 
Because, in the period preparatory to the Path proper, that is, the period of examination, the ascetic first creates an idea of that to which he is attached, of that by which he is totmented, of that from which he seeks to be delivered, namely, suffering. 
So too, having seen a disease, one searches out its origin, its disappearance, and its remedy. 
In the Sūtra which says, Endowed with the four qualities, the doctor. 
In the order in which, in the course of the period of examina tion, he creates an idea of the Truths, in this same order, having reached the period of comprehension, he understands the Truths, because comprehension is projected by the preparatory exercises, the same way that a horse gallops without obstacie over familiar teṟrain. 
Why is comprehension only pure? 
Because it is a knowledge tuṟned towards Nirvāṇa and the true. 
To the extent that they are a cause they are the Truth of Origin or arising, because suffering arises from them. 
Consequently suffering and arising differ in name, but do not differ in fact, since they are the same upādānaskandhas coṉsidered as result or as cause. 
But Extinction and the Path differ in fact as well as in name. 
What is the meaning of this expression? 
They are truth for the Āryans, truths of the Āryans: this is why they are called āryasatya. 
Not being erroneous , they are true for everyone. 
Therefore, the Truths are called truths of the Āryans and not truths of others, because the seeing of these latter is incorrect. 
As the stanza says, What the Āryans call happy others call painful; what others call happy, the Āryans call painful. 
According to other masters, two are Āryan truths, and two are truths of both Āryans and others. 
tk Since only a part of sensation is painful by its nature. how can one say that all impure, conditi oned things are suffering? 
Impure dharmas, whether they are agreeable, disagreea ble, or otherwise, are, without exception, suffering, by reason of the three types of suffering, each according to its type. 
There are three types of suffering: suffering which is suffering in and of itself , suffering through the fact of being conditioned , and suffering which is change or transformation. By reason of these three, all impure conditioned things, without exception, are suffering: 
agreeable things are suffering because they are subject to transfoṟmation; disagreeable things are suffering in and of themselves; and neitherdisagreeablenora greeable things are suffering because they are conditioned. 
The three sensations, in this order; and, by reason of the three sensations, all the seskāras which reṣult in agreeable sensation, etc., receive the name of agreeable, etc. 
Agreeable sensation is suffering through transformation, as the Sūtra says, Āgreeable sensation is agreeable when it arises, agreeable while it lasts, but suffering in its change. 
Disagreeable sensation is suffering by nature, as the Sūtra says, Suffering sensation is suffering when it arises, and suffering while it lasts. 
Neitherdisagreeablenoragreeable sensation is suffering because it is so decreed by its causes, as the Sūtra says, That which is impermanent is suffering. 
The same holds true for the saūskāras which result in these sensations as for these sensations themselves. 
But all conditioned things are suffering from the fact of suffering through the fact of being conditioned, and they are seen under this aspect only by the Āryans. 
Therefore it is said, One does not feel a hair placed on the palm of the hand; but the same hair, in the eye, causes suffering and injury. 
So too the ignorant, resembling the hand, do not feel the hair which is suffering through the fact of being conditioned: but the Āryans, resembling the eye, are tortured by it. 
The Āryans make of existence in the most sublime heaven an idea more painful than do fools make of existence in the most dreadful hell. 
But, one would say, the Path is conditioned; it should thus be suffering from the fact of suffering through the fact of being conditioned. 
The Path is not suffering, because the definition of suffering is to be hateful. 
Now the Path is not hateful to the Āryans because it produces the extinction of all of the sufferings of arising; when they consider Nirvāṇa as peaceful, what they consider as peaceful is the extinction of what they consider as suffering. 
But, since the agreeable or happiness does exist, why is only suffering, and not the agreeable, a truth of the Āryans? 
In the same way that one calls a pile in which some peas are to be found a pile of beans, so too no one with any intelligence would consider a wound as agreeable because one experiences a very small agreeable sensation when one washes this wound. 
And further, Because it is a cause of suffering, because it is produced by many sufferings, because one desires it when one suffers , the agreeable, they conclude, is suffering. 
But, even if accmpanied by happiness, existence in its totality has the same flavor of suffering through the fact of being conditioned: Āryans thus consider it as suffering. This is why suffering and not heppiness is an Āryan Truth. 
But how can Āryans regard sensations which are agreeable by nature as suffering? 
They are hateful by reason of their impermanence in the same way that they consider the rpas, sajñās, etc., as suffering, even though the rāēpas, sajñās, etc., are not suffering in the same way as is disagreeable sensation. 
With regard to the proposed argument The agreeable is suffering because it is a cause of suffering: 
to be a cause of suffering is its aspect or origin ; to see things as a cause of suffering is not to see them as suffering; how could the Āryans born in Rūpadhātu and in Ārūpyadhātu have an idea of suffering? 
For the rkandhas of these spheres are not a cause of suffering; why would the Sūtra mention suffering through the fact of being conditioned? 
But if Āryans see the agreeable as suffering because it is impermanent, then what is the difference between the aspects of suffering and of impermanence? 
One sees things as inpermanent because their nature is to arise and perish; one sees them as suffering because they are hateful. 
When one has seen them as impermanent, they become hateful. The characteristic of impermanence implies the characteristic of suffering, but it is not subsumed in this characteristic. 
Certain masters deny any agreeable sensation, affirming that all is suffering. 
The Blessed One said, Sufferiṅig is to be found in any and all sensation; Agteeable sensation should be regarded as suffering; and It is an error to regard what is suffering as agreeable., Reasoning: 
Because the causes of pleasure are not always the causes of pleasure. 
The things that one pretends to be causes of pleasure,food, drink, cold, warmth, etc.,when they are grasped or experienced to excess or out of season become causes of suffering. 
Now it is inadmissible that a cause of pleasure, because it has increased, or presents itself at a different moment,even if it remains completely the same,would produce suffering. 
for later suffering will grow and become felt. 
Because the idea of pleasure has for its object, not a real pleasure, but sometime a remedy for suffering or a modification of suffering. 
As long as a person is not tormented by sufferings which are caused by hunger, thirst, cold, heat, fatigue, or desire, he will not have any sensation which he will feel to be agreeable. 
Consequently the ignorant have the idea of pleasure, not with regard to true pleasure, but with regard to the relief of suffering. 
Fools also have the idea of pleasure with regard to the modification of suffering: for example to pass a burden from one shoulder to another. 
We would ask him who denies the existence of pleasure, What is suffering? 
If he answers, That which is painful, we would then ask, How is it painful? 
If he answers, Because it is not desired, we would say that that which is desired is agreeable. 
But, one would say, this same desire is no longer cherished by the Āryans when they obtain detachment. Thus the quality of desirable is not proved. This objection is useless, for if Āryans, once they become detached, no longer cherish it, it is then from another point of view that it is undesirable to them. 
The sensation which, in itself, is desirable, wili never become, in itself, undesirable. 
Consequently, it is not from the poiat of view of its intrinsic nature, but from another point of view that Āryans do not cherish agreeable sensation. 
it is the occasion for the loss of good dharmas, it is acquired only at great effort, it is directed toward suffering, and it is impermanent; If this sensation were undesirable in and of itself, who would ever be able to become attached to it? 
From the fact ṭhat, with a view to detaching themselves from it, Āryans consider it in its defects by placing themselves in a poiat of view distinct from that of its intrinsic nature, it then follows that agreeable sensation does exist in and of itself. 
The meaning of the declaration of the Blessed One, Suffering is to be found in any and all sensation has been fixed by ṭthe Blessed One himself: 
Oh Ānanda, it is with regard to impermanence, it is with regard to the transformation of the saskāras that I said that ŚSuffering is to be found in any and all sensation. 
Consequently it is proved that this declaration was ṉnot made with regard to the suffering which is suffering in and of itself. 
If all sensation were, by its nature, suffering, then the Ārya Ānanda would not have asked, The Blessed One taught that there are three types of sensation, agreeable, suffering, and neithersuf feringnoragreeable. 
The Blessed One taught that any and all sensation is suffering. 
With what intention, from what point of view did the Blessed One teach that any and all sensation is ṣuffering? 
Ānanda would have asked, From what point of view did the Blessed One teach that there are three types of sensation? 
And the Blessed Oṉe would have responded, It was intentional, with a defiaite motive, that I taught that there are three types of sensation. 
ṛTherefore if the Blessed One said, I have declared, with a definite motive, that any and all sensation is suffering, this is because, by its nature, sensation is of three types. 
As for the declaration Agreeable sensation should be regarded as suffering, agreeable sensation is, on the one hand, agreeable in and of itself, being pleasant; but on the other hand, it is in a certain sense suffering, since it changes and as such is impermanent. 
Persons not free from desire are bound to regasd it as agreeable, because they savor its taste; Āryans are free from regarding it as agreeable, because they are free from desire with regard to it. 
This is why the Buddha enjoined one to regard agreeable sensation in a manṉer which would lead one to obtain deliverance. 
How do we know that agreeable sensation is agreeable in and of itself? 
It is said, The perfect, omniscient Buddha, knowing the impermanence and the transformation of the sanskāras, declares that sensation is suffering.. 
The declaration It is an eṟror to regard what is suffering as agreeable is also made with a certain intention. 
The world attaches the idea of agreeable to agreeable sensation, to delectable objects, to existence. 
Now agreeable sensation is in a certain sense suffering: 
Delectable objects contain much suffering, but little pleasure; to consider them as absolutely agreeable is an eṟror. 
Consequently this text does not demonstrate the nonexistence of agreeable sensation. 
If all sensation is suffering in and of itself, how does one explain that the Buddha taught the existence of three types of sensation? 
Perhaps the Buddha, in this teaching, is conforming to the views of the world. 
This hypothesis is inadmissible: 
In fact, after having said, The organ of pleasure and the organ of satisfaction are agreeable sensation, he then said He who, conforming to reality and through correct discernment sees the five organs , abandons the three bonds. 
Furthermore, how would the world arrive at the conclusion that sensation is of three types if it were exclusively suffering? 
But pleasure also presents three degrees, and it then follows that one would have the idea of great pleasure with regard to a weak sensation of suffering, the idea of medium pleasure with regard to a medium sensation of suffering, and the idea of little pleasure with regard to strong sensation of suffe ring. 
Furthermore, when one experiences pleasure arisen from some excellent smell, taste or tangible thing, what is then the weak suffering through a relationship to which the idea of pleasure is produced? 
then this weak sensation of suffering has not arisen or when it has disappeared, one will all the more have the idea of pleasure, suffering having completely disappeared. 
Furthermore, in your system, a weak sensation of suffering is transmitted by a clear and strong sensation ; a sensation of medium force is transmitted by an indistinct sensation : 
So too the Sūtra teaches that the first three Dhyānas are accompanied by pleasure: there one will find, according to you, some weak suffering. The Sūtra teaches that, in the Fourth Dhyāna and above, sensation is neitherdisagreeable noragreeable: there one will find, according to you, medium suffering. 
Consequently your theory that agreeable sensation, etc., correspond to weak suffering, etc., is not admissible. 
Finally, the Blessed One said, Oh Mahānāman, if physical matter were exclusively suffering, not agreeable nor accompanied by pleasure, there would be no reason why one would become attached to physical matter. 
The first logical reason presented by our adversary, because the causes of pleasure are not always the causes of pleasure is worthless. 
A given object is the cause of pleasure or suffering through the function of the state of the person who experiences it; it is not a cause of pleasure or suffering in an absolute manner. 
If a given object is a cause of pleasure when it is in a relationship with a body found in a certain state, then it will always be a cause of pleasure when it is again in a relationship with this body in the same state. 
A comparison: The same fire will give forth different results of cooking according to the state of the rice which one is cooking: the food will be edible or not. 
Furthermore, how can one dispute that, in the Dhyānas, the causes of pleasure are always causes of pleasure? 
As for the argument that the idea of pleasure has for its object, not a real pleasure, but a remedy of suffering or a modification of suffering, we would say: 
When one experiences the pleasure of a smell, a taste, etc., what is the suffering whose remedy is the object of the idea of pleasure? 
Before this suffering has arisen or when it is destroyed, in the absence of any remedy, one will all the more experience pleasure. 
When one moves a burden to another shoulder, this is truly a pleasure that arises from a new bodily state and which continues to arise as long as this bodily state does not disappear. 
If it were otherwise, then the idea or impression of pleasure would become stronger. 
The same explanation holds for the impression of pleasure brought about by the changing of bodily position which has caused fatigue. 
By reason of a certain transformation of the body ; so too, in the case of alcohol, etc., sweetness and tartness succeed one another. 
It is thus proved that there is agreeable sensation, and that all impure conditioned things are suffering from the fact of the three types of suffering. 
This thesis of the Abhidharma that the Truth of Suffering is the Truth of Origin, that is, that the wpādānaskandhas, which are suffering, are at the same time the origin of suffering , comes from the teaching of the Sūtra. 
The Sūtra says that desire is the origin by reason of the capital importance of desire. 
In fact, some other dharmas are named in other Sūtras. 
The Blessed One said, Action, desire and ignorance are the cause of future raskāras; he also said, Five types of seeds, that is, the vjñāna associated with wpādāna; the earth element, that is, the four vijñānasthitis. 
Furthermore, when the Buddha said, It is desire which is the origin, he intended to define the cause of reexistence. When, in the stanza, he enumerates action, desire, and ignorance, he defined the cause of different births which is action; the cause of reexistence, namely desire; and the cause of births and of reexistence, namely ignorance. We shall continue the explanation of the meaning of these terms. 
In fact, the Sūtṛa says, Action is the cause of births, and desire is the cause of reexistence; and it teaches the successive order of causation: The eye has action for its object; action has desire for its cause; desire has ignorance for its cause; and ignorance has incorrect judgment for its cause. 
That consciousness and the other skandhas are the origin of suffering results again from the fact that the Sūtra declares that they are respectively seed and field. 
What is birth ? 
What is reexistence ? 
Upapatti signifies a birth or an existence characterized by a certain sphere , a certain realm of rebirth , a certain mode of birth , a certain gender, etc. 
so too a seed is the cause of a shoot characterized as a riceshoot, a wheatshoot, etc.; whereas water is the cause of the simple germination of all the different species of shoots. 
How does one prove that desire is the cause of reexistence? 
From the fact that a person free from desire is not reborn. 
When a person endowed with desire and a person free from desire die, we know that the first is reborn and that the second is not reborn. Therefore since there is no rebirth where there is no desire, we know that desire is the cause of reexistence. 
kissḵ The Blessed One proclaimed the Four Noble Truths, but he also declared Two Truths, relative truth and absolute truth. 
The idea of a jug ends when the jug is broken; the idea of water ends wheṇ, in the mind, one analyzes the water. 
the idea of a jug disappears when it is reduced to pieces. 
If the idea of a thing disappears when this thing is dissipated, or broken to pieces, by the mind, then this thing should be regarded as having relative existence; for example, water. 
If we grasp and remember the dharmas, such as color, etc., in the water, then the idea of water will disappear. 
Thus if one says, from the relative point of view, There is a jug, there is water, one is speaking truly, and one is not speaking falsely. 
one can reduce physical matter into atoms, one can remember smell and other dharmas in the mind, but the idea of the unique nature of physical matter persists. 
And as this absolutely exists, it is absolḻutely true. 
Consequently, beginning from the beginning, we would say: 
Firm in his cultivation, endowed with teaching and reflection, he will be capable of giving himself up to meditation. 
Whoever desires to see the Truths should first of all keep the Precepts. Then he reads the teaching upon which his Seeing of the Truths depends, or he hears their meaning. Having heard, he correctly reflects. Having reflected, he gives himself up to the cultivation of meditation. 
With the wisdom arisen from the teaching for its support, there arises the wisdom arisen from reflection ; with this for its support, there arises the wisdom arisen from meditation. 
fīōk What are the characteristics of these three wisdoms? 
The wisdoms arisen from the teaching, etc., have respectively for their sphere name, name and the thing, and the thing. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, wisdom arisen from the teaching has name for its object; wisdom arisen from reflection has the name and the thing for its object: 
Wisdom arisen from meditation has the thing for its objecr; it goes to the things as an abstraction made from its name. 
in fact, when it has name for its object, it is wisdom arisen from the teaching, and when it has a thing for its object, it is the wisdom arisen from meditation. 
In this way the specific characteristics of the three wisdoms are proved in an irreprochable manner. 
How does one who thus applies himself to meditation succeed in it? 
When the ascetic is withdrawn with regard to his body and his mind by separating himself from promiscuity and bad thoughts, he succeeds. 
For whom are these two separations easy? 
Not for one discontented and with many desires. 
What should one understand by discontent and many desires? 
To desire more of the fine things, clothes, etc., which one possess is discontent. 
To desire what one does not possess is many desires. 
But is not the desire to have more also produced with respect to what one does not possess? 
What then is the difference between the two? 
Many desires is the desire for goods, of excellent or in great quantity, that one does not possess. 
They are of the three spheres or pure. 
But discontent and many desires only belong to Kāmadhātu. 
What is the nature of content and few desires? 
They have for their nature , nondesire. 
The lineages of the Āṛyans. 
They are also nondesire in their nature. 
Among them, three are contentment. 
The first threeto be content with clothing, to be content with food, to be content with bed and with seatare contentment by natuṟe. 
The fourth āryavasa is to take delight in Extinction and in the Path. 
Because it turns its back on attachment to pleasure and attachment to existence. 
What did the Blessed One teach by the four āryavasas? 
By three is taught the regimen; by the last, activity. 
The Blessed One, the Master of the Law , established a certain regimen and a certain activity for his disciples who, having renounced their old regimen and their old activities, are engaged in searching out deliverance. 
If, with this regimen, you do these actions, before long you will obtain deliverance. 
Why did the Blessed One establish such a regimen and such an activity? 
The Sūtra establishes that the arising of desire is fourfold: 
Oh monks, desire, arising, arises by reason of clothing, by reason of food, by reason of the bed and the seat; lasting, it lasts by reason. ; being attached, it is attached. 
Oh monks, desire, arising, arises by reason of such existence or nonexistence. 
It is in order to create an obstacle to it that the four āryavasas are taught. 
The object of the idea of self is clothing. 
The object of the idea of self is the āmabhāva, the sensorial and mental complex. 
The first three āryavarsas destroy for a time the desire for the things that one regards as pertaining to self. 
Being in this way a suitable receptacle, how would the ascetic enter into meditation? 
Who enters through visualiza tion on the loathsome? 
Certain masters say: 
Some other masters say: Mindfulness of breathing cuts off imagination because it is not turned towards externals, for it bears on breathing. 
The loathsome is turned outwatds, like visual consciousenss; it is not visual consciousness, but it is a contempla tion of an object of the visual consciousness. 
The ioathsome visualization that has a cadaver wasted and torn to pieces for its object is opposed to the second craving. 
The loathsome visualization that has a cadaver eaten by worms and a skeleton held together by its tendons for its object is opposed to the third craving. 
And the loathsome visualization that has an immobile cadaver for its object is opposed to the fourth craving. 
The fourfold object of craving,color, shape, contact, and honors,is lacking in the chain of bones. 
The loathsome visualization does not have the abandoning of the defilements for its result, but only an arresting of the defilements, for it is an act of attention bearing not on reality but on a voḻuntary representation; and bearing not on the totality of things, but only on one part of the visible of Kāmadhātu. 
The beginner, by enlarging the visualization of the bones up to the sea, and by reducing it. 
The ascetic who desires to cultivate a visualization of the loathsome, first of all fixes his mind on a part of his body, either the toe, or the forehead, or on any other part of his choosing; then he purifies the bone, that is, he removes the flesh from it by supposing that the flesh rots and falls off; he then progressively enlarges his visualization and finally sees his entire body reduced to a skeleton. 
In this same way, in oṟder to increase his power of visualization , he creates the same idea of a second individual, of the individuals of the Vihāra, of the Ārāma, of the village, of the country, up to the earth surrounded by the ocean, as full of skeletons. 
Then he reduces his visualization, in order to strengthen his power of visualization, to the point where he only sees his own body as a skeleton. 
Then the visualization of the loathsome is complete; and from this time onward the ascetic is a beginner. 
The master by removing the toe, etc., until half of the skull. 
In order to strengthen this power of reduced visualization, the ascetic makes an abstraction of the bones of the foot, and considers the others; and so on, always reducing, to the point when, removing one half of the skull, he visualizes nothing more than its other half: 
Holding his thought between his two eyebrows, he is an absolute master in the act of attention. 
The loathsome can be small through the smallness of its object, without being small through the mastery of the ascetic. 
What is the nature of the loathsome? 
What is its object? 
The loathsome is nondesire; it is in ten spheres; it has the visible of Kāmadhātu for its object; it is generated by humans. 
The ten spheres in which the ascetic can be found in order to produce them are the Four Dhyānas, the four sāmantakas , dhyānāntara and Kāmadhātu. 
Its object is the visibles of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. Visible signifiescolor and shape. 
Only humans generate it; not beings of the other realms of rebirth, nor much less beings of the higher spheres. 
Also, among humans, the inhabitants of Uttarakuru do not produce it. 
As its name, the loathsome , indicates, it is a visualization of a repulsive or unclean thing: 
in other words, its object is contemporaneous to it. 
Mindfulness of breathing is prajñā, belonging to the five spheres, having wind for its object, and it is cultivated by beings in Kāmadhāṭu. 
This prajñā is called mindfulness, s7ri, the same as the applications of mindfulness , because this knowledge of inbreathing and outbreathing, nāpānaprajñā, is provoked by the force of mindfulness, It can be cultivated in five spheres, namely the first three sāmantakas, hyānāntara, and Kāmadhātu, because it is associated with indifference. 
thus mindfulness of breathing, which is the opposite of imagining, cannot be associated with happiness or with suffering. 
But accoṟrding to the masters who believe that the fundamental Dhyānas include the sensation of indifference , mindfulness of breathing can exist in eight spheres, by adding the first three Dhyānas: 
Not to outsiders. 
In fact, on the one hand, the teaching of mindfulness of breathing is absent among them; and on the other hand, they are incapable of discovering the subtle dharmas by themselves. 
It has six aspects, counting, etc. 
One fixes the mind on inbreathing and outbrea thing, without effort or contention; one lets the body and mind be as they are; and one counts from oṉe to ten only in the mind. 
counting too high, by taking one for two; c. 
If, in the course of this cultivation the mind becomes distracted, then one should count anew from the beginning until apsorption is attained. 
does the air breathed in occupy all of the body or does it go into only one part of the body? 
The ascetic follows the air breathed in into the throat, the heart, the navel, the kidneys, the thigh, and so on to the two feet; the ascetic follows the air breathed out to a distance of a hand and a cubit. 
This opinion is not admissible, for mindfulness of breathing is an attention to things as they really are. 
Fix the attention on the tip of the nose, or between the eyebrows, or in another area all the way dowa to the toes; fix the mind; see the breath held in the body like the thread of a pearl necklace; state that it is cold or hot, unfavorable or favorable. 
Observe that These breaths are not only air, but the four primary elements, and again physical matter.derived from these four; and the mind with its mental dharmas rests on them: in this way the ascetic discovers the five rkandhas through analysis. 
The ascetic modifies the mind that had the air as its object and now directs his mind to better and better dharmas up to and including the transworldly ḍharmas. 
The ascetic enters the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation. 
According to some other masters , modification is progressive elevation from the foundations of mindfulness up to Vajropamasamādhi. Purifying is the Knowledge of Extinction , the Knowledge of NonArising and the Right Views of the Arhat. 
There is a summarizing stanza: 
Inbreathing and outbreathing are like the body. The two breaths, being part of the body, belong to the same sphere as does the body. 
When the body has cavities in it, and when the mind belongs to a sphere in which there is breathing, then there is inbreathing and outbreathing. 
There is outbreathing at death and at the moment when one enters the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
It is not takeṉ up. 
It is an outflowing. 
It diminishes when the body increases; cut off, it recovers: therefore it is not an increase , and it does not arise from retribution. 
In fact, the physical matter arisen from retribution does not recover after having been cat off. 
Inbreathing and outbreathing is observed by a mind of its own sphere or by a mind in a higher sphere; but not by an airyāpathika mind, nor by a mairmāṇika mind of a lower sphere. 
We have spoken of the two teachings, the visualization of loathsome things, and mindfulness of breathing. 
Having attained absorption by these two portals, now, with a view to realizing insight , Having realized stilling, he will cultivate the foundations of mindfulness. 
How is this? 
By considering the twofold characteristics of the body, sensation, the mind, and the dharmeas. 
By considering the unique characteristics and the general characteristics of the body, sensation, the mind, and the dharmas. 
The unique characteristics peans its self nature. 
The general characteristics signifies the fact that All conditioned things are impermanent; all impure dharmas are suffering; and that all the dharmas are empty and notself. What is the unique nature of the body? The primary elements and physical matter derived from these primary elements. Dharmas means the dharmas which are neither the body, nor sensation, nor the mind. 
According to the School, foundation of mindfulness of the body is realized when, being absorbed , one sees the atoms and the succesive moments of the body. 
What is the nature of the foundations of mindfulness? 
Foundation of mindfulness is threefold: foundation of mind fulness in and of itself , foundation of mindfulness through connection, and foundation of mindfulness in the quality of being an object. 
Foundation of mindfulness in and of itself is Prajñā. 
What is prajñā? 
Proceeding from hearing, etc. 
The foundations of mindfulness are likewise threefold, proceeding from hearing, reflection, and meditation. 
The others, through connection and as object. 
The other dharmas which are not prajñā, are, when they are dharmas coexistent with prajñā, foundations of mindfulness through connection; when they are the object of prajñā and of the dḍharmas coexistent with prarñā , they are a foundation of mindfulness as object. 
How do we know that the foundation of mindfulness in and of itself is prajñā? 
one who possesses anupaśya or darśana is called an anupaśyin; and one who is an anupaśyin with respect to the body is called a kāyānupaśyin. 
sṭ What is prajñā? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: 
By reason of the preponderant role of attention, ; as a wedge contributes to the splitting of wood; it is due to the force of mindfulness that prajñā is active with respect to the object. 
Mindfulness is applied by it, thus the prujñā is a foundation of mindfulness ; in fact, as the object is seen by the prujñā, so too it is expressed, that is to say, grasped by the attention. 
And the Blessed One said, He dwells with his attention fixed having his body for its object; his attention is applied, unexhausted. 
Through the origin of food, there is the origin of the body; through the disappearance of food, there is the disappearance of the body; through the origin of contact, there is the origin of sensation. 
In this Sūtra we are not dealing with a foundation of mindfulness in and of itself, but a foundation of mindfulness in the quality of being an object: 
Each foundation of mindfulness is threefold accordingly as it is considered as oneself, as another, or as oneself and another. 
The order is that of their production. 
Why are they produced in this order? 
the body is the support of sensual attachment which has its origin in the desire for senṣation ; this desire takes place because the mind is not calmed; and the mind is not calmed because the defilements are not abandoned. 
Four, oppositions to eṟṟoṟs. 
The foundations of mindfulness are taught in this order as oppositions to the four errors, belief in purity, happiness, permanence, and self. They are therefore four, no more and no less. 
Of the four foundations of mindfulness, three have an unmixed object; the fourth is of two types: when it bears only on the dḍharmas, its object is not mixed; when it bears on two, or three, or four things at one and the same time, its object is mixed. 
Placed in the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its mixed object, placing together the body, sensation, etc., he sees them under the fourfold aspect of inpermanence, suffering, empty, and notself. 
From this there arises the Heat.1 From this cultivation of the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its object, there finally aṟises a root of good called Uṣmagata , because it is similar to heat , being the first indication or the anticipation of the Noble Path, a fire which burns the fuel which are the defilements. 
Which has the Four Truths for its object. 
Since it is prolonged for a certain period of time, Ugmagata, the Heat, has the Four Truths for its object. 
Which has sixteen aspects. 
k From Heat, the Summits. 
they receive another name by reason of their excellence. 
They are called Summits , because they are the most elevated or the head of the unfixed roots of good, that is, those from which one can fall away; or one can fall away from the Summits; or one goes beyond them by penetrating into a Patience. 
It is through dharma that these two imprint. 
It is through the foundation of mindfulness that has the dharmas for its object that Heat and the Summits imprint. 
Heat and the Summits grow by means of the four foundations of mindfulness together. 
The progressing ascetic does not manifest the previously acquired roots of good, because he does not esteem them very much. 
From that, Patience. 
In the Heat they please weakly, and in the Supnmits, mediurn,as one sees from the fact that one cannot fall away from Patience, but can from the first two stages. 
Three grow totally through the dharras. Weak, medium, strong, they grow only through the foundation of mindfulness which has the dharmnas for its object; not by the other foundations of mindfulness. 
Strong, it has the suffering of Kāmadhātu for its object. 
A similar restriction is not formulated concerning the preceding stages; thus they have the suffering, arising, etc., of the three spheres for their objects. 
Medium Patience lasts from the moment when the ascetic ceases to consider the sixteenth aspect bearing on the two higher spheres, but continues to successively eliminate the higher aspects and spheres, until the moment when, in two moments of thought, he is impressed with.only two aspects of the suffering of Kāmadhātu. 
Strong Patience exists when the ascetic considers, in a single thought, only one aspect applied to the sufferings of Kāmadhātu. 
It is of a moment. 
So too, the Supreme Dharmas. 
because they are worldly, being impure; because they are supreme dharmas; and because they are supreme among the worldly harmas. 
They are Supreme Worldly Dharmas because, in the absence of any similar cause , by their own power, they manifest the Path of Seeing the Truths. 
kitsk The four roots of good, Heat, etc., are by their nature foundations of mindfulness; they are thus prajñā. 
However All include the five sandhas. 
Considering the root of good, Heat, etc., with their attendants, they include the five sandhas. 
When the Heat begins and when it has three Truths for its object, a foundation of mindfulness that has the dharmas for its object is present; the four foundations of mindfulness of the future, aṟe possessed. 
In the period of increase, when the Heat has the three Truths for its object, any of the foundations of mindfulness may be present; the four of the future are possessed. 
When it has the Truth of Extinction for its object, the fourth foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed. 
In the Surnmits, having for their object the Four Truths at their beginning, and having for their object extinction in the period of growth, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed; all the aspects of the future are possessed. 
Having for its object the three other Truths in the period of increase, any of the foundations of mindfulness are present; four of the future are possessed; and so too all of the aspects. 
In Patience, in the beginning and in the period of increase whichever of the Truths is considered, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed; and so too all of the aspects. 
In the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessedthose which are not destined to arise; four aspects only, those of the Truth of Sufferingfor the aspects of the other Truths do not belong to the Supreme Worldly Dharmas; for the Supreme Worldly Dharmas are similar to the Path of Seeing, in which one acquires only in the future the four aspects of the Truth that one considers under one aspect. 
This is the fourfold nirvedhabhāgīya. 
The first two, being nonfixed since one can fall away from them, are weak nirvedhabhāgīyas; the Patiences are medium nirvedhabhāgīyas; and the Supreme Worldly Dharmas are strong nirvedhabhāgīyas. 
the Path of Seeing is one part of the Path; thus nirvedhabhāga. 
these four nirvedhabhāgīyas Arise from absorption. Not from hearing or reflection. 
They are actions of the completing class, and not of the projecting class , for they hate existence. 
Or rather, two are also of the lower sphere. 
Three can be produced only by human beings of the three Dvīpas. 
Once produced, they can be manifested among the gods. 
The fourth can be produced by the gods. 
Three, acquired by men and women, can be found in a male or female body. 
Women obtain the Supreme Worldly Dharmas destined to be found in female and male bodies. 
Acquired by a female, the Supreme Worldly Dharmas will be found in a female body and in a male body ; acquired by a male, it will only be found in a male body,for there is, from the fact of the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, destruction of the quality of female. 
The nonĀryan, through death. 
The Prthagjana, whether or not he has passed to another sphere, loses them by abandoning the nkāyasabhāga. 
The Āryan does not fall from out of the first two, and the Prṛthagjana does not fall from out of the last two. 
He who has produced the nirvedhabhāgīyas by cultivating the fundamental Dhyānas, shall certainly see the Truths in this very same life, because his disgust with existence is very strong. 
When the nirvedhabhāgīyas have been lost and are acquired anew, one acquires them afresh, like the Prātimokṣa discipline ; one does not acquired the nirvedhabhāgīyas previously abandoṉed. 
If the ascetic meets a master possessing knowledge resulting from resolution , he produced the nirvedhabhāgīyas beginning from the one which, having been acquired, had been lost. 
these are two types of loss, āni. 
teesk Even though he may lose it through falling, whoever obtains Heat is destined to attain Nirvāṇa. 
If there is no obstacle, Heat is quite close to the Seeing of the Truths. 
He who has attained the Summits does not cut off the roots. 
Even though he may lose them by falling, he who has obtained the Summits does not cut off the roots of good ; but he cāanṉ go to the painful realms of rebirth and commit mortal transgres sions. 
He who obtains the Patience does not go to the painful realms of rebirth. 
He who loses the Patience through simple loss, vhāni, does not go to the painful realms of rebirth, because he is removed from the actions and the defilements which lead to them. 
through weak Patience, the painful realms of rebirth enter into the condition of not erising;. 
The nirvedhabhāgīyas are of three types by reason of the distinction of the three goeras or families. 
Oṉe can attain two nrvedhabhāgīyas of the Śrāvaka family, and become a Buddha. 
Now the Bodhisattvas, with the intention of being useful to their fellow creatures, go to the painful realms of rebirth. 
We say however that a person of the Śrāvaka family, once he acquires Patience, cannot become a Buddha, because the Śrāvaka family, once penetrated and confirmed by the Patience, can no longer be modified. 
The Master and the Rhinoceros go as far as Bodhi in one sitting, by relying on the last Dhyāṇna. 
In one sitting, without rising from it, they go from the nrvedhabhāgīyas to the arising of Bodhi. 
For the Ābhidhārmikas who admit the existence of Pratyekabuddhas different from those likened to a rhinoceros, nothing prevents these other Pratyekabuddhas from changing their family. 
This is not possible. 
Of them all The most rapid obtains deliverance in three existen ces.. 
first existence, to plant the socalled moṣabhāgīya roots of good; second, to produce the nrvedhabhāgīyas; and third, to produce the Path.s khḥ The School admits that the mokṣabhāgīyas Arise from hearing and reflection. 
The three actions. 
Bodily action and vocal action are also ṉokṣabhāgīya when they are embraced by the resolution for deliverance; this resolution is a type of volition : 
Projected among humans. 
Only persons of the three Dvīpas project or plant the mokṣabhāgīyas.In fact, disgust, or intelligence , or disgust and intelligence are absent among the gods, among beings in hell, and among the inhabitants of Uttarakuru. 
Froṃ out of the Supreme Worldly Dharmas there proceeds one Patienṇce, a Patience having the dharmas for its object, which is pure. 
Exactly one Patience having Dharma Knowledge for its aspect immediately follows the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. 
What is its object? 
Bearing on the suffering of Kāmadhātu. 
Its object is the suffering of Kāmadhātu. Therefore it is called Duḥkhe Dharmajñānakṣānti, the Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering for its object. In order to indicate that it is pure, it is qualified by its outflowing result which is a Dharma Knowl edge. 
The expression dharmajñānaksāṇti therefore signifies: a ksāṇ or Patience which produces a dharmajñāna , which has for its intention and result a Dharma Knowledge. In the same way that a tree which bears flowers or fruit is called a purpavṛkṣa or a phalavṛkṣa. 
This Patience is the entry into ṉiyāma, for it is the entry into the certitude of the acquisition of absolute good or samyaktva. 
The Sūtra says that it is Niṛvā ṇa. 
Nyama or absolute determination with regard to the samyaktva is called niyāma, and also niyama. 
Once this possession arises, the ascetic is an Āryan. 
It is in a future state, that is, in its arising state, that this Patience brings about the cessation of the quality of Pṛthagjana; for it is admitted that in a future state it possesses this efficacy, which does not belong to any other dharma; in the same way that a future lamp destroys darkness, and in the same way that a future arising akṣaṇa causes arising. 
According to other masters, the Supreme Worldily Dharmas bring about the cessation of the quality of Pṛthagjana. An inadmissible opinion, since these dharmas are Prthagjana dharmas. 
This objection does not hold, for these dharmas are in contradiction to the quality of Prthagjana: this is as if someone climbed onto the shoulders of his enemy and killed him. 
According to others, the quality of Pṛthagjna ceases both by the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, which take the place of the Irresistible Path , and by the Patience which takes the place of the Path of Deliverance. 
From this, a Dharma Knowledge having the same object. 
Immediately after the Patience that has the Dharma Knowl edge of Suffering for its object there arises a Dharma Knowledge having for its object the suffering of Kāmadhātu. It is called the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering. The qualification of pure applied to the first Patience holds for all of the following Patiences. The knowledge in question is therefore pure. 
kik In this same way there arises one Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge for its object and a Dharma Knowledge relating to the suffering of Kāmadhātu. In the same way, relating to the rest of suffering, one consecutive Patience and a Knowledge. 
Immediately following the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering, there arises one Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, having a composite object, bearing on the Śuffering of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
From this Patience there arises a consecutive Knowledge which receives the name of Consecutive Knowledge of Suffering. 
Dharma Knowledge, or Knowledge of the Dharmas is socalled because it is the first knowledge which the ascetic obtains, since the origin of time, on the nature of the dharmnas, suffering, etc. 
In the same way that, relating to the Truth of Suffering, four āharmas have arisen, two Patiences and two Knowledges, In that same way, relating to the three other Truths. 
When, immediately after the Consecutive Knowledge of Suffering, there has arise a Patience of Dharma Knowledge bearing on origin in Kāmadhātu, from this Patience there arises a Dharma Knowledge of Origin; in the same way, by the immediate succession of arising, there arises a Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, bearing on the rest of origin, and a Consecutive Knowledge of Origin. 
There arises one Patience of Dharma Knowledge, bearing on the extinction of suffering in Kāmadhātu, and the Dharma Knowledge of Extinction. There then arises one Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, bearing on the rest of extinction, and the Consecutive Knowledge of Extinction. 
There then arises one Patience of Dharma Knowledge bearing on the path which is opposed to the suffering of Kāmadhātu, and the Dharma Knowledge of the Path. 
In this way, the comprehension of the Truths consists of sixteen mental states. 
In this order, the comprehension of the Truths is made up of sixteen mental states. 
Insight comprehension is the comprehen sion of the Truths by one pure prajñā. 
Resultant comprehension is the comprehen sion of the Truths by this prajñā, by the dharmas which are associated with it, and also by the dharmas not associated with it but which accompany it, for example, morality, the arising lakṣaṇa , etc. 
When the ascetic sees suffering, the thtee comprehensions take place relative to suffering; the third comprehension takes place relative to the other Truths, for origin is abandoned, extinction is experienced, and the path cultivated. 
But, he would say, one sees all the Truths under the aspect of nonself. 
If this were the case, then one would not see the Truths under the aspects of suffering, etc.; and this hypothesis contradicts the Sūtra which says, The Śrāvaka, when he judges suffering as suffering, or origin as origin, or extinction as extinction, or path as path, there is then for him discernment of the dharmas associated with these pure judgments.1 But, he would say, does this declaration refer to the Path of Meditation, to the period during which one meditates on, and cultivates the Truths already seen? 
This is inadmissible, for one cultivates the Truths in the same manner in which one has seen them. 
If the paṟtisans of a single, unique comprehension pretend that this comprehension is unique because the ascetic who sees one Truth obtains mastery with respect to the others, this is to say that, through the seeing of the Truth of Suffering, the ascetic obtains the capacity of experiencing the seeing of the other Truths without any new preparatory exercise,and this we approve. 
But if the partisans of a single comprehension affirm the unity of comprehension because suffering is perfectly known, origin is abandoned, extinction realized, and the path cultivated, then this we approve, for we have said that when one Truth is seen, there is resultant comprehension with regard to the three others. 
It is with reference to insight comprehension that the Sūtra teaches the gradual comprehension of the Truths, Oh householder, compre hension is not unique, but gradual . 
and the rest; in all there are three Sūtras accompanied by examples. 
But, one would say, the Sūtra says that one who is free from perplexity and doubt with regard to suffering is also free from perplexity and doubt with regard to the Buddha. 
We have seen that comprehension consists of sixteen mental states. It is of the same sphere as the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. 
These sixteen mental states are of the same sphere as the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. 
We have seen that these can be of six spheres. 
Why are there necessarily Patiences and Knowledges? 
The Patiences and Knowledges are, in this oṛder, the Irresistible Path and the Path of Deliverance. 
The Patiences cannot be hindered in their cutting off of the possession of the defilements; they are therefore, according to Pāṇni, iii.3.1712, the Iṟresistible Path. 
they are therefore the Path of Deliver ance. 
If the possession of disconnection takes place only with the second Patience or second Irresistible Path , then the Knowledge,which is free from doubt will not arise having the same object of the first Irresistible Path, namely the suffering of Kāmadhātu. 
But if the defilements are abandoned by means of the Patiences , is there not a contradiction with the text of the Śāstra, There are nine categories of bonds? 
No, for the Patiences are the attendants of the Knowledges; the Śāstra attributes the very same work of the Patiences to the Knowledges, in the way that one says that the king does that which is done by his men. 
From the fact that they all see the Truths, does it follow that the sixteen mental states of comprehension are the Path of Seeing? 
Because they are produced within anyone who sees that which has not been seen, fifteen moments are the Path of Seeing. 
Fifteen moments, from the Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering for its object to the Patience of Consecu tive Knowledge that has the Path for its object, constitute the Path of Seeing. 
Because the seeing of what has not been seen continues. 
In the sixteenth moment there is nothing more to see which has not been seen. This moment meditates on the Truth as it has been seen, and so forms part of the Path of Meditation. 
But, one would say, the sixteenth moment sees the fifteenth moment, the Patience that has the Consecutive Knowledge of the Path as its object, which has not been seen previously. 
because it constitutes a result, a rāmaṇyaphala ; b. 
because it embraces meditation, the possession or acquisition of the eight Knowledges and the sixteen aspects, ; c. because it embraces the abandoning of a Path, the path of a follower; and d. because it belongs to a series.. 
And its nonfalling away results from the fact that it supports or confirms the abandoning of the defilements aban doned through the Path of Seeing. 
How is it that the first seven Knowledges are of the Path of Seeing and not the eighth? 
Because the seeing of the Truths has not been finished: 
The first seven Knowledges are of the Path of Seeing because, the seeing of the Truths not. 
In the course of the fifteen moments which are the nature of the Path of Seeing, In these moments, the ascetics of weak and sharp faculties are respectively Śraddhānusārin and Dharmānusā tiṇ.194 Placed in these moments, the ascetic with weak faculties is called a Śraddhānusāriṉ; the ascetic with sharp faculties is called a Dharmāṇusārin. 
Here the word faculties signifies the faculties of faith, absorption, etc. 
śrad dhayā anusāraḥ śraddhānusāraḥ, pursuit by reason of faith; one in whom there is this pursuit, or in whom the habit is to pursue by reason of faith, is called a Śraddhānusārin, because, first, he has pursued the Truth under the impulse of another, through confidence in another. 
dharmair anusāraḥ dharmānusāraḥ, puṟsuit by means of the dharmas. It is by himself, by means of the dharmas, that is, by means of the twelvefold Scripture, Sūtra, etc. , that this ascetic has first pursued the Truth. 
These two ascetics, If they have not abandoned the defilements to be abandoned through Meditation, they are candidates for the first result. 
The first result, that is, the first of the results, the state of Srotaāpanṇa which is in fact the first resultant state in the order of acquisition. 
If the Śraddhānusārin and the Dharmānusārin have not previously abandoned, by the worldly path , any category of the defilements to be abandoned through Meditation, and as a consequence are found to be bound by all the bonds , they are candidates for the state of Srotaāpanna from the time in which they entered the Path of Seeing. 
Up to the abandoning of the five categories. 
If they have, through the worldly path, abandoned the first, second, third, fourth or fifth category of the defilements of Kāmadhātu to he abandoned through Meditation, once having entered the Path of Seeing, they are the same candidates for the first state. 
Candidates for the second, until the abandoning of the ninth category. 
But if they have previously abandoned the sixth, seventh, or eighth category, they are candidates for the second state, that is, for the state of Sakrdagamin. 
Candidates for the third, through detachment either with respect to Kāmadhātu, or with respect to higher spheres. 
In the case where they are detached from Kāmadhātu through the abandoning of the ninth category of defilements of Kāmadhātu to be abandoned through Meditation, or they are detached with respect to the higher spheres up to and including Ākiñcaṇyāyatana, they are candidates for the third state, that is, for the state of Anāgāmin. 
In the sixteenth moment, the ascetic becomes an abider in the state for which he was a candidate. 
In the sixteenth moment, these two ascetics no longer bear the name of Śraddhāṇusārin or Dharmānusārin; they no longer bear the name of candidates. 
They are abiders in a result: 
At this moment, the ascetics with weak and sharp faculties become respectively Śraddhādhimukta or Drṣṭi prāpta. 
The ascetic with weak faculties, who was a Śraddhānusārin, now takes the name of Śraddhādhimukta. 
he is therefore called a Śraddhāadhi mukta. 
At the moment of the acquisition of a reṣult, the ascetic does not acquire the path of a higher result; consequently the abider in a result does not exert himself with a view to a higher progress, and he is not a candidate for a result. 
Upon the acquisiton of a result, one does not acquire a path higher than this state , for example, upon the acquisition of Srotaāpanna, one does not obtain the path of Sakrdāgāmin: 
As a consequence, the abider in a result, as long as he does not exert himself with a view to a higher progress for the acquisition of a new state, that is, as long as he does not cultivate the preparatory exercises which have for their result the abandon ing of the defilements not yet abandoned and which is the cause of the acquisition of a new state, this resident is not a candidate for this new state. 
Nevertheless, the ascetic who, detached from the Third Dhyāṇna , enters into niyāmma or the Path of Seeing in a sphere lower than this Dhyāna , certainly realizes a path higher than the result. 
If it were otherwise, then if he were reborn in a higher sphere , he would not be in possession of the faculty of happiness.. 
We must now study the ascetic who proceeds gradually. 
ksksk As the defilements of Kāmadhātu are divided into nine categories, Each sphere has nine categories of vices. Each sphere, up to and including Naivasajñānāsarṅjfīāyatana. As each sphere has nine categories of vices, So too there are nine categories of qualities. 
Each sphere has nine categories of qualities which are as many as the paths, the Irṟesistible Paths and the Paths of Deliverance, opposed to these said vices. 
How is this? 
weakweak, weakmedium, weakstrong, mediumweak, mediummedium, mediumstrong, strongweak, sttrongmedium, and strongstrong. 
For it is impossible for the strong strong path to be produced from the very beginning; and it is impossible that there would be a strongstrong defilement when there is a strongstroṅṇg path. 
In the same way, when one washes a piece of cloth, the greater stains are washed out first and only lastly the subtle stains; so too a great darkneṣs is vanquished by a small light, whereas a great light is required to get rid of a small amount of darkness. 
An Āryan path, although momentary and weak, is capable of uprooting the defilements which have accrued through a succes sion of their causes in eternal transmigration his path cuts off the possessions of the defilements which are similar to rootsfor the white ḍharmas are powerful, whereas the black dharmas are weak. 
In this same way, the vices of wind, the bile, etc., accumulated over a long period of time, are gotten rid of by one grain of powder of the :rvṛt root ; so too a great darkness is broken up by a small, momentary light. 
ek:x There are therefore nine categories of defilements abandoned through meditation. 
The abider in a result who has not destroyed that which one should abandon through meditation is a Sap takrtṭparamaḥ. 
The abider in a result who has not even abandoned one category of the defilements abandoned through meditation is a Srotaāpanṇa; as he can be reborn seven times but no more, he is an at the most seven times. 
As it is not an absolute rule that he will be reborn seven times, one says, at the most. 
The expression of the Sūtra, saptakrtvaḥ paramaḥ, signifies there is rebirth for him seven times at the most. 
the river or stream , the stream of Nirvāṇa, the path, for one goes by means of a stream. 
How can one enter it? 
Then the eighth saint would be a Srotaāpanna. 
Independently of the present existence, the Srotaāpanna again takes up birth among humans, seven existences properly socalled, and seven intermediate existences ; and in this same way, he again takes up biṟth among the gods. That is, he takes up birth up to twentyeight existences. 
Yet, as he has everywhere the series of seven existences, the ascetic is said to be reborn at the most seven times; the same way that a Bhikṣu is called wise in seven things when he knows the groups of seven; so too a tree is termed having seven leaves because its buds produce some seven leaves. 
Objection: But the Sūtra says, It is absolutely impossible for a saint possession views to produce an eighth existence. 
He does not produce an eighth existence in the same realm of rebirth, how does it happen that an Ūrdhvasrotas of the Bhavāgraparama class is reborn eight times in the same realm of its rebirth? 
And what proves that the saint transmigrates seven times, among the gods on the one hand, and among humans on the other, and not seven times in all among both? 
The text has, in fact, Having transmigrated seven times among gods and among humans. 
The Kāśyapīyas read, Having transmigrated seven times among gods, and seven times among humans. There is therefore no reason to attach any importance to the preceding question. 
He who becomes a Srotaāpanṇna as a human will return to be among humans in order to obtain Nirvāṇa; he who becomes a Srotaāpanna as a god will return to be among the gods in order to obtain Nirvāṇa. 
Why is a Srotaāpanna not reborn an eighth time? 
Because, in this limit of time, in the course of seven existences, his series is necessarily matured. Such is the nature of the Path: so too, such is the nature of the venom of the sevenfooted serpent that a person bitten dies after having walked only seven paces; such is the nature of this illaess that the fourday fever returns during each of the four days. 
Because, evenṉ though he realizes the Noble Path , he does not obtain Nirvāṇa in the iaterval by reason of the force of the actions which should be rewarded in the course of the seven existences. 
If a Buddha has not arisen in the period when one should obtain Nirvāṇa, it is as a householder that he will obtain the quality of Arhat, but he does not then remain as a householder: 
accoṟding to other masters, with the marks of a nonBuddhist Bhikṣu. 
A person who has accumulated an action which should necessarily mature in a painful realm of ṛrebirth cannot even produce Patience , much less the pure Path. 
There is a stanza, The ignorant, if they have committed only a small transgression, go below; the wise, if they have committed a great transgression, avoid painful rebirth. A small mass of iron, in a mass, sinks; the same iron, in a greater mass but fashioned into a bowl, floats. 
What does the end of suffering mean? 
Suffering beyond which there is no more suffering. 
Or rather the end of suffering is Nirvāṇa. 
How can one make Nirvāṇa? 
By clearing away the obstacles to Nirvāṇa;. In the same way that one says, Make some space! Make the house fall down!. 
Delivered from three or four categories, destined for two or three rebirths, he is a Kulakula.2 The Srotaāpanna becomes a Kularhkula, one who goes from family to family, from the point of view of the abandoning of the defilements, through the abandoning of three or four categories of defilements of Kāmadhātu; from the point of view of the ṉdriyas or moral faculties, through the acquisition of pure faculties opposed to these defilements; or from the point of view of existences, because there remain only two or three more rebirths for him. 
Why does the Srotaāpaṇṇa who abandons the fifth category not become a Kulakula? 
Because, when the fifth category is abandoned, the sixth is also certainly abandoned, and the saint therefore becomes a Sakṛdā gāmiṉn. 
k The same abider Who has conquered up to five categories, is a candidate for the second. 
Having destroyed the sixth category, he is a Sakrdāgāmin. 
The Sūtra says that one becomes a Sakrdāgāmin by reason of the weakness of lust, anger, and delusion, because only the three weak categories of these defilmeents rernain. 
This abider in the state of Sakrdāgāmin, Having destroyed seven or eight categories, and destined for one rebirth, is an Ekavīcika; he is also a candidate for the third state. 
This Sakrdāgāmin becomes an Ekavicika for three reasons, because he abandons seven or eight categories of defilements; because he acquires the faculties opposed to these defilements; and because he has to be reborn only one more time. 
Because the acquisition of this state involves passage to another sphere. 
Now this holds here for the defilements as for actions, for they refer to going beyond the sphere where they should be manifested as the results of retributionwith respect to actionsand of outflowingwith respect to the defilements. 
Having abandoned seven or eight categories of defilements, he is a candidate for the third state. 
He whopreviously freed, through the worldly path, from three or four categories of defilements, or from seven or eight categories of defilements , obtains a result , is not a Kulakula and is not an Ekavīcika as long as he does not realize a path superior to the state acquired: 
He is an Aṇnāgāmin by the destruction of the ninth category. 
This abider in a result, through the abandoning of the ninth category of the defilements of Kāmadhātuthe weakweak defilements,becomes an Anāgāmiṅ, because he is no longer ṛreborn in Kāmadhātu. 
He is a saint who obtains Nirvāṇa in the interval, by arising, with effort, without effort, and by going higher. 
n c One who obtains Nirvāṇa in the interval signifies one who attains Nirvāṇa in the intermediate existence. 
one who attains Nirvāṇa by being born , and one , and one who does not make any effort. 
The first one, who obtains Nirvāṇa in the intermediate existence, is one who obtains Nirvāṇa in an intermediate existence, by attaining it in Rūpadhātu. 
The second one obtains Nirvāṇa as soon as he is reborn, soon, through sopadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa with remnant; and because he is energetic and because the path is spontaneous, he realizes it by himself. 
According to other masters, he obtains nrṇpadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa without remnant, exactly like the first Anāgāmiṇ, that is, having obtained the quality of Arhat, he obtains Nirvāṇa without achieving his portion of life. 
The third one, the Anāgāmin who obtains Nirvāṇa with effort, obtains Nirvāṇa after having been born, without relaxing his exercises, for he is energetic; with effort, for the Path is not spontaneous. 
The fourth one, who obtains Nirvāṇa without effort, obtains Nirvāṇa without effort, for he is not energetic, and the Path is not spontaneous. 
In the Sūtra , the Anāgāmiṉ who obtains Nirvāṇa without effort is listed before the Anāgāmin who obtains it with effort. 
In fact, for the first, the path is realized without abhisaskāra, being obtained without efforṟt; it is thusspontaneous. 
For the Anāgāmin who obtains Nirvāṇa through birth, the path is even more spontaneous, even stronger, and the latent defilements are even weaker. 
He does not obtain Nirvāṇa where he is reborn upon leaving Kāmadhātu, but he goes higher. 
also, dying from among the Brahmakāyikas, he is reborn among the Akaniṣṭhas. 
A HalfJumper is the saint who, passing beyond any one place, enters the Akaniṣṭhas after having been reborn among the Śuddhāvāsas. 
An Āryan is never reborn among the Mahābrahmas, because this heaven is a place of heresy: 
One who Dies Everywhere transmigrates through all of the other heavens, with the exception of the Mahābrahmas, before he enters into Akaniṣṭha. 
An Anāgāmin never takes up two existences in the same place of rebirth, because he goes in successive order. 
Such is the Ūrdhvasrotas who has combined his Dhyāna, namely an Akaniṣṭhaga. 
The Ūrdhvasrotas who has not combined his Dhyāna goes up to Naivasajñānāsajñāyatanṉa, or Bhavāgra. 
Tasting the other concentrations , he is reboṟrn in all other places, but he does not enter the Śuddhāvāsas; traversing the Ārūpyas he arrives at Bhavāgra and there he obtains Nirvāṇa. 
There are five types of Anāgāmins who go to Rūpadhātu and attain Nirvāṇa there: 
Another, who goes to Ārūpyadhātu, is of four types. 
There is another Anāgāmin, the Ārūpyopaga, one who goes to Ārūpyadhātu and who attains Nirvāṇa there. 
Being detached from Rūpadhātu, and dying here, he is reborn among beings in Ārūpyadhātu. 
Therefore there are six Anāgāmins, the five named above and the Ārūpyaga, not taking into account the different types of Ārūpyaga. 
Another obtains Nirvāṇa right here, the saint who obtains Nirvāṇa in this existence. 
It is said that there are nine saints going to Rūpadhātu, by making a threefold distinction among the three. 
Three Aṇāgāmins, each divided into three categories, make nine Anāgāmins, because they go to Rūpadhātu. 
How are the three categories distinguished? 
According to the comparisons of the Sūtra, there are three Antarāparinirvāyins who obtain Nirvāṇa, the first, quickly, the second, not quickly, and the third, after a long time; 2. 
with respect to the Upapadyapari nirvāyin, one should distinguish the Upapadyaparinirvāyin properly so called, the Sābhisaskāraparinirvāyin, and the Anabhisaskāraparinirvāyin: 
all three, obtaining Nirvāṇa after having been reborn, are Upapadyaparinirvāyins; 3. 
Or rathert one can say that these three Anāgāmins are each divided iato three categories accordingly as Nirvāṇa is acquired by them quickly, not quickly, or after a long time. 
Their differences are due to the difference of actions, faculties, and defilements. 
The distinction of these three Anāgāmins and of these nine Anāgāmins, is due to the differences of their actions, their moral faculties, and their defilements. 
There are therefore nine categories of Anāgāmin by reason of the differences of their actions, their defilements and their faculties. 
How does the Sūtra teach that there are seven realms of rebirth for good persons , by not distinguishing the categories of Jumper, HalfJumper, and One who Dies Every where, teaches seven realms of rebirth for good persons, namely three Antarāparinirvāyins, three Upapadyaparinirvāyins,in all six realms of rebirth,and the realm of Ūrdhvasrotas, the seventh. 
Now three characteristics do not exist among the other Śaikṣas: By reason of the cultivation of good and the noncultivation of evil, and of the nonreturning from whence they have come. 
Only these seven realms of rebirth are the realms of rebirth for good persoṉs. 
It is true that the Sūtra says, What is a good person ? 
the committing of the five types of transgressions, ; 2. they have abandoṇed, in a general manner, their bad defilements, that is, the defilements of Kāmadhātu. 
But here the Stra of the Saptasatpuruṣagati refers to the saints who are absolutely good persons. 
kṟtsk It happens that an Āryan, who became an Āryan in the first birth through the acquisition of the state of Srotaāpanna o:r Sakrdāgāmin, obtains in his following existence the state of Anāgāmin. 
The Āṛyan who obtains the state of Anāgāmin after having been reborn in Kāmadhātu, does not go to another sphere. 
This Āryan, once he has obtained the state of Anāgāmin, obtains Nirvana in this same existence ,. 
But the Āryan who obtains the state of Anāgāmin after having been reborn in Rūpadhātu, goes sometimes to Ārūpyadhātu as a Bhavāgraparana Ūrdhvasrota. 
But Śakra expresses himself thus: If at the end I should fall, may I be reborn among the wellknown gods under the name of Akaniṣṭhas! This contradicts your thesis. 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: Śakra expresses himself in this way because he does not know the Dharma. 
And, if the Blessed One does not correct him, it is with the intention of encouraging him. 
This Āryan and one who is born in a higher sphere, aṟe incapable of modifying their faculties, and are incapable of falling away.2 The Āryan who has become an Anāgāmin by being reborn in Kāmadhātu and one who is born in a higher sphere are not even capable of modifying their faculties; how could they fall away have acquired an advanced state of maturity; and because the saint has acquired a personality favorable to the Path. 
Why is not a Śaikṣa not detached from Kāmadhātu, that is a Srotaāpanna and a Sakrdāgāmin, an Antarāparinirvāyin? 
Since he has not mastered the Path, this saint cannot manifest it; and because these latent defilements are not extremely weak. 
Now a saint, in his intermediate existence, is not capable of doing this. 
sk We have seen that combining his Dhyānas, he is an Akanis ṭha. 
What Dhyāna is first combined? 
First, combination of the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
the Arhat or the Anāgāmin enters the Fourth Dhyāna, pure and prolonged, that is, constituting a series of thoughts.2 He leaves it, and retuṟrns to the same Fourth Dhyāna, but impure and prolongued. 
He continues in this way, diminishing gradually the number of thoughts of each pure, impure, and pure Dhyāna, until, having entered a pure Dhyāna of two thoughts, he leaves it in order to enter an impure Dhyāna of two thoughts, which will be folliowed by a pure Dhyāna of two thoughts. 
This constitutes the preparatory stage for the combination. 
then, through the combining of an impuṟe thought and two pure thoughts, the combination of the Dhyāna is achieved. 
The first two moments are similar to the Irresistibie Path , the third to the Path of Deliverance. 
Having thus combined the Fourth Dhyāna, by the force of this combined Dhyāna, the saint also combines the other Dhyānas. 
The combination takes place first in Kāmadhātu; later, in the case of falling away, the saint combines these in Rūpadhātu. 
With a view to arising, to bliss and also through fear of the defilements. 
It is for three reasons that the saint combines his Dhyānas: 
the Anāgāmin of sharp faculties, with a view to a rebirth among the Śuddhāvāsas and with a view to happiness in this life; the Anāgāmin of weak faculties, also through fear of the defilements, so that he may avoid falling away by holding the absorption of disgust at a distance ; the Arhat of sharp faculties, with a view to happiness here below; the Arhat of weak faculties, also through fear of the defilements, so that he may avoid falling away. 
tṅs Why are there five types of birth among the Śuddhāvāsas? 
The cultivation of the combination of the Fourth Dhyāna, described above, As it is fivefold, there are five births or types of existence among the Śuddhāvāsas. 
The five births are, in this order, the result of these five cuḻtivations. 
According to others, the five births take place by reason of the predominance of the different faculties: Avṛhas, by the predominance of faith. 
The Anāgāmiṉ who has acquired extinction is considered aKāyasākṣin.6 One who is in possession of the absorption of extinction is called one who has acquired extinction. 
As the Anāgāmin, whichever one he may be, has acquired extinctionas he has, in his body, seen the absence of thought and immediately experienced a dbarma similar to Nirvāṇa, namely the Absorption of Extinctionhe is called a Kāyasākṣin, a bodily witness. 
How does he immediately experience by the body alone? 
Because, in the absence of thought, this immediate perception takes place dependent on the body. 
According to the Sūtra, there are eighteen Śaikṣas.! Why is not the Kāyasākṣin mentioned as one of the types of Śaiūkṣa? 
Now the Absorption of Extinction is not a skṣa, not being a path of abandoning, nor a result of sṟ5a, not being disconnection. 
For each place , there are six gotras. 
this makes six groups of nines, or fiftyfour. 
If one multiplies this number by the number of places, that is, by sixteen, then we have eight hundred and sixtyfour. 
With a view to obtaining a uniform distribution of nine saints through Dhyāna, the saint who is detached from the ninth category of a lower Dhyāna is considered to be bound by all the bonds of a higher Dhyāna. 
Up to the moment when he destroys the eighth part of Bhavāgra, he is a candidate for the quality of Aṝhat. 
We are speaking of the Anāgāmin. 
From the moment when he is detached from the fitst category of the defilements of the First Dhyāṇna, up to the moment when he abandons the eighth category of the defilements of Bhavāgra , the Anāgāmin is a candidate for the state of Arhat. 
Also in the ninth path of abandoning. 
In the path of abandoning which brings about the abandoning of the ninth category of defilements of Bhavāgra, he is again a candidate for the state of Aṛhat. 
This path is similar to a diamond. 
This ninth path, which breaks all of the latent defilements is called the absorption similar to a diamond. 
but it has the power to break all of them, being the most powerful of all the paths of abandoning. 
There are many types of Vajropamasamādhi. 
Eight Vajropamasamādhis are associated with each of the four aspects of the Dharma Knowledge of extinction, and with each of the four aspects of the Dharma Knowledge of the Path. Four Vajropamasamādhis associated with each of the four aspects of the Consecutive Knowledge of Extinction bear on the First Dhyāna; and so on until: four Vajropamasamādhis associated with each of the four aspects of the Consecutive Knowledge of Extinction bear on Bhavāgra. 
Four Vajropamasamādhis are associated with each of the four aspects of the Consecutive Knowledge of the Path, because the Consecutive Knowledge of the Path has a universal sphere. 
We have therefore, in the sphere of 2ṉāgamya, fiftytwo Vajropamasamādhis by reason of the distinction of the aspects and the objects of the Knowledges and the Consecutive Knowledges. 
The same calculation holds with respect to the Vajropama samādhis produced in the other spheres up to and including the Fourth Dhyāṇṉa. 
the Consecutive Knowledge having the extinction of a lower sphere for its object is also absent there ; 3. 
the Consecutive Knowledge exists there having for its object the Path which is opposed to a lower sphere, by reason of the quality of cause which the paths have. 
in this theory, one must add twentyeight to the calculation of the Vajropama samādhis which are produced in anāgamya, etc. 
For the Ārūpyas, we have forty, thirtytwo and twentyfour. 
We have seen that the ninth category of Bhavāgra is aban doned by Vajropamasamādhi. 
44d With the acquisiton of the destruction of this categoty, there is the knowledge of destruction. 
At the moment when the saint acquires the destruction of the ninth category, there arises the knowledge of destruction. 
lInmediately after Vajropamasamādhi, the last path of abandoning , there arises the last Path of Deliverance. 
Then the saint is an Aśaikṣa, an Arhat, When this knowledge has arisen, the candidate for the quality of Arhat has acquired the state of Aśaikṣa, the state of Arhat: 
Why are they Śaikṣas? 
These three sñṣās, namely adhisīam ikṣa, adhicistam fikṣā, and adhiprajñām śikṣā, are by their nature morality, absorption , and speculative knowledge. 
No, because he does not exactly discern the Truths; and because he is susceptible to completely losing the fiṣās that he has acquired. 
But how can one say that the Āryan, when he finds himself in a normal state and not in absorption, has it for his nature to apply himself? 
Why is not Nirvāṇa, the unconditioned, a faṣa Because both the Aśaikṣa and the Prthagjana are endowed with it. 
from one who is in the progress of realizing the state of Śrotaāpanna, and Srotaāpanna, up to one who is in the progress of realizing the state of Arhat, and the Arhat. 
Eight in considering their names, but in fact, only five, namely the first candidate, that is to say, the person who is in the Path of the Seeing of the Truths, and the four abiders. 
We have said that the Path of Meditation is of two types, worldly or impure, transworldly or pure. 
Detachment from Bhavāgra is through the trans worldly path. 
In fact. 
there is no worldly path higher than Bhavāgra ; the worldly path of a certain sphere cannot be opposed to this same sphere, because the defilements of this sphere attach themselves to this path. 
Since it is a given that one defilement attached itself to a path, this defilement cannot be expelled by this same path; and since it is a given also that a path is opposed to a defilement, it is certain that this defilement does not attach itself to this path. 
There is detachment from the other spheres in two ways. 
For the Āryan who detaches himself through the worldly path, his acquisitions of the disconnections are of two types. 
According to other masters, he becomes detached through the transworldly path, in the same way. 
Some other masters say that in the case also where the Āryan becomes detached through the transworldly path, his acquisition of disconṉnection is twofold. 
Why is this? 
Let us admit an instance, when the Āryan becomes detached through the transworldly or Āryan Path, he then does not have worldly possession of disconnection. 
In this hypothesis, there may be an Āryan who, through the Āryan Path, becomes detached from Ākiñcanyāyatana; who then, in a Dhyāna , transforms, that is, sharpens his faculties. 
This Āryanby the fact that he abandons the paths previously acquired, , by the fact that he only possesses the path of the state of Anāgāmin, in relation to his sharp facultieswill no longer be in possession of disconnection from the defilements of Ārūpyadhātu; and, having lost this disconnection, he will be filled with these defilements. 
But, if he is not filled with these defilements, he is like a saint half delivered from Bhavāgra, like a person who is teborn above. 
So too, the saint who is delivered from half of the categories of defilements of Bhavāgra, certainly does not possess a worldly acquisition of disconnection from these categories, since only the transworldly or Āryan Path destroys the defilements of Bhavāgra. 
Let us suppose that this saint, sharpening his faculties in a Dhyāna, abandons the transworldly acquisition of disconnection from these defilements of Bhavāgra: 
One becomes detached from all the spheres by means of pure aṉāgamya. 
When the ascetic becomes detached from a lower sphere in a sāmauntaka , should one admit that all of the Paths of Deliverance arise from the sāmantaka, as is the case for the Iṟṟesistible Pathṣ? 
Why is this? 
At the detachment from the Three Dhātus, the last Path of Deliverance arises either from the Dhyāṇa, or from a sāmanmtaka. 
There are nine spheres of arising: Kāmadhātu, the Four Dhyānas and the Four Ārūpyas. 
When one triumphs over the Three Dhātus,that is, when one becomes detached from Kāmadhātu, from the First Dhyāṇna, or from the Second Dhyāṇna,it is with a ninth Path of Deliverance which arises either from a sāmantaka or from the Dhyāṇna itself. 
With respect to the higher spheres, the last Path of Deliver ance always arises from the fundamental absoṟrption , never from the preliminary stage or thteshold of this absorption. 
We have seen that the ascetic can detach himself from all the spheres through the pure paths practiced in enāgamya. 
Through the eight pure paths, he triumphs over his sphere, and over a higher sphere. 
kṣkṣx It is established that the transworldly paths, the Irresistible Path as well as the Path of Deliverance, proceed from aspects of the Truths , that is to say, from seeing the dharmas as impermanent, suffering, etc. 
The worldly paths, paths of deliverance and paths of abandoning, have respectively the aspects of calm, etc.; coarse, etc. 
The worldly paths of deliverance have the aspects of calm, etc., that is, seeing their objects as calm, etc. 
The paths of deliverance can see the higher spheres as calm, excellent, and as definitive liberation. 
as coarse, because it is not calm, entailing a great effort; as bad, because it is not excellent, because it is odious as well as presenting the greatest incapacity to the body and the mind; and as a thick wall, because, by means of this lower sphere, it is impossible to escape from this sphere, as if it were a wall The aspects of calm, excellent, definitive liberation, are the opposite. 
Having terminated this accessory question, let us return to our subject. 
What arises immediately after the Knowledge of Destruction? 
When he is Immovable, after his Knowledge of Destruction, there is the consciousness of nonarising. 
If the Arhat is of the class of the Immovable Ones , immediately after his Knowledge of Destruction there arises the consciousness of the future nonarising of the vices or āsravas. 
If the Arhat is not of this class, then after his Knowledge of Destruction there arises either the same Knowledge of Destruc tion, or the Right Views of the Aśaikṣas; but not the Knowledge of NonArising;: 
These Views belong to all the Arhats. 
sṭk We have spoken of the four states or results. Of what are they the results? 
They are the results of śrāmaṇya or the religious life. 
What is frāmaṇya? 
Śrāmaṇya is the inmmaculate path. 
Śrāmaṇya is the pure path. 
By this path, by śrāmaṇya, one becomes a Śramaṇa, that is to say a person who calms or who makes cease the defilements. 
Therefore it is said in the Sūtra , He is called a Śramaṇa because he calms all of the types of dhatrmas of transgression, bad, favorable to transmigration, producing rebirth. old age and death. 
The Prthagjana is not a true Śramaṇa because he does not calm the defilements in an absolute manner. 
His result is both conditioned and unconditioned. 
The results of frāmaṇya are conditioned and unconditioned dharmas. 
The Sūtra says that these results are four in number. 
On the other hand, There are eightynine. 
The paths of deliverance with their destructions. 
We have eight Irresistible Paths, followed by eight Paths of Deliverance, for the abandoning of the defilement to be abandoned through seeing. 
We have eightyone Irresistible Paths for the abandoning of the defilements abandoned through meditation, namely nine paths through which one abandons the nine categories of defilements of each of the nine spheres , and also as maṇny for the Paths of Deliverance. 
The eightynine Paths of Deliverance are the conditioned results of frāmaṇya, being outflowing results and virile results of śrāmaṇya. 
The abandoning or pratisakhyanirodha of the eightynine categories of defilements is the unconditioned resuit of frāmaṇya, being the virile result of frāmaṇya.5 We have therefore eightynine results of frāmaṇya. 
But, if this theory is correct, is there not reason to complete the teaching of the Buddha?1 No. 
The results are indeed eightynine in number; But four results are established for five reasons which are encountered therein. 
The Blessed One defined as results the stages of the path of abandoning in which some five causes are encountered. 
What are these five causes? 
52c In a result, there is the abandoning of a previous path, the acquisition of another path, the addition of destructions, the acquisition of a group of eight knowledges, and the acquisition of sixteen aspects. 
there is the abandoning of the path of the candidate, and the acquisition of the path of the result; the acquisition of a single possession of abandoning in its entirety ; the acquisition at one and the same time of eight Knowledges, the fourfold Dharma Knowledge, and the fourfold Consecutive Knowledge ; and the acquisition of the sixteen aspects, impermanence, etc. 
These characteristics exist in each of the four results. 
But if only the pure path receives the name of frāmaṃya, how. can the two states, those of Śakrdāgāmin and Anāgāmin, when they are obtained by a worldly path, be the results of frāmaṇya? obtained by a worldly path is a result, because it is combined, and because it is supported by pure possession. 
The state of Sakrdāgāmin and the state of Anāgāmin, even if they were acquired by a worldly path, are not only abandonings resulting from a worldly Path of Meditation: 
in fact, they also include an abandoning result of the Path of Seeing; this second abandoning is not separable from the first abandoning; for there is inherent in the results of Sakrdāgāmin and Anāgāmin the single possession of abandoning in its entirety, on the one hand, of defilements abandoned by Seeing, and on the other hand, of defilements abandoned by the worldly Path of Meditation. 
This is why the Sūtra says, What is the result of Sakrdāgāmin? 
The abandoning of the three bonds which are abandoned through Seeingand the reduction of lust, anger, and delusion. 
What is the result of Anāgāmin? 
The abandoning of the five bonds here below. Furthermore, the abandoning which results from the worldly path is supported, confirmed by the pure possession of disconnection , as it results from the fact that, by virtue of this pure possession, the Sakṛdāgāmin and the Anāgāmin cannot die in a state of falling away: 
Śrāmaṇya or the religious life Is brāhmaṇya; it is brahmacakra. 
It is brahmacakra because it expells the defilements; it is brahmacakra, the Wheel of Brahmā, Because it is set into motion by Brahmā. 
In fact, the Sūtra says, This Blessed One is Brahmā; it says that the Blessed One is calm and pacified. 
The Wheel of the Dharma is the Path of Seeing. 
It is termed wheel, cakra, because it moves. 
The Path of Seeing, being of the nature of a wheel , is called the Wheel of the Dharma. 
Because it goes quickly, etc.; because it has spokes, etc. 
because it subdues the unsubdued and rules over those subdued, triumphing over the defilements through the Irresistible Path by cutting off the possession of these defilements; ruḻing over the vanquished defilements by the Path of Deliverance by obtaining possession of disconnection from these defilements; because it rises and descends, either because it is alternatively the Irresistible Path and the Path of Deliverance, or because it successively takes as its object Kāmadhātu and the higher spheres. 
The Noble Eightfold Path is a wheel, because its parts are in the nature of spokes, etc.: 
Right Views, Right Thought, Right Effort, and Right Mindfulness are similar to spokes; Right Speech, Right Actions, and Right Livelihood are similar to the axle; and Right Concentration is similar to the rim. 
On what rests the doctrine that the Wheel of the Dharma is the Path of Seeing the Truths? 
On the Āgama which says that, at the moment when this Path arose within the Āryan Kauṇḍinya, declared that the Wheel of the Dharma had been set into motion. 
ksṭk How is this Path of threefold revolution and of twelve aspects? 
this is the Noble Truth of Suffering; 2. It should be perfectly known;; and 3. 
Since the revolutions and the aspects are the same for each Tṛruth, the Wheel of the Dharma is of three revolutions and twelve aspects; not of twelve revolutions and fortyeight aspects. 
So too the teaching of two things is the teaching of a great aumber of things which go by twos ; in the same way a person skillful in seven things, is skillful in a great number of seven things. 
kṣkṣk But if this is the case, then the Path of Seeing would not have three revolutions and twelve aspects. Therefore how would the Wheel of the Dharma be the Path of Seeing? 
Consequently one should understand that the Wheel of the Dharma is this sermon itself , the Sermon of Benares, which sets into motion the Wheel of the Dharma, which includes three revolutions and twelve aspects: 
three revolutioṉs, because it causes the Truths to be turned some three times; and twelve aspects, because it considers each Truth under a threefold aspect. 
Through the setting into motion of this sermon, one should understand that it goes, that it is cast into the intelligence of another; it goes towards the intelligence of another, in that it comes to be known by another. 
Or rather, the entirety of the Noble Path, the Path of Seeing, the Path of Meditation, and the Path of the Aśaikṣa, is the Wheel of the Dharma, because it penetrates into the intelligence of those to be disciplined. 
When the Path of Seeing is produced in the intelligence of another, in the intelligence of Kauṇḍinya, the Wheel of the Dharma begins to be set into motion, begins to be cast into the intelligence of another. 
How can one obtain the results within each sphere? 
Three are acquired in Kāmadhātu. 
Three can ounly be acquired in Kāmadhātu, not elsewhere. 
The last state of srāmaṇya, or the quality of Arhat, can be acquired in the Three Dhātus. 
We can understand why the first two states, which suppose that the ascetic is not detached from Kāmadhātu, cannot be acquired in the higher spheres; but why does the same hold for the third? 
Higher, the Path of the Seeing of the Truths is absent. 
Above Kāmadhātu, the Path of Seeing is absent. 
In its absence, a person detached from Kāmadhātu and reborn in a higher heaven cannot obtain the state of Anāgāmin. 
Why is the Path of Seeing absent there? 
With respect to Ārūpyadhātu, because hearing is absent there: and because the Path of Seeing bears on Kāmadhātu. 
With respect to Rūpadhātu, Disgust is absent there, because the Sūtṛa says, Here one undertakes, and there one achieves. 
all saffering sensation is absent in them; therefore disgust is impossible there, and one cannot enter the Noble Path except through disgust. 
Furthermore the Sūtra says, Five persons, the Antarāparinir vāyin being the first and the Ūrdhvasrotas being the fifth, undertake here and achieve there. 
Undertake, vidhā, means to establish the Path, because it is the means to Nirvāṇa. 
If the Arhat is Immovable, then after his Knowledge of Destruction there arises the Knowledge of NonArising; is this to say that there are differences among the Arhats? 
The Sūtra says that there are six types of Arhats: 
S Five arise from the Śraddhādhimuktas. 
Five, with the exception of the Immovable Ones have been Śraddhādhimuktas. 
Their deliverance is occasional. It should be known that the deliverance of mind of these five types of Arhats is occasional and dear, for it should be constantly guarded. Consequently these Ārhats are called ramayavimukta. Depending on the occasion , they are delivered : 
We have thus samayavi mukta, delivered by reason of the occasion, like ghṛtaghata, a pot full of butter, a pot for butter. 
possession of a number of material goods, the absence of illness, a ceṟtain place. 
Thus he is not occasionally delivered. 
It follows that an Immovable One is not occasionally delivered. 
Do these six Arhats belong, from the beginning of their teligious careers, to the family to which, as Arhats, they belong? 
A Sthitākampya is an Arhat who when strong causes of falling away are absent, even without preserving himself, is not capable of being budged, that is to say, who dwells in his result; but, not falling away, in the absence of any effort, he is not susceptible of progressing. 
A Prativedhanādharman is an Arhat who is capable of penetrating without effort the Immovable Oṇnes. 
The Parihāṇadharman does not necessarily fall away; and so on: 
Having admitted this principle , one then concludes that the six types of Arhats can exist within the Three Dhātus. 
Four fall from their families, and five fall from their ṣtates, Four, the Cetanādharman, etc., can fall away from their families; the Parihāṇadharman cannot fall away from his family. 
Five, the Parihāṇadharman, etc., can also fall away from their states. 
But one can fall away from the family which one has obtained by the perfecting of his faculties. 
The ascetic does not fall away from the first state which he has obtained, but he can fall away from the others. 
Therefore he does not fall away from the state of Srotaāpanṇna. 
three as above, plus: or by falling away and becoming a Parihāṇadharmanṉ; and so on: five, six, seven cases for the Anurakṣaṇādharmaṉ, the Sthitākampya and the Prativedhanād harman . 
Otherwise, in the hypothesis that he would obtain a better family, he would progress, and he would not fall away. 
Why does one not fall away from the first state? 
They have the Truths for their object, ; therefore they do not have a thing that does not exist for their object, but they are mistaken with respect to this object. 
But the defilements which are abandoned through Meditation, namely desire, hatred, pride, and ignorance, have for their nature attachment, antipathy, satisfaction, and confusion with respect to physical matter, etc.: 
But, for the defilements which, are abandoned through Seeing, there is no determined support which is characterized as self or as a thing pertaining to self; consequently they do not have a support. 
Among the Āryans who do not reflect, the defilements which are abandoned by Meditation can arise by reason of the weakness of mindfulness; these defile ments do not arise among the Āryans who reflect. 
In the same way that one thinks a rope is a snake if one does not observe it carefully ; but the error of personalism cannot arise among Āryans who do not reflect, because this error is a product of reflection. 
Consequently, the saint caṉnot fall away from the abandoning of the defilements which have been abandoned through Seeing. 
The Sautrāntikas say that one can no longer fall away from the quality of Arhat. 
2.It is said, I declare that the Śaikṣa should cultivate vigilance. 
The Blessed One did not proscribe vigilance to the Arhat. 
3., Without doubt, the Blessed One said, Ānanda, I declare that, even for the Arhat, property and honors are a cause of obstacle. 
Yet the Sūtra specifies that, if the Arhat can fall away, it is only from the blisses: With respect to immovable deliverance of mind , which is actualized physically , I declare that one absolutely cannot fall away from it. 
One can fall away from the socalled occasional deliverance of mind. 
Since the absorption which consists of the fundamental Dhyānas is realized under ceṟtain circumstancesfor example in a place free from noise, etc.,it is termed occasional deliverance; it is also called cherished deliver ance, because, each time that it is lost, one desires it anew with a view to enjoying the blisses. 
According to another master, , this absorption is called cherished deliverance because, being impure, it is delectable. 
But the deliverance which constitutes the qnality of Arhat is not occasional since it is possessed in a permanent manner; it is no longer cherished, because one does not have to search it out anew. 
Consequently immovable deliverance of the mind belongs to all the Arhats. 
As for the blisses, a ceṟtain Arhat can fall away from them, when, being distracted by property and honors, he loses his mastery in absorption: 
A certain Arhat does not fall away from them: 
One should explain the Cetanādharmaṇ, etc., in the same way. 
The second does not fall away from the qualities in which he is found: 
Such is the difference between these three saints. 
By reason of his indifference with respect to his body and life, he obtained the quality of Arhat at the very moment of his death, and Nirvāṇa. Therefore he did not fall away from the quality of Arhat. 
The Daśottara teaches, There is a āharma which one should produce, namely occasional, cherished deliverance. 
There is a dḍharma that one should actualize, namely the immovable deliver ance of the mind. 
If occasional and cherished deliverance were the quality of an Arhat, and so if the quality of Arhat were of two types, why does the Daśottara, alone among the Sūtras, speak twice, under two distinct names, of the quality of Arhat? 
Moreover, no part of the Scripture employs the expression to produce the quality of Arhat; it always says that one should actualize this quality. 
Would you say that the quality of Arhat, to the extent that it is associated with weak faculties, is to be produced? 
Therefore occasional deliverance is not a quality of Arhat. 
But, if this is the case, why does the Scripture speak of the occasioṇally delivered Arhat? 
Such is an Arhat who, because of the weakness of his faculties depends on certain circumstances in order to actuaḷize the absorption. 
According to the Abhidharma, it is by reason of three causes that sensual desire arises: the latent defilement of sensual desire has not been completely known, has not been abandoned; 2. 
But what dharma can arise without its causes being complete? 
Let us pass on to atrgumeats from reason. 
In the Arhat there are arisen dharmas which are opposed to the defilements and which are of such a nature that the defile ments are reduced to the condition of absolutely not being able to arise, anṉutpattidharman. 
Would you say that such dharmar are not arisen in the Arhat, that the defilements exist within him in the state of a seed, that which constitutes the seed of the defilements not having been uprooted? 
In this hypothesis, how can one say of the Arhat that he is kṣīṇāsrava, a person whose vices are cut off ? 
This Sūtra says, A wise Āryan Śrāvaka who follows this rule of life, who passes his time in this way ,it happens sometimes, through weakness of mindfulness, that he produced bad thoughts. 
We would answer: 
kfṅ The Vaibhāsṣīkas maintain that one can also fall away from the quality of Arhat. 
Are the Arhats the only ones who are divided into six families ? Is this also the case for others? 
The Śaikṣas and the nonĀryans are also of six families. 
the families of the Arhats have their antecedents in these families. 
In the Path of Śeeing, there is no perfecting. 
The Sūtra quoted above says, I declare that one caṉ fall away from any one of the four blisses of absorption which one has acquired; but, with respect to the immovable deliverance of mind which is physically actualized, I declere that one absoḻutely caṅnot fall away from it. 
How can it be that an Immovable Arhat can fall away from the blisses? 
There are three types of falling away: from that which is acquired, from that which has not yet been acquired, and from fruition. 
Whoever falls away from the possession of a spiritual quality, falls away from what has been acquired. 
Whoever does not acquire a spiritual quality that is to be acquired, falls away from that which has not yet been acquired. 
Whoever does not actualize a spiritual quality that he possesses, falls away from his fruition. 
kisk Among these falling aways, The last, with respect to the Master; the second also, with respect to an Immovable One; all three, with respect to others. 
3, The Arhats who are not immovable also fall away from what they have acquired. 
Does the saint who falls away from the state of Arhat take up a new existence? 
He does not die having fallen away from his reṣult. 
In fact the Sūtra says, Oh Bhikṣus, it happens that the wise Āryan Śrāvaka experiences weakness of mindfulness, that his mindful ness becomes slow. 
If it were otherwise, if a person, having become an Aṟhat, falls away from the state of Arhat, and could continue to transmigrate, the religious life would not inspire confidence. 
Even though fallen, he does not do that which is in contradic tion with his state. 
How many Irresistible Paths and Paths of Deliverance are included in the transformation or perfecting of the faculties? 
The Prativedhanādharman who perfects his faculties and penetrates the family of the Inmmovable Ones, should produce nine Irresistible Paths, nine Paths of Deliverance, exactly like the Śaikṣa, in order to obtain the quality of Arhat. 
Why is this? 
tṅtk These Irresistible Paths and Paths of Deliverance are Pure paths For the faculties of Āryans cannot be transformed by impure paths. 
There is transformation among humans. 
Only humans can transform their faculties; there is no transformation elsewhere, for elsewhere falling away is impossi ble. 
The Śaikṣa, in six. 
Why is this? 
When the Śaikṣa perfects his faculties, he loses a state , a state that he had acquired by the path of weak faculties; he loses his vifeṣa, that is, the progress that he had madepreparatory paths, Irresistible Path, Path of Deliverance, and Path of Excellence,in the detachment of the Dhyāṇnas, a progress realized with his weak faculties. 
He obtains only a state belonging to the family of sharp faculties, a state forming part of the detachment of Kāmadhātu, not the state of Anāgāmin which is of Ārūpyadhātu. 
kḥk The Arhats, by reason of their difference of faculties, are nine in number. 
Two Buddhas and seven Śrāvakas, the Arhats have nine classes of faculties. 
The two Buddhas,the Pratyekabuddha and the Buddha,are varieties of Immovable Ones. 
These make nine persons whose faculties are respectively weakweak, etc. 
Seven pudgalas, by reason of their cultivation, their faculties, absorption, deliverance, of two. 
In the beginning, in the state of Pṛthagjana, it is by reason of faith that the first, under the impulse of another applied himself to things, that is, he devoted himself to reflection and meditation. 
Thus, from the point of view of their enumeration, there are seven. 
These seven, from the point of view of substantial entities, are six. 
In the Path of Seeing, there exists two padgalas or persons, the Śraddhānusarin and the Dharmānusariṇ; who, in the Path of Meditation, become a Śraddhādhimukta and a Drṛṣṭiprāpta, and, in the Path of the Arhat , a Samayavimukta and an Asamayavimukta. 
The calculation relative to other saints is established according to the same elements, with the differences of title. 
Who is the saint that is called an Ubhayatobhāgavimukta, ? 
He who possesses extinction is doubly delivered; the other is delivered through prajñā. 
One who has entered the Absorption of Extinction , that is to say, one who is endowed with extinction, is called doubly delivered, because, by the power of prajñā and absorṟption, he is delivered from the hindrance of the defilements and from the hindrance that opposes the arising of the eight liberations. 
The other is one who is delivered through prajñā, because, by the power of prajña, he is delivered from the hindrance of the defilements. 
The Blessed One said, One who has abandoned the five defilements here below and who is not subject to falling away is a complete Śaikṣa. 
It is from the point of view of absorption, of faculties, and of result that a Śaikṣa is said to be complete. 
The Anāgāmin of the Drṣṭiprāpta class who is not a Kāyasāk ṣin is complete from the point of view of his result and his faculties. 
The Aśaikṣa is complete from two points of view. 
The Ubhayatobhāgavimukta who is a Samayavimukta is complete from the point of view of his absorption. 
In short, how many types of paths are there? 
In short, the path is of four types, Prepararory, Irresistible, Deliverance, and Excellence. 
Prayogamārga, the Path of Application or of Preparatory Cultivation, is the path by which and following upon which there arises the Irresistible Path. 
Ānantaryamārga, the Irresistible Path , is the path by which an obstacle is abandoned. 
Vimuktimārga, the Path of Deliverance, is the first path which arises free from the obstacle abandoned by means of the Irresisti ble Path. 
Viśeṣamārga, the Path of Excellence, is the path differing from the preceding paths.l What is the meaning of the word mārga, path?1 The path is the path to Nirvāṇa because it goes from here; or rather, because it is through it that Nirvāṇa is searched out.l But how are the Path of Deliverance and the Path of Excellence paths? 
In fact, it is on the Preparatory Path and the Iṛresistible Path that the acquisition of Nirvāṇa depends. 
Or rather because, by these two paths, one enters into mirupadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa without rermnant, The path is also called pratipad, route, because, by it, one arrives at Nirvāṇa.1 There are four routes: 
The path , cultivated in the Dhyānas, that is to say, while one is in Dhyāṇna, is the easy route. 
it results from this that, in the Dhyānas, the route flows on effortlessly. 
The difficult routes belong to other spheres. 
kskṣk These two routes, When intelligence is weak, a route for slow intelli gence; in the contrary case, a route for a quick intelligence. 
Whether the route is easy or difficult, when the faculties are weak, the route is for slow intelligences ; when the faculties are sharp, the route is for quick intelligences. 
The route is termed for slow intelligences when intelligence prajñā, and dhandha the equivalent of manda. 
So too, the route is for quick intelligences when zbhijñā is rapid in it, that is to say, when prajñā is sharp in it. 
There are thirtyseven adjutants of Bodhi, namely the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right exertions, the four supernormal powers , the five faculties, the five powers, the seven parts of Bodhi , and the Noble Eightfold Path. 
The Knowledge of Destruction with the Knowledge of NonArising is Bodhi. 
The Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonAr ising are Bodhi which, by reason of the differences of the saints who obtain it, is threefold: Śrāvaka Bodhi, Pratyekabuddha Bodhi, and Unsurpassed, Perfect Bodhi. 
In fact, by these two Knowledges, one completely abandons ignorance; by the first, one knows in all truth that the task is accomplished; and by the second, that there is nothing more to be accomplished in the task. 
Because they are favorable to it, thirtyseven dharmas are its adjutants. 
Because they are favorable to Bodhi, thirtyseven dharmas are adjutants of Bodhi.1 Thirtyseven from the point of view of name, but ten substantial entities. 
What are these ten entities? 
Faith, energy, mindfulness, prujñā, absorption, joy, indifference, resoḻution, morality, and aptitude. 
684 Foundation of mindfulness is prajñā; eṉnergy receives the name of right exertion; the supernormal powers are samādhis. 
The foundations of mindfulness, the right exertions , and the supernormal powers are, by their nature, ptajñā, eṉergy, and samādhi. 
Among these five items, prajñā is made up of: 
Mindfulness is made up of: one of the parts of Bodhi, mindfulness; b. one of the parts of the Noble Eightfold Path, Right Mindfulness. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, there are eleven items; Right Speech and Right Actions together form one item, and Right Livelihood is another item. Therefore morality counts for two items added to the nine preceding items. skīk We have said that the foundations of mindfulness, the right exertions, and the supernormal powers are by their nature prajñā, enṉetgy, and samādhi. 
A definition according to their essentials; they are also all the qualities that arise from cultivation. 
kṣkṣk Why is energy termed rignt exertion? 
Because the body, speech, and mind are, through energy, corṟectly placed into action. 
they should therefore say that the adjutents of Bodhi are thirteen in number by adding desire and mind to their list of eleven. 
The ascetic accomplishes different works of miraculous power; being one, he becomes many, and so oṉ. 
Why are faith, energy, etc., termed faculties and powers? 
How is the order of the faculties explained? 
In order to obtain the result in which one believes , one makes an effort. 
When one forces onself, there is a setting up of mindfulness. 
When mindfulness is set up, one fixes the mind in order to avoid distraction. 
When the mind is fixed, there arises a conscious ness which conforms to the object. 
In which stages are the different adjutants of Bodhi placed? 
They form seven groups which are distributed, in order, between the beginning stage, the nirvedhabhāgīyas, Meditation, and Seeing. 
In the Heats , there are the right exertions , for, in this stage one incteases his energy, an increase which is the principle of progress. 
In the Summits , there are the supernormal powers, for, due to them, one obtains the condition in which the roots of good cannot be lost. 
The faculties are in the Patiences, for faith, energy, etc., become predominant in this stage from the fact that, in the Patiences, one is no longer capable of falling away. 
The powers are in the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, for, in this stage, faith, energy, etc., can no longer be crushed either by the defilementsfor these are not activatednor by any other worldly dharmas. 
The parts of Bodhi are in the Path of Meditation, for this Path is close to Bodhi, that is to say, to the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising in which the Path of Seeing is separated by the Path of Meditation. 
for one goes quickly.4 The Sūtra lists the parts of Bodhi first, and the perts of the Noble Eightfold Path second, with an end to having an order corresponding to the number of parts, at first seven, and then eight. 
Investigation into the dharmas is at one and the same time Bodhi and a part of Bodhi, and Right Views is both the Path and a part of the Noble Eightfold Path. Such is the doctrine of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
ksk Other masters justify the order of the adjutants of Bodhi without disturbing the regular succession, by placing, as it suits them, the Path of Seeing first, and then the Path of Meditation. 
The four foundations of mindfulness bind the mind, for it is said in the Sūtra, .. with a view to expelling the idea of desires which have their support in thitst. 
Energy increases through the power of the founda tions of mindfulness, through the control and the exertion of the mind through the accomplishment of the fourfold tasks: abandoning the bad dharmas which have been produced, the nonproduction of bad dharmas which have not been produced. 
these are the four right exertions. Then, by reason of the purification of absorption , the supernormal powers arise and are cultivated. Supported by absorption, there arise faith, energy, etc., which are predominant among the transworldly dbarmas since they lead to them: they are the faculties, indriyas. 
In fact, it is said, The Noble Eightfold Path goes thus to fulloess through meditation, the four foundations of mindfulness go to their fullness through meditation. 
It is further said, Oh Bhikṣus, to say words conforming to the truth is an expression that says the Four Truths; Oh Bhikṣus, to say to advance by the Path is an expression that speaks of the Noble Eightfold Path. 
Therefore, since the Noble Eightfold Patn exists both in the Path of Seeing and in the Path of Meditation, the order which places the parts of Bodhi first, and the parts of the Noble Eightfold Path second, is justified. 
Among the adjutants of Bodhi, how many are impure, and how maṉy are pure? 
The parts of Bodhi and the parts of the Path are pure. 
They are only pure, for they are placed in the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation. 
Without doubt, there are worldly right views, etc., but they are not called the parts of the Noble Eightfold Path. 
The others are of two types. 
The other adjutants of Bodhi are either impure oṛ 
All exist in the Fiṟst Dhyāna. 
In all, thirtyseven. 
In anāgamyga, with the exception of joy, Why is joy absent from anāgamya? 
Because the thresholds of absorption are realized only through force, and again, because they include the fear of falling into a lower sphere. 
In the Second, with the exception of thoughts. 
In the Second Dhyāna, thoughts are absent, but the other thirtysix adjutants of Bodhi remain. 
In two, with the exception of the one and the other. 
In the Third and the Fourth Dhyānas, there is absent both joy and thought, but the other thirtyfive adjutants of Bodhi remain. 
Also, in dhyānṉāntara. 
There one finds thirtyfive adjutants of Bodhi with the exception of these same two. 
In three Ārūpyas, with the exception of the preced ing and the parts of morality. 
In the three Ārūpyas there is also absent Rignt Speech, Right actions, and Right Livelihood, but thirtytwo adjutants of Bodhi remain. 
In Kāmadhātu and in Bhavāgra, the parts of Bodhi and the parts of the Path are absent. 
Therefore some twentytwo adjutants of Bodhi remain. 
At what moment does the person who cultivates the adjutants of Bodhi obtain the avetyaprasādas, that is, the four types of faith which accompany intelligence? 
when one comprehends the Path, also the aveyaprasāda relating to the Buddha and his Saṅgha. 
At the comprehension of the Truth of the Path, dear to the Āryams, there is an acquisition of the avetyaprasāda 1elating to the Buddha and to his ŚrāvakaSaṅgha. 
The prasāda relating to the Buddha is a prasāda 1elating to the Aśaikṣa dharmas which make up a Buddha; so too one should understand by Śaṅgha the Śaikṣa and Aśaikṣa dharmas which make up the Saṅgha. 
7c The Dharma is the three Truths and the Path of the Pratyekabuddha and the Bodhisattva. 
The precepts dear to the Āryans, are, by their nature, morality. 
Are these two things pure or impure? 
The avetyaprasādas are exclusively Immaculate. 
The avetyaprasādas are aṟṟanged in the order in which, upon leaving the contemplation of the Truths, they are actualized. 
How does one actualize them upon leaving this contem platioṉ? 
it is when the mind is thus believing that one acquires the precepts dear to the Āryans. 
According to the Sūtra, a Śaikṣa has eight parts , namely the eight parts of the Noblie Eightfold Path termed pertaining to the Śaikṣa: 
Why does not the Sūtra attribute both perfect deliverance and the knowledge of this perfect deliverance to the Śaikṣa? 
Because he is bound, deliverance is not said to be a part of a Śaikṣa. 
A Śaikṣa is bound by the bonds of the defilements. 
How could one consider him delivered? 
The person who is pertially bound is not called released. 
Deliveraṅnce is absent from him, and he cannot possess the knowledge of the acquisition of deliverance. 
therefore it is of the Aśaikṣa alone that one can say that perfect deliverance and the knowledge of this perfect deliverance are his parts. 
What is deliverance? 
Deliverance is twofold. It is conditioned and unconditioned. 
The abandoning of the defilements is uncon ditioned deliverance. 
The intention of the Aśaikṣa is coṇditioned deliverance. 
This last is a part. 
It is conditioned deliverance which is called a part pertaining to an Aśaikṣa; for the other parts, Right Views, etc., are conditioned. 
It is two deliverances. 
wThis same conditioned deliverance is described, in the Sūtra , as being double, mental deliverance and deliverance through prajñā. it therefore constitutes what is called the skandha of deliverance, the vśmuktiskandha. 
What is the essential factor of the purification of deliveraṅce? 
The mind of a Bhikṣu is detached, delivered from craving; the mind of this Bhikṣu is detached, delivered from hatred and ignorance. 
In this way, either with a view to the fullness of the sandha of deliverance which is not complete, or with a view to maintaining the shandha of deliverance which is complete, all desire, all energy. 
It results from this Sūtra that intention does not constitute deliverance: this is the purity of the mind resulting from the abandoning of the defilements, craving, etc. 
Perfect deliverance has been explained. 
What is the perfect or Right Knowledge which is distinct from Right Views ? 
Bodhi, as described above, is knowledge. 
Bodhi, as we have described above, is the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising , and these constitutes Right Knowledge, the tenth part of the Aśaikṣa. 
fr Which mindpast, present, or futureis delivered? 
The Śāstra says, The future Aśaikṣa mind is delivered from its obstacle. 
What is this obstacle? 
The possession of the defilements , which in fact creates an obstacle to the arising of an Aśaikṣa mind. 
At the moment of Vajropamasamādhi , this possession is abandoned, and an Aśaikṣa mind arises and is delivered. 
When this possession has been abandoned, the Aśaikṣa mind has arisen and has been delivered. 
But what would you say of the Aśaikṣa mind which has not aṟisen at the moment of Vajropamasamādhi, or of the worldly mind which is produced within an Aśaikṣa? 
These two minds are also delivered; but it is of the future Aśaikṣa mind in the process of arising that the Śāstra says is delivered. 
From what is the worldly mind of an Aśaikṣa delivered? 
But is not this same worldly mind produced within a Śaikṣa, and have you not said that it is delivered? 
It is while perishing that the Path causes the abandoning of the obstacle. 
The Śāstra and the present work defined unconditioned deliverance. 
This deliverance is the three dhātus. 
The destruction of craving is detachment. 
The abandoning of ctraving is virāgadhāsu, the sphere of the absence of craving. 
The destruction of the others is abandoning. 
The abandoning of the defilements other than craving is prahāṇadhāu, the sphere of abandoning. 
The destruction of the object is called nirodhadhātu, the sphere of extinction.4 The abandoning of the object, impure physical matter, etc., with the exception of the abandoning of the defilements, is the realm of extinction. 
There are four alternatives. 
Disgust arises by means of the Patiences and the Knowledges of Suffering and Origin. 
It is only by means of the Patiences and the Knowledges of the Truths of Suffering and Origin that one obtains disgust, and not by means of the other Patiences and Knowledges. 
If the ascetic abandons his defilements through the Patience and Knowledges of Extinction and the Path, he only acquires detachment; these Patiences and these Knowledges have only the causes of joy for their sphere. 
If the ascetic abandons the defilements through the Patiences and the Knowledges of Suffering and Origin, he acqnires detachment and disgust. 
If the ascetic does not abandon the defilements through the Patiences and the Knowledges of Extinction and the Path, he acquires neither detachment nor disgust. 
We have spoken of the ṣāntis or Patiences and of the jñāmas or Knowledges , of samyagāṛṟṣṭi or Right Views and of remyagjñāna or Right Knowledge. 
Are the Patiences actually Knowledges, and isnt Right Knowledge identical to Right Views? 
The pure Patiences are not a type of Knowledge. 
The eight types of pure Patience which form part of the Path of Seeing are not, by their nature, knowledge; for, at the moment of patience, the defilement of doubt, which each Patience abandons, is not already abandoned. 
In opposition to the pure Patiences which are Seeing and aṟe not Knowledge, Ib. 
The knowledge of destruction and the knowledge of NonArising when they constitute Bodhiare not Seeing, because they do not incude examination, and because the intention of inquiry is not in them. 
Besides the Patiences and the two Knowledges named above, pure prajñā is at one and the same time both seeing and knowledge, for it incdudes examination, and is threfore seeing; it is free from doubt, and is therefore knowledge. 
This refers to the eight abhisamaya knowledges . 
All other prajñā is knowledge. 
Six are also seeing. 
Six impure prajñās are at one and the same time knowledge and seeing, namely the mental prajñā associated with the five defilements which are views by nature and, sixth, good prajñā, which is right worldly views. 
ksk How many knowledges are there? 
Knowledge is pure or impure. 
All the Knowledges are subsumed into two types of knowledge, impure or worldly knowledge, and pure or supermundane knowledge. 
Of these two knowledges, The first is called conventional. 
Impure Knowledge is called knowledge conforming to worldly conventioṉs. 
Because from usage it bears on things which exist conventionally a jug, clothing, male, female, etc. 
Pure knowledge is of two types, a knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge. 
These two knowledges with the preceeding make three knowledges: worldly, convrentional knowledge, a knowledge of dharmas, and inferential knowledge. 
Among these, Conventional knowledge bears on all. 
All the conditioned and unconditioned dharmas are the object of conventional knowledge. 
The knowledge of dharmas has for its object the Suffering, etc., of Kāmadhātu. 
The knowledge of dharmas has Suffering, the Arising of Suffering, the Extinction of Suffering, and the Path leading to the Extinction of Suffering of Kāmadhātu for its object. 
Inferential knowledge bears on Śuffering, etc., of the higher spheres. 
When one takes into consideration the distinction of the Truths, these two knowledges, make up four knowl edges. 
These two knowledges, fourfold, are termed the knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonAri sing. 
The knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge, which are as we have just seen fourfold by reason of their objects, are, among the Arhats, when they are not of the nature of Seeing, called the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NoṉnArising. 
4d At the moment when they arise, they are inferential knowledges of SŚuffering and Origin. 
The Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonAr ising, at the moment when they first arise are, by their nature, inferential knowledge of Suffering and of its Origin in the higher spheres, because they have for their object the skandhas of Bhavāgra under the aspects of Suffering and Origin. 
Does Vajropamasamādhi have the same object as these two knowledges at the moment of their arising? 
The knowledge of the mind of another follows from four. 
The knowledge of the mind of another follows four knowl edges, a knowledge of the dharmas, inferential knowledge, a knowledge of the Path, and conventional knowledge. 
The knowledge of the mind of another of a lower sphere does not know a mind in a higher sphere. 
The knowledge of the mind of another of a saint with weak faculties, namely a Śraddhādhimukta or a Samayavimukta , does not know the mind of a saint of strong faculties, namely a Dṛṣṭiprāpta or a Asamayavimukta. 
When the mind of another is either past or future, the knowledge of a mind of another does not know it, for this knowledge has a present mind for its object. Does the mind of another avoid being in the sphere of the knowledge of the mind of another in other cases as well? 
The knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowl edges do not know one another. 
The knowledge of the mind of another, when it is by its nature a knowledge of dharmas, is not capable of knowing the mind of another which is by nature inferential knowledge; when it is inferential by nature, it is not capable of knowing the mind of another which is by nature a series of dharmas. 
Because these two knowledges have for their object the dḍharmas which are opposed to Kāmadhātu and to the higher spheres respectfully. 
There is no knowledge of the mind of another in the Path of Seeing. That is to say, an ascetic, while he cultivates the Path of Seeing, is not endowed with the knowledge of the mind of another, because the duration of the Path of Seeing is much reduced, and because the Seeing of the Truths is rapid. 
But the mind of another which is found in the Path of Seeing can be the object of the knowledge of the mind of another. 
The Śrāvaka knows two moment of Seeing; the Pratyekabuddha, three; the Buddha, without preparation, all. 
When a Śrāvaka cultivates the knowledge of the mind of another in the desire to see the mind of an ascetic in the Path of Seeing, he obtains some knowing of the first tvo moments, the Patience of the Knowledge of the dharmas of Suffering end the knowledge of dharmas but ṉot the following moments because the knowledge of the inferential part of the Path of Seeing supposes a different preparatory exercise. 
The whole interval between the twelfth and the sixteenth moment therefore is not in the sphere of the knowledge of the mind of another of the Śrāvaka. 
In the same circumstances, the Pratyekabuddha knows three moments, namely the first two and the eighth; because the required preparatory exercise, after the consciousness of the first two moments, for the knowledge of the inferential part, is, among the Pratyekabuddhas, weak. 
According to other masters, he knows the first two moments and the fifteenth. 
The Buddha, through simple desire, and without preparatory exercise, knows the mind of another in all the moments of the Path of Seeing. 
The knowledge of destruction is, with respect to the Truths, the certitude that they are known, abandoned, etc.; the knowledge of nonarising is the certitude that they are no longer to be known, to be abandoned, etc. 
When one knows within himself that Suffering is completely known by me, its Origin is abandoned by me, its Extinction has been actualized by me, the Path has been cultivated by me, then the knowledge which results from this , the seeing, the knowing, the intuition, the intelligence, the discernment, the clarity, the insight, is what is called the Knowledge of Destruction. 
What is the Knowledge of NonArising? 
When one knows within himself that Suffering is completely known by me and is no longer to be known... the Path is no longer to be cultivated, then this knowledge.. 
is what is called the Knowledge of NonArising. 
But how can one, through a pure knowledge, have such a knowledge? 
It is by reason of this characteristic of being directly perceived that it says in the Śāstra, Knowledge is seeing. 
tsk There are ten knowledges: a knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, worldly, conventional knowledge, the knowledge of the mind of another, the knowledge of Suffering, the knowledge of Origin, the knowledge of Extinction, the knowledge of the Path, the Knowledge of Destruction, and the Knowledge of NonAri sing. 
A knowledge of dharmas is made up of one full knowledge and one part of seven other knowledges, namely the Kāmadhātu part of the knowledge of suffering, of origin, of extinction, and of the Path, the knowledge of the mind of another, the Knowledge of Destruction, and the Knowledge of NonArising. 
The knowledge of suffering is made up of one knowledge and one part of four other knowledgesthat part of the knowl edge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising which have the Truth of Suffering for their objects. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is made up of one knowledge and one part of four knowledges: the knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, a knowledge of the Path, and conventional knowledge. The Knowledge of Destruction is made up of one knowledge and one part of six knowledges: the knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, the knowledge of suffering, of origin, of extinction, and of the Path. 
How are the knowledges, which are twofold distributed into ten knowledges? 
The knowledges are ten in number; the distinction is established by reason of their nature, their opposition, their aspect, their aspect and their object, their preparatory exercises, the achievement of their task, and the extension of their cause. 
By reason of its nature, there is conventional knowledge, because it is not absolute knowledge. 
these two knowledges have the same object , but differ in their aspects. 
By reason of their aspect and their object , there is a knowledge of Extinction and a knowledge of the Path which differ in their aspects as well as in their objects. 
By teason of their preparatory exercises, there is the knowledge of the mind of another. 
Without doubt this knowledge extends also to the mental states of another, but the ptreparatoṟy exercise bears on the mind ; also, even though it may know the caittas, it is termed paracitajñāna by reason of its preparatory exercise. 
this knowledge is the first knowledge to arise in a series in which that which should have been done has been done. 
By reason of the extension of its causes, there is the Knowledge of NonArising, for it has for its causes all the pure knowledges, up to and including the Knowledge of Destruction. 
We have said that the knowledge of the dharmas is opposed to all of Kāmadhātu. 
Furthermore The knowledge of dharmas, in the Pathway of Meditation, when it bears on Extinction and the Path, is opposed to the three spheres. 
A knowledge of dharmas with respect to Extinction and the Path, realized in the course of the Path of Meditation is opposed to the three spheresthat is to say, these two knowledges oppose the defilements of the higher spheres which are abandoned through Meditation. 
Inferential knowledge is not opposed to Kāmadhātu. 
What are the aspects of the ten knowledges? 
A knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge have sixteen aspects. 
The sixteen aspects which will be explained later. 
Conventional knowledge is the same and otherwise. 
Conventional knowledge has the sixteen aspects; it also takes up others, for it grasps unique characteristics, common characteris tics, etc. 
Four, because of the aspect of their Truth. 
A knowledge of Suffering, Origin, Extinction, and the Path, bearing on the aspects of their Truths, each have four aspects. 
So too, when it is pure, the knowledge of the mind of another. 
The knowledge of the mind of another, in its impure part , bears on the aspects of its Truth; it therefore has four aspects. This part of the knowledge of the mind of apother is, in fact, made up of the knowledge of the Path. 
When it is impure, it has for its aspects the unique characteristics of its object. 
When the knowledge of the mind of another is impure, it grasps the unique characteristics of its object , namely the mind and the mental states of another. 
When it bears on a mind, it does not bear on a mental state ; when it bears on a certain mental state , it does not bear on any other one. 
If this is the case, why did the Blessed One say, He knows in truth the mind which is sarāga as being sarāga, since the knowledge of the mind of another does not know minds and mental states at one and the same time, in the same way that one does not grasp the cloth and its stain at one and the same time? 
The mind associated with craving , that is to say, which is presently in the prey of craving, is serāga for two reasoṇs; it is mixed with craving, and it is united to craving. 
ĀAny other impure mind is solely sarāga to the extent that it is united to craving. 
Certain masters think that the Sūtra, by the expression sarāgacitta solely designates a mind mixed with craving, that is to say, a mind associated with ctaving. 
As for the vgaiarāga mind, a mind without craving, this is, according to these masters, the mind opposed to craving. 
In fact, they say, if the mind not associated with craving were called vigatarāga, the mind associated with the other defilements would be also termed vigararāga, for they are not associated with craving. 
In this hypothesis a nondefiled, indeterminate mind is not serāga, since it is not associated with craving; it is not vigatarāga, since it is not opposed to craving. 
As a consequence we must admit that what the other masters say, that the mind is serāga through the fact of being united to craving, without it ṉecessarily being mixed with craving. 
In this same way we must explain the other expressions of ṭhe Sūtra up to possessing delusion and not possessing delusion. 
A good mind is called concentrated because it is not tarned away from its object. 
A defiled mind is distracted, because it is associated with distraction. 
The Westerners, or Masters of Gandhāra, say: A mind associated with laziness is concentrated; a distracted mind is any other defiled mind. 
Further, this system contradicts the Mñālaśāstra , which says, He knows in truth the concentrated mind, endowed with the four knowledges, a knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, worldly conventional knowledge, and a knowledge of the Path. 
a defiled mind is of small force, for the roots of good, cut off, are reborn ; a good mind is of great force, for the Patience of the Knowledge of the dharmas concerned with Suffering definitively cuts off ten latent defilements. 
This is why a defiled mind is called small, and a good mind, great. 
The defiled mind is stara, because it is associated with frivolity ; the good mind is anṉuara, because it is opposed to frivolity. 
Calm and not calm minds are explained in the same way. 
A defiled mind is nonabsorbed, because it is associated with distraction; a good mind is absorbed, because it is opposed to distraction. 
A defiled mind is uncultivated, because the two cultivations are absent. 
A good mind is cultivated, for the contrary reason. 
A defiled mind is undelivered, not being delivered in and of itself, nor delivered with regard to the series in which it arises. 
A good mind can be delivered in and of itself and from the point of view of the series in which it arises. 
Such is the explanation of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
This explanation, does not conform to the Sūtra and it does not take into account the meaning of the terms. 
How does it not conform to the Sūtra? 
The Sūtra says, What is a mind internally concentrated? 
A mind which is accompanied by torpor and laziness, or a mind internally accompanied by calm but not insight. 
What is a mind externally distracted? 
But, we have said that if a mind associated with laziness is concentrated, a defiled mind, when it is associated with laziness, will be at one and the same time concentrated and distracted. 
How does this explanation lack the proper meaning of the different terms? 
Because it gives the characteristics of different mindsdis tracted, sunkendown, small, not calm, nonabsorbed, uncultivated, and undelivered on the one hand, and concentrated, well in hand, etc., on the other handwithout noting their differences. 
It is false that we do not indicate the special sense of the different terms. The quality of defiled of distracted minds, etc., is the same; but we explain the particular defects of these different defiled minds. 
In the same way we explain the particular qualities of the different good minds, in which their good qualities are not differentiated. 
We answer that the meaning of the different terms is not correctly established because you fail to eliminate the objection of contradiction with the Sūtra. 
Aṇnd if, , the Sūtra designates, by the sunkendown mind, a small mind, it would not speak separately of a sunkendown mind and a small mind. 
Now it distinguishes them, for it says, When the mind is sunken down, or fears becoming sunken down, this is not a proper time to cultivate the prasrabdhi, samādhi, and upekṣa parts of Bodhi, When the mind is small or fears becoming small, this is not a fitting moment to cultivate the dharmavicaya, vīrya, and prīi paṟts of Bodhi. 
The mind in which indolence dominates and in which frivolity is reduced is called sunken down. 
The mind in which frivolity dominates and in which indolence is reduced is called small. 
1We do not pretend to challenge a text of intentional meaning; but such is not the intention of the Sūtra rs The Knowledges 1105 In the thesis presented above that all minds united with craving possess craving , what is the meaning of the expression rāgasaynkta, united with craving? 
If a mind is both united with craving and possesses craving through the fact of being the object of the active craving, then the impure mind of an Arhat will possess craving, sṣince this mind can be the object of the craving of another person. 
Consequently when I know that the mind of another person possesses craving, this mind of another does not possess craving because it is united with craving in the sense that it is accompanied by the possession of craving, or in the sense that it is found in the series in which this possession has not been expelled. 
If this is the case, what is a serāga mind? 
Vigatarāga, without craving is a mind which is not associated with craving, even when this mind will be accompanied by the possession of craving. 
The expression vigatarāga cannot have this meaning; for another Sūtra says that a mind which is without craving , without anger , and without ignorance , does not fall back into threefold existence. 
We said in fact that if one calls a mind without craving vigatarāga, that is, a mind in which craving is not presently active, then one should terrm all minds associated with another defilement vigatarāga. 
But one does not say that a mind associated with hatred is vigaṭarāga, without craving. 
When the knowledge of the mind of another attains its object, namely the mind of another person, does it attain this mind of another as this latter knows it? 
If it were otherwise, the knowledge of the mind of another would bear on rpa, etc.,and would no longer be the knowledge of the mind of another; the knowledge of the mind of another would bear on itself: 
for the person whose mind I know can at the same moment know my mind. 
The characteristics of the knowledge of the mind of another are set: 
There are no pure aspects outside of the sixteen. 
The Masters of Kaśmīr say that there are no pure aspects outside of the sixteen. 
Some others, according to the Śāstra, affirm that there are. 
The Mālaśāstra says, Canṉ one distinguish the dharmas belonging to Kāmadhātu through a mind not included among the Dhātus ? 
One can distinguish them as they are, as impermanent, suffering, empty, impersonal, cause, proximate cause, near cause, specificing cause; there is this characteristic , there is this cause. 
it is fitting that a pure miDd distinguish these dharmas as impermanent. 
Fot, if the Śāstra employs the terms asty ekat sthānan... 
Yes, one can distinguish them, namely, one becomes attached to, one hates, one prides oneself, one errs, one erroneously distinguishes these dharmas as self, mine , as eternal or perishable , as noncause, nonāc tion, nonexistent , as supreme, excellent, distin guished, superior , as purification, deliverance, salvation , with anxiety, disagreement, or doubt. 
How many things constitute the sixteen aspects? The aspects are sixteen things. 
Certain masters said that the aspects, sixteen in name, are only seven in fact. The four aspects of the Truth of Suffering are in fact distinct from one another. 
But maintain that the sixteen aspects exist in fact,. 
kitsk Whas is the difference between these four types of proces sions? 
One should distinguish four states of desire : the affection that one experiences for oneself when one thinks, I am, without otherwise distinguishing an actual self, without thinking of a past or future self; 2. 
the desire for reexistence without any other specification; 3. 
Twhe first desire is the initial cause of snfferingas the seed is the initial cause of the fruit; it is called herx. 
The second desire is that which brings about reexistenceas the production of the shoot, ṣtalk, etc., is a casual process or arising which brings about fruit; it is therefore called samudaya, a cause which brings forth. 
The third desire is the cause which determines the quality of suffering,as the field, the water, the fertilizer, etc., determine the virility, the ripening, the appearance of the fruit; it is therefore called prayaya, or condition.9 The fourth desire is the cause from whence the fruit appears as the flower is the cause of the fruit; it is therefore called prabhāva, o appearance. 
And again, according to the Sūtra, theṟe are two groups of five modes of desire , and two groups of four, which are, respectively, the four desires studied above. 
Calm, because it is cessationof all suffering; thus it is said, AIl the seskāras, Oh Bhīkṣus, are suffering; only Nirvāṇa aḻone is absolute calmn. 
3, Obtaining, because it is determined; that is to say one arrives by this path and not by another, as it is said, This path leads to purity, other systems do not lead to it. 
Furthermore, it is in order to cure persons who nourish views of permanence, bliss, of things pertaining to the self, and a soul ṭhat the aspects of impermanence, suffering, empty, and nosoul are established. 
The extinction aspect is opposed to the view that there is no deliverance. 
The calm aspect is opposed to the view that deliverance is suffering. 
The definitive release aspect is opposed to the view that deliverance is subject to falling, that it is not definitive. 
The Path, truth, cultivation, and definitive release aspects oppose, respectively, the views that there is no path, that a false path is the Path, that there is another path, and that the Path is subject to falling. 
The aspects are by their nature mental prgjñā oṟ discernment. 
But, we would say, if this is so, then prjñā, the knowledge that discerns the dharmas, will not be endowed with the aspects, for prajñā cannot be associated with prajñā.It is therefore correct to say that aspect is a mode of perceiving objects by the mind and mental states. 
prajñā is aspect, subject, and object; 2. 
The first is of three natures; the others are good. 
The first is worldly, conventional knowledge, because this knowledge is named first in the Kārika , and is of three types, good, bad, or neutral. 
The first exists in all spheres. 
In six, the knowledge named dharma. 
A knowledge of the dharmas is obtained in or through the Four Dhyānas, and in Anāgamya and Dhyānāṇnṭara. 
In nine, that which is called anvaya. 
Inferential knowledge is obtained in the six spheres which have been mentioned, and furthermore, in three Arūpyas. 
So too six jñānas. 
When one considers them together, some six knowledges, the knowledge of Suffering, Origin, Extinction, the Path, Destruction, and NonArisingare obtained in nine spheres; when they form part of the knowledge of dhurmas, they are obtained in six spheres; when they form part of inferential knowledge, they are obtained in nine spheres. 
The knowledge of the mind of another exists in the Four Dhyāṇnas. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is only obtained in the Four Dhyānas, and nowhere else. 
It has for its support a person either in Kāmadhātu or Rūpadhātu. 
Beings in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu realize the knowledge of the mind of another. 
The knowledge of dharmas, a person in Kāmādhātu. 
The knowledge of dharmas can only be realized by a person in Kāmadhātu, and notby a person in either Rāpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
Others, in persons of the three spheres. 
What are the other knowledges? 
They are the eight knowledges with the exception of the knowledge of the mind of another and the knowledge of dharmas. 
We have explained the spheres in which one acquires the knowledges, and the sphere to which the persons who can acquire the knowledges belong. Let us explain the relationship of the knowledges with the four applications of mindfulness. 
The knowledge of Extinction is an application of mindfulness. 
The knowledge of Extinction is an application of mindfulness which relates to a dharma. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is threefold. 
The knowledge of the mind of another, related to the mind of another, necessarily relates to vedanā, saṅṅjñā, and the saskāras. 
The others, four. 
By excluding the knowledge of Extinction and the knowledge of the mind of another, the other eight knowledges have the four applications of mindfulaness for their nature. 
The different knowledges are the object of how maṅny other knowledges? 
Nine knowledges are the object of a knowledge of dharmas. Excluding inferential knowledge. 
Nine are the object of inferential knowledge and knowledge of the Path. 
Excluding the knowledge of dharmas in inferential knowledge; by excluding worldly conventional knowledge in the knowledge of the Path, because it does not form part of the Path. 
Two are the object of the knowledge of Suffering and Origin. 
Ḷ Worldly conventional knowledge and the part of the knowl edge of the mind of another which is impure, are the object of a knowledge of Suffering and of Origin. 
Ten, of four. 
Ten knowledges are the object of worldly conventional knowledge, a knowledge of the mind of another, the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising. 
No knowledge is the object of the knowledge of Extinction whose only object is Extinction obtained through conscious effort. 
How many dharmas constitute in their totality the object of the ten knowledges? 
The totality of their object is ten dharrnas.M What are these ten dharmas? 
Dharmas of the Thtee Dhātus, pure dharmas, unconditioned, each category being twofold. 
The unconditioned dharmas aṟe divided into two classes, good and neutraḹ. 
Which of these tro classes of dbarmas are the object of the ten knowledges? 
Woṟldly conventional knowledge is related to ten dharmas; 2. 
two of Rāpadhātu, two of Ārūpyadhātu, and two pure, which make six, and a good unconditioned dharma; 45. 
the knowledge of Suffering and of Origin are related to only good unconditioned dharmas; 7. 
a knowledge of the Path is related to the two pure dharmas; 8. 
a knowledge of the mind of another is related to three; the dharmas associated with the mind which are of Kāmadhātu, and of the Rūpadhātu, and pure; 910. 
the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising are related to nine dharmas, with the exception of neutral uncondi tioned dharmas. 
kṣkestk Can one, through a single knowledge, know all of the dharmas? 
Yet One conventional knowledge, with the exception of its own complex, knows the rest as nonself. 
When a moment of conventional knowledge knows ail the dharmas as not being a self, this is with the exception, in the totality of the dharmas, of 1. 
itself, this same moment of conventional knowledge, for the subject of knowledge cannot be its own object; 2. 
the mental ḍharmas which are assōciated with it, for they have the same object as it does; and 3. 
A common person possesses only worldly conventional knowledge; when he is detached , he also possesses a knowledge of the mind of aṉother. 
As for the Āryaṇ, Not detached, in the first pure moment, he possesses one knowledge. 
An Āryaṉ who is not detached through a worldly path before entering the Path, in the moment in which the Patience which is the knowledge of the dharmas related to Suffering arises, possesses a single knowledge, namely worldly conventional knowledge, because this Patience is not a knowledge. 
In the second moment, he possesses three knowledges. 
At the moment of the knowledge of dharmas related to Suffering, he possesses worldly conventional knowledge, a knowledge of Zharmas, and a knowledge of Suffering. 
Beyond, in four moments, each time adding a knowledge. 
A knowledge is added in each of four subsequent moments; at the fourth moment there is inferential knowledge; at the sixth moment there is the knowledge of origin; at the tenth moment , there is the knowledge of Extinction; and at the fourteenth moment , there is the knowledge of the Path. 
For an Āryan who, before entering into the Pure Path , has obtained detachment through a worldly path, we must add the knowledge of the mind of another. 
How many knowledges does the ascetic cultivate at one and the same time in different stages, the Path of Seeing the Truths, and in the Path of Meditation, etc.? 
In Seeing, future patiences and knowledges exist to the extent to which they are produced. Those which are produced are acquired or cultivated. 
For example, when an ascetic produces the Patience of the knowledge of the dharmas related to Suffering, he cultivates future Patience of this same type, and he takes possession of future Patience of this ṣame type. 
Why, in the Path of Seeing, is there only acquisition of the knowledge and the aspects of the type of knowledge and the aspects produced? 
In the Path of Seeing one also acquires conventional knowledge at the moment of the three inferential knowledges. 
Why does an ascetic not take possession of it at the mornent of inferential knowledge of the Path ? 
Because the Path has not been understood formerly, through a worldly path, under its aspects of Path, Truth, etc. 
We would say that this argument does not hold, for one should not regard the fact that conventional knowledge does not accompany the Path of Meditation as a proof.! 
This knowledge does not arise when the ascetic is in contem plation, nor when the ascetic has left his contemplation. 
On the one hand this knowledge is incompatible with his contemplation ; on the other hand the mind, outside of its contemplation, is too coarse. 
Formerly it was not acquired, but ṉnow it is acqunired. 
This point should be understood in the same way as the Former Masters understood it. 
According to these Masters, one acquires conventional knowledge through the power of the Āryamārga. 
After one has left the contemplation of the Āryamārga, a conventional knowledge bearing on the Truths is realized, and it is much more distin guished than that which preceeds the obtaining of the Āryamārga itself. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this manner of seeing things. 
From the sphere or from a lower sphere. 
When one realizes the Path of Seeing of a certain sphere , one acquires, in the future, the conventional knowledge of this sphere or of a lower sphere. 
if one realizes the Path of Śeeing in the Fourth Dhyāṇna, one acquires, in the future, the Path of Seeing of six spheres , and one acquires, in the future, the conventional knowledge of seven spheres. 
In Extinction, the last. 
If one cultivates at the end of Extinction,that is, in the moment of the inferential knowledge of Extinction,it is only the last foundation of mindfulness, namely the foundation of mindfulness related to dharmas. 
When one cultivates conventional knowledge at the end of the comprehension of a certain truth, the conventional knowledge takes on the aspects of this Truth and has this Truth for its object. 
The knowledges are so called because knowledge is the major element in them; if one takes into consideration their followings, they make up four skandhas in Kāmadhātu, and five skandhas in Rūpadhātu. 
In the sixteenth, six, through nondetachment. 
One should add are cultivated. 
In the sixteenth moment , the ascetic who is not detached from Kāmadhātu cultivates two knowledges in the present; he cultivates six knowledges in ṭhe future: namely the knowledge of dharmas, inferential kṇowledge, and knowledges of the Four Truths. 
Through detachment, seven. 
With respect to the ascetic already detached from Kāmadhātu, at the moment when he attains inferential knowledge of the Path, one should add the cultivation of the knowledge of the mind of another, the seventh. 
Above, in the Path of Meditation associated with sensual desire, there is the cultivation of seven. 
Beyond the sixteenth moment, that is, in the rest of the Path of Meditation, as long as one has not obtained detachment, in the preparatory paths, the uninterrupted paths, the paths of deliver ance, and in the excellent paths,there is cultivation of seven knowledges, namely a knowledge of the dbarmas, inferential knowledge, the knowledges of the Four Truths, and worldly, conventional knowledge. 
If one cultivates a worldly path, one also, in the present, cultivates worldly conventional knowledge. 
If one cultivates a transworldly path, one also, in the present, cultivates one of the four knowledges of the dharmas. One will cultivate the other six knowledges in the future. 
In the uninterrupted paths of the victory over seven spheres, of the acquisition of the supernormal krowledges, and of the quality of Immovability, of mixed meditation. 
One cultivates seven knowledges, the same as above, in the uṉinterrupted paths which make up: 
victory over seven spheres, that is to say detachment from the Four Dhyānas and the three Ārūpyas: these spheres are vanquished when one is detached from them; 2. 
If the ascetic cultivates these paths through a worldly path, he cultivates, in the present, conventional knowledge; if he follows a transworldly path, he cultivates in the present one of the four inferential knowledges, and one of the two knowledges of ḍharmas. 
.In the acquisition of the quality of Immovability, he does not cultivate conventional knowledge; for this latter is not opposed to Bhavāgra. 
Here the Knowledge of the Destruction is the seventh knowledge. 
Above the detachment from the seven spheres, in the first eight paths of deliverance of Bhavāgra, the ascetic cultivates, in the future, seven knowledges, namely the knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, the knowledges of the Four Truths, and the knowledge of the mind of another; he does not cultivate conventional knowledge, because this knowledge is not opposed to Bhavāgra. 
He cultivates, in the present, one of the four inferential knowledges or one of the two knowledges of dharmas. 
The Śaikṣa, in the path of deliverance of the perfectioning of the faculties, cultivates six or seven knowledges. 
When he is detached, he cultivates seven knowledges, the knowledge of the mind of another being the seventh. 
Some other masters say that conventional knowledge is cultivated by one who is not detached as well as by one who is detached. In the preparatory path , both of them cultivate this knowledge. 
In the uninterrupted path, he cultivates six knowl edges. 
Detached or nondetached, he cultivates six knowledges, as above, in the uninteṟrrupted path of the perfection ing of his faculties. 
He does not cultivate conventional knowledge, because the perfectioning of the faculties resembles the Path of Seeing; he does not cultivate the knowledge of the mind of another because this knowledge is absent from the uniaterrupted path: 
in fact this knowledge does not oppose the defilements. 
The same in the victory over Bhavāgra. 
In the uninterrupted paths of detachment from Bhavāgra, the Śaikṣa cultivates six knowledges. 
At the moment of the knowledge of destruction, nine knowledges. 
The ninth path of deliverance of detachment from Bhavāgra is called the Knowledge of Destruction. 
The ascetic then cultivates nine knowledges, with the exception of the ṚKnowledge of NonArising. An Immovable One cultivates ten knowledges. 
wThe saint who is from the beginning an Immovable One cultivates ten knowledges at the moment when he produces the Knowledge of Destruction, for at this moment he obtains the Knowledge of NonArising. 
The ascetic who obtains the state of Immovability through the perfectioning of his faculties also cultivates ten knowledges in the last path of this perfectioning. 
In the cases not mentioned, there is cultivation of eight knowledges. 
The ninth path of deliverance from detachment to Kāma dhātu ; 2. 
the paths of deliverence from detachment to the seven spheres, to the five sipernormal knowledges, to mixed meditation of the Śaikṣa ; 3, the first eight paths of deliverance of the perfectioning of ṭthe faculties leading to the state of Immovability ; and 4. 
In all these paths, there is cultivation of eight future knowl edges, with the exception of the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising. 
The Aśaikṣa, in the preparatory path, the path of deliverance, and the excellent path of the five supernormal knowledges and of mixed meditation, cultivates nine knowledges or ten knowledges, depending on whether the Aśaikṣa is a saemayavimukta or an asamayavimukta. 
In the uninterrupted paths of the same , he cultivates either eight or nine knowledges, with the exception of the knowledge of the mind of another in both cases. 
Nevertheless, in the path of deliverance of the two supernor mal knowledges which are neutral , this path being itself morally neutralthere is no cultivation of any future knowledge. 
In the other cases, obtaining a path not previously obtained, he cultivates solely, in the future, conventional knowledge. 
kskṣk To which sphere does the knowledge belong which is culti vated in the worldly and transworldly paths? 
A knowledge of the mind of another, a future cultivation, belongs to the sphere which serves as the support of the Path, or rather to the sphere which one obtains through the Path. 
It is not a rule that pure knowledge, cultivated in the future, will belong to the sphere which serves as the support for its arising. 
The knowledge that one cultivates in the future belongs to the sphere from which one is detached, to the sphere acquired, or to a lower sphere. 
When, in order to become detached from one sphere an ascetic cultivates the paths of the two classes, pure or impure, he cultivates pure knowledges which are either of the sphere which he obtains for the first time by these paths, of the sphere which is the support of the path, or of a lower sphere. 
In fact, Vajropamasamādhi cuts off these ties which are the possessions of the defilements; all the qualities will be found in a series freed from the defilements; one can thus say that they breathe , in the manner of a sack when one cuts the ropes that bind it. 
all the good dharmas come towards him, as vassals come to present their homage to a prince who accedes to supreme kingship. 
sxttk Is eveṟything that has been previously obtained also cultivated? 
That which has been obtained previously is not cultivated. 
Cultivation is of four types: 
Cultivation of good conditioned dharmas is acquisition and practice; there is cultivation of opposition and expulsion with respect to impure dharmas. 
There is cultivation of acquisition and practice with respect to the good conditioned dharmas, acquisition with ṛrespect to the future and acquisition and practice with respect to the present. 
These two cultivations rest on the first two efforts, effort for the arising of what has not yet arisen, and effort for the growth of what has already arisen. 
There is cultivation of opposition and expulsion with respect to impure dharmas; they rest on the last two efforts, effort for the nonarising of what has not arisen, and effort for the destruction of what has already arisen. 
Thus the good but impure dharmas are susceptible of four types of cultivation; the pure dharmas are susceptible of the first ṭwo; the defiled and neutral dharmar of the last two. 
The Vaibhāsikas of the West say that there are six types of cultivation: four as above, plus the cultivation of constraint , and the cultivation of inspection. 
ṟhe first is the cultivation of the organs, the eye, etc.; the second is the cultivation of the body, as it says in the Sūtra, These six organs well subdued, well gunarded... 
and, There is in the body the beard, hair, etc. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr however think that these two cultivations should be included within the cultivation of opposition and expulsion. 
Among these qualities, there are fitst those which are uniquely proper to the Buddha, which the Bodhisattva acquires at the moment of the Knowledge of Destruction in becoming an Ārhat and, at the same time, a Buddha. 
The dharmas unique to the Buddha are eighteen, the powers, etc. 
There are ten knowledges in sthānāsthāna; The power which consists of the knowledge of what is possible and what is impossible is made up of ten knowledges. 
Eight in karmaphala, The power which consists of the knowledge of the retribution of actions is made up of eight knowledges, with the exception of the knowledge of the Path and Extinction. 
Nine in the Dhyāṇas, etc., in the Indriyas, in the Abhimokṣas, in the Dhātus; The power of the knowledge of the Dhyānas, Vimokṣas, Samādhis and Samāpattis; the power of the knowledge of the degree of the moral faculties of beings; the power of the knowledge of the different aspirations of beings; and the power of the knowledge of the different acquired dispositions of beingsthese four powers are made up of nine knowledges, excluding the knowledge of extinction. 
Nine or ten in the paths; The power of the knowledge of the paths which lead to the different realms of rebirth and to Nirvāṇa, is made up of either nine knowledges or ten knowledges. 
If one understands the Path with its result, this power then includes the knowledge of extinction ; but if one understands the Path without its result, then this power is made up of nine knowledges. 
Two are conventional knowledges; The power of the knowledge of former abodes and the power of the knowledge of the death and rebirth of beings are both conventional knowledges. 
Destruction is made up of six or ten knowledges. 
The power of the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers is made up of six or ten knowledges. 
the ten knowledges exist in such a series. 
30ac.The power of former abodes and the power of deathrebirth lie in the Dhyānas; the others in all the spheres. 
The knowledge of former abodes and the knowledge of the death and rebirth of beings have the Dhyānas for their spheres; the other powers are of all the spheres, Kāmadhātu, Anāgamya, the Four Dhyānas, Dhyānāntara, and the Four Ārūpyas. 
They arise in a male body in Jambudvīpa, that is to say in the Buddha, for Buddhas do not appear outside of Jambudvīpa. 
In others this tenfold knowledge is not called a power: it is only in the series of the Buddha that it is called a power, because, elsewhere, it is shackled. 
This is why the ten powers exist only in the Buddha, because the Buddha, having expelled all the cankers and all the traces of ignorance, knows all objects of his own accord. 
It is not the same for the knowledges of others, and as a consequence these knowledges are not called powers. 
According to tradition, Śāriputra refused a person who asked for admission to the Order; he was not capable of seeing the number of the previous and subsequent births of a pigeon chased by a hawk.1 The Buddhas knowledge is exercised without obstacle, the power of his mind is infinite and envelopes all objects. 
ksiesk If such is the power of his mind, what is the power of his body? 
The power of the body of the Buddha is equal to that of Nārāyaṇa. 
According to others, in his parts; According to others, each part of his body possesses this power. 
The Bhadanta, , says that his physical power is like his mental power, that is, infinite; for, if it were otherwise, the body of the Blessed One would not be able to support infinite knowledge. 
The Buddhas have nzgāgranthi power in their body parts, Pratyekabuddhas have śakalā power, and Cakravartins have śaṅṇku power. 
What is the extent of Nārāyaṇa power? 
This is a power the seventh term of a series which begins with the elephant and in which each term is worth ten times the preceeding; There is a series: 
prākrtahastin, gandhahastin, mahānagna, praskandin, varāṅga, cāṇūra, and nārāyaṇa. 
The physical power of the Buddha is, by its nature, a tangible.Īt consists of ptimary elements of a special ṉature. 
According to others, however, it is a rpa derived from the primary elements, but a derived rāpa different from the seven derived tangibles, lakṣṇabva, etc. 
As for the four assurances , Assuraṇce is fourfold The Buddha possesses four assurances which are explained in the Sūtra. 
Resembling the first, the tenth, the second, and the seventh power. 
The first assurance, the assurance that he has attained supreme comprehension with respect to all the dharmas, resem bles the first power ; it consists of ten knowledges, and can exist in all of the spheres. 
the dhaṛmas, resembles the second power, the power of the knowledge of the retribution of actions: 
The fourth assurance, the assurance that he can explain the Path leading to definitive deliverance, resembles the seventh power, the power of the knowledge of the paths which lead to the different realms of rebirth and to Nirvāṇa: 
The word vaiśāradya signifies absence of fear. 
By reason of the fact that he knows that he has understood all the dharmas, destroyed all the defilements, etc., the Buddha is free from fear in the assemblies. 
the assurances, being a result of knowledge, are not knowledge by nature. 
ktk What are the three applications of mindfulness of the Buddha? 
These three applications of mindful ness are, by their nature, mindfulness and awareness. 
But a Śrāvaka who is free from the cankers, whose disciples are either respectful or not respectful, or respectful and not respectful, experiences neither joy nor displeasure, nor either joy or displeasure. 
Why consider the three applications of mindfulness as dharmas unique to a Buddha? 
it is admirable that the Buddha does not experience either joy or displeasure from their respect or disrespect; but the disciples are not the disciples of the Śrāvakas from whom they receive the teaching: there is nothing admirable in the fact that these Śrāvakas do not experience joy or displeasure. 
kḥk Great compassion is a conventional mental state; compassion in eight ways. 
Great compassion is, by its nature, conventional knowledge. 
In the contrary case, it would be, in its natare, absence of hatred as is oṟdinary compassion ; like ordinary compas sioṉ, it would not embrace all beings of the Three Dhātus, it would ṉot envision the three types of suffering. 
Why is the compassion of the Blessed One termed great? 
It is great through its factors, its aspects, its object, its equality, and its excellence. 
By reason of its factors ; it is produced in fact by a great provisioning of merit and knowledge. 
it considers things as painful by reason of the threefold suffering, the suffering inherent in suffering itself, the suffering inherent in change, and the suffering inherent in the saskāras , whereas ordinary compassion only envisions the suffering inherent in suffering itself. 
3.By reason of the object, for it has for its object all beings in the Three Dhātus. 
By reason of its equality, for it is equally concerned with the happiness and benefit of all being. 
It differs from ordinary compassion in eight ways. 
ordinary compassion takes on the form of one suffering, whereas great compassion takes on the form of threefold suffering. 
kṭk We have explained the qualities which belong only to the Buddhas and which distinguish them from other beings. 
Do the Buddhas resemble one another among themselves? 
In sabhāra, dharmakāya and their service to beings, the Buddhas are identical; not in their duration of life, their caste, their stature, etc. 
tḥ All intelligent persons who reflect on the threefold perfecti on of the Tathāgatas necessarily produce a profound affection, a profound respect with respect to thern. This threefold perfection is the perfection of their causes which consists of the provisions of merit and knowledge; the perfection of the result which consists of the dharmakāya; and the perfection of benefit which consists of service to all beings. 
The perfection of the result is fourfold, for the realization of the dharmakāya includes four perfections, that of knowledge, of abandoning, of power and of material body. 
perfection in the mastery of abandoning and prolonging life; 3. 
perfection in the mastery of movement through resistant bodies, through space, to very distant location, of great speed, and mastery in the reduction of a large body to a small volume; and 4. 
The perfection of the material body is fourfold: 
Such are, in short, the perfections of the Buddhas. There would be no end of our discussion if we were to speak of them in great detail. Only the Buddhas, the Blessed Ones, if they were to prolong their existence for numbers of asakhyeyakalpas, would be capable of knowing and speaking of their grandeur. 
It is enough to know that the Buddhas, endowed with qualities, knowledges, powers, and infinite and extraordinary benefits, are like mines of jewels. 
Nevertheless fools , themselves poor in qualitiesand judging based upon themselveshave no spiritual aspirations: they understand in vain the extolling of the merits of the Buddha and they do not conceive affection either for the Buddha or his Dharma. 
The wise, on the contrary, understand the explanation of the qualities of the Buddha, conceiving, with respect to the Buddha and his Dharma, a mind of faith which penetrates to the marrow of their bones. 
These persons, through this single mind of faith, surmounṅt an infinite mass of actions of unnecessary retribution; they obtain excellent human and divine rebirths; and, finally, they aṟrive at Nirvāṇa. 
This is why the Tathāgatas are said to be a supreme field of merit; for this field gives forth fruits which are certain, agreeable, abundant, rapid, , and of excellent issue. 
The Blessed One, in fact, has proclaimed, If anyone plants a small root of good in the field of merit which are the Buddhas, he will first possess heavenly realms of rebitth and then he will obtain the Deathless. 
We have explained the eighteen qualities unique to the Buddhas. 
teksk There are other qualities which the Buddhas have in common with Śaikṣas The Buddhas possess innumerable qualities which they have in common either with Śṛāvakas And Prthagjanas Orṟ with ordinary persons. 
These are: 
The Arhats know that the sufferings of beings are produced through their defilements; they know thar they them selves are the most worthy field of merit ; they fear that others might generate defilements with respect to them ; thus they generate a knowledge of such a nature that no other person will produce, with respect to them, lust, hatred, pride, etc. 
it is thus called rgṇā oṟ absence of contention. 
It is of the sphere of the Fourth Dhyāna; It exists in the Fourth Dhyāna, which is the best of the easy paths. 
It is produced by Immovable Arhats and not by others: 
It is produced by humans. 
It is produced by humans, for it is only a being in the human realm of rebirth who can cultivate it in the Three Dvīpas. 
It bears on the defilements of others, in Kāmadhātu, in the future, and has a real object , May no defilements arise in others with respect to me! 
The avasinka defilements of others , which are abandoned through Seeing, are not susceptible of being arrested, for the universal defilements , which exist in the totality of their sphere, also exist in the series of another. 
As is the Samādhi Absence of Contention, So too the Knowledge Resulting from Resolution;. 
But it has all for its object. 
the conduct of Ārūpyadhātu, that is to say the practice of the Ārūpya Samāpattis which will produce an existence in Ārūpyadhā tu,and one caa.infer from a cause to its result and from a result to its cause. 
Such is the opinion of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
sḥtsk So too the Unhindered Knowledges of dharmas, of objects, of etymological explanations, and of eloquence. 
There are Four Unhindered Knowledges: the Unhindered Knowledge of ḍharmas, the Unhindered Knowledge of things , the Unhindered Knowledge of etymological explanations , and the Unhindered Knowledge of eloquence. 
They are like the Saṃādhi Absence of Contention in that they belong solely to the Inmmovable Ones who are humans. 
But they differ from it with respect to their object, the sphere in which they are acquired, and their nature. 
The first three are unhindered knowledges bearing, in this order, on name, the thing, speech. 
The fourth is the knowledge of exact and facile expression, and of mastery with respect to the Path. 
Infallible knowledge which confers the capacity to express oneself in an exact and facile manner and which also confers never failing attention on a person who is a master in absorption is the Unhindered Knowledge of eloquence. 
Speech and the Path are the object of this Unhindered Knowledge. 
It is made up of nine knowledges. 
Which, in its nature, is made up of nine knowledges with the exception of the knowledge of extinction. 
It is of all the spheres. 
Unhindered Knowledge of things is made up of ten or six. 
The others are conventional knowledge. 
Two Unhindered Knowledges are conventional knowledge, for they have names, phrases, and syllables, etc., and speech, for their object. 
The Unhindered Knowledge of dharmas exists in Kāmadhātu and the Dhyānas. It therefore exists in five spheres. Above them, names are absent. 
The Unhindered Knowledge of speech exists in Kāmadhātu and the First Dhyāna. 
The Unhindered Knowledge of etymological explanation exists only in Kāmadhātu.and the First Dhyāna, because vitarka is absent above them. 
the infallible knowledge of name, phrase, and syllable; 2. 
According to the School, the preparatory exercises of the Four Unhindered Knowledges are, in this order, the study of calculation, the word of the Buddha, the study of sounds , and the study of causes , for a person who has not cultivated these four disciplines is not capable of producing the Four Unhindered Knowledges. 
If a person obtains one Unhindered Knowledge, he obtains the others; if he does not obtain them all, he does not obtain any of them. 
xkṅ The six qualities described above, Absence of Contention, etc. 
These six are prāntakoṭika. 
It is sixfold. 
Even though the Unhindered Knowledge of etymological explanation may be obtained through the power of a Prāatakoṭika Dhyāna, it does not arise in the Fourth Dhyāna, for it has Kāmadhātu and the First Dhyāṇna for its sphere; consequently it is not included within the Fourth Prāntakoṭika Dhyāna. 
It is the last dhyāna, in a series with all the spheres and carried to its maximum. 
from a good mind of Kāmadhātu, oṉe enters into the First Dhyāna; from the First Dhyāṇna, into the Second, and so oṅ up to naivasajñānāsajñāya ṣana ; then, one redescends to a good mind of Kāmadhātu; finally, from this mind, one ascends again to the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
One cultivates the Fourth Dhyāna; after having cultivated in an inferior manner, one cultivates in a medium manṇner; after having cultivated in a medium manner, one cultivates in a superior manner. 
With the exception of the Buddha, the other Āryans acquire these six qualities, the Samādhi Absence of Contention, etc., only through effort, and not through detachment, since all do not possess them. 
The Buddha alone acquires them through detachment, for the Buddha obtains all his qualities in a single stroke, from the beginning, at the moment of the Knowledge of Destruction, through detachment. 
Later, he actualizes them at his will, without effort; for the Buddha is the master of all the dharmas that he possesses. 
Among the qualities which also belong to ordinary persons we must explain the Supernormal Knowledges. 
Realization of the knowledge of supernormal power, of ear, of the mind, of past existences, of death and rebirth, of the destruction of the cankers; this is the sixfold supernormal knowledge. 
There are six supernormal knowledges: the supernormal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the sphere of rddhi or supernormal power ; 2. 
They are by their nature the prajñā of the Path of Deliverance, like the results of the religious life. 
Four are conventional knowledge. 
Four, with the exception of the supernormal knowledge of the minds of others and the supernormal knowledge of the destruction. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is made up of five knowledges. 
The fifth supernormal knowledge is by nature the knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, a knowledge of the Path, conventional knowledge, and the knowledge of the mind of another. 
The supernormaḻ knowledge of the destruction of the cankers is similar to the power. 
Exactly like the power of the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers, this supernormal knowledge is made up of six or ten knowledges. 
So too, it can exist in all of the spheres and relates to all objects. 
Five exist in the Four Dhyāṇnas. 
The first five supernormal knowledges exist in the Four Dhyānas, that is to say, they are obtained by an ascetic in any of these Dhyānas. 
Why do they not exist in the nonmaterial absorptions, the Ārṛūpyas? 
The first three have rāpa for their object. Thus one cannot produce them in the ārpyas. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is prepared through the gate of physical matter , that is to say through a path which has color and shape for its object. Now the nonmaterial absoṟrptions do not have physical matter for their object. 
In fact the ascetic who wishes to know the mind of another first considers, in his own series, the characteristics of his body and mind, Such is my body, such is Iny mind. 
As he has considered his own body and mind, in this same way, envisioning the series of another, he takes into consideration the characteristic of the body and mind of another: thus he knows the mind of another and the supernormal knowledge arises. 
When the supernormal knowledge is realized, the ascetic no longer considers the rāpa of the body; he directly knows the mind. 
The ascetic who wishes to remember his past existences, begins by grasping the characteristic of the mind which has just perished; from this mind, he again considers the states which it immediately succeeds in the present existence up to the mind at conception. 
In oṟder for him to remember the previous existences of another, the pṛeliminary exercise is the same. 
Oṉne remembers only that which has been experienced previously. 
If this is the case, how can there be remembrance of the Śuddhāvāsas? 
He rememnbers them because he has experienced them through his hearing. 
Beings who, falling from Ārūpyadhātu, arise here produce this supernormal knowledge by means of the series of another. 
The preparation of the first three supernormal knowled gesthe supernormal knowledge of the sphere of rddhi, of dīvine hearing, and divine sight,consists of the observation of lightness, sound, and light. 
Through the Supernormal Knowledge of magical power of a certain sphere, acquired in a certain dhyāna , one possesses the powers of displacement and creation in this sphere or in a lower sphere, but not in a higher sphere. 
So too, through the Supernormal Knowledge of divine hearing, one understands the sounds of the sphere to which the Supernor mal Knowledge belongs, or the sounds of a lower sphere, but not the sounds of a higher sphere. 
Through the Supernormal Knowledge of the mind of another, one does not know the mind of another when it is of a sphere higher than that of the Supernormal Knowledge. 
Through the Supernormal Knowledge of the memory of past existences, one does not obtain the memory of existences in a sphere higher than that of the Supernormal Knowledge. 
Consequently, a mind in Ārūpyadhātu cannot be attained either through the Supernormal Knowledge of the knowledge of the mind of another, nor through the Supernormal Knowledge of the memory of past existences, because this mind in Ārūpyadhātu is of a sphere higher than that of the Supernormal Knowledges. 
How are the Supernormal Knowledges acquired? 
If they have not been acquired in a past life, they are acquired only through effort. 
The third is made up of three applications of mindful ness. 
The supernormal knowledge of the mind of another contains three applications of mindfulness,.vedanā, citta, and dharma because it has the mind and its mental states for its object. 
Supernormal power, hearing, and sight make up the first application of mindfulness. 
The supernormal knowledges of supernormal power, divine hearing, and divine sight, make up the first application of mindfulness, that is, the body as an application of mindfulness, for they have rāpa, color and shape, for their object. 
The supernormal knowledge of supernormal power has four external āyatanas, with the exception of sound, for its sphere. 
And divine hearing and divine sight have both sound and rāzpa for their domain. 
If this is the case, how can the Supernormal Knowledge of the divine sight know, as the Sūtra explains, that These beings endowed with bad physical actions, with bad vocal actions, deniers of the Āryaṉs, produce false views, attach themselves to views and to wrong actions, because of which, at the end of their lives, they fall into bad realms of rebirth...? 
The Supernormal Knowledge of divine sight does not know that a being is endowed with a mental action, that a being has conceived a false view, etc. But there is another knowledge which accompanies the Supernormal Knowledge of divine sight, which arises in the series of the Āryan, and which knows mental action, etc. As this knowledge is produced through the power of the Supernormal Knowledges of divine sight, it receives, together with this Supernormal Knowledge, the name of Knowledge of death and rebiṟth. 
As their natures are not determined in the Kārikā, it follows in and of itself that the two Supernormal Knowledges of memory of past existenṅces and the destruction of the cankers have for their nature the four applications of mindfulness. 
The Supernormal Knowledges of hearing and sight are neutral; the others are good. 
The Supernormal Knowledges of divine hearing and divine sight are morally neutral, for, by nature, they are prajñā associated with auditory and visual consciousness. 
If this is the case, how can one say that they are of the sphere of the Four Dhyānas? 
There is no contradiction here, for we express ourselves in this way by consideration of the organs. 
The organs, the ears and eyes, which are the support of the Supernormal Knowledges, are produced through the power of the Four Dhyānas and belong to their sphere: they therefore exist in the four spheres. 
If this is the case, why does the Prakaraṇapāda say, What is supernormal knowledge? 
It is good prajñā? 
According to the Sūtra, there are three Aśaikṣa Wisdoms. 
Three supernormal knowledges are wisdorn, The three wisdoms,the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of past lives, the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the death and biṟth of all beings, and the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers, are, in the order of the Sūtra, the fifth, the second, and the sixth supernormal knowledges. 
Which of these three supernormal knowledges really belongs to the Aśaikṣas? 
The knowledge of the destruction of the cankers belongs only to the Arhat. 
The two others are said to belong to the Aśaikṣas when they arise in the series of an Aśaikṣa. 
If this is so, why not admit that these two supernormal knowledges are, when they are produced in a Śaikṣa, the wisdom of a Śaikṣa. 
In fact the Buddha did not say that these two supernormal knowledges are Śaikṣa dharmas. 
When a series is associated with nonwisdom it is not coṟrect to give the name of wisdom to the supernormal knowledge which is produced in this series, for the supernormal knowledge is obscured by the nonwisdom. 
The first, the third and the sixth are the methods of coṉversion. 
Through them, one makes persons of hostile, unbelieving, or nonṉzealous mind, produce a mind of refuge, a mind of faith, or a mind of practice. 
Among the three methods of conversion, conversion through the Teaching is the best. 
ConveṬsion through miracles and conversion through reading someoṇes mind can be produced by means of wisdom. 
There is a wisdom called Gāṇdhārī: the person who possesses it can fly through space. 
There is also a wisdom called Ikṣaṇikā: 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the word rḍdhi designates absoṟption or samādhi. 
The absoṟrption is so named, for it is due to it that the work succeeds. 
skḵ.What does rddhi consist of? 
Rapid displacement like the mind is unique to the Master. This displacement goes very. quickly, like the mind; from whence its name of wanojava. Only the Buddha possesses it, not other beings. 
The body arrives at a great distance even in the time it takes to think of arriving there. 
This is why the Buddha said that the sphere of the Buddha is incomprehensible. 
The others possess displacement of transport and of adhimokṣa. 
Śrāvakas and Pratyekabuddhas elevate their bodies and morve, as a bird gradually raises his body and moves. 
As for the displacement of adhimoṣa, when one does it, through the power of intention , what is distant becomes close: 
Fictive creation in Kāmadhātu is made up of four external āyatanas, Fictive creation is of two types, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, and of the sphere of Rūpadhātu. 
The second consists of the creationi of physical matter and tangibles only, because odors and tastes do not exist in Rūpadhāṭu. 
It is of two types. Fictive creation in Kāmadhātu is twofold, accordingly as it is connected with the body of the ascetic himself or with another: 
The same holds true of fictive creations in Rāpadhātṭu, A person who is in Kāmadhātu and one who is in Rūpadhātua are each capable of four types of fictive creations, so creation is eightfold. 
But when a person in Rūpadhātu produces a fictive creation in Kāmadhātu, is it not found to possess odor and taste? 
No, there is no possession, no more so than a person does not possess clothing or attire, even though they are bound to his body, because these things, not being living organisms , are not bound to the sense organs. 
Is it through the supernormal knowledge of creation itself that the ascetic creates fictive, cteated objects ? 
How is this? 
What is this dharma that you term the result of supernormal knowledge? 
It is through a mind capable of creating fictive beings that one creates. They are fourteen in anumber. 
A result of supernormal knowledge are minds capable of creating fictive, created objects. 
These minds are fourteen in nummber. 
They are the results of the Dhyānas, from the number of two up to five, in this order. 
Two minds are the results of the First Dhyāṇna: the first of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, and the second of the sphere of the First Dhyāṇa. 
In the same way four and five minds are the results of the Third and Fourth Dhyānas. 
The mind capable of creating fictive objects, the result of a certain Dhyāna, is of the sphere of this Dhyāṇna or of a lower sphere. 
The Dhyāna mind of a lower sphere does not produce a mind capable of creating fictive beings of a higher sphere, because its power is too small. 
The same for the following Dhyānas. 
It produces the two. 
This is to suppose that the person who has a mind which is capable of creating fictive beingsthe result of an absorption, and morally neutraldoes not again enter a Dhyāna, that he would not depart ftom this Dhyāṇa, in the same way that one enters through a door and leaves through this same door. 
All the fictive, created things are created by a mind of their sphere, for a mind capable of creating fictive beings of a certain sphere does not produce a being belonging to another sphere. 
But speech also takes place through a mind of a lower sphere. 
Speech uttered by a fictive being in Kāmadhātu or of the First Dhyāna takes place by virtue of a mind of the sphere of this created beiṅg. 
But a fictive being of a higher sphere, of the Second Dhyāṇna, etc., speaḵs by virtue of a mind of the First Dhyāna: 
When the ṇirmātar, the person who produces fictive beings , produces a number of fictive beings, all speak when their creator speaks, because their vāgvijñāpti or vocal action, is common to all. 
This is why the stanza says, When one speaks, namely the creator, all his creatures speak; when one remains silent, all remain silent. 
at his will, fictive beings speak one after the other; they question the Buddha and the Buddha answers; the Buddha questions them and they respond. 
It is thus, through his own empowerment that Kāśyapa the Great made his bones last until the advent of Maitreya. 
It is only a hard thing which is susceptible of being empowered for a long period of time. This is why Kāśyapa the Great did not empower his flesh. 
Some other masters say no. The body protected by the power of empowerment is not capable of lasting beyond death. 
If the bones of Kāśyapa last, it is through the protection of the gods. 
A beginner, by means of numerous minds capable of creating fictive beings, produces a single fictive being; later, wheṉ his practice is complete, the ascetic produces at his own will, by means of a single such mind, many or few creatures. 
Produced through meditation, it is neutral. 
Ianate, it is threefold. 
Ṛddhi is also produced through mantras, plants, and actions; in all five types. 
kxkṣk Are divine sight and the divine hearing called divine in the proper sense of the word, because they are of the nature of the organs of the gods, or rather figuratively so, because they are as if they were divine? 
.ē They are as divine in the case of the Bodhisattvas, Cakravar tins, and Grhapatiratnas. When they are divine in the proper sense of the word Divine sight and divine hearing are of pure rpa of the sphere of the Dhyānas. By reason of a preparatory exercise consisting of meditation on light and soundthe ascetic is in the Dhyānas, and in the eyes and ears of the asceticeyes and ears which are in Kāmadhātuthere is found to be attracted a pure rpa, a matter derived from the primary elements of the sphere of the Dhyāna in which it exists, subtle and excellent. 
This rāzpa constitutes his eyes and ears; it sees and understands; it constitutes what is called divine sight and divine hearing. 
Divine sight and divine hearing of this category, obtained through meditation, aṟe never atsabhāga , but are always accompanied by visual or auditory consciousness. 
On this point, there is a stanza, The eye of flesh does not see rpa which is distant, obscured, or subtle; it does not see in all directions. 
Divine sight, the contrary. 
When one sees the rūpas by means of divine sight, are the objects of sight near or far away? 
The objects are near or far away according to the person and accoṟding to the eye. 
If they desire to see, but make no effort to do so, Śrāvakas, Pratyekabuddhas and Buddhas see, respectively, a Sāhasra, a Dvisāhasra, or a Trisāhasra universe. 
If a Śrāvaka, desiring to see by divine sight, makes a great effort, he will see a Dvisāhasra Madhyama Lokadhātu. 
And the Buddha the Blessed One, will see the Asakhya Loka dhātu: he sees according as he desires. 
Why is this? 
As his knowledge extends to all the dharmas, so too his divine sight extends to all the rāpas. 
The others are also innate. 
Four powers,;divine heaṟing, divine sight, memory of past existences, and knowledge of the mind of another,are also innate. 
But the innate powers are not called supernormal knowledges. 
Divine sight, when it is innate, does not see intermediary beings. 
It is not capable of seeing the color and shape of intermediate beings which are seen only by the divine sight of supernormal knowledge. 
This knowledge of the mind of another is of three types. 
It can be three types: good, bad, or neutral. 
A knowledge of the mind of another, and memory of past existences are innate in the beings in hell. Through these two knowledges, The beings in hell know from the very beginning. 
Beings in the other realms of rebirth where a knowledge of the mind of another and a memory of past existences are innate always know because their sufferings do not overwhelm them. 
Among hurmans, not innate. 
Among humans, the five powers, rddhi, etc., described above, are not innṇate. 
How is this? 
We shall speak first of their supports , that is, the mental states in which these qualities are produced. 
The Dhyānas are twofold; Fach of these Dhyāṇnas is of two types: 
The Dhyānas as existence have been defined in the Third Three are threefold and the Fourth is eightfold. 
With their concomitents, they are the five skandhas. 
If one consideres ramādhi with its following, Dhyāna as absorption has the five skandhas for its nature. 
The fact that minds have a single object. If this is the case, then what is designated by the word samādhi are the minds themselves which have a single object. 
What is called saradhi is a certain dharma by which the minds are concentrated, applied on a single object. 
Since minds are momentary, each of them has a single object. 
Samādhi causes the second mind to not be distracted or turned aside from the object of the first mind. 
But if this is the case, then the samādhi does not exercise any action with regard to the first mind which you consider as associated with samādbhi. 
hence all minds should possess the characteristic of being concentrated. 
No, because of the weakness of the samādhi. 
The Sautrāntikas say that the minds which have the same object constitute samādhi: 
For it is said in the Sūtra that the Four Dhyānas are adhicitta fikṣa, the higher mental learning; another says that the Four Dhyānas are the primary element in the purification of the mind. 
What is the meaning of the word dhyāna? 
It is thus the excellent absorptions which are called ḍhyāna. 
But if dhyāṇna is an absorption filled with parts, how can a defiled absorption be called dhyāna? 
What are the characteristics of the First to the Fourth Dhyāna? 
The First Dhyāna is a good concentration filled with vicāra, prīti, and rukha. 
This also says implicitly, filled with vitarka, for viarka necessarily accompanies vicāra, as smoke accompanies fire. It does not happen that vicāra is associated with prīti and sukha without at the same time being associated with viṭarka. 
and sukha; eliminating p7ī7, the Third Dhyāṇna is only filled with sxkha; and by eliminating svkha, these thṛee parts are absent from the Fourth Dhyāna. 
What are the Ārūpyas? 
The Ārūpyas, that is, the absorptions of, and the rebirths in Ārūpyadhātu are like the Dhyāṇnas in their number and nature. 
There are four Ārūpyas and each Ārūpya is twofold, existence and concentration. 
They are made up of four skandhas. 
The Dhyānas are accompanied by five skandhas, but the Ārūpyas are accompanied by only four skandhas, for no rāpa or physical matter accompanies it. 
What is separation? 
The paths by which the ascetic is delivered from the lower spheres, because these paths have turned him away from them. 
They are called vibhūtarūpasajñā together with three sāmantakas. The first ṝāmantaka, the threshold of Ākāśānantyāyatana is not called a rāmantaka because it has the Fourth Dhyāna for its object, and so the idea of physical matter is not completely transcended in it. The Ārūpyas are so called because there is no pa or physical matter in them: 
they are made up of the four randhas as mentioned above. 
This should be proved, say some Schools, for we maintain that there is some physical matter, rpa, in the Ārūpyas. 
But then why are the rāpyas called ārāpyas, absences of physical matter? 
So be it; but what type of physical matter is in Ārūpyadhātu? 
If you say that this physical matter is neither the body nor the voice, but merely the physical matter that constitutes bodily and vocal discipline , then how can this discipline exist in the absence of body and voice? 
If you attribute material organs to the beings in Ārūpyadhātu, how can you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātu is subtle? 
Because their dimensions are very small; the beings are therefore of reduced rāpa , so the beings are then without physical matter. But if you reason in this way, then the tiny and invisible aquatic animals would also be without rūpa. Would you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātṭu is transpaṟrent ? 
Would you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātu is more transparent and so merits being called absence of physical matter? 
But then you should only call the highest stage of Ārūpyadhātu absence of physical matter, for bodies will be all the more transparent the more distinguished is the absorption of the stage to which they belong. 
Furthermore, the physical matter of Rūpadhātu cannot be perceived by an eye in a lower sphere, since it is too transparent. How does this differ from the physical matter that you attribute to Ārūpyadhātu? Finally it is a gratutitous affirmation to maintain that the name of the first two Dhātus correspond to their objects , but that this is not so in the case of Ārāpyadhātu. It is maintained that physical matter exists in Ārūpyadhātu. 
It is said that consciousness does not come or go independ ently of physical matter, sensation, ideas, or the sarṅskāras. 
But does this text teach that all consciousness either a consciousness caused by the saskāras of Kāmadhātu or Rāūpadhātu, or a consciousness caused by the saskāras of Ārūpyadhātu, is a cause of the material and nonmaterial sandhas? 
External physical matter would be supported by the noamaterial rkandhas. 
There would be material food in Rāpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, for the Sūtra says, in a general way, that there are four types of food , in the same way that it says in a general way that there are four abodes of consciousness: from whence you conclude that the abode of physical matter exists in Ārūpyadhātu. 
it speaks of a being who surpasses the gods who nourish themselves with material food; and it speaks of beings who nouṟish themselves with joy. 
Very well, but does not the Sūtra also say, and categorically so, that there is no physical matter in Ārūpyadhātu? 
It says, 1 One departs from the rūpas through the Ārūpyas; 2 These states of calm deliverance, beyond the rpas, namely the Ārūpyas.; 3 There are existences without physical matter, absolutely passing beyond the ideas of physical matter: 
now, if physical matter were to exist in the existences or the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu, beings who are in Ārūpyadhātu would have ideas of their own physical matter. 
Our opponent answers that the Sūtra, in these different passages, intends to speak not of physical matter in general, but of gross physical matter of a lower sphere. 
one should understand in the same sense the text relative to material food, which would exist, albeit subtly, in Rāpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu; 2. 
We then assume that the Ārūpyas are beyond any and all physical matter. 
The Blessed One expresses himself in this manner with reason, for one cannot leave a certain existence by means of this same existence, and one can neither leave all of the existences nor definitively leave any existence by means of any existence whatsoever. 
Finally the Blessed One says that there is rāpa, vedanā, sarjñā, the saskāras, and vijñāna in the Dhyānas, and that there is vedaṇā. 
and vijñāna in the Ārūpyas. 
If there were truly pa in the Ārūpyas, why did not the Blessed One say that there is rēpa in them, as he did for the Dhyānas? 
Hence, There is no rāpa in the Ārūpyas. 
If this is the case, then when a being obtains an existence in Ārūpyadhātu, his series of physical matter is cut off for numerous cosmic periods. When this being is finally reborn in a lower sphere, where does his physical matter come from? 
Physical matter arises from the mind. 
A cause was formerly produceda certain action, etc.,.which should ripen in physical matter; a trace of this cause remains in the mind: 
But how can a mind in Ārūpyadhātu exist without being supported by physical matter, rāpa? 
But, by virtue of this same reasoning, you should deny that beings in Rūpadhātu live on material food. 
Moreover we have already explained how a mind in Ārūpyadhātu has nṉikāya and fṝvta as its support. 
kskṣk Do the Ārūpyas receive their different names,Ākāśānan tyāyatana, etc.,.from the fact that they have space etc., for their objects? 
The first three, Ākāśānantya, Vijñānānantya, and Ākicanya are named after their preparatory exercises. 
Because of its weakness, the absorption is called NeitherIdeasNorAbsence of Ideas. 
Ideas are not active in it, but neither is it completely without ideas. 
tt There are then eight things that are basic absorptions; The Four Dhyānas and the Four Ārūpyas are the eight basic absorptions. 
The seven are threefold. 
The first seven of these eight are threefold. 
Eṇjoyment, pure, and free from the defilements. 
They are associated with enjoyment, are pure, and are free from the defilements. 
The eighth is twofold. 
The absorption of enjoyment is associated with thirst; For enjoyment is itself thirst. 
A pure absoṟption is of a worldly order of good; Worldly good is also termed good, because it arises in conjunction with the pure dharmas, such as nondesire, etc. 
It is the object of enjoyment. 
As soon as the pure absorption disappears, the absorption of enjoyment that enjoys it arises. 
The absorption free from the defilements is trans worldly. 
There are five parts or items in the First Dhyāna. 
Vitarka, vicāra, joy, happiness, and samādhi. 
But in our opinion, it is the same for the fivepart Dhyāna as for a fourpart aṛṟmy, which does not exist apart from its parts. 
joy, happiness, concentration of the mind on a single object , and internal purity of faith. 
Five in the Third: equanimity, mindfulness, awareness, happiness, and stability. 
sthiti or stability is a synonym for saādhi, as the Sūtra says, What is right samādhi? 
And four in the last: mindfulness, equanimity, the sensation of neither suffering nor happiness, and samādhi. 
The Fourth Dhyāna possesses four parts: 1 the sensation of indifference , 2 pure equanimity , 3 pure mindful ness, aṇd 4 samādhi. 
the First and the Third Dhyānas have five parts each, and the Second and the Fourth Dhyānas have four parts each. 
Regarded as things or substances , there are eleven parts. 
There are five in the First Dhyāṇna, plus 1 internal purity or faith in the Second Dhyāna; 35 equanimity, mindfulness, awareness and happiness in the Third Dhyāna; and 6 the sensation of neither suffering nor happiness in the Fourth Dhyāna. 
There are then some parts of the First Dhyāna that are not parts of the Second Dhyāna. 
There are four alternatives: 
ṭt4 Why do you say that the happiness of the Third Dhyāna conṉstitutes a sepaṟate thing? 
Because the happiness of the Third Dhyāna is agreeable sensation , whereas In the first two Dhyānas, happiness signifies wellbeing. 
In the First and Second Dhyāna, prasrabdhi is called happiness: 
The reason for this is: 
1 the happiness attributed to these Dhyānas cannot be bodily happiness, in light of the fact that the five sense consciousnesses are absent in a person who has entered into contemplatioṇ; 2. 
the happiness attributed to these Dhyānas caṇnot be mental happiness because these Dhyānas possess joy. 
Now joy is satisfaction and it is inadmissible for joy and happiness, even happiness of sensation, to coexist; they cannot even succeed one another, for the First Dhyūna possesses five pa:ts, and the Second, only four. 
In the first three Dhyānas, there is no mental sensation of happiness, but only a bodily sensation of happiṉess, which constitutes the part called happiness of these Dhyāṇas. 
In this hypothesis you should explain how the Sūtra could say, What is the faculty of happiness ? 
The bodily and mental sensation of happiness produced by reason of an agreeable contact is what is called the faculty of happiness. 
In all the sects the text merely reads bodily happiness. 
that the happiness part of the fitst two Dhyānas is wellbeing is untenable, for the wellbeing of the Fourth Dhyāṇna is certainly greater than the wellbeing of the first two Dhyānas, and the Sūtra does not attribute a happiness part to the Fourth Dhyāna. 
The wellbeing of the first two Dhyānas is called happiness because it is favorable to the sensation of happiness, whereas the wellbeing of the Fourth Dhyāna does not have this character, The wellbeing of the Third Dhyāna, like that of the first two, is favorable to the sensation of happiness; why do the Vaibhāṣikas not attṛibute prasrabdhisukha, happiness which consists of wellbeing, to the Third Dhyāna, but rather a happiness consisting of an agreeable mental sensation ? 
In the Third Dhyāna, wellbeing whose character is karmaṇyatā or aptitude is opposed by equanimity, whose character is akarmaṇyatā, for them wellbeing is accumulated through equanimity, since it results from the fact that the wellbeing of the Third Dhyāṇna is greater than the welibeing of the first two Dhyāṇnas. 
Finally, the Śūtra says,When the Noble Śrāvaka, having realized the joy born of separation, abides in absorption, then five dharmas have been abandoned by him, and he has achieved the cultivation of five dharmas, namely joy, wellbeing, happiness, prajñā, and samādhi. 
In this Sūtra, wellbeing is listed separately from happiness; it should be distinct from happiness in order for the list of the five dbarmas to be complete. 
Anṇd this is not possible. 
In the state of absoṟrption, the body is penetrated by a wind born of excellent mental concentration ; this wind is a tangible which is agreeably felt and is called wellbeing. 
But would the ascetic fall away from the samādhi when he produces the consciousness of touch? 
How can the body , which is in Kāmadhātu, give rise to a touch consciousness , which is, according to you, a type of wind in Rūpadhātu ? 
This criticism does not hold, for this consciousness of touch is produced by reason of wellbeing. 
In fact physical wellbeing is defined as a part of Bodhi. 
Do you admit that certain parts of undefiled ḍhyāna are undefiled, and that certain parts are not undefiled? 
The undefiled part is not simultaneous to the nonundefiled part; we know indeed that happiness does not exist at the same time as joy. 
We affirm that vitarka and vicāra coexist; but the example that you cite to prove the noncoexistence of the parts is not proved. 
This example is proved; for vitarka, which is a coarse mental state, and vcāra, which is a subtle mental state, are contradictory and cannot coexist. 
it is for this reason that the First Dhyāna is said to contain five parts, because the other Dhyānas are defined by the elimination, successively and in order, of the first four of these parts. 
If you do not accept this explanation, then why does the First Dhyāna have only five parts? 
No, this cannot be the case, since mindfulness and prajñā are more useful to the Dhyāna than are vtarka and vicāra. 
A certain school maintains the system that has been presented, but the ancient masters are not in agreement on this. 
Consequently the point should be further examined. 
What is the dharma called internal purity ? 
When the agitation of vitarka and vicāra has come to an end, the series flows calmly and cleatrly: this is what is called internal purity. 
As a river agitated by waves, so too the series, by reason of the agitation of vitarka and vicāra, is not calm or clear. 
This faith is called internal purity. 
According to other masters , vitarka, vicāra, samādhi, and internal purity are not separate things. 
If these are not separate things, how can one say that they are mental dharmas? 
Some special states of mind receive the name of mental states because they arise in the mind. 
But the system of the Abhidharma does not admit this theory. 
ktsk You have said that joy is satisfaction , a happy or agreeable mental sensation. 
According to this school, there exists a dharma distict from satisfaction, a mental state called joy. 
The hapiness of the three Dhyānas is satisfaction; hence joy, which is distinguished from happiness, is distinct from satisfaction. 
Joy is satisfaction. This is proved by two texts. 
The Blessed One says in the Viparñasūtra, In the Third Dhyāna the faculty of satisfaction which has previously arisen is destroyed without remnant; in the Fourth Dhyāna, the faculty of happiness is destroyed without remnant. 
He says in another Sūtra, By reason of the abandoning of the faculty of happiness and the faculty of suffering, and by reason of the previous disappearance of the faculty of dissatisfaction and the faculty of satisfaction. 
These two texts prove that there is no faculty of satisfaction in the Third Dhyāna. Hence joy is satisfaction, and not happiness. 
Does defiled dhyāna possess the parts that we have just studied? 
In the defiled Dhyānas there is no joy, happiness, faith, sampradhīḥ , mindfulness, pure equanimity nor pure mindfulness. 
When it is defiled, the First Dhyāṇa does not contain joy and happiness arisen from separation, because it is not separated from the defilements of Kāmadhātu. 
The Second Dhyāna does not contain internal purity , because it is troubled by the defilements; the defilements cause it to be unclear. 
The Third Dhyāna does not contain mindfulness and aware ness, because it is confused by a defiled happiness. 
The Fourth Dhyāna does not contain the purity of equanimity or the purity of mindfulness, because it is soiled by the defilements. That is what some say. 
According to some, wellbeing and equanimity. 
The Blessed One teaches that three Dhyānas are disturbed because of faults. 
As it is free from the eight faults, the Fourth is undisturbed. 
What are the eight faults? 
Viṭarka aṅd vicāra, the two breaths, and the four of which happiness is the first. 
The eight faults are vitarka, vicāra, happiness, suffering, satisfaction, dissatisfaction, inbreathing, and outbreathing. None of these eight is found in the Fourth Dhyāna: this is why it alone is termed uṇdisturbed. It is trne that the Sūtra says that the Fourth Dhyāna is undisturbed because it is not agitated by vitarka and vicāra, by joy and happiness. 
ĀAccording to others, the Fourth Dhyāna is undisturbed because it is like a lamp which, in a sealed place, is not agitated by the wind. 
Do the arisings of dhyāna existences or existences in Rāpadhātu, possess the same sensations as do the absorption of the Dhyāṇas? 
No, they do not. 
Why is this? 
In the dhyāna existences, there is satisfaction, happi ness, and equanimity; equanimity and smanaskatā ; happiness and equanimity; and equanimity. 
In the First Dhyāṇna existence, there are three sensations: 
1 the sensation of happiness associated with three consciousnesses ; 2 the sensation of satisfaction of the sphere of the mind consciousness ; and 3 the sensatioṉ of equanimity associated with four consciousnesses. 
In the Second Dhyāna existence, there are two sensations, namely satisfaction and equanimity, both of the sphere of the manas. There is no happiness here, because the five sense consciousnesses are absent. 
In the Third Dhyāna existence, there are two sensations, namely happiness and equanimity, both of the sphere of the manas. 
In the Fourth Dhyāna existence, there is a single sensation, the sensation of equanimity. 
Such is, with respect to the sensations, the differences between the Dhyāna existences and the absorptions of dhyāna. 
If, from the Second Dhyāna on, three consciousnesses are absent, as well as vśtarka and vicāra, how can beings born in the three higher Dhyānas see, hear, and touch? 
How can they produce the bodily or vocal act of informing ? 
We do not say that beings who are born in these Dhyānas lack visual consciousness, etc. 
In the Second Dhyāna and above, the body, eye, and ear consciousnesses, and the consciousness that sets the act of informing into motion belong to the sphere of the First Dhyāṇa. 
The eye consciousness, etc., and the consciousness that sets into motion the act of informing do not exist in the Second Dhyāna and above.9 But the beings of these Dhyānas manifest these con sciousnesses, in the same way as they manifest a fictive mind of creation of a lower sphere, and, by means of these consciousnesses, they see, hear, touch, and produce the action of informing. 
The four dhyānas which beings in the Second Dhyāna and above manifest, belong to the sphere of the First Dhyāna. 
Hence they are not defiled, because these beings are detached from the lower spheres; but they are not good, because the good of a lower sphere is less good. 
How does the acquisition of the absorptions of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu take place accordingly as they are pure, undefiled, or defiled? 
One who does not possess these absorptions obtains them by detaching oneself from a lower sphere or by taking up birth in a lower sphere , with the exception of the fourth absorption of Ārūpyadhātu, or Bhavāgra, which one acquires solely by detaching oneself from the third absorption. 
Can one abandon a pure dhyāna through birth? 
In fact, 1 one obtains this dhyāna through detachment from Kāmadhātu; 2 one loses it through detachment from Brahmaloka ; 3 one obtains it by falling from detachment in Brahmaloka; 4 one loses it by falling from detachment in Kāmadhātu; 5 one obtains it by tebirth from here up to Brahmaloka; and 6 one loses it by rebirth into Kāmadhātu. 
But cannot one say that the ascetic, through entry into the certitude of the acquisition of absolute good , acquires undefiled absorption for the first time? 
No, for the ascetic who, before pursuing the acquisition of the result of the state of Sakrṛdāgāmin, has obtained the result of the state of Śrotaāpanna can enter into this certitude in the state of Anāgamya ; he does not necessarily acquire the basic absorption. 
One acquires them, defiled, through falling and through birth. 
One who falls from the detachment of a sphere acquires the defiled absorption of this sphere. 
Oae who, dying in a higher sphere and reborn in a lower sphere, acquires the defiled absoṟrption of this second sphere. 
kḵcs How many types of absorptions arises after how many types of absorptions? 
Six absorptions can arise after the first undefiled dhyāna: 12 puṟe and undefiled absoṟrption of the same sphere; and 36 pure and undefiled absoṟption of the Second and Third Dhyānas. 
Eight absorptions can arise after the Second undefiled Dhyāṇa: 12 pure and undefiled absorption of the same sphere; and 38 pure and undefiled absorption of the Third, Fourth, and First Dhyāṇna. 
According to these same principles, one will see that ten absoṟptions can arise after the dhyāna and ārāpya absotptions not specified above. 
After the undefiled, up to the third sphere above or below, there arises the good. 
1 either two types of absorption of the same sphere as this undefiled absorption, namely pure and undefiled; or 2 two types of absorption, pure oṟ undefiled, of a higher sphere or of a lower sphere until the third in either direction. 
After inferential knowledge , one can enter into the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu, but not after the knowledge of the dharmas , because this has a lower sphere for its object. 
Re have seen which absorptions arise after the undefiled absoṟrptions. 
The same after the pure, by adding the defiled of its sphere. 
A defiled absorption of the same sphere can arise after any pure absorption. 
The rest as for the undefiled absorption. 
A defiled absorption cannot arise after an undefiled absorption. After the defiled, the pure and the defiled of its sphere. 
A pure or a defiled absorption of the same sphere can arise after a defiled absorption. 
And the pure of a lower sphere. 
Wearied of the defilements of the sphere in which one finds oneself,defilements belonging to the defiled absorption of a higher sphere,the ascetic produces an esteem for the pure absorption of a lower sphere. 
If an ascetic were in a position to distinctly know a defiled absorption and a pure absorption, he would be able to pass from the higher defiled absorption to the lower pure absoṟrption. 
By the force of a previous resolution. 
The series develops of itself by reason of this resolution, and, as a conse quence, the lower absorption arises after the higher defiled absorption, in the same way as a person forms the resolution to sleep until a certain time, falls asleep, and then wakes up at that fixed time. 
kḥk The undefiled absoṟrptions, of whichever sphere, never arise after a defiled absorption. 
At death, a defiled mind of any sphere can arise following a pure absorption obtained through birth. 
the defiled, nothing higher. 
We have seen that the undefiled absorption can follow the pure absorptions; but it cannot follow all types of pure absorptions. 
The pure absorption is of four types, of falling, etc. 
Nevertheless, the pure absorption of Naivasarṅjñānāsajñāyatana is only of three types, excluding the category of the pure absotption of progress, because it has no higher sphere. 
What are these four types? 
In order, they are suitable to the arising of the defilements, to its own sphere, to a higher sphere, to the undefiled. 
When the pure absoṟrption is of such a nature that it tends to lead to the arising of the defilements, it is called an absoṟption of falling. 
When the pure absorption tends to leed to its own sphere, it is called an absorption of duration. 
When the pure absorption tends to lead to a higher sphere, it is called an absoṟption of progress. 
When the pure absorption tends to lead to the undefiled absorption, it is called an absorption of penetration. 
Therefore it is from this last category of pure absorptions that the undefiled absorption arises. 
cskak What is the reciprocal generation of these four categories of absoṟptioṉ? 
the absorption of falling, etc., two, three, three, one. 
After the absorption of duration, three can arise, with the exception of the absorption of penetration. 
After the absorption of progress, three can arise, with the exception of the absorption of falling. 
How is this absorption actualized? 
18c Going and coming in two ways over the eight spheres, in immediate succession, by passing over one sphere, going to the third sphere of a different type, is called transitional absoṟption.1 Going and coming: 
to go is to take up the absorptions in ascending order; to come is to take up the absoṟptions in descending order. 
In two ways refers to undefiled absorption and defiled absoṟrption. 
The eight spheres means the Four Dhyāna absorptions, and the Four Ārūpya absorptions. 
In immediate succession signifies by degrees. 
By passing over one sphere means by skipping a sphere. 
1 cultivatioṉ of the eight defiled absorptions in ascending and descending order; 2 when this cultivation is assured, there is cultivation of the seven undefiled absorptions in ascending and descending order; 3 when this cultivation is assured, then the ascetic, in order to gain mastery in absorption, passes from the first defiled dhyāna into the third dhyāna of this same quality; from this he passes into Ākāśānantyāyatana, from this into Ākicanyāyatana; and he then descends in the same way, since aḻl of the absorptions are defiled; 4 when this cultivation is assured, there is cultivation in the same way, and in the two ways, of the undefiled absorptions. 
When the ascetic is capable of passing from the first defiled ḍhyāna into the third undefiled Zhyānṉa, from this into defiled Ākāśānantyāyatana, from this into undefiled Ākicanyāyatana, and to return in the same way, then he has realized the entry into the third absorption of a different quality and has returned from this absorption: 
The transitional absorption is cultivated only by humans of the Three Dvīpas; by Arhats who are noncircumstantially delivered, that is, those who realize absorption of theit own accord, those who are delivered independently of circumstances because they possess mastery in absorption. 
The Dṛṣṭiprāptas , that is, the ascetics in whom prajñā dominates, , are of keen faculties and possess mastery in absorption; but they lack the first condition. 
Arhats whose liberation is occasional and circumstantial have destroyed the defilements, but the second condition is absent. 
In the same way the absorptions of the other spheres can be actualized by beings who are in the sphere of these absorptions or in lower spheres. 
But a being reborn in a higher sphere cannot actualize the absorption of a lower sphere: 
An absoption of a lower sphere does not have even the smallest amount of usefulness for a being born in a higher sphere, because this absorption is, by comparison, mediocre. 
A being born in Bhavāgra realizes the Āryan, that is, the undefiled absorption of Ākirhcanyāyatana in order to destroy the defilements relating to Bhavāgra. 
In fact, the pure Path cannot be cultivated in Bhavāgra; but on the other hand, Ākicanya is very close to it. 
What is the object of the Dhyāna and Ārūpya absorptions? 
Āssociated with thirst, absorption has its own exis tence for its object. 
He does not have a higher sphere for his object, for the spheres are delimited by desire. 
He does not have an undefiled absorption for his object, which would imply that it is pure. 
Pure absoṟption has all that exists for its object. 
The pure or undefiled absorption takes as its object all of the dharmas that exist, conditioned and unconditioned. 
Nevertheless The pure Ārūpya absorptions of the principal spheres do not have lower defiled absorptions for their object. 
The pure absorptions cultivated in the principal spheres of Ārūpyadhātuin opposition to the Dhyāna absorptions and to the absorptions cultivated in the sāmantakas of Ārūpyadhātu do not have for their object the defiled dharmas of lower spheres, but the dharmas of their own sphere or of a higher sphere. 
The undefiled dharmas grasp all inferential knowledge for their object, the sarvānvayajñānapakṣa; they do not concern themselves with the knowledge of the dharmas ; they no longer concern themselves with the extinction of a lower sphere, which would be possible only if they were concerned with this sphere. 
Among the three types of dhyāna and ārūpya absoṟptions, undefiled and supermundane , pure , and defiled ,which one destroys the defilements ? 
Any undefiled absorption is capable of cutting off the defilements; not the pure absorptions, nor even less, the defiled absorptions. 
The pure absorption does not cut off the defilements of a lower sphere, for the ascetic can only obtain the pure absorption of a certain sphere because he is detached from a lower sphere; he does not cut off the defilements of his sphere, for he does not oppose these defilements; he does not cut off the defilements of a higher sphere, because they are more subtle than he himself. 
If the sāmantakas of the dhyānas and the ārāpyas are pure, they cut off the defilements, because they ate opposed to a lower sphere. 
How many sāmantakas, prefatory or threshold absorptions, are there? 
Each basic absorption has a sāmantaka or prefatory absorption, through which one enters into the basic absorption. 
Are the sāmantakas of three types,undefiled, pure, or defiled,like the basic absorptions? 
The first sāmantaka is called Anāgamya. 
It is of two types, pure and Āryan, that is, undefiled. 
Some say that it is threefold. 
Other masters say that the Anāgamya sāmantaka is also associated with enjoyment. 
It differs from it. 
In fact rārnantaka is the door to detachment from a lower sphere, but this is not the case for dhyānāntara. 
Only dhyānāntara is filled with vicāra without being filled with vitarka; consequently it is superior to the Firsṭ Dhyāna but inferior to the Second. 
To three; It can be associated with enjoyment, a puṟe absorption, and an undefiled absorption. 
One progresses through it through effort and therefore it cannot be associated with satisfaction. 
It has Mahābrahmā for its result, Whoever cultivates this absorption to the highest degree is reborn as Mahābrahmā. 
k The Sūtra says that there are three types of samādhi: 1 samādhi with vitarka and vicāra, 2 samādhi without vitarka but with vcāra, and 3 samādhi without vitarka and vicāra. Dhyānān tara is samādhi without vitarka but with vicāra. 
This refers to the First Dhyāna and to any other samādhi supported by the First Dhyāna. 
The Sūtra teaches that there are three absorptions, the absorption of emptiness , the absorption of the absence of characteristics, , and the absorption of the absence of intention. 
The ebsorption associated with the aspect of the Truth of Extinction ,that is, the absorption in which the ascetic considers extinction,is called the absorption of the absence of chaṟacteristics. 
This absorption has four aspects. 
Why does it receive this name? 
Because Nirvāṇa or extinction, being free from ten characteris tics is called animita. 
The absorption that has Nirvāṇa for its object is thus ānmita. 
The ten characteristics or marks are: 15 the five āyatanas, exterṉal sources of the sense consciousnesses, physical matter , sound, etc.; 67 male and female; and 810 the three characteristics of conditioned things , arising, durationandchange, and death. 
Emptiness has the aspects of emptiness and nonself. 
The absorption associated with the two aspects of emptiness and of nonself is called the absorption of emptiness. 
The absence of intention is associated with the other Truths. 
On the one hand, there are aspects of impermanence and suffering and the four aspects of the Truth of Origin, which provoke dread , and on the other hand, the four aspects of the Path, for the Path is like a raft and should necessarily be abandoned. 
ksksk These three absorptions are of two types Pure or immaculate. 
Worldly, they exist in eleven spheres; transworldly, they exist in the sphere of the Path. 
Immaculate, they are the three gates to deliverance. When they are undefiled, they are also called the gates to deliverance, because they are effectively the gates leading to Niṛrvāṇa or deliverance. We have emptiness as a gate to deliverance , the absence of characteristics as a gate to deliverance , and the absence of intention as a gate to deliverance. 
There are also three other absorptions called emptiness of emptiness, etc.! 
They are also called the absorption of the emptiness of emptiness , the absorption of the absence of intention in the absence of intention , and the absorption of the absence of characteristics in the absence of characteristics , because they have respectively, and in a manner that we shall explain, the absorptions of emptiness, the absence of intention, and the absence of characteristics for their objects. 
The first two refer to the Aśaikṣa under the aspects of emptiness and impermaṇence. 
The absorption of the emptiness of emptiness considers the absorption of emptiness, which considers the dharmas as empty and nonself, as empty but not as nonself, because a view of nonself does not provoke the same dread as does a view of emptiness. 
The absorption of the absence of intention in the absence of intention has the absoṟption of the absence of intention of the Aśaikṣa for its object, an absorption which considers things under ten aspects, impermanence, suffering, etc. 
It does not consider them as suffering, nor as cause , origin , condition , or appearance , for the absorption of the absence of intention, being undefiled, is not suffering or cause; and although the absorption of the absence of intention is the Path, the absorption of the absence of intention in the absence of intention no longer considers it as a Path, the truth , the route, , nor as pertaining to the truth , because the goal pursued by the ascetic is that of becoming disgusted with the absorption of the absence of intention. 
The absence of characteristics in the absence of characteristics has for its object extinction not attained through conscious effort, and considers it as tranquil. 
This is to say that the absorption of the absence of characteris tics in the absence of characteristics has for its object the extinction that is not attained through conscious effort of the absorption of the absence of characteristics, and considers this extinction under the aspect of tranquility, thinking, This extinction is tranquil. 
In fact, the characteristic of extinction belongs to the extinction not attained through conscious effort, as well as to the extinction brought about by impermanence; the extinction not attained through conscious effort is not excellent, for it is morally neutral ; it is not leaving, for it is not disconnection from the defilements. 
The three absorptions are exclusively Defiled. 
Because they hate the Path Now such absorptions are not pure, or undefiled dharmas. 
Among humans,. 
Among whom do they arise? 
Only among the Arhats of the Unshakeable class, and among no other Aṛhats. 
With the exception of the seven sāmantakas. 
There is a cultivation of the absorption that cultivates, practices, repeatedly cultivates, which has for its result the possession of happiness in this world, and the rest. 
The First good Dhyāna is the first pure or uṇdefiled dhyāna. 
The supernormal knowledge of the eye has sight for its result. 
The third cultivation of the absorption has for its result the attainment of the excellent forms of prajñā. 
This is the samādhiḥhāvanā of the superior qualities which arise from cultivation, that is, the qualities of the three spheres and pure, undefiled qualities. 
4.In the Fourth Dhyāṇna there is produced an absoṟption that is called the cultivation like a Vajra. 
ḵskṣk According to the School, the Blessed One, in setting forth this fourfold cultivation of the absorptions, teaches his own caltivation. 
The Immeasurables are four in number. They are goodwill or friendship , compassion , joy , and equanimityz. They are called the Immeasurables because they apply to an immeasura ble number of beings, drawing after them an immeasurable merit, and producing immeasurable results. 
Because they oppose illwill, etc.,1 In oṟder the four Immeasurables oppose illwill , harm , diīssatisfaction , and sensual craving and hostility. 
What is the difference between the meditation on loathsome things and equanimity in their opposition to sensual craving? 
Accoṟding to the Vibhāṣā , there is reason to distinguish, with respect to sensual craving, craving for the visible things of Kāmadhātu, and sexual craving. 
rmnrnHammsncnRnmrn 11 0ṇI1R1IIIIHI I Ṛ IIJJIIIIIHRHs HIRRIIHJI Goodwill is the absence of hatred. 
The nature of goodwill is the absence of malice. So too compassion. This is also the case for compassion. 
Joy is satisfaction. 
The nature of joy is satisfaction. 
Equanimity is the absence of desire. 
The nature of equanirnity is the absence of desire. 
how can it oppose illwill? 
Because illwill is provoked by desire. 
Their aspects are happiness, unhappiness, joy, and beings. 
Happy beings are the object of goodwill. 
The ascetic produces with regard to them a mind having the following aspect, Beings are happy! and by this, he enters the meditation of goodwill. 
Suffering beings are the object of meditation. 
With tegard to them the ascetic thiaks, Beings are unhappy! aad, by this, he enters the meditation of compassion. 
Joyful beings are the object of joy. 
With regard to them, the ascetic thinks, Beings are joyful! and, by this, he enters into the meditation of joy. 
Beings considered merely as beings and without making any distinction, are the object of equanimity. 
With regard to them the ascetic produces a tnind having the following aspect, Beings! 
Yet, to consider the beings who do not possess happiness as happy is an intentional view not conforming to the facts, and is erroneous. 
2 there is no erṟror in his intention, for 3 the ascetic indeed knows that he conceives an intentional view. 
And even though the ascetic himself is mistaken, what harm in there in that? 
Would you say that the Immeasurables are bad because they take beings as they are not? 
But they are the roots of good since they oppose illwill, etc. 
More precisely They have the living beings of Kāmadhātu for their sphere. In fact they oppose illwill with respect to these beings. 
However, according to the Sūtra,:the ascetic produces the mind of goodwill with regard to one cardinal direction, with regard to two cardinal directions, The Sūtra speaks of the physical world but it has in view the beings that are to be found in the physical worṟld. 
Joy in two Dhyānas. 
One cultivates joy in only the first two Dhyāṇas, for joy is satisfaction and satisfaction is absent in the other Dhyāṇnas. 
The others in six spheres. 
Or, accoṟding to some, in five. 
However, accoṟding to other masters, they are in only five spheres, with the exception of the Anāgamya. 
Accoṟding to still other masters, they exist in ten spheres, by adding to the six 7 Kāmadhātu and 810 the three sāman:akas of the higher Dhyānas. 
this is why we have said above that the Inmmeasurables oppose illwill, etc. 
After having disturbed illwill, etc., by means of preliminary goodwill, compas sion, etc., the ascetic produces, in the absorption of Anāgamya, a path of abandoning īndependent of goodwill, compassion, etc,.by which he abandons the defilements. 
Once the defilements are abandoned, the ascetic obtains detachment from Kāmadhātu, enters the basic Dhyāna, and then obtains the Four Immeasurables of the sphere of the basic Dhyāna. 
How does the beginner cultivate goodwill? 
He calls to mind the happiness that he himself has expe rienced; he hears one speak of the happiness experienced by others, by the Buddhas, the Bodhisattvas, the Śrāvakas, and the Pratyekabuddhas. He forms the vow that all beings shall obtain this happiness. 
he should then divide all beings into three categories, friends, persons to whom he is indifferent, and enemies. 
Finally the ascetic no longer distin guishes the three categories of friends; he then forms the same vow with regard to persons to whom he is indifferent and with regard to his enemies. 
When all beings, without exception, are embraced in his infinite mind of goodwill, the meditation of goodwill is achieved. 
For even persons who have cut off their roots of good are not without their good qualities, and one can even find faults among the Pratyekabuddhas themselves: 
the consequences of the ancient good deeds of the former, and the bad deeds of the latter, are visible in their bodies, etc. 
So too one should understand the meditation or cultivation of compassion and joy. 
One sees beings falling into the ocean of suffering: one forms the vow : May they be delivered from suffering! May they enter into joy. 
In this way one exercises himself in compassion and joy. 
In what sphere of rebirth does one cultivate the Immeasura bles? 
One produces them among humans. 
When a person possesses one Immeasurable, does he necessar ily possess all of the others? 
He does not necessarily possess them all. 
He necessarily possesses three. 
The petson who has produced the Third Dhyāna or the Fourth Dhyāṇa cannot possess joy, since satisfaction is absent in these Dhyānas. 
When one possesses one Immeasurable, one always possesses three. 
The Deliverances are eight in number. 
this is the First Deliverance; 2 not having the idea of internal visible things, he sees external visible things: 
this is the Second Deliverance; 3 bringing forth agreeable Deliverance, he dwells in this absorption: this is the Third Deliverance. 
The Fourth to the Seventh Deliverances are the four absorp tions of Ārūpyadhātu. The Eighth Deliverance is the absorption of the extinction of ideas and sensations. 
Twhe first two Deliverances are, by their nature, meditations on , for they have for their aspect the idea of a corpse turning blue, etc. 
They are in two Dhyānas. 
They are cultivated only in the fitst tvo Dhyānas; when they aṟe cultivated in the First Dhyāna, they oppose aṭtachment to the visible things of Kāmadhāṭtu; cultivated in the Second Dhyāṅa, they oppose attachment to the visible things of the First Dhyāna. 
Āccording to others, the mind and mental states produced by retribution among beings born in Ārūpyadhātu are not concen trated. 
The name of Deliverance is also given to the Path of Deliverance of the prefatory stages of the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu , but not to the Irresistable Path of these same prefatory stages: 
The Absorption of Extinction, or more fully the absorption of the extinction of ideas and sensations is the Eighth Deliverance. 
We have already mentioned it. It is called Deliverance because it turns away from ideas and sensations ; or rather because it turns away from all conditioned things. 
According to others, the Eight Deliverances are called deliverances because they deliver one from the obstacles to absoṟption. 
The absorption of extinction is realized Immediately after a subtlesubtle mind. 
Subtlesubtle signifies a mind more subtle, but yet one which enters the absorption of extinction that is to say, upon which there immediately succeeds. 
Going out into a pure mind of the sphere of the same absorption, or into a lower Āryan mind. 
The absorption of extinction comes to an end when there appears either a pure mind of the sphere of Bhavāgṛa, the Fourth Ārūpyathe sphere to which the absorption of extinction belongsor an Āryan, that is, an undefiled mind of the sphere of the Third Ārūpya. 
Then there is entry into the absorption of extinction by a defiled mind, and going out by a defiled or undefiled mind. 
The first three Deliverances have for their object the physical matter of Kāmadhātu, unpleasant physical matter in the first two, pleasant physical matter in the Third. 
As for those that are nonmaterial, all that which belongs to the Knowledge, the Suffering of their sphere and of a higher sphere, etc. 
The Deliverances of Ārūpyadhātu have for their object the Suffering of their sphere and a higher sphere, the cause and the extinction of this Suffering, the totality of Nondual Knowledge , the extinction pot attained through conscious effort and space. 
Why is there no Deliverance in the Third Dhyāna? 
Since body consciousness is absent in the Second Dhyāna, there is no craving for the visible things of this Dhyāṇa , because the Third Dhyāṇna is agitated by its excellent pleasures. 
He asks himself if the first two Deliverances have been achieved or not. 
If, in his contemplation on an agreeable object , defilements do not arise, then the first two Deliverances have been achieved. 
tkāk Why does the Sūtra use the expression having experienced sākṣātkṛtvā in the definition of only the Third and the Eighth Deliverances? 
It is because of their excellence and because they are found to exist in the final sphere of the two Dhātus. 
esṭḵ The Dominant Āyatanas are eight in number.1 1. 
There is an absence of any idea of internal physical matter, but there is the seeing of a large amount of external physical matter. These are the first four Dominant Āyatanas. 
There is an absence of any idea of physical matter, but there is the seeing of external blue, yellow, red, and white. These make a total of eight. 
Two are like the First Deliverance. 
Twhe first two Dominant Āyatanas are similar to the First Deliverance. 
The following two are like the Second. 
The Third and the Fourth Dominant Āyatanas are like the Second Deliverance. 
And the last four are like the Third Deliverance. 
They are ten in number: 
this is the totality of eaṟth, water, fire, and wind; blue, yellow, red, and white; plus the uninteṟrupted āyataṉas of space and consciousness. 
Eight are the absence of desire. 
The first eight are, by nature, the root of good which is absence of desire:. 
They belong to the last Dhyāna. 
They are realized by an ascetic in the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
They have Kāmadhātu for their object. 
They refer to the visible things of Kāmadhātu. 
Some think that the first four have tangible things for their object, while the last four have visible things for their object. 
Two are pure ārpya. 
The last two are pure absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu, 36. 
They have the four skandhas of their sphere for their object. 
Their objects are the four skandhas of the sphere to which they belong. 
keik The Eight Dominant Āyatanas have the Eight Deliverances for their entṛy and the Ten AIlEncompassing Āyataṉas have the Eight Dominant Āyatanas for their entry: the foḷlowing, in fact, aṟe superior to the preceding ones. 
All these qualities can have the mental series of a Pṛthagjaṇa or the mental series of an Āryan for their support, with the exception of the Deliverance of Extinction which can only be produced by Āryans. 
Extinction has been explained. 
All of the types of the Deliverance of Extinction have been previously mentioned. 
The others are obtained either through detachment or through cultivation. 
The qualities of Ārāpyadhātu are obtained by beings of the Three Dhātus; the others, only by humans. 
wThe Deliverances and the Allacompassing Āyatanas of Ārūpyadhātu are cultivated by beings born in any of the Three Dhātus. 
In two spheres, it is through the power of cause and of action that one produces the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu.2 In Rūpadhātu and in the lower spheres of Ārūpyadhātu, the higher absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu arise through the power of cause, when they have been, in the course of a previous existence, closely and intensively cultivated. 
They also arise through the power of action , that is to say, by reason of the imminent retribution of a previous action of the category to be retributed later, including a sphere of retribution higher than that in which one is born. 
This is because someone who is not detached from a lower sphere cannot be reborn in a higher sphere. 
In Rūpadhātu, it is through these two powers, and aḻso by reason of the nature of things, that one produces the dhyānas. 
In this period, all the beings of lower spheres produce higher dhyāṇnas, for the efficacy of good dharmas becomes fully develo ped.i k k How long will the Good Law of the Blessed One last, during which time these different types of dharmas caṉ be cleaṟly known and seen? 
The nature of the Good Law of the Master is twofold, āgama and adhigaa. 
Āgama is the teaching, the Sūtra, the Vinaya and the Abhidharma. 
Those who cultivate or who realize the Good Law, the dharmas aiding Bodhi, etc., support the Good Law which is adhigama. 
As long as such persons exist in the world, the Good Law wiil last. 
It is said that the Good Law will last one thousand years after the Parinirvāṇa. 
kṣkḵ This present treatise is based on the treatises of the Abhid harma. 
The Abhidharma that is established through the interpretation of the Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmiīr is, in its totality, what I have explained. 
For the most part, this Abhidharma, which has been spoken by me, is the Abhidharma as established by the Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīir. 
That which, herein, has been poorly grasped, is my fault: 
for the Buddhas and the sons of the Buddhas alone are the authority for the interpretation of the Good Law. 
The Master, the eye of the world, is closed; the witnesses, for the most part, have perished; the Law is put into confusion by persons who have not seen the Truth; and by bad sophists, independent, from whom nothing is gained. 
Īs there any liberation outside of Buddhism? 
No, there is not. 
What is the reason for this? 
There is no liberation outside of this teaching, because other doctrines are corrupted by a false conception of a soul. 
We know this because no proof establishes the existence of a soul apart from the sandhas, no proof by direct perception, nor any proof from inference. 
If the soul were a real entity, separate like other entities, it would be attained either by direct perception as are the objects of the five sense consciousnesses and the object of mental consciousness, or by inference, as are the five driyas. 
In fact, the five organs are known through inference. 
In the same way, even though general causes the presence of an external object, attention, etc.,are present, the blind and the deaf do not see and hear to the extent that the nonblind and the nondeaf see and hear. 
The first are lacking, whereas the second have the specific causes for visual and auditory consciousness: 
There is neither direct perception nor inference of a soul independent of the skandhas. 
We should examine whether this prdgala exists as an entity or as designation of a nominal existence. 
If it has a separate existence, like physical matter, then the pugala exists as an entity. 
If it is only a collection, Iiike milk, then it exists as a designation. 
If the pudgala is an entity, it will be different from the skandhas,because its nature is separate, as the sēandhas are different one from another , and you will have to name its causes; or it will be unconditioned: 
and this is a nonBuddhist opinion; and if it is unconditioned, the pudgala will be useless. 
But if you admit that the pudgala exists only as a title of designation, you will abandon your doctrine and you will be placed within our doctrines. 
We do not say that it is an entity, and we do not say that it exists only as a designation of the skandhas: 
for us the designation pdgala occurs in necessary relationship to present, internal skandhas. 
If you explain sandhān upādāya as skandhānā lakṣate , you must then say The designation pudgala occurs by taking the elements as an object this is to recognize that pugala is a word designating the rkandhas, the same as the designation milk occurs taking as its object the constituents of milkcolor, etc. 
This is not the way that we conceive of the pndgala and its relationship with the sandhas, but rather as the world conceives of fire and its relationship with fuel. 
How does it conceive of fire and its relationship with fuel? 
The world conceives of fire in relation to fuel they do not conceive of fire independent of fuel; they believe that fire is not identical with fuel nor different from fuel. 
If fire were different from fuel, fuel would not be hot; if fire were the same as fuel the consumed would be the consumer. 
if it were different from the skandhas, it would be eternal and thus unconditioned; but if it were identical to the skaṇndhas, it would then be susceptible of annihilation. 
Define the terms fire and fuel, so that I can better understand what the expression fire in relation to fuel signifies. 
What shall we say to you? 
The consumed is the fuel, the consumer is fire. 
In the world, a thing to be burned, not on fire, wood, is called the combustible matter , the consumed; the thing that exercises the action of burning, bright, very hot, in flames, is called the consumer or fire. 
The series that constitutes the fuel, is ignited by the fire, and it is reduced to ashes; by means of fire, each moment of existence of the series of fuel is made different from the preceeding moment. 
The fire and fuel are both made up of eight substances; consequently, fire is generated by reason of the fuel, as milk ferments and vinegar is cṟeated by reason of milk and wine. 
This is why the world agrees in saying that fire exists in relation to fuel If this were the case, fire is different from the fuel, as their timeperiods are different: 
If your pndgala exists in relation to the skandhas, as fire exists in relation to fuel, you then have to admit that, since it is produced by reason of the skandhas, it is different from the skandhas, and that it is, moreover, traṅsitory. 
In the thing set on fire, wood, etc., one of the substances, namely a tangible object which is heat, is the fire; the other substances are the fuels. 
Since fire and fuel are generated at the same time, how can one say that fire exists in relation to fuel? 
One can say no more than that the term fire had for a cause fuel, since this term is applied to the tangible heat. 
The expression fire in relation to fuel means that the fire has fuel as its basis, or that the fire coexists with fuel. 
And logic demands also that, as fire does not exist when fuel is absent, likewise the pudgala does not exist without skandhas. 
Fire is not different from fuel , because, in this hypothesis, fuel would not be hot. 
What does hot mean? 
If hot is defined as being the tangible heat , as has been done above, then fuel will not be hot. 
If hot is that which is associated with heat , then this means that different things are called hot: 
To think thus is to confess that fuel is termed hot although it is different from fire or from the tangible heat. 
Explain then the meaning that you attribute to the expression fire in relation to fuel! The pxdgala will be identical to the skandhas : 
if it is ineffable, one cannot say either that it is a fifth category, nor that this is not a fifth category. 
If it depends on a real pudgala, why did the Vātsīputrīyas say that the designation pudgala is in relation to the skandhas? 
But color is perceived when diverse causes are present, the eye, light, etc.; may we thereby conclude that the designation color is with relation to these diverse causes? Another point. 
It is perceived by all six consciousnesses. 
When the eye consciousness recognizes physical matter , it indirectly discerns the pudgala, and then we can say that the pvgala is known by the eye consciousness. But the relationship of the pudgala with physical matter, be it identical or different, is inexpressible. 
when the mental consciousness recognizes the dharmas , it indirectly discerns the pudgala; it is then known by the mental consciousness, but its relationship with these states is inexpressible. 
When the eye conscious ness recognizes the color of milk, it indirectly discerns the milk: the milk is then known by the eye consciousness and one cannot say that the milk is the same thing as its color or is different from its color. 
The same for ear, nose, tongue, and body consciousness: the body consciousness recognizes tangibles; from whence there is the consciousness of milk; the milk is then known by the body consciousness without which one could only say that the milk is identical to the tangible, or different from the tangible. 
then it is not color, smell, taste, tangible; but furthermore, one cannot say that the milk is not made of these four. 
The conclusion is that one metaphorically designates a complex of elements by pvdgala, the same as the designation milk is understood as a coming together of color, smell, etc. 
What meaning do you therefore attach to the phrase, When the eye consciousness recognizes physical matter, it indirectly discerns the pudgala? 
If the Vātsīputrīyas answer that physical matter is the cause of the perception of the pwudgala but that, nevertheless, one cannot say that the pudgala is different from physical matter, then the condition and the causes of the perception of physical mattereye, light, an act of attentionwould not be different from physical matter. 
If the Vātsīputrīyas answer that one perceives the pudgala at the same time as one perceives physical matter, we would question whether one perceives the pudgala by the same operation which perceives physical matter, or by a different operation. 
In the first hypothesis, the pudgala is only physical matter and the designation pudgala applies only to physical matter. 
It is then impossible to distinguish This is physical matter; that is pudgala. 
Without this distinction, how can one prove that there is physical matter and that there is a pudgala? 
In the second hypothesis, since the time of the two perceptions is different, the pudgala will be as different from color and shape as yellow is from blue, as former is from latter. 
The same reasoning follows for the other sandhas. 
hṭtk If the pudgala is an entity that one cannot define as being matter nor as being nonmarter , why did the Blessed Oṇne say that matter and the other skandhas are not self? 
The pudgala, you say, is attained by the eye consciousness. 
The Sūtra saysOh Bhikṣus, eye consciousness is generated having the eye as its cause and physical matter as its condition. 
All eye consciousness is by reason of the eye and physicaḻ matter. 
If the pudgala is the cause of the eye consciousness, it will be impermanent, because the Sūtra says, All causes and all conditions that produce consciousnesses are impermanent. 
, an object of vrñna; if it is not discernible, it is not cognizable , the object of jñana; if it is not cognizable, how caa one prove that it exists? 
You have said that the pudgala is discerned by the six consciousnesses. 
But, if it is discerned by the eye consciousness, it will be, like physical matter and shape, different from sound; if it is discerned by the ear consciousness, it will be, like sound, different from physical matter and shape. 
Moreover, your thesis is in contradiction to the Sūtra. 
And the mental organ perceives the spheres and the objects of the first five organs, and they have the mental organ as their refuge. 
In fact, the Ṣatprāṇakopamasūtra says, Each of these six organs has its own object and its own sphere; each seeks after its object and its sphere. 
This Sūtra does not intend to speak of the six organs, because the five material organs and the five consciousnesses which are dependent on them do not possess the desire to see, to hear, etc. 
kṣk The Blessed One has said, Oh Bhikṣus, I declare to you all the dharmas that should be penetrated and known , namely: 
the eyes, physicaḻ matter, eye consciousness, eye contact, the sensation which is produced having as a cause eye contact, painful, pleasant, and neither painful nor pleasant sensation.... 
these aṟe what should be penetrated and known. 
This text teaches us that the dbarmas to be penetrated and comprehended are only those enumerated. 
In fact, the speculative consciousness by which one penetrates or comprehends, has the same sphere as does ordinary consciousness. 
They fall into the abyss of harmful views in saying that it sees a soul in what is not a soul. 
Furthermore, the Buddha explained that the word pdgala designates the skandhas. 
In the Sūtra of Man, he said, Supported by the eye, having physical matter for its object and condition, the visual consciousness arises: by reason of the coming together of these three, contact arises; at the same time there arises sensation, thought, the act of attention, etc. 
The last four termsvjñāna, vedanā, sajñā, cetanāare nonmāterial skaṇndhas: the eye and physical matter are the rāpa skandhas. Here is then all that one speaks of when one says man. 
One says to oneself, My eye sees physical matteṛ, and according to cuṟrent usage, This venerable one is of such a name, of such a family, of such a gotra, of such food, of such happiness and of such suffering, of such length of life; he lasts a time; he terminates his life in such a manner. 
The Blessed One declares that the Sūtras of explicit meanings are the authority. The Sūtras that we have quoted are of explicit meaning; one cannot draw a divergent explaṉation from them. 
The Blessed One said to a Brāhmin, When I say that all exists, I mean that there are twelve sources of conscious ness. 
Then if the pudgala is not included in the twelve āyatanas, it does not exist; and if it is included one cannot say that it is ineffable. 
The Vātsīputrīyas read a Ṣūtra which says, All that is of the eye, all physical matter.., the Tathāgata, Oh Bhikṣus, eṃmbraces this group , terms them all, establishes that all exists, so many dharmas in themselves. 
The Bimbiṣārasñra says, A stupid, ignorant Pṛthagjana becomes attached to words, and he imagines that there is a self; but there is no self nor things pertaining to self, but only past, present and future painful dharmas. 
Seeing that the interior is empty, see that externals are empty; and there is no ascetic who meditates oa emptiness. 
What then is the authority in your system, your tradition or the words of the Buddha? 
If it is your tradition, then the Buddha is not your teacher, and you are not a child of the Śākyan. 
If it is the word of the Buddha, why do you not recognize the authority of all the words of the Buddha? 
The texts you have quoted are not the authentic word of the Buddha, since our tradition does not read them. 
That is not a good reason. Why is this? 
Because all the other traditions read these texts, and because these texts do not contradict any other Sūtras, nor philosophic truths. 
Very well; but it is taught that the pudgala cannot be discerned by the mental consciousness, since the Sūtra establishes clearly that the mental consciousness is produced by reason of two condi tions, the mental organ and the dharmas. 
Besides how would you explain the Sūtra which says, To recognize a soul in what is not soul is a mistake of ideas, of mind, and of view? 
What is understood by that which is not a soul? 
Furṟther, a Sūtra says, Oh Bhikṣus, know that all the Brāhmins and monks that contemplate a soul, contemplate only the five skandhasofattachment. 
Another Sūtra says, All those that have remembered, do remember, or shall remember their various past existences their remembrance is solely with regard to the five rkandhasof attachment. 
But the same Sūtra says, In the past, I was handsome. 
This declaration is for the purpose of indicating that the saint capable of recollecting his past lives remembers the variety of characteristics of his series of these existences. 
We conclude that the Sūtra, insofar as it attṛibutes the possession of physical matter, etc., to a soul, has in view a self of designation, as one speaks of a pile which, being only an accumulation, has no unity; or of a current of water which being only an accumulation, has no unity; or of a cuṟṟent of water which, being only a succession , has no permanence. 
ē The Blessed One would then not be omṇiscient, since the mind and mental states are not capable of knowing all the dharmas, seeing that mind and mental states change, arising and perishing from moment to moment. 
We would reply that the pudgaa would be eternal if it does not perish when the mind perishes: 
We do not say that the Buddha is omniscient in the sense that he knows all the dharmas at one and the same time: 
Buddha designates a certain series: to this series there belongs this unique ability that, by a single act of modulating his mind, he immediately produces an exact conscious ness of the object relative to which a desire for knowing has arisen: one then calls this series Omniscient. One moment of thought is ṉnot capable of knowing everything. 
On this point, there is a verse: As fire, by the capacity of its series, burns all, so too does the Omniscient Onebut not by a universal, simultaneous knowl edge. 
For example the verse: Buddhas of the past, Buddhas of the future, and Buddhas of the present destroy the sorrows of many. 
But, in your system, the rkaṉdhas of existence belong to the three periods of time, but not the pzdgala. 
If the term pugala only designates the five ṛkandhasofattachment, how can the Blessed One say, Oh Bhikṣus, I shall explain to you the burden, the taking up of the burden, the laying down of the burden, and the bearer of the burden. 
Why may it not be explained in these terms? 
Why not? 
Simply because it is unheard of. Do not speak then of an ineffable pudgala. No one has ever ascertained the existence of an ineffable thing. 
The taking up of the burden is included within the rkandhas, and so too the bearer of the burden. 
The pudgala exists as the Sūtra says, To say that apparitional beings do not exist is a false view. 
Who denies the existence of apparitional beings? 
We admit the existence of these beings in the sense that the Blessed One understands them. 
To negate the existence of an apparitional being so defined, is a false view, because this type of series of skandhas truly exists. 
If you maintain that the negation of the pudgala is false, you wil have to say how this false view is given up. 
Now this does not refer to the five skandhas, but to an entity. 
Such is not the meaning of the Sūtra that only metaphorically designates as a unit that which exists only as a complex; as the world speaks of a grain of hemp, or a grain of rice, or of a heap, or a word. 
For the skandhas, to arise means to exist after having been nonexistent. 
As oṉe says in the world, when a certain person acquires a certain knowledge, that a sacrificer, or a grammarian is born; when a layman takes on certain characteristics, one says that a bhiks, a monk of a certain sect is born: 
And again in the same way, through the acquisition of a certain trait, one says: an old man is born, a sick person comes into being. 
This explanation of the phrase, A pudgala arises in this world has been condemned by the Blessed One. 
In the Paramār thafūnyatasūtra, the Blessed One said, There is action; there is result; but, besides the causal production of the dharmas , one does not maintain the existence of an agent which abandons these skandhas and which takes up other skandhas. 
There is then no pudgala that gives up or takes up the skandhas. 
But minds and mental states appear from instant to instant after having been nonexistent and they are not capable of abandoning and grasping. 
As for the example of an old man and a sick person, there is a succession of different bodies: to hold that an old man is the transformation of a young man is the Sākhya thesis of transformation , a thesis already refuted. 
Then your examples are without vaiue. 
And if you say that the rkandhas arise, but that the pxdgala does not arise, it follows that the latter differs from the skandhas and is eternal. 
Your position is totally parallel , since you say that the primary elements, earth, etc., are four; but that secondary matter color, for exampleis one; but that, nevertheless, secondary matter does not differ from the primary elements. 
This objection does not go against us, but only against the teachers who say that secondary matter is the four elements. 
If the pugala is only a word serving to designate the five sēandhas, why did the Buddha not declare that the vital principal is the body? 
Because the Buddha takes into consideration the intention of whomever asks him questions. 
In like manner one cannot say that the hairs of a tortoise are hard or soft. 
The ancient masters have already explained this difficulty. 
At that time, the King of Kalinga went up to him and said, I have come with the intention of clearing up my doubts. 
shall we agree that you answer plainly to the questions that I ask? 
Nāgasena accepted his request and the King asked, Is the vital principal identical to the body or different from the body? 
But kings are verbose: 
shall we agree that the King answers plainly to the question that I shall ask? 
The King consented and Nāgasena asked, Do the mangos in the Kings palace give sweet fruit or bitter fruit? 
And the King answered him, There are no mango trees within my palace. 
Nāgasena protested as the King had protested, saying, Havent we made an agreement? 
Why speak off the point and not answer? 
But, said the King, as there are no mangos in my palace, how could there be any sweet or bitter fruits? 
In the same way, Oh King, the vital principal does not exist: 
Because he took into consideration the intention of the questioner, that questioning on the jṝva may be with the idea that the jṝva is a series of skandhas. 
Furthernore, as the questioner was not capable of understanding dependent origination ,he was not a fit receptacle for the Good Law: 
I did not answer him. 
I had a soul, but this soul does not now exist. 
Whoever believes in the soul falls into the extreme view of eternity; whoever believes that the soul does not exist falls into the extreme view of annihilation. Thoughtless error, heavy error..., and so on. 
Taking into consideration the injury that heresy does and, also, the falling off of good deeds, the Buddhas teach the Law in the manner in which a tigress carries its young. 
Those who believe in the reality of the soul are torn by the teeth of heresy; those who do not recognize the conventional self let their good actions fall away, and perish. 
Since a real jṝva does not exist, the Buddha does not say that the jva is identical or nonidentical; he does not say any more than that the jñva does not really exist, fearing that one would only negate the conventioṇal jṝva. 
It is then because of the state of mind of Vatsa that the Buddha, asked if there was a soul, yes or no, did not answer. 
If such a person understands Joka to be a soul , the four alternatives are incoṟṟect, since the soul does not absolutely exist. 
If he understands oka to be transmigration or sasāra, the four alternatives are incorrect; if transmigration is eternal, no one could obtain Nirvāṇa; if it is not eternal, all would obtain Nirvana by spontaneous annihilation, and not through effort: 
In fact, Nirvāṇa is possible through the Way; then no categorical response is acceptable. 
The four questions as to whether the world is infinite, namely if it has an end or not, has the same sense as the questions relative to the eternity of the world, and present the same defect. 
The wandering monk Uktika, after having asked the Buddha about infinity, resorted to a ruse in order to repeat his question and asked, Does the whole world obtain deliverance through the Way, or only a part of the world? 
If the Blessed One did not explain concerning the four questions relative to the existence of the Tathāgata after death, this is again because he took into account the intentions of the questioner. 
Such a person understood the Tathāgata to be a soul ḷiberated from the defilements. 
why did he not declare that the Tathāgata exists after death? 
If answer that the Blessed One does not say anything concerning the deceased Tathāgata because, seeing at first the pudgala, he now no longer sees the pudgala once it has attained Nirvāṇa; it is then through ignorance that the Tathāgata does not make any declaration concerning the deceased Tathāgata, and to speak thus is to deny the omniscience of the Master. 
Rather one should believe that if the Blessed One abstains from all declarations, it is because the soul that the questioner alluded to in speaking of the Tathāgata does not absolutely exist. 
If say that the Blessed One sees the pudgala, which is in Nirvāṇa, but that he still does not make a statement on this subject; and that the pudgala exists but is not, at the same time, an object of a statement of the Blessed One, we then conclude that admit that the pudgala is permanent. 
If say that whether the Blessed One does or does not see the pugala is indescribable, they then proceed to say that all is indescribable, and that one can only say that the Blessed One is omniscient or nonomniscient. 
This is not a proof, for it is also said that it is an incorrect opinion to affirm the existence of an āmegn. 
Scholars of the Abhidharma think that a belief in the existence of an āman and a belief in its nonexistence are two extreme opinions, as they identify them with the two branches of the opinion that consists in believing in extremes. 
Further the Blessed One has said, Beings misled by ignorance, bound by thirst, wander here and there, either among beings in hell,among animals, among pretas, humans, or the gods; thus for a long time they experience all suffeṛing. 
one says that when a flame burns a field it travels, although they be only moments of flame, because it constitutes a series; in the same way the harmony of the rkandhas which is constantly repeated receives, metaphori cally, the name of being; supported by thirst, the series of skandhas travels in saṅsāra. 
If only the skandhas exist, we do not see how one can explain these words of the Blessed One, In the past, I was the teacher Sunetra. 
then, since the soul is permanent, a past ṣsoul is identical with a present soul. 
In the same way one says, This fire has been burning here. kṣfek You affirm the existence of a real soul: we hold that only the Buddhas, Tathāgatas would see it. 
But if the Buddhas see a soul, they would produce a firm belief in a soul; from this belief in a soul there would be produced among them a belief in things pertaining to a soul; from these two beliefs there would be produced among them affection for the soul and for things pertaining to a soul. 
There would be then sakāyadrṣi among the Buddhas; they would be bound by affection for a soul and for things pertaining to a soul; and they would be very far from liberation. 
when one recognizes a soul in what is not the soul, as do the nonBuddhists, one feels affection for this pretended soul; but, when one sees the soul in that which is truly the soul, namely the ineffable pvdgala, as do the Buddhas, no affection is produced with regard to the soul. 
Whereas there are those who admit an ineffable pudgala, others deny the existence of all the dharmas; nonBuddhists imagine a soul apart from all other substances. 
All these doctrines are wrong and present the same flaw in that they do not lead to liberation. 
kṣk If the soul does not absoḻutely exist, how can a mindwhich perishes as soon as it is generatedbe capable of remembering an object perceived a long time before? 
Memory and recognition are generated immediately, in a series, from a certain type of mind, when this type of mind arises from the idea of object already perceived and which one calls object of the memory. 
it is necessary that the mind involves an idea resembling the object, in the case where one remembers by reason of resemblance ; 3. 
and one of the characteristics 2 4if the thought does not proceed from the idea of the object of memorythat is to say, if the mind so envisaged is not produced in a series where the idea of a certain object has been placed by perception, if this mind does not proceed from this ideathe mind cannot produce memory; 6. 
when it is not of this nature, even though it proceeds from an idea of the object of mernory, it cannot produce memory. 
How can one mind see and another mind remember? 
Their minds are not in the relationship of cause and effect, as is the case for minds which form series. 
Indeed, we do not say that one mind sees an object and that another mind remembers this object, because these two minds belong to the same series. 
In other words, a mind of memory is generated from a mind of seeing, as fruit is generated from the seed through the force of the last stage of the transformation of the series. 
Memory is generated after recognition. 
In the absence of a soul, who remembers? 
What do you understand by to rememmber? 
To grasp an object by the memory. Does to grasp differ from memory? Memory is the agent of the action to grasp. 
it is the cause of memory, namely a certain type of mind. 
One gives the name Caitra to a series; a mind of memoty is generated, in this series, from a mind of seeing, and by reason of this fact one says that Caitra remembers. 
In the absence of a soul, whose is the memory? 
As Caitra is the master of the cow. 
To what purpose? 
For the purpose of memory. 
Do you want to say that one causes it to be produced? 
What you call master is then simply the cause, and what you call subject is simply the result. 
In fact the cause, by its command, operates the result; it is then master; and the result, in that it is subordinate to the cause at the morment of its arising, is called subject. 
Complexes of saskāras, or the five skandhas forming a homogeneous series, are called Caitra and cow. 
One says that the Caitraseries possesses the cowseries, because the Caitraseries is the cause of the geographic displacement and the various changes of the cowseries. 
There is not there any one, real entity Caitra, nor another entity called cow; there is not, for the Caitraseries, any quality of owner or master outside of its quality of cause. 
Who knows? 
To whom do we attribute consciousness? and to other similar questions, What feels, what makes ideas? 
Certain scholars say that the soul exists, as existence depends on an existing being , as the walking of Devadatta depends on Devadatta. 
In the same way consciousness and all action depends on a base of s.pport , one who knows , the agent. 
not an individual entity,; Devadatta is only the name that one gives to the series of taskāras. 
In the sense that one could say that such a Devadatta walks, in the same sense we can say that Devadatta knows. 
How does Devadatta walk? 
Devadatta is only a homogene ous series of samskāras, moments of existence replaced without interruption and roughly similar one to another. 
The foolish see within this series an entity which would be the cause of the action that this series generates in a different place, the cause by the efficacy of which the successive moments of the existence of the body of Devadatta is produced in different places. 
the fire walks, the sound walks, that is to say, the fireseries and the soundseries go being generated from one place to another. 
In the same way the world says that Devadatta knows because the complex which is Devadatta is the cause of conscious ness ; and, in order to conform to received usage, the Āryans also express themselves in this manner, which is inexact. 
Nevertheless, a Sūtra says that the consciousness knows the object. What does the vñāna do with regard to the object? 
Nothing: 
In the same way that fruit, although it does nothing, is said to correspond to the seed, to reproduce the seed, because it is produced resembling the seed; the vijñāna also, although it accomplishes no action with regard to the object, is said to know the object because it is produced resembling the object. 
This resemblance of the vijñāna consists in that it has the appearance of the object. 
By reason of this appearance one says that the vijñāna knows the object which is only one of its causes; the organ is also a cause of the vyñāna, but one does not say that the vjñāṇa knows the organ because the vijñāna does not take the aspect of the organ. 
the previous moment is the cause of the later moment; the vñāna is then a cause of vijñāna; it is then called the agent since it is the cause; one attributes the action of knowing to it as one attributes the action of ringing to a bell or the action of moving to a lamp. 
here is what the moving of the lamp consists of: 
lamp is the name metaphorically attributed to the uninterrupted series of moments of the flame that one sees, wrongly, as a unity. 
When one of these successive moments is produced in place other than that of the preceeding moment, one says that the lamp moves. 
In the same way, one metaphorically designates a series of minds by vśjñāna, or consciousness: 
when one moment of mind is produced relative to a new object, one says that the consciousness knows this object. 
the same way that one says that physical matter exists , is produced, lasts, without there being an exister , a producer, anything that lasts, distinct from what is called its existence, etc. 
If the later consciousness is produced from the previous consciousness and not from a soul , why is not the later consciousness always similar to the previous consciousness? 
Why do not consciousnesses succeed themselves in a determined order, as do shoots, stems, leaves, etc? 
If it were otherwise, the ascetics who had entered into meditationin which the body and the consciousness are always produced in the same way, the successive moments of the series being identicalwould not spontaṉeously get out of meditation. 
If a ceṟtain mind should be produced afteṛ a ceṟtain mind, it will be produced after this mind. On the other hand, certain consciousnesses present a partial similarity that obliges them to produce one another by reason of the particular character of their goēr4. 
For example, upon the idea of woman there immediately arises the idea of detesting the body of a woman, but there immediately arises the idea of a wife or daughter. 
Later, following upon the differing development of the succession of ideas, the idea of a woman reproduces itself. 
This second idea of a womnan would have the capacity of producing the idea of the detesting the body, or the idea of wife or daughter, accordingly as it has either of these ideas as gotra, that is to say, as a seed; but not when it does not have a similar gora. 
And again innumerable different ideas can succeed the idea of a woman, and that by reason of multiple causes. 
Among all these ideas, those are produced first which are the most numeroushaving formed a series in the pastthe most alive, the nearestas these ideas have most strongly impregnated the mental series: 
kḻīk Here we have, in an incomplete and summary manner, explained the causes and conditions of the order of the reciprocal generation of different categories of consciousness. 
Thus the staṉza says, All the types of causes which go to produce a peacock featherno one can know them except the Omniscient Ones: this is the power of knowledge of Omniscience. 
A certain nonBuddhist believes that the consciousnesses are produced from a soul. 
Why arent the conscious nesses produced in a fixed order? 
This master explains the variety of consciousnesses and the absence of a fixed rule to their arising by the diversity that he terms the conjunction of the soul with the anas or mental organ. 
Judge if your definition of coṇjunction, possession succeeding upon nonpossession, admits of the same conclusion as our reasoning, namely that the soul is delimited, localized. 
It also results from your definition of conjunction that, when the manas movesit goes to such and such a part of the bodythe soul should also move to make a place for it or that it should perish. 
Would you say that this diversity results from the diversity of the bxddhi, intelligence, ? 
But you would insist, saying that the soul is its support : 
In the same way that one cannot perceive the existence of earth independently of smell, etc.what one designates by the word earth is only a collection of smells, etc.in this same way there is no soul existing apart from the thoughtsazṛkāras: 
Who can obtain the idea of earth apart from smell, etc.? 
But, if earth does not exist apart from smells, etc , how can one qualify certain smells, etc., as properties of earth: 
in other words, one wants to indicate that certain smells, tastes, etc., are what is termed earth, not other smells or tastes which are termed water. 

He has, in an absolute menner, destroyed all blindness; He has drawn out the world from the mire of transmigration: I fkender homage to Him, to this teacher of truth, before composing the treatise called the Abhidharmakoa. 
Desiring to compose a treatise, with the intention of making known the greatness of his master, the author undertakes to render him homage and to first present his qualities. He refers to the Buddha, the Blessed One. 
A treatise is that which instructs disciples. 
Which treatise? 
Prajñā which wili be defined below is the discernment of the dharmas. 
Pure prajñā is undefiled prajñā. 
The following of prajñā is its escort, namely the five pure skandhas which coexists with prajña. Such is the absolute meaning, of dbhidharma. 
Dharma is that which bears self charac teristics. 
sḥk Why is the present work called the Abhidharmakośa? 
The present work is called the Abhidharmakośa because the Abhidharma enters into it through its meaning; or because the Abhidharma constitutes its foundation. 
The Treatise that bears the name of Abhidharma enters by its meaning into this work, which is thus the Abhidharmakośa, the sheath of the Abhidharma. 
Or rather as the Abhidharma is the point of support of this work, one can say that this work is drawn from out of the Abhidharma, as from a sheath; it is thus called the Abhi dharmakośa, the work which has the Abhidharma for a sheath. 
Why was the Abhidharma taught? 
By whom was the Abhidharma originally taught? The answer to these two questions will tell us why the author piously undertakes the writing of the Abhdharmakośa. 
Apart from the discernment of the dharmas, there is no meaṇs to extinguish the defilments, and it is by reason of the defilements that the world wanders in the ocean of existence. 
Apart from the discernment of dharmas, there does not exist any means for the extinguishing of the defilements , and these are the defilements which cause the world to wander in the great ocean of transmigration. This is why, say the Vaibhāṣikas, with a view to the discernment of the dharmas, the master, the Buddha, the Blessed One, spoke the Abhidharma. 
For, without the teaching of the Abhidharma, a disciple would be incapable of discerning the dharmas. 
However, the Vaibhasikas explain, the Blessed One spoke the Abhidharma in fragments. 
kkṣk What are the dharmas of which the Abhidharma teaches the discerning? 
The dharmas are impure, in a relatioaship with the defilements, or pure,with no relationship to the defilements. 
What are the impure dharmas? 
Conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the Path, are impure. 
Why is this? 
They are impure because the defilements adhere to them. 
This does not make the Path or these dbarmas impure, or in a telationship with the defilements, because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
This point will be explained later in the Fifth Chapter. 
What are the pure dharmas? 
The undefited truth of the Path and the three uncondi tioned things are pure. 
What are the three unconditioned things? 
Space and the two types of extinctions. 
The three unconditioned things and the truth of the Path are pure dharmas because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
Why is this? 
solely pratisahkhyānirodha of the impure dharmas, past, present, and destined to arise; 2. 
What are the conditioned dharmas? 
Conditioned things are the fivefold skandhas, matter, etc. 
These are the aggregate of matter, the aggregate of the sensations, the aggregate of ideas, the aggregate of mental formations, and the aggregate of consciousness. 
Saṃbrṛta, conditioned, is explained etymologically as that which has been created by causes in union and combination. 
There is ṅṉo dharma which is engendered by a single cause. Even though the expression sarskrṛta signifies that which has been created. 
, it also applies to future dharmas and to present dharmas, as well as to past dharmas; in fact, a dharma does not change its nature by changing its time period. 
Or rather conditioned things are called paths because they are devouted by impermanence. 
Discourse , means words, oṟ speech ; discourse has names or words for its foundation. 
Should one take literally the definition given by the stanza, and say that conditioned things ate worṟds? 
If we understand foundations of discourse to be only words, we would be at variance with the Prakaraṇapāda which says; The kathāvastus, the foundations of discourse, are embraced within the eighteen dhātur. 
When they are impure, they are upādānaskandhas. 
Everything that is upādānaskandha is shandha; pure conditioned. 
things are included within the skandhas, but are not included within the upādānaskandhas. 
The upādānaskandhas are so called because they proceed from the defilements, as one says grass fire or straw fire; or rather because they are governed by the defilements, as one says the kings man; or rather because they give rise to the defilements, as one says flowerbearing tree or frnitbearing tree. 
kskk We have seen that there are five skandhas. 
Rūpa, or matter, is the five sense organs, five objects, and avijñapti. 
The five organs are the organs of sight, hearing, smell, taste and touch. 
The five objects of the five organs are visible matter, sounds, odors, tastes aṅd tangibles. 
And avñapti ; such is rūpaskandha. 
ks We have enumerated five things, visible matter, sound, etc. 
The points of support of the consciousnesses of these things, namely the subtle material clements, aṟe the five oṟgans, the organ of sight, etc.! 
The five which are the point of support of the consciousnesses of visible matter, sounds, odor, taste and tangibles, and which consist of the suprasensible subtle mmaterial elements, are, in this order, the oṟgans of sight, hearing, smell, taste, and touch. 
The Blessed One said in fact, The eye, Oh Bhikṣus, an internal āyatana, a subtle matter derived from the primary elements. 
Or rather, the points of support of the visual consciousness, or eye consciouspess, etc. 
This inteṟpretation is in conformity with the Prakaraṇa which says: 
What is the oṟrgan of sight? 
It is the subtle matter which is the support of the coṇsciousness of sight. 
kṭck Let us now examine the five objects beginning with visible matter, rūpāyatana. 
Visible matter is twofold. Visible matter is color and shape. 
In the same way that it is said The appearance of the Buddha is happiness; the teaching of the religion is happiness; happiness, the harmoṇṉy of the commnunity; happiness, the austerities of monks who are in agreement. 
Both huṇger and thirst are lacking in Rūpadhātu, but the other tangibles are found there. 
It is true that the clothes of the gods of Rūpadhātu, individually, have no weighit; but, brought all together, they have weight. 
It is true that bothersome cold is lacking in Rūpadhātu but beneficent or pleasing cold is found there: 
It is possible for one visual consciousness to arise from a single thing, from a single category of visible matter: when a characteristic of this thing is separately distinguished. 
when such a distinction is lacking; for example, when one sees the multiple colors and shapes that an army or a pile of jewels present at a distance and bunched together. 
The same remark is applicable to the auditory consciousness, the olfactory consciousnesses, etc. 
But one touch consciousness arises from only five things at most, namely the four primary elements and one another of the other tangibles, soft, hard, etc. Such is the opinion of certain masters. 
But, according to another opinion, one touch consciousness can arṟise from eleven tangibles at one and the same time. 
Accoṟding to what you say, each of the five sense consciousnesses bears on a totality, for example the visual conscious ness bears on blue, red, etc.; consequently the sense consciousnesses have general characteristics for their object and not, as Scripture teaches us, specific characteristic. 
answer that the Seripture means by specific characteristic not the specific characteristic of things, but the specific characteristic of an āyatana. 
When the organs of touch and of taste attain their object at the same time , which consciousness is the first to arise? 
The one whose object is the strongest. 
But if the strength of the two objects is equal, the consciousness of taste arise first, because the desire for food dorninates. 
Let us now examine the aviñapti, which is the eleventh category of rāpaskandha. 
this is called the avijñapti. 
One whose mind is distracted is one who has a mind different from the mind that provoked the zvñapti,for example, a bad mind i when the avijñapti has been provoked by a good mind. 
A serial continuity is a flux. 
Or it is because they assemble on a large scale in the mass of the earth, the water, the fire and the wind, where their modes of activity are manifested together. 
Expansion signifies growth and deplacement. 
These are their actions. 
1i They are solidity, humidity, heat and motion. As for their natures, the earth element is solidity, the water element is humidity, the fire element is heat, and the wind element is motion. 
Motion is what causes the series of states which constitutes a thing to reproduce itself in different places; in the same way that one speaks of the motion of a flame. 
It is lightness; the Prakaraṇa also says: Lightness is a derived rēpa. Consequently, the dḥarma which has motion for its nature is the wind element: 
What is the difference between the earth element, and earth, etc? 
In common usage, what is designated by the word earth is color and shape. 
As is the case for the earth, The same for water and fire. 
In common usage, that which one designates is color and shape. 
Wind is either the wind element, But the wind element is simply called wind in the world. Or else. 
What is called wind in the world is also the wind element; in fact, one speaks of black wind, or circular wind. 
If the pleasures are lacking in a person who ardently searches out these pleasures, such a person is broken, as a person pierced by an aṟrow is broken.. 
But how is rpa damaged? 
By deteriorating, by being transformed. 
Considered as āyatana, origin of the mind and of the mental states , they are ten āyatanas: 
Considered as dhātw, a mine , they are ten dhātus: cakṣur dhātu, rūpadhātu. kāyādhatu, spraṣṭavyadhātu. kṣk We have explained rpaskandha and how it is distributed into āyataṇṉas aṅd dhātus. 
Vedanāskandha, sajñāskandha, saskāraskandha, plus avijñapti and the three unconditioned things , are seven things which are called dharmāyatana or dharmadhāta. 
Consciousness is the impression relative to each object. 
Vijñānaskandha is the impression relative to each object, the raw grasping of each object. 
Vijñāṉarkandha is six classes of con sciousness, visual, auditory, olfactory, taste, touch, and mental consciousness. 
Considered as āyatana , It is the mental organ. 
Considered as dhatu , It is seven dhāṭus. 
Rāpaskandha is ten āyatanas, ten dhātus, aṇḍ avijñapti. 
The dharmāyatana, or dharmadhātu is vedanā, sajñā and saskārāskanṇha; avijñapti and the anconditioned things. 
Vijñānaskandha is the manaāyatana, it is seven dhātṭus, namelḻy the six classes of consciousness and the mental oṟgan. 
Could a manas or manodhātu be distinct from the six classes of consciousness, distinct from the sense consciousness and from the mental consciousness? 
There is no manas distinct from the consciousness. 
The Dhāsus 75 Of these six consciousness, the one which continually passes away, is the manar. 
All consciousness which has just perished receives the name of manodhātu; in the same way, a man is both son and father, the same vegetable element is both fruit and seed. 
.If the six consciousnesses which make up six dhātus constitute the anas, and if the manas is not a thing other than the six consciousnesses, then there would be either seventeen dhātus,by excluding the anas which is cofunctional with the six conscious nesses,or else twelve dhātus, by excluding the six consciousnesses which are cofunctional with the anas,supposing of course that you want to enumerate distinct things and not mere designations. 
This is true; but Onṉe counts eighteen dhātus with a view to assigning a point of supposrt to the sixth consciousness. 
The first five consciousnesses have.for their point of support the five material organs, organ of sight, etc. ; but the sixth consciousness, the mental consciousness, does not have such a point of support. 
Consequently, with a view to attributing a point of support to this consciousness, one calls manas or manodhātu, or again mana āyabana aṅṇd manaindriya, that which serves it as its point of support, that is to say, any one of the six consciousnesses which depend on these six points of support, and six objects. 
If the consciousness or mind is called anar when, having perished, it is the point of support of another consciousness, the last mind of an Arhat will not be a meanas, for it is not followed by a mind of which it would be the immediately antecedent cause and point of support. 
If it is not followed by a new mind, namely the consciousnessofconception of a new existence , this is not related to its nature; rather, this results from the absence of other causes, actions and defilements, necessary to the production of a new thought. 
kxskk All conditioned dharmas are included within the totality of the skandhas ; all of the impure dharmasr are included within the totality of the xpādānaskandhas ; and all the dharmas are included within the totality of the āyatanas and the dhatus. 
But, more briefly, All the dharmas are included in one sēandha, one āyatana, aṇd oṉe dhāṭu. 
In rūpaskandha, manaāyatana aṇḍ dḍharmadhātu. 
A dharma is included in its own nature. 
Why is this? 
For it is distinct from the nature of othets. 
A dharma is not included in that from which it is diīstinct. 
For example, the organ of sight is included within the rūpaskandha, being rūpa by its nature; within the cakṣurāyatana and within the cakṣurdhāta, for it is the cakṣurāyatana and cakṣurdhātu, within the Truth of Suffering and Arising, for it is suffering and aṟising; but it is not included within the other rkandhas, āyatanat, etc., for it is distinct by its nature from that which is not itself. Without doubt the assemblies are won over by almsgiving and other sargrahavasius: there is therefore tagraha of oṉe thing by a thing different from it. 
But the semgraha is occasional and as a consequence, not real, but convenṇtioṉal. 
But, there are two organs of sight, of hearing, and of smell; consequently one should count twentyone dhātus. 
The organs of sight, of hearing, and of smell, although twofold, form only, in pairs, one dhātu, for their nature, their sphere of activity, and their consciousnesses are common. 
The two organs of sight have a community of nature, for they areboth of themthe organ of sight; community of sphere, for they both have visible matter for theit sphere; and community of con sciousness, for they are both the point of support of the visual coṉsciousness. 
Consequently the two oṟgans of sight form a single dhātu. 
The same holds for the organs of hearing and smell. 
It is for beautys sake that they are twofold. 
Although they form only one dhātu, these organs are produced in pairs, with a view to the beauty of the body. 
With but a single eye, a single ear, or a single nostril, one would be very ugly. 
ksksṣk What is the meaning of the terms skandha, āyatanra, and dhātu? 
Skandha signifies heap, āyatana signifies gate of entry, gate of arising, and dhāṣu signifies lineage. 
Whatever rpa there is, past, present, oṛ future, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or excellent, far or near, if ope puts together all this pa, that which is past, etc., one has that which is called rpaskandha. 
past rāpa is rpa destroyed by impermanence, future rpa is rūpa which has not arisen, and present rūpa is rūpa which has arisen and which has not been destroyed; rūpa is internal when it forrs part of the series called me ; all other rūpa is external; or rather the terms internal and external are understood from the point of view of āyatana: 
the oṟgan of sight is internal because it forms paxt of my series or of the series of another; rūpa is gross when it offers ṛesistance; or rather these two designations are relative and not absolḻute. 
Should one say that, in this second hypothesis, the gross and the subtle are not proven, since the same rūpa is gross or subtle according to whether one compares it to a rāpa more subtle or gross? 
This objection is invalid, for terms of comparison do not vary: 
when a rūpa is gross in relation to another rāpa, it is not subtle in relation to this same other rūpa: like father and son. Inferior rpa is defiled rāpa; excellent rpa is nondefiled rūpa; past and future pa are distant; present pa is near. 
gross consciousness is that which has for its point of support the five oṟgans; subtle consciousness is the mental consciousness; or rather coṉscious ness is gross or subtle according to whether it belongs to a stage which is inferior or superior. 
According to the Bhadanta, gross 7pa is that which is perceived by the five organs; all other rāpa is subtle;. 
infeṟior signifies unpleasant, Śexcellent signifies pleasant; distant rūpa is that which is found in an invisible place; near rp4 is that which is found in a visible place. 
past rpa, etc., has already been designated by its ncme. The same for sensation; it is far or neaṟ according to whether its point of support is visible or iavisible; it is gross or subtle according to whether it is corporeal or mental. 
āyṭatana signifies gate of entry or of arising of the mind and of the mental states. 
Etymologically, āyatana is that which extends the entry of the mind and of the mental states. 
In the same way that the place, the mountain, where there are many families of gems,iron, coppet, silver, goldis said to have numerous dhātus, in this same way in the huiman complex or series, there are eighteen types of families which are called the eighteen dhātus. 
Gotra is thus a mine. 
Of what is the organ of the eye the mine? 
The dhātus are the mine of their own species: 
But then unconditioned things, which are eternal, cannot be considered as dhātu? Let us say that they are the mine of the mind and mental states. 
According to another opinion, dhātu signifies species. The specific nature of the eighteen dhātus is what is understood by the eighteen dhātus. 
If skanṉdha signifies heap, the skandhas have only a nominal existence, not a real existence, for collections are not a thing: 
9No, for an atom is a sandha. 
As an atom in this hypothesis cannot have the qnality of being a heap, do not say that skandha signifies heap. 
According to another opinion , skandha signifies that which bears the burden, namely its effect. 
1 Or else skandha signifies part, section, as one says in the world, I will lend you three sandhas, if you promise to return them to me. These two explanations are not in conformity with the Sūtra. 
The Sūtra, in fact, attributes the sense of heap to sēaṉdha and no other sense: Whatever rpa there is, past, ptesent, or future, if one puts together all this rpa. 
all rēpa,past rūpa, future rūpa, etc.,.is, individually, called ṛandha, the same way that it teaches that hair, etc., is earthelement ; thus each real element of past rpa, future rāpa, etc., receives the name of skandha. 
Thus the skandhas have real existence and not merely nominal existence. 
If this is the case, then the material āyatanas,:the oṟgans and objects of the five sense consciousnesses, have only a nominal existence, for the quality of being a gate of arising of the mind or mental states does not belong to atoms taken one by one, which are solely real, but to collections of atoms which constitute an organ of sight, a visible object, etc. 
No, since each of these atoms individually possesses the quality of being a gate of the arising of the mind, of being the cause of consciousness. 
If you do not accept this doctrine, you will refuse to the organ, in its totality, the quality of being a cause of consciousness, for it does not produce 4 consciousness by itself, without the cooperation of an object. 
On the other hand, the Vbhāṣa expresses itself thus: 
When the Ābhidhārmikas take into coṉsideration the fact that the term sandha is only the denomimation of a heap, they say that an atom is part of a dhātu, an āyatama, and a skandha; when they do not take this fact iato consideration, they say that an atom is a dhātu, an āyatana, skandha. 
In fact, one metaphorically designates the part by the whole; for example, The robe is burned, for One part of the robe is burned. 
kkk Why did the Blessed One give skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus as the triple designation of the dharmas? 
The teachings of the skandhas, etc., because error, faculty, joy are threefold.1 1. Eṟṟor is threefold: 
three catagories, sharp, mediocre, duḻl 3. 
Joy is threefold; the first category of persons apply themselves to that which is said in brief; the second to that which is said normally; the third to that which is said at great length. 
all the other mental dharmas are placed within the saskāraskandha. 
The two mental states, sensation and ideas, are defined as distinct sandhas because they are the causes of the roots of dispute, because they are the causes of transmigration, and also by reason of the causes which justify the order of skandhas. 
There are two roots of dispute: attachment to pleasure, and aṭtachment to opinions. 
Sensation and ideas are, respectfully, the principal causes of these two roots. In fact, if one becornes attached to pleasures, it is because one relishes the sensation; if one becomes attached to opinions, it is by reason of erroneous or false ideas. 
those who are greedy for sensation and whose ideas are erroneous transrmigrate. 
The reasons which justify the order of the rkandhas will be explained below. 
kskk Why do unconditioned things, which form part of the dharrnā yataṇa and the dharmadhāku , not form part of the skaṇdhas? 
22ab Unconditioned things are not named with respect to the ṛkandhas, because they do not coṟrespond to the concept. 
Unconditioned things cannot be placed within any of the five skandhas, for they are not matter, nor sensation. 
it does not correspond to the concept of skandha, since skandha signifies heap, capable of being put together. 
, one has that which one calls the a asaskṛtaskandha, for the distinctions of past, etc., do not exist with respect to unconditioned things. 
Furthermore, the expression pādānaskaṇdha designates the totality of that which is the cause of defilements; the expression skandha designates the totality of that which is the cause of defilement as well as the cause of purification. 
Thus unconditioned things, which are neither the cause of defilement, nor the cause of purification, caṉnot be placed either amonṇg the upādānaskandhas nor among the skandhas. 
According to one opinion, the same way that the end of a jug is not a jug, in this same way unconditioned things, which are the end or cessation of the skandhas, ate not skandhas. 
kṣkḵ We have defined the sandhas.We should now explain the order in which the rkandhas are enumerated. 
The order of the sēandhas is justified by their grossness, their defilement, the characteristic of the jug, etc., and also from the point of view of their spheres of influence. 
Among the nonmaterial skandhas, sensation is the grossest, by reason of the grossness of its functioning; in fact, one localizes sensation in the hand, in the foot, etc. 
Ideas are grosser than the last two skandhas. 
The saskāraskandha is grosser that the skandha of consciousness. 
The sandhas are thus arranged in order of their diminishing grossness. 
In the course of external transmigration, men and women are mutually infatuated by their bodies because they are attached to the pleasures of sensation. This attachment proceeds from erroneous ideas , which are due to the defilements which are saskāras. 
Matter is the pot, sensation is the food, ideas are the seasoning, the ramskāras are the cook, and the mind is the consumer. 
Finally, in considering the sanṉdhas on the one hand, and the dhātus or spheres of existence on the other, one sees that Kāmadhātu is characterized by matter, namely by the five objects of sense enjoyment. 
Rūpadhātu, that is to say the Four Dhyānas, is characterized by sensation. 
The first three stages of Ārāpya dhātu are characterized by ideas: ideas of infinite space, etc. 
Finally, these diverse stages are the abodes of consciousness ; it is in these places that the mind resides. 
There are thus five rkandhas, no more, no less. 
ksksk One should now explain the order in which the six āyatanas or dhātus which are the six organs.of consciousness, the oṟgan of sight, etc., are enumerated: 
an order the function of which is to arrange the objects and the consciousnesses which correspond to these organs The first five are the first because their object is present. 
Five, beginning with the organ of sight, are called the first, because they bear only on present, simultaneous objects. 
The first four are the first because their object is solely derived or secondary matter. 
sometimes primary elements, sometimes derived matter, sometimes both at the same time. These four are arranged according to the range and speed of their activity. 
Their activity is at a distance, at a greater distance, very rapid. 
The organ of sight and the organ of hearing bear on a distant object. They are thus named first. 
The organ of sight bears on objects at a greater distance than does the organ of hearing: for one can see a river of which one cannot make out the sound. 
The organ of sight is thus named before the organ of hearing. 
Neither odor nor taste are perceived at a distance. 
But the activity of smell is more rapid than that of taste. 
The organ of smell perceives the odor of food before the organ of taste perceives its taste. 
Or rather the organs are arraṅged according to their position. The point of support or the place of the organ of sight, that is to say, the eye, is the highest; below that, the place of the organ of hearing; below that, the place of the oṟgan of smell; below that, the place of the organ of taste. As for the place of the organ of touch, that is to say the body, it is, for the most part, lower than the tongue. As for the mental organ, it is not matter. 
kk Among the ten āyatanas included within vāpaskandha, only one receives the name of rāpaāyatana. 
Anṅd although all the āyatanas are dharmas, only one is called dharmaāyatana. 
A single āyatana is called rūpaāyatana with a view to diīstinguishing it from the others, and by reason of its excel lence. A single āyatana is called dharmaāyatana with a view to distinguishing it from the others, and because it includes many of the dharmas as well as the best dharma. 
The āyatana which does ṉpot bear any of these nine names, and which is matter, is sufficiently designated by the expression tūpaāyatana, without there being any need to give it another name. 
why is the name of rāpaāyatana given in preference to the object of the organ of sight? 
being subject to resistance, it is deteriorated through contact with the hand, etc.; by reason of deśanṉidarśfana : 
that which one understands in the world by rāpa, is visible matter, color and shape. 
The dharmāyatana is sufficiently distinguished from the other āyatanas by the name of dharmāyatana. 
It incldes numerous dharmas, sensations, ideas, etc.; it includes the best dharma, that is to say, Nirvāṇa. This is why the general name, dharmāyataṇa, īs attṛibuted to it par excellence. 
According to another opinion, visible matter is called rūpā yatana because it includes twenty varieties , and because it is the sphete of three types of eyes, a fleshy eye, the divine eye, and the wisdom eye. 
The Sūtras name other skandhas,other āyataṉas, aṇḍ other dhātus. 
Are these included within the skanṇdhas, āyataṉas, aṅd dhatus described above? 
the sarskāraskaṇndha. 
For the teachers who say The word of the Buddha ss, by its nature, voice, these skandhas are inctuded within the rāpaskandha; for those who consider the word of the Buddha as name, these rhandhas are included within the se?skāraskandha. 
kkstk What is the dirension of a dharmaskandhua? 
Accoṟding to some, a dharmaskhandha iīs of the dimension of the Treatise. 
The exposition of the skandhas, etc., constitutes so many dharmaskandhas. 
According to another opinion, the exposition of the skandhas, āyatanas, dhātus,praīṭyasamutpāda, the Truths, the foods, the dhyānas, the apramāṇas, the ārūpyas, the vimokṣas, the abhibhvāyaṭanas, the krtsṇāyataṇas, the bodhipakṣikas, the abhiñās, the pratisavid;, praṇidhiūñāna, o araṇā, etc., aṛe each one of them separately so many dharmaskandhas. 
In this same way the other skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus should be suitably arranged within the skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus as described above, by taking into account the charac teristics that have been attributed to them. 
The other skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus which are mentioned in other Sūtṛas should be arranged within the five skandhas, twelve āyataṉas and eighteen dhātus, by taking into consideṟation the unique characteristics which have been attributed to them in these works. 
There are five pure skandhas, sūa , samādhi , prajñā , vimukti , and vimuktijñānadarśana: 
The first eight kṛsṇāyatanas , being by their nature absence of desire, form part of the dharmāyatana. 
If one considers them along with their following, they are by their nature five skanṇdhas, and they are included within the manaāyatana and the dharmāyatana. 
The last two kṛtṣnāyatanas and the four ārūpyāyatanas are, by their nature, four randhas, with the exclusion of ūpa. 
The five gates of entry into deliverance aṟe, by their nature, speculative knowledge ; they are thus included within the ḍdharmāyatana. 
If one considers their following, they are included within the śzebāāyatana, the manaāyatana, and the dharmāyatana. 
the Asajñisattvas , which are included within the ten āyatanas, with the exception of smell and taste; and 2. 
the Naivasajñānāsajfayatanopagas, which are in cluded within the anaāyatana and the dharmāyatana. 
Is the space elernent the same thing as all space, the first of the unconditioned things ? 
Is all consciousness the consciousness element? 
Cavities are called the space element, it is, one says, light and darkness. 
According to the School , the void of the space element is light or darknessthat is to say, a certain type of color, of matteṛ 
The void is thus a type of matter close to agha. 
tssk Among the eighteen dhātus, how many are visible, capable of being pointed out? 
The ten dhātar which are exclusively material are capable of being struck. The ten dhātus which are included within the rāpaskandha are capable of being struck. Striking, or collision, is of three types: āvaraṇapratighūta, viṣayapratighāta, and ālambanapratighāta. 
the five spheres, visible matter, etc. are sapratigha solely through impenetra bility; 3. the five oṟgans, eye, etc. 
Minus visible matter and sound, that is to say, eight dhātas: the five material ogans, odor, taste and the tangible, are neutral, not being defined as good or bad; or rather, according to another opinion, not being defined from the point of view of retribution. 
The seven dhātus. are good when they are associated with the three good roots , bad when they are associated with bad roots, and neutral in all other cases. 
The dharmadhātu includes the good roots, the dharmas associated with these roots, the dharmas that issue from these roots, and pratisakhyānirodha or Nirvāṇa; the bad roots, the dharmas associated with these roots, the dharmas that issue from these roots; and neutral dharmuas, for example space. 
Rūpadhātu and śabdadhātu, the visible matter and the audible, are good or bad when they constitute a bodily or vocal action that issued from a good or bad mind. They are neutral in all other cases. 
kskṣk Among the eighteen dhātus, how many exist in each sphere of existence, Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, and Ārāpyadhātu ? 
Fourteen exist in Rūpadhātu. There are fourteen dhāeus in Rāpadhātu. With the exception of odor, taste, the consciousness of odor, and the consciousness of taste. 
Although odor and taste are lacking there, the organs of smeil and taste exist in Rūpadhātu. 
In fact, a person who is detached from odors keeps his attachement with respect to the organ of smell which is part of his person. 
In Ārāpyādhatu, there is a mental organ, an object of the mental consciousness, and the mental consciousness. 
kkk How many dhātus are ispure? 
They are pure when they form part of the Truth of the Path or of unconditioned things; in the opposite case they are impure. The others are impure. 
The other dhātus, fifteen in number, are solely impure. 
kṣḥṣk How many dhātus ate associated with vtarka aṇd with vicāra, free from vitarka and associated with vicāra, or free from both viarka and vicāra? 
Five consciousnesses aiways include viarka and vicara. 
They are always associated with vitarka and with vicāra, for they are gross, being turned towards externals. 
The last three dhāṭus are of three types. These dhātusr are the mental organ, the object of mental con sciousness, and the mental consciousness. 
ksḵ But, if the five sense consciousnesses are always accompanied by viṭarka and vicāra, how aṟe they defined as free from vkalpa? 
Mental prajñā, that is, the discernment of the dharmas associated with the mental consciousness, but dispersed, that is to say, not concentrated, not in the state of absorption , is either vikalpa of examination or by definition. 
sksḵ How many dhātus have an object, that is to say, are the subject of consciousness? 
The seven dhātus which are mind have an object. 
That part which consists of the dharmas associated with the mind. 
The other dhātus, namely the ten material ḍhātus and the part of the dharmadhātu which is not associated with the mind , do not have an object. Īt How many dhātus are nonappropriated? How many are appropriated? Nine are nonappropriated. 
The seven that have been mentioned which have an object, together with onehalf of the eighth. The eight that have been mentioned, and sound. These nine are never appropriated: the seven dhātus of mind , the dharmadhātu , and sound are never appropriated. 
The other nine are of two types. They are sometimes appropriated, sometires nonappropriated. 
The five oṟgans of seṇse consciousness , of the present time, are appropriated. They are not appropriated in the future and in the past. Four objects,visible matter, odor, taste, and tangible things,are appropriated when they are present, when they are an integral part of the organs. Every other visible matter, every other odor, every other taste, and every other tangible is not appropriated: 
for example, the physical matter,color and shape, of hair, body hair, pails and teeth.with the exception of their roots, which are bound to the body or to the organ of touch; color and shape of excrement, urine, saliva, mucus, blood, etc.; the color and shape of eaṟth, water, fire, etc. 
What is the meaning of the expression appropriated? 
That which the mind and the mental states grasp and appropriate to themselves in the quality of a support is called approprated. 
Matter that the Abhi dharma calls appropriated, is called in common language, saceśanā or sensitive matter. 
tṣeis How many dhātur are primary matter, or the great, primary elements? 
How many are secondary matter, matter derived from the primary elements? 
The tangible is of two types. 
Tangibles are the four primary elements, solidity, fluidity, heat, and motion ; and sevenfold secondary matter, the soft, the hard, etc. 
The other nine material dhātus are solely secondary matter. The other material dhātus, the five organs and the objects of the first four organs, are solely secondary matter. As is the part of the dharmadhātu which is materiaḻ. 
The same for avñapti , which forms part of the dharma dhātu. 
The dhātus of mind are neither primary matter nor secondary matter; the same for the dharmadhātu, with the exception of avijñapti. 
According to the Bhadanta Buddhadeva, the ten āyatanas, that is, the five organs of consciousness and their objects, are solely primaty matter. Ñ An inadmissible opinion. 
The Sutra teaches, in a limited manner, that there are four primary elements, and it defines them in a limited manner as being solidity, fludity, etc.,. 
solidity is not preceived by the organ of sight. 
Further, that the tangible is primary matter and secondary rmatter, and that the nine other materials āyatanas are solely secondary matter, results from the same words of the Sūtra: Oh Bhikṣus, the eye, the internal source of consciousness , a subtle matter derived from the primary elements, material sources, invisible, capable of being struck, and so on with respect to the four other material organs which are described in the same terms. 
With respect to the first four objects: The visible matter is an external sources of consciousness, deriving from the primary elements, material, visible, capable of being struck. 
The same with respect to odor and taste. 
Tangibles are an external source of consciousness, the four primary elements and matter deriving from the four primary elements. One can maintain that the five organs are primary matter, for the Sūtra says: 
Eveṟything that is in the eye, a ball of flesh, is solid, resistant. 
Here the Sūtra refers to the ball of flesh which is not separable from the organ of sight, and not to the organ itself. 
Four external dhātus alone are burned. 
Not the organs, by reason of their translucidity, like the sparkle of a jewel. 
kkk Among the eighteen dhātus, how many are fruition, accumulation, or outflowing? How many are conjoined with material substances? And how many ate momentary? 
Five internal dhātus are of fruition and accamulation. 
There is a problem to be examined. 
He can obtain the otrgan of sight and the visual consciousness either separately or together. 
he remains in possession of the visual consciousness acquired in the course of his intermediary existence or at conception, a being in Kāmadhātu who has taken possession of the organ of sight and who has not lost it, a being born in the heaven of the First Dhyāna, a being born in a heaven of the thtee higher Dhyāna who manifests a visual consciousness of the sphere of the First Dhyānas: 
sksk How many are external? 
With the exception of visible matter, etc. 
Twelve dhātus are personal, the six organs and the six conscious nesses; six dhātus are external, the six objects of consciousness, visible matter, etc. 
But how can one speak of petsonal dhātus, or of external dhātus, since there is no āmnan? 
Ī The mind is the object of the idea of self, the mind is what persons falsely grasp for their self. 
Compare, for example, these two line of Scripture: The sage obtains heaven, by means of a well subdued āman, and It is good to subdue the mind; the subdued miṇd brings happiness. 
Now the organs and the consciousnesses are close to the mind to which one gives the name of āman: 
they are in fact the point of support of them; then one qualifies therm as internal, or personal, whereas the visible and the other objects of the consciousness are held to be external. 
Among the eighteen dhātus,how many are sabhāga, active or in mutual assistance? How many are asabhāga, analogous to sabhāga? 
The dhātu called dharmas is sabhāga. 
An object of consciousness is qualified as sabhāga when the consciousness which constitutes its proper sphere arises or is destined to atise with respect to it. 
The word also shows that they are both s2bhāga and tatsabhāga. 
How many can be abandoned by Meditation or repeated consideration of the Ttuths, in other words, by the Path of Meditation or by Meditation? 
Ten and five aṟe abandoned through Meditation. 
The ten material dhātus, orgaṉs and objects, and the five sense consciousnesses, ate abandoned through Meditation. 
ten anuśayas with the coexistents, prāptis, etc.; 2. 
the impure avrñapti with its following. 
Thus, according to us, both are abandoned through Seeing. 
ṣkṅk Among the eighteen dhāus, how many are view, how many are not view? The organ of sight and part of the dharmadhātu are view. How many ? Eight parts. What are these eight parts of the dharmadhātu? The five false views, of which the first is belief in a self and Worldly correct views, that is to say, prajñā associated with the mental consciousness, good but impure. 
It is not the consciousness of which this organ is the point of support. But then, that which sees is indeed the consciousness which is supported by the organ of sight. For obscured visible matter is not seen. Such is the opinion of the Vaibhāṣikas. No, foṛ visible matter, obscured by a wall or any other screen, is not seen. Now the consciousness is nonmaterial, not capable of being repulsed. Thus, if the visual consciousness were to see, it would see even the visible matter obscured by a screen. 
One terms seen that which is attained by the organ of sight, that which falls within its line of vision and is perceived by the visual consciousness. 
Is visible matter seen by one eye or by both eyes? 
Visible matter is seen by the two eyes also, as the clarity of sight demonstrates. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say: Seen also by the two eyes; the two eyes being open, sight is clearer. 
Furthermore, when one eye is covered and the other half closed, oṉe perceives two moons; but not when one completely closes or half closes that which was open, or when one opens or completely closes that which has been half closed. 
One should not conclude that the visual consciousness is twofold from the fact that its point of support is twofold, for the consciousness is not material like pa; not having a mass it is not situated in a place. 
ḵskḵ We have said that the organ of sight sees, that the organs of hearing, smell, taste, and touch each perceive their objects; and that the mental organ discerns. Do these organs attain their object, ? 
The organ of sight, the organ of hearing, and the mental organ know their object without attaining it. 
The organ of sight sees visible matter at a distance: 
it does not see the eyesalve placed on the eye; the organ of hearing hears distant sounds. The mental organ, being nonmaterial, does not enter into a close physical relationship with its object. 
If the organs of sight and hearing must necessarily enter into a close relationship with theit object, then ascetics in dḥyāna would not attain divine sight or divine hearing, in the same way that they do not attain a divine sense of smell. 
If the oṟgan of sight sees an object with which it is not in a close relationship, why does it not see visible matter which is too distant or obscured? 
Why does a magnet not attract all iron? Moreover, the same difficulty remains even if you suppose that the organ enters into a close relationship with the object: 
why does the organ of sight not see the eye salve, the brush, and all the objects with which it is in close relationship? 
Or else, let us say that the same rule applies to the organ of sight and to the organs of smell and taste: 
the organ of smell senses only the smell with which it is in close relationship, but it does not sense the odor which constitutes the organ itself; in the same way, the oṟgan of sight sees only certain distant visible matter, but it does not see all distant visible matter. 
According to certain rnasters, from the fact that one hears noise from the interior of the ear, one can conclnde that the oṟgan of hearing hears the sound with which it is ia close relationship, as it also hears distant sound. 
The other three organs, smell, taste, touch, perceive an object with which they are in close relationship. 
For smell, this results from the fact that inbreathing is necessary to the pe1ception of the smell. 
The question is therefore posed whether the atoms do or do not touch one another. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr say that atoms do not touch one another; if atoms touch one another in their totality, things, that is to say, the different atoms, would mix with one another, that is, they would only occupy one place; and if atoms touched each other in one spot, they would thus have parts: 
But, if there is no contact among the atoms, how is sound produced? 
if atoms were to touch one aṉother, a hand in collision with a hand would dissolve into it, a rock in collision with another rock would dissolve into it, as gum dissolves into gum. 
But if atoms do not touch one another, why does an agglomeration of atoms not fall to pieces when it is struck? 
Because the wind element holds it together. 
A certain wind element has dispersion for its function, for example the wind of the period of the destruction of the world; a certain wind element has coṇcentration for its function, for example the wind at the period of creation. 
One says that three organs attain their object, because their object is in a state of nonseperation from them. What does nonseperation consist of? 
It consists of the fact that there is nothing which is in the interval between the two. 
This is also what is meant by to attain, Furthermore, as agglomerations have parts, there is no difficulty in agglomerations touching one another. 
Anḍ, fromn this point of view the definitions of the Vbhāṣā are justified: 
Does a thingincontact arise having for its cause a thingin contact, or does it arise having for its cause a thingoutsideofcontact? 
Same question with respect to a thingoutsideofcontact. 
Sometimes a thing outsideofcontact arises from a thingincontact, as when a thingin contact falls to pieces. 
Sometimes a thingincontact arises from a thingoutsideofcontact, as when a thingoutsideofcontact comes together. 
Śometimes a thingincontact arises from a thingoutsideof contact, as when agglomerations come together. 
And sometimes a thingoutsideofcontact arises from a thingoutsideofcontact, for example the particles of dust suspended in the void of a window. 
The Bhadanta Vasumitra says: If atoms touched one another, they would therefore endure two moments. Opinions of Vasubandhu. 
it is evidently thus when one sees the circle of fire delineated by an ember;:or else do the organs indifferently grasp an object of their dimension and of a different dimension? 
The three organs of which the organ of smell is the first, grasp an object of their dimension. 
A given number of atoms of an organ, attaining the same number of atoms of an object, produce consciousness. This also holds for smell, taste, and touch. 
Sometimes the object is smaller than the organ, as when one sees the end of a hair; sometimes equal to the organ, as when one sees a grape; and sometimes larger than the organ, when, the eye being hardly open, one sees a mountain. 
The same for sound; one hears the buzzing of a mosquito, the noise of thunder, etc. 
The question does not arise for the mental organ which is nonmateṟial. 
How are atoms of the different organs arranged? 
The atoms of the organ of sight are arranged on the pupil like the flower of the cumin, that is to say, on the surface; they are covered again by a membrane, of translucent colot, which prevents them from dispersing. 
According to another opinion, they ate arranged in depth, iike a pill; being translucent, like crystal, they do not obscure one another. 
The atoms of the organ of hearing are arranged in the interior of the bhūrja, that type of birch leaf which is found within the ear. 
The atoms of the organ of smell are arranged within the interior of the nostril. 
These fiṛst three organs from a garland. 
The atoms of the organ of taste are arranged on the upper surface of the tongue in the form of a halfmoon. 
In the middle of the tongue a space the dimension of the end of a hair is not occupied by the atoms of the organ. 
The atoms of the organ of touch have the shape of the body. 
The atoms of the female oṟgan are like a drum. The atoms of the male organ are like a thumb. 
The atoms of the organ of sight can be sabhāga in their totality; asabhāga in their totality; some sabhāga, others tatsabhāga. 
The same for the organs of hearing, smell and taste. 
But, it does not occur that the atoms of the organ of touch are all sabhāga; even when the body is enveloped in the flames of Pratapana hell , an infinite number of atorns are tatsabhāga; for, says the School, the body would fall to pieces if all the atoms of touch were to work at the same time. 
It does not occur that consciousness is produced by one atom of organ, or by one atom of object. 
In fact the five categories of consciousness have agglomerations for their support and their object. 
It results from thiis that atoms are not perceived; they are thus imperceptible. 
kkk The object of the fitst five consciousnesses is simultaneous with them; the object of the sixth consciousness is either eaṟlier than īit, simultaneous with it, or later than it; in other words, it is past, present, or future. Does the same hold for the point of support of the consciousness? 
No, it does not. 
Why is this?Relative to consciousness, the point of support of the sixth consciousness is past. 
The sole point of support of the mental consciousness is the mental oṟgan, this is, the consciousness which has just perished. 
the sense organ, organ of sight, etc., which is simultaneous with consciousness; and 2. 
the mental organ, which is past at the moment when the consciousness arises. 
The five consciousnesses thus have two points of support. 
ls that which is the point of support of the viṣual consciousness at the same time the immediately antecedent and parallel cause of this consciousness? 
Four cases: 
the organ of sight, which is solely a poiat of support; 2. 
the consciousness which has just perished, or mental organ, which is at one and the same time a point of support and an immediately antecedent cause; and 4. 
sksk Visual consciousness depends on the organ of sight and on visible matteṟ. 
The point of support of a coṇsciousness is its oṟgaṉ, for consciousness changes according to the modality of the orṟgan. 
The object, on the contrary, has no influence on the modality of consciousness. Con sequently, it is the organ, and not the object, which is the point of support of consciousness. 
Why is it designated by the name of its organ eye consciousness. 
For this reasoṉ, and also because it is its own, it is the organ which gives its name to the consciousness. 
The consciousness takes the name of an organ because the organ is its point of support. Because the organ is its own: the organ of a certain person is the point of support of the visual consciousness of this person alone. 
Visible matter, on the contraty, is general, for a certain visible thing is perceived by both the visual consciousness and the mental coascious ness, by one person and by another person. 
One says in the world sound of the drum, and not sound of the stick; sprout of the wheat, and not sprout of the field. 
Do the body, the orgen of sight, visible matter and consciousness belong to the same stage or to different stages? 
When a being born in Kamadhātu sees, by means of an organ of sight of his stage, visible matteṛ 
When this being sees visible matter of his stage, by means of an oṟgan of sight of the First Dhyāna, then the body and visible matter are of Kamadhātu, but his organ and consciousness are of the First Dhyāna; if he sees visible matter of the First Dhyāna by means of the same oṟgan, then only the body is in Kāmadhātu; the other three are of the First Dhyāna. 
When this being sees visible matter of Kāmadhātu by means of an organ of sight of the Second Dhyāna, then the body and visible matter are in Kāmadhātu, the organ is in the Second Dhyāna, and conscious ness is in the First Dhyāna; if he sees, by the same organ, visible matter of the Second Dhyāna, then the body is in Kāmadhātu, the oṟgan and visible matter are in the Second Dhyāna, and consciousness is in the First Dhyāna. 
Oṇṉe would explain in the same way these cases where a being born in Kāmadhātu sees, by the organ of sight of the Third or Fouṟth Dhyāna, visible matter of these same stages or of a lower stage. 
When a being in the First Dhyāna sees visible matter of his stage by means of an organ of sight of his stage, then body, organ, visible matter and consciousness are of the same stage; if he sees visible matter of a lower stage by the same oṟrgan, then the body, organ, and consciousness are of his stage, the First Dhyāṇa. 
When this being sees visible matter of his stage by means of an organ of sight of the Second Dhyna, then three are of his stage , but the organ is in the Second Dhyāṇna; if he sees, by the same organ, visible matter of Kāmadhātu, then the body and con sciousness are of his stage , visible matter is in a lower stage, and the organ is in the ŚSecond Dhyāna; if he sees visible matter of the Second Dhyāna by the same organ, then the body and consciousness are of his stage , but the organ and the visible matter are in the Second Dhyāna. 
Ope would explain in the same way these cases where a being in the First Dhyāna sees, by means of an organ of sight of the Third or the Fourth Dhyāṇna, visible matter of these stages or of a lower stage. 
According to these same principles, we can explain those cases where a being in the Second, Third or Fourth Dhyāṇa, sees, by means of an organ of sight of his stage or of a different stage, visbble matter of his stage or of a different stage. 
The organ of sight is not inferior to the body. 
The body, the organ of sight, and visible matter can belong to five stages: Kāmadhātu, aṇd the Four Dhyānas. The consciousness of sight is of two stages only: Kārmadhātu and the First Dhyāṇna. 
Thus stated, the organs of sight which a certain being uses can be of the stage to which the body of this being belongs, that is, of the stage where this being has arisen; it can be of a higher stage; but it caṉ never be lower. 
Visible matter and consciousness, through relationship to the organ, is either of the same stage or lower, but never of a higher stage. Visible matter is not higher than the oṟgan. Visible matter of a higher stage cannot be seen by an oṟgan of sight of a lower stage. Nor coṉsciousness. A visual consciousness of a higher stage cannot arise from an organ of a lower stage. 
Visible matter, in relation to consciousness, and visible matter as well as consciousness, through relation to the body, is of all types. Visible matter, through relationship with the visual consciousness, is either equal, or higher, or lower. Visible matter and the visual consciousness, through relationship to the body, are as visible matter is through relationship to the consciousness, this is to say, equal, higher, or lower. 
The same holds for the organ of hearing. The organ of hearing is not lower than the body, sound is not higher than the organ of hearing, nor is auditory consciousness; sound, through relationship to this latter, and sound and consciousness through relationship to the body, can be of all types. 
Three oṟgans belong to their own stage. With respect to the organs of smell, taste, and touch, the body, oṟgan, object and consciousness belong exclusively to the stage where the being is born. After having formulated this general rule, the author mentions one exception. 
The consciousness of touch is of its own stage or of a lower stage. The body, the organ of touch and tangibles are always of the stage where the being is born. 
If a body belongs to the first five stagesKāmadhātu and the Four Dhyānas, then the mental organ, the dharmadhātu, and the mental consciousness can be, in absoṟption or at conception, of any stage, all the stages not being moreover the same in each case. 
kxkṣk There are eighteen dhāus aṇd six consciousness. Which dhātu is discerned by which consciousness? 
Five external dhātus are discerned by two types of coṉsciousness. 
Visible matter, sounds, odots, tastes and tangibles are known respectively, by the consciousness of sight, hearing, smell, taste, and touch. 
Each of these external dhātus is thus discerned by two consciousness. 
The thirteen other dhātus, not being of the sphere of the sense coṉsciousness, are discerned by a single mental consciousness. 
No dhātu is totally eternal. But Unconditioned things are eternal. Unconditioned things form part of the dharmadhātu. Thus one part of the dharmadhātu is eternal. 
skk How many of the dhātus are indriyas, that is to say, predominate ? 
The twelve internal dḥātus and one part of the dharma dhātu are indriyas. A Sūtra eṇumerates twentytwo ndriyas: organ of sight, 2. organ of hearing, . 
Among the twentytwo ndriyas, elevennamely the vital organ , the five faculties of sensation , the five moral faculties aṉnd one part of the last three, form part of the dharmadhātu. 
The twelve internal dhātus are the five organs of sense consciousness which form five dhātus and five ndriyas ; the mental organ , that is to say, the sixth ṉdriya, which make up seven dhātus; and one part of the last three ndriyas. 
The five remaining dhātus and one part of the dharmadhātu are not ndriyas. 
The root :di signifies paramaiśvarya or supreme authority. 
According to the School, five are predominate with regard to things; i. 
Each of the five ndriyas of which the organ of sight is the firstthe five organs of sense consciousnessis a predominating influence with regard to the beauty of the person; with regard to the protection of the person; with regard to the production of a consciousness and the mental states associated with this consciousness; and with regard to their special mode of activity. 
The organs of seeing and hearing are predominating influences with regard to beauty, for the body in which they are missing is not beautiful ; with regard to protectioōn, for by seeing and hearing, a person avoids that which would destroy him; with regard to the production of the seeing and hearing consciousnesses, and of the mental states associated with them; and with regard to their special activities, ie., seeing visible things and hearing sounds. 
The organs of smell, taste, and sensation are predominating influences with regard to beauty, as above; with regard to protection, through the consumption of solid foods ; with regard to the production of their three coṉscious nesses; and with regard to their special activities, i.e., perceiving smells, tasting tastes, and touching tangibles. 
Four ndriyas, pamely the two sexual organs, the vital organ, and the mental organ are each a predominating influence with regard to two things. The sexual organs are the predominating influence with tegard to the distribution of living beings: it is by reason of these two that living beings form the categories of male and female; and with regard to the differentiation of living beings: 
by reason of these two orgams, there are, among the sexes, differences of physical form, voice, and manner of being, Some other masters do not admit this explanation. 
Thus, if the sexual organs are the predominating influences from two points of view, they are the predominating influences with regard to defilement and purification: 
the world and the dharmas submit to the mind. 
The five ndriyas of sensation and the eight indriyas of faith, and the three pure faculties, ii.10 c. Five and eight with regard to defilement and to purification. are, tespectively, predominant with regard to defilement and to purification. 
The sensations are predominant with regard to defilement, for the defilements, lust, etc., atiach themselves to the sensations, and take shelter therein. 
Faith and the seven other faculties are predominant with regard to purification, for it is by them that one obtains purity. 
According to other masters , the sensations are also predominant with regard to purification, so that the Sūtra says: 
swkhiasya citta samādhīyate, duḥkhopaniṣacchradḍhā aṇṉ naiṣkramyāfritaḥ saumamasyādhayaḥ Such is the explanation of the Vaibhāsikas. 
Here predominance belongs to the con sciousnesses, visual consciousness, hearing consciousness, etc.; and it is after having distinguished that one has avoided anything harmful that one takes solid food. 
By reason of their predominance with regard to the perception of their special object, with regard to all objects, six organs. 
That is, by reason of their predorminance through their affinity to the si consciousnesses. 
The five organs, the first of which is the organ of sight, are predominant through their affinity to the five sense consciousnesses, visual consciousness, etc., each one of which distin guishes its own object, visible things, etc. The mental orṟgaṉ is predominant with regard to the mental conscionsness which dis tinguishes all objects. It is in this way that the six sense organs are predominant. 
But, we might say, the sense objects, visibles, etc., are also predominant through their affinity to the consciousness, and as a consequence, should they not also be considered as ndriyas? 
They are not predominant merely by this. 
Predomiṇance means predominant power. The eye is predominant, for it exeṛcises this predominance with regard to the arising of the consciousness that knows visible things, being the common cause of all consciousnesses of visible things, whereas each visible thing merely aids the arising of but one consciousness; the visual consciousness is clear or obscure, active or well, accordingly as the eye is active or weak: 
now visible things do not exercise a similar influence. 
It is by reason of their predominance in masculinity and femininity that one must distinguish two sexual organs within the body. 
There are two separate sexual organs within the kāyendriya, or the oṟgan of touch. 
These two organs are not distinct from the kāyendriya: they too cognize tangible things. But there is a part of the kāyendriya that receives the name of male organ or female organ because this part exercises predominance over masculinity or femininity. 
Femininity is the physical form, the voice, the hearing, and the dispositions ptoper to women. 
Since the differences of these two natures are due to these parts of the body, we know that these two paxts are predominant through their two natures. 
The five sensations are predominant with regard to defilement, for the Sūtra says, Lust finds its shelter in the sensation of pleasure; hatred, in the sensation of displeasure; confusion,in the sensation of indifference. 
The five facaltiesfaith, force, memory, absorption, and discernmentare predominant with regard to purification, for, through their power, the defilements are disturbed and the Path is brought about. 
By reason of their predominance with regard to ascending acquisitions, with regard to Nirvāṇa, etc., the anājñātamājñās yāmīndriya, the ajñendriya, and the āgñātāvīndriya, are likewise. Likewise, that is, these three are, likewise, considered as pre dominating influences or ndriyas. 
If you regard a pre dominating influence as an indriya, ignorance and the other parts of pratityasamutpāda would be ṉdriyas, for these causes are predominant with regard to their effects. 
The support of the mind; that which subdivides, prolongs, and defiles this support; that which prepares the purification and which does purify it: 
The support of the mind consists of the six organs of consciousness, from the organ of sight to the mental organ. 
This sixfold support is differenciated by reason of the sexual oṟgans. It lasts for a time by reason of the vital organ. 
It is defiled by reason of the five sensations. Its purification is prepared by the five moral faculties, faith, etc. It is purified by the three pure faculties. The dharmas that possess the characteristic of being predominant with regard to the constitution, the subdivision, etc. 
This characteristic is missing in other dharmas, in voice, etc. 
Or rather there are fourteen ndriyas, support of transmigra tion, origin, duration, enjoyment of this support; the other indriyas have the same function with regard to Nirvāṇa. 
The expression or rather introduces the explanation of other mastets. 
The six organs , from the oṟgan of sight to the mental organ, are the support, the raison detre of sasāra. It is through the sexual oṟgans that the saḍāyataṉas aṟise. 
It is through the vitaḻ oṟgan that the saḍāyatanas last. 
It is through the five sensations that the saḍāyatanas eṉjoy. On the other hand: 
The five faculties:faith, force, memory, absorption, discernment,are the support of Nirvāṇa. 
Nirvāṇa is experienced by the third pure faculty, zjñatā vīṇāriya, for, through this faculty, one experiences the satisfaction and wellbeing of deliverance. 
The voice is not predominant with respect to words, for woṟds suppose a certain instruction; 23. 
Hands and feet are not pre dominant with regard to grasping and walking, for grasping and walking are simply the hands and feet arising a secood moment in another place and with a new figure. 
On the other hand, we see that hands and feet are not indispensable for grasping and walking, for example with snakes. 
The anus is not predominant with regard to the expulsion of matter, for heavy things always fall in a void; further, wind pushes this matter and makes it go out; 5. 
The sexual parts are not predominant with regard to pleasure for pleasure is produced by the sexual organs. 
If you consider the hands, the feet, etc., as ṉdriyas, you must then place the throat, the teeth, the eyelids, and the joints, whose function it is to swallow, to chew, to open and close, to fold up and to extend the bones, among the ndriyas. 
In this way, everything that is a cause, which exercises its action with regard to its effects, would be an indriya. 
But we must reserve the name of indrya to whatever possesses predominance. 
kkōk We have defined the organs of consciousness and the sexual organs ; the vital organ will be explained with the cittaviprayuktas among which it is placed; the five faculties:faith, force, etc., being mental states, will be explained with the mental states : 
We shall examine here the organs of sensation and the pure faculties which are not found anywhere else. 
Disagreeable bodily sensation is the ṉdriya of pain. Disagreeable is that which does harm. Sensation in relation to the five organs of sense consciousness, and which does harm, is called duḥkhenāriya. 
Agreeable is that which does good, which comforts, is beneficent. Āgreeable bodily sensation is termed swkhendṛriya. In the Third Dhyāna, agreeable mental sensation is also an nriya of pleasure. 
Āgreeable mental sensation of the Third Dhyāna is also called sukhendriya, an indriya of pleasure. This name, moreover, is reserved for agreeable bodily sensation; but in the Third Dhyāṇna, bodily sensation is absent because the five sense consciousnesses are not there. 
Then, when one speaks of the sukha or pleasure of the Third Dhyāna, one means agreeable mental sensation. Moreover, it is satisfaction. Moreover, that is, in the stages below the Third Dhyāna, in Kāmadhātu and in the first two Dhyānas, agreeable mental sensation is satisfaction or the ndriya of satisfaction. 
In the Third Dhyāna, agreeable mental sensation is calm and tranquil, because the ascetic, in this Dhyāṇna, is detached from joy: hence it is pleasure and not satisfaction. 
Joy, is not distinct frorn satisfaction. 
Disagreeable mental sensation is dissatisfaction. 
Intermediate sensation, which neither comforts nor harms, is the sensation neitherpainnorpleasure. This is what is termed the sensation or ndrya of equanimity. 
Is this seṇsation bodily or mental? 
It is both. 
Either bodily or mental, the sensation of equanimity is equally free from any intellec tual element. 
Then we should distinguish ndriyas relative to agreeable and disagreeable sensations accordingly as these sensation are bodily or mental. 
Accordingly as the agreeable or disagreeable sensations are bodily or mental, they do good or harm according to a mode of operation that is special to them, and they are not felt in the same way. 
The sensation of equanimity creates neither good or harm; it is not differenciated; mental or physical, it is felt in the same way. 
Nine ndṛiyas, in the Paths of Seeing, of Meditation and of the Aśaikṣa, constitute three ṉdriyas. 
kkk We have explained the specific characteristics of the ndriyasr. 
The last three indriyas are exclusively clean or pure. 
Stain and vice are synonyns. 
The material organs, the vital oṟgan and the two painful sensations are imputre; The material organs are seven in number: 
the five organs, of seeing, etc, plus the two sexual organs, for all these seven organs are included in rūpaskandha. 
The mental oṟgan, the sensation of pleasure, the sensation of satisfaction, the sensation of equanimity, and the five moral facalties are nine ṉdriyas that caṉ be either pure or impure. 
Accoṟding to other masters , the five moral faculties are solely pure, for the Blessed One said: Whosoever is completely lacking, to whatever degree, any of these five ndriyas, faith, etc., I declare him to be a person outside, one who belongs to the class of Pṛthagjanas. Hence anyone who possesses them, to whatever degree, is an Āryaṉ; hence they are pure. 
This text is not proof, for the Blessed One is speaking here of a person in whom the five pure moral faculties are absent. 
In fact, in the passage that precedes the quotation in question, the Blessed One defines the Āryapudgalas with reference to the five moral faculties. 
Or rather, if this passage speaks of moral faculties in general, we would remark that there are two types of Pṛthagjana : 
those outside, and those inside; the first have cut off the roots of good , whereas the second have not cut them off. 
I declare him to be a person outside, one who belongs to the class of Pṛthagjanas. 
On the other hand, according to the Sūtra, even before setting into motion the Wheel of the Dharma , there were in the world persons of sharp, medium, and weak faculties. 
Hence the mmoral faculties of faith, etc., are not necessarily and exclusively pure. 
Finally, the Blessed One said: If I do not know truly the origin, the disappearance, the advantages, the disadvantages, the escape of the five faculties of faith, foṛce, etc., I shall not be liberated, gone out, disassociated, delivered from the world of gods, Māras, and Brahmās, of a worId wherein there are Brahmins and monks; I shall not reṣide with a mind free from error. 
Hence the moral faculties of faith, force, etc., can be either pure or impure. 
kkḥ Among the ndriyas, how many are retribution , and how many are not retribution? 
The vital organ is always retribution. 
The vital energies that a Bhikṣu Arhat stabilizes or increases, are evidently the vital organ. Of what action is the vital organ thus stabilized or prolonged the retribution? 
The Mātaśāstra says: How does a Bhikṣu stabilize the vital energies? 
An Arhat in possession of supernormal power , in possession of the mastery of mind, ie., one who is asamayavimukta , gives, either to the Saṅgha or to a person, things useful to life, clothing, pots, etc. 
after having given these things, he applies this thought to his life; he then enters into the Fourth or prāntakoṭika Dhyāṇa ; coming out of the absorption, he produces the thought and pronounces the words: 
May this action which should produce a retributioninjoy be transformed and produce a retribution inlifeP Then the action which should produce a retributioninjoy produces a retributioninlife. 
Accoṟding to them,, there is a remnant of the result of retributioninlife which should have ripeṉed in a previous life, but which was interrupted by death before its time. 
How does a Bhiksu cast off the vital energies? 
An Arhat in possession of supernormal powers. enters into the Fourth Dhyāna. ; coming out of this absorption, he produces the thought and pronounces these words: May the action that should produce a retributioninlife be transformed and produce a retributioninjoy! Then the action that should produce a retribution inlife produces a retributioninjoy. The Bhadaūṇta Ghoṣaka said: 
By the force of the prāntakoṭika Dhyāṇna that this Arhat produced, the primary elements of Rūpadhātu aṟe attracted and introduced iato his body. 
Along with the Sautṛāntikas, we say that the Arhats, through their mastery in absorption, cause the projection of the constitutive primary elements of the organs for a certain period of duration, a projection due to previous actions, to cease; inversely, they produce a new projection, born of absorption. 
Why does the Arhat prologue his vital energies? For two reasons: with a view to the good of others, and with a view to the ionger duration of the Dharma. 
He sees that his life is going to end; he sees that others are incapable of assuring these two ends. 
Why does the Aṛhat cast off his vital energies? 
he sees that his dwelling in this world has only a small utility for the good of others, and so sees himself tormented by sickness, etc. 
As the stanza says: If the religious life has been well practiced, and the Way well cultivated, at the end of his life, he is happy, as at the disappearance of sickness. 
Who, and in what place, extends or casts off his life? 
In the three Dvīpas , male or female, a asamayavimukia Arhat who possesses prāntakoṭika Dhyāna : in fact, he possesses the mastery of absoṟrption and he is free from the defilements. 
According to the Sūtra, the Blessed One, after having extended the jīvita saskāras, casts off the saskāras of āyus One asks 1. 
Accoṟding to certain masters, there is no difference. 
In fact, the Mūlaśāṣṭra says: What is the vital organ? 
It is the 5 in the Three Dhātus. 
According to others the expression āyuḥsaskāras designates life which is the result of actions in a previous life; the expression jāvitasaskāras designates life which is the result of actions in this life. 
According to other masters, the āyuḥsaskāras are that by which existence lasts; the jñvitasaskāras are that by which life is prolonged for a little while. On the second point: The Sūtra uses the pluraḻ because the Saint extends or casts off many saskāras. 
There is no advantage, in fact, in extending a moment, or in casting off a moment: 
According to another opinion, the pilural condemns the teaching according to which the jāvita or the āyus is an entity susceptible of duratioṉ. 
If it were otherwise, the Sūtra would not use the expression the jāvitaskandhas; it would say The Blessed One extends somne jṝvias, and casts off some āyus. 
Why does the Blessed One cast off and extend ? 
With the aim of showing that he possesses mastery over death, he casts off death; with the aim of showing that he possesses mastery over life, he extends it. 
He extends it for a period of three months, no more, no less; after three months, there is nothing more to do for his followers, after his task is well achieved, for, short of three months, he would leave his task unachieved. 
Any Bhikṣu who has well cultivated the four supernorrmnal powers , can live, if he so desires, a ēalpa or more. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: The Blessed Oṇe casts off or extends with the aim of showing that he triunphs over the Māra who is the skandhas, and over the Māra who is death. 
In the first watch of the night, under the Bodhi Tree, he has already triumphed over the Māra who is a demon, and, in the third watch, over the Māra who is the defilements. 
With the exception of the last eight and dissatisfaction. With the exception of the vital organ, which is always retribution, and of the nine that will be mentioned below which are never retribution, the remaining twelve are of two types, sometimes retribu tioṉ, and sometimes nonretribution. 
This refers to the seven material oṟgans, to the mental organ and to the four sensations, the sensation of dissatisfaction being excluded. 
The seven material orgaṇs are not retribution to the extent that they arise from accumulation. In other cases, they are retributioṉ. 
The mental oṟgan and the four organs of sensation are not retribution 1. 
It refers to an action with which dissatisfaction is associated. 
Now such is not the case with retribution. 
skṣ Among the twentytwo indriyas, how many have retribution? How many are without retribution? 
Dissatisfaction always has retribution, for, on the one hand, it is never neutral, being the result of a concept ; but, on the other hand, it is never puṟe, never being produced in a state of absoṟption. 
The first eight ṉdriyas never have retribution, because they are neutral; the last three neveṛ 
The mental oṟrgan , and faith and its following; 3. 
The mental organ, the sensations of pleasure, satisfaction, and indifference, have retribution when they are bad or goodimpure; they are without retribution when they are neutral or.pure. 
fk Among the twentytwo indriyas, how many are good, how many are bad, and how many are neutral? 
Eight are good; Eight, faith, etc., the anājñāṭamājñasyāmīndāriya, etc., are only good. Dissatisfaction is of two types; Dissatisfaction is good or bad. 
The mental organ, and the sensations,with the excep tion of dissatisfactionare of three types. The mental organ and the four sensations are good, bad, or neutral. The others, of one type. The organ of sight, etc., the vital organ, and the sexual oṟrgans are neutral. 
ksksk Among the twentytwo indriyas, how many belong to each of the three spheres of existence? 
All of the ndriyas are in the sphere of Kāmadhātu, with the exception of the last three, the immaculate or pure ndriyas: 
Thus nineteen ndriyas, excluding the last three, are in the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
The sexual oṟgans and the two disagreeable sensations are absent from Rūpadhātut 2. 
Nevertheless the Sūtra says: 
That a female being is Brahmā such does not happen, that is impossible. That a male being is Brahmāsuch happens, that is possible. 
They possess the other aspects of masculinity that one sees amoṅg the males of Kāmadhātu, namely bodily form, sound of the voice, etc. 
transparency of the body, from whence there is absence of pain produced by hurt; and because of the absence of bad actions liable to retribution, from whence the absence of suffering arisen from retribution.. 
The sensation of dissatisfaction is absent because beings in Rūpadhātu aṟe penetrated by calm; and because all causes of iṟṟitation aṟe absent. 
kksk Among the twentytwo āndriyas, how many are abandoned through Seeing the Truths? How many through Meditation? How many are notabandoṇed? 
The mental oṟgan and three sensations belong to three categories; 1. 
The mental organ, the sensations of pleasure, satisfaction and equanimity, are of three types. 
Dissatisfaction is abandoned through Seeing and through. Meditation, for, never being pure, it is always an object of abandoning. 
Nine ndriyas, amely the five sense organs and the two sexual organs, the vital oṟrgan, and the sensation of dissatisfaction, are only of the class abandoned through Mediation, for the first eight are not soiled; the ninth does not arise from the mind ; and all are always impure. 
Five are either abandoned through Meditation or are not abandoned; 4. The five indriyas, the first of which is faith, are not soiled, and hence are tot abandoned through Seeing; being able to be pure, they are able to be not the object of abandoning. 
The last three are not aban doned, because they are pure, and dharmas without defects are not to be rejected. 
kk How many indriyas, having retribution for their nature, do beings in the different spheres of existence possess from their origins? 
l In the Kamas, beings possess from their origins two indriyas that are from retribution, The organ of touch and the vital organ. 
In Kāmadhātu, beings that are born from a womb, from eggs, and from perspiration possess from their origin, ie., from their conception, two indriyas which are from retribution, namely the organ of touch and the vital organ. 
Because, at conception, both of these are always soiled; hence they are not from retribution, they are not retribution. 
Beings without sex, namely beings at the beginning of the cosmic age , possess six: the five organs of sense consciousness, plus the vitaḻ oṟgan. 
Or seven. 
Beings with sex possess seven inriyas, like the gods. 
Oṟ eight Bisexual beings possess eight indriyas. 
But can apparitional beings be bisexual? 
Yes, in bad rebirths. 
In Rūpadhātu, six; Kāmadhātu is called the Kāmas, because of the primary role that belongs, in this sphere, to the āmaguṇas or objects of desire. 
Rūpadhātu is called the Rūpas, because of the primary roḷle of the rāpas. 
These calm deliverances, beyond the rpas. 
In Rūpadhātu, beings, from their origins, possess six indriyas which are from retribution, like apparitional beings without sex in Kāmadhātu. Above, one. Above means in Ārūpyadhātu. 
This sphere of existence is not situated above Rūpadhātu ; but it is said to be above it because it is superior to Rūpadhātu from the point of view of absorption: 
the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu are cultivated after those of Rūpadhātu; and because it outweights it from the point of view of its mode of existence, from the point of view of the duration of its existence. 
In this sphere of existence, beings initially possess one indriya which is of retribution, the vital organ. 
Now how many ndriyas perish at death? 
In Ārūpyadhātu,dying destroys the vital organ, the meṉtal organ, and the sensation of indifference; in Rūpadhātu, it destroys eight indriyas;, In Rūpadhātu one must add the five organs of sense consciousness, the organ of sight, etc. 
In the second case four ndriyas die lastly and together; the oṟgan of touch, the vital organ, the mental organ and the organ of indifference. 
A being in Arupadhatu, at death, abandons at the last moment the three xdriyas named in the Karika. 
We ask then how many ndriyas come into play in the acquisition of the results of the religious life. 
One obtains the two highest results through nine ndriyas, The highest results are the.resuilts of Śrotaāpanna and Arhat, for these two results are the first and last. 
He who possesses the mental organ or the vital oṟgan or the organ of equanimity necessarily possesses three indriyas. 
He who possesses these three orgaṅs may or may not possess the others. 
A being born in Ārūpyadhatu does not possess the organs of seeing, hearing, smelling, or taste. A being in Kāmadhātu does not possess these organs when he has not yet acquired them or when he has lost them. 
A being born in Ārūpyadhātu does not posses the organ of touch. 
A being born in Kāmadhātu cannot possess it when he bad not acqnired it or when he has lost it. 
A Prṛthagjana boṟṉ in the Fourth Dhyāna, in the Second Dhyāna, oṟ in the Ārūpyas, does ṉot possess the oṟrgan of pleasure. 
A Prthagjana born in the Fourth Dhyana, in the Third Dhyana, or in the Ārūpyas, does not possess the organ of satisfaction. 
6.4.being born in Rūpadhātu or in Ārūpyadhātu does not possess the organ of displeasure. 
A detached person does not possess the organ of dissatisfaction. 
A person who has cut off the roots of good does not possess the five moral faculties, faith, etc. 
Neither a Prṛthagjana nor a Saint in possession of a result possesses anājñātamājñāsyāmīndāriya. 
The Pṛthagjana and the Śaikṣas do not possess ājñātavīndriya. 
This enumeration peṟmits us to establish those ndryas possessed by those categories of nonspecified beings. 
He who possesses the organ of pleasure or the organ of touch certainly possesses four organs. 
He who possesses the organ of pleasure also possesses the vital oṟgan, the mental oṟgan, and the organ of equanimity. 
He who possesses one of the organs of sense conscious ṉess necessaṟily possesses five oṟgans. He who possesses the organ of sight also possesses the vital organ, the mental organ, the organ of indifference and the organ of touch. 
The same for him who possesses the organ of hearing, etc. 
He who possesses the organ of satisfaction also possesses the vital otgaṉ, the mental orgaṉ, the organ of equanimity and the organ of pleasure. 
But, one would ask, what sort of organ of pleasure can a being possess who is born in the heaven of the Second Dhyāna and who does not therein cultivate the absorption of the Third Dhyāna? 
i He possesses the organ of defiled pleasure of the Third Dhyāṇna. He who possesses the organ of displeasure certainly possesses seveḥ oṟgaṇs. This being evidently belongs to Kāmadhātu since he possesses the organ of displeasure. 
18d Whoever possesses the female organ, etc., necessarily possesses eight organs. 
He who possesses a sexual organ necessarily possesses, in addition to this organ, seven oṟgans, which have been specified in 18cd, for this being evidently belongs to Kāmadhātu. 
He who possesses the organ of dissatisfaction necessaly pos sesses, in addition to this organ, these same seven oṟgans. 
He who possesses one of the moral faculties can be born in any of the three spheres of existence; he necessarily ṇossesses the five moral faculties, which are seen together, plus the vital organ, the mental organ, and the organ of indifference. 
He who possesses ājñendriya ot ājñatavīndriya becessarily possesses eleven oṟgans. These are the vital organ, the mental organ, the organs of pleasure, satisfaction, and equanimity; the five moral faculties; and the eleventh, which is either ājñendriya or ājñātavīndriya. 
kskṣk What is the smallest number of organs it is possible for a being to possess? 
A being who is lacking any good at all possesses a minimum of eight organs, the organ of touch, sensations, the vital organ, and the mental organ. 
A being who is lacking good is one who has cut off the roots of good. 
It is the same with an ignorant person who is born in Ārūpyadhātu; The Prthagjana is termed ignorant. 
skṣkṣk What are the largest number of organs it is possible for a being to possess? 
At the maximum, nineteen: with the exception of the immaculate oṟgans. A bisexual being necessarily belongs to Kāmadhātu. 
He is not detached; he can possess the moral faculties; and he can possess all the organs of sense consciousness. 
The pure organs are termed immaculate in the Kārikā. 
are puṟe because they are not in relation with the vices either in the quality of an object, or through associatioṉ. 
The Āryan, not detached, can possess all the organs, The Āryan who is not detached, and hence a Śaikṣa and not an Arhat, possesses at most nineteen oṟgans. 
With the exception of a sexual organ and two pure organs. 
One must exchude either the male organ, or the female organ; one must exclude the gṝñātāvīndriya in all cases; furthermore, one must exclude the jñendriya when the Śaikṣa is in the path of Seeing the Ttuths, or the gjñāṣymīndriya when the Śaikṣa is in the Path of Absorption in the Truths. 
sskḵ The conditioned dharmas are, as we have seen, of different naturesphysical matter, sensation, ideas, etc. 
One asks if, in the same way, they arise independently one from another; or rather if, in ceṟtain cases, they necessarily arise together. 
Certain conditioned dharmas are divided into five categories: 
We shall first study the simultaneous arising of the material dharmas. 
In Kāmadhātu, an atom into which there is no entry of sound, and into which there is no entry of any organ, is made up of eight substances; By paramāṇu, we do not understand here a paramāṇu in its proper sense, a dravyaparamāṇu, an atom or monad which is a thing, a ṣsubstance , but a saghātaparamāṇu, a molecule, ie., the most subtle among the aggregates of matter, for there is nothing, among the aggregates of matter, which is more subtle. 
In Kāmadhātu, the molecule into which sound does not enter, and into which no organ enters, is made up of eight substances, but of 1n0 less than eight: 
namely the four primary elements , and the four derived elements,visibles , odors, tastes, and tangibles. 
When the organ of touch enters into it, it is made up of nine substances; 2. 
The molecule into which sound does not enter, but into which the organ of touch enters, admits of a ninth substance, the dravya which is the organ of touch. 
When any other organ enters into it, it is made up of ten substances. 
for the organs of seeing, hearing, etc. do not exist independently of the organ of touch nor do they constitute distinct gyatanas. 
When sound enters into the aforementioned aggregates, the total rises to nine, ten, or eleven substances: in fact, sound which is produced by the primary elements that form part of the organism does rot exist independently of the organs. 
If the four primaty elements, earth element, etc., are never disassociated, but coexist in every aggregate or molecule, how is it that, in any given aggregate, one perceives either solidity, or viscosity, or heat, or movement, and not these four substances or characteristics at one given time? 
Ñ Onṇe perceives in any given aggregate those substances that are most active in it, and not the others. 
In the same way, when one touches a pile of pieces of plants and needles,9 one perceives the needles; when oṉe eats some salted soup, one perceives the taste of salt. 
How does one know that a given aggregate consists of the primary elements when their presence in it is not perceived? 
The fire element exists in water, since this latter is more or less cold, a fact which is explained by the presence of the element of fire in a more or less great quantity. 
Thus ṛthe Blessed One was able to say , There are many dhāus or miṉeral substaṅces in this piece of wood. 
How does one prove the presence of coloṟ in wind? 
1 This is an object of faith , and not of reasoning. 
Or rather physical matter exists in the wind, since one perceives smell by reason of the contact of the wind with an object possessing an odor; now odor is never disassoci ated from physical matter. 
We know that odor and taste are missing in Rūpadhātu ; one must then reduce the number of molecules in Rūpadhātu. We wil have six, seven, or eight substances, and when sound intervenes, seven, eight, or nine. 
We shall not explain this in detail. 
it will consist of, we would say, not only of the rūpa of color but also of the rpa of figure , since many atoms are agglomerated in these. 
it will be, we should say, heavy or light, hard or soft; it could be cold or hunger, or thirst; it then consists of the dravyas that are either heaviness or lightness, softness or hardness, cold, hunger and thirst. 
But if, on the contrary, the Vaibhāṣikas mean to speak of dravyas as āyatanas, then the numbers are still too few, for the primary elements form part of the āyatana tangible ; one should then say that a molecule consists of four substances, visible, odor, taste, and touch. 
The word dravya is to be understood, in this case, as substances properly socalled, and as āyatanas. 
visibles, odors, tastes and tangibles. 
This answer is not good, for each of these four derived elements is supported by all four of the primary elements. 
The nature of all four of the primary elements remains the same, in that they support the derived element of odor or the derived elements of visibles, tastes, and tangibles. 
But why do you express yourself in an ambiguous manner and use the word dravya in two different meanings? 
Words are subject to caprice, but one must examine their meaning. 
The mind and its mental states are necessarily generated together. 
The mind and its mental states cannot be independently generated. 
All conditioned dharmas, physical matter, the mind , its mental states, and the susāras disassociated from the mind , are necessarily generated with their sarūskrtalakṣaṇasarising, dura tion, old age, and impermanence. 
Among the conditioned dharmas, those that are integral to living beings aṟre necessarily geṉnerated with the prāpti relative to each one of them. 
There is no prāpi for the others. 
That is why the Kārikā says sornetirnes. 
ksk What are the mental states? 
The mental states are of five types, mahābhūmikas, etc. 
have small defile ments for their sphere. 
Bhūmi or sphere signifies place of origin. The place of origin of a dharma is the bhūmi of this dharma. 
The dharmas that are inherent in the mahābhmi are called mahābhūmika, that is, the dharmas that are always found in all minds. 
24, Sensation, volition, motion, desire for action, contact, discernment, memory, the act of attention, approval, and absorption or concentration coexist in every mind. 
According to the Schoo1, all the ten dharmas exist in every moment of the mind. 
Vedanā is the threefold sensation, pleasant, painful, and neither painfulnorpleasant. 
One discerns them,. 
the dharmas that are found in all good minds. 
Faith, diligence, aptitude, indifference, respect, fear, two roots, nonviolence, and energy are found only in a good mind, and are found in all good minds, These ten dharmas are always found in all good minds. 
Such are the mental states that aṟe associated with all good minds. 
The mental states that belong to this sphere, that is, the mental states that exist in all defled minds, are kleśamahābhāmikas. 
What are the defiled mental states? 
Error, nondiligence, idleness, disbelief, torpor, and dissipation are always and exclusively in soiled minds. 
Nondiligence, pramāda, the opposite of diligence, is the noṉ taking possession of and the noṉcultivation of good dharmas. 
What is torpor? 
As for the statement: 
kskḥ Disrespect and the absence of fear are always and exclusively found in bad minds. 
These two dharmas, which will be defined below are always found in bad minds. 
Anger, enmity, dissimilation, jeaḻousy, stubbornness, hypo crisy, greed, the spirit of deception, prideintoxication, the spirit of violence, etc., are the parītakleśabhūmikas. They are called this because they have parūtakleśas for their spheres. 
Parīṭṭakleśa, small defilement, meaṅs avidyā oṟ ignorance in an isolated state, not associated with lust, etc. 
ḥk How many mental states are necessarily produced with each mind of each classwith a good, bad, or neutral mind? 
The mind in Kāmadhātu, when it is good, always consists of twentytwo mental states, as it is always associated with vitarka aṇḍ vicāra. 
Twentyone, when it is associated with one of the four defilements, with anger, etc., with regret. 
This mind consists of ten wmeahā bhūmikas, sīx kleśamaḥhābhūmikas, plus vitarēa and vicāra. 
The bad mental states, regret and apathy, aṟe absent from the First Dhyāṇna. 
The other mental states of Kāmadhātu exist in the First Dhyāṇa. 
We have to define the mental ṣṭates enumerated above. 
What is the difference between disrespect and absence of fear ? 
Disrespect is lack of veneṟation. 
Lack of respect, that is, the lack of veneration, the lack of fearful submission with regard to the qualities of oneself and others, and with regard to persons endowed with these qualities, is āhtīkya; ahrī is a mental dharma opposed to respect. 
Some think that affection and respect are the same thing. 
Viṭarka and vicra aṟe grossness and subtlety of the miṇd. 
The grossness, that is, the gross state of the mind is termed vitarka; the subtlety, that is, the subtle state of the mind is termed vicra. 
How can vitarka and vicāra be associated with the mind at one and the same time? 
According to one opinion, we may compatre vicāra to cold water, the mind to cheese which floats on the surface of this cold water, and vitarka to the heat of the sun which operates on this cheese. By reason of the water and sun, the cheese is not too runny nor too hard. 
a mind of the First Dhyāna is subtle in comparison with a mind in Kāmadhātu, but gross in comparision with a mind in the Śecond Dhyāna; the qualities and the defilements can be more or less gross or subtle in one and the same stage, for they are divided into nine categories. 
But there is a specific difference between viṭarka aṇḍ vicāra. 
tt The mind and its mental states have a support, have an object, have an aspect, and are associated. 
in any given moment there can be only one mind produced; to this one, unique mind there is found associated one sensation, one idea, or one mental state of each type. 
We have explained the mind and its mental states, in full, with their characteristics. 
35 The dharmas not associated. with the rnind are prāpti, aprāpti, sabhāgāta, āsanjñika, and two absorptions, life, characteristics, ṇāmakāya, etc., aṇḍ that which is of this type.ē These dharmas are not associated with the mind; they are not of the nature of rpa or physical matter; they are included within the saskātraskandha : they are called the ciīttaviptayukta saskāras, because they are disjoined from the mind, and because, being noṇmaterial, they resemble the mind. 
Prāpti is acquisition and possession. 
Prāpti is of two types: acquisition of that which has not been obtained or of that which had been lost; and possession of that which, having been obtained, has not been lost. Aprāpti is the opposite. 
There is prāpti and aprāpti of dharmas that belong to the person himself, 1. 
When a conditioned dharma falls into the personal series, there is prāprś ot aprāpti; of this dharma, but not if it falls into the series of another person, for no one possesses the dharmas of another; ṉor if it does not fall into any series, for no one posseses the dharmas which are not of a living being. 
As for unconditioned dharmas, there is prāpti of pratisakhyiā nirodha and apratisakhyānirodha. 
All beings possess the apratiskhyānirodha of the dharmas that do not arise without a cause. The Abhidharma expresses itself in this way: Who possesses pure dharmas? 
All beings possess pratisakhyānirodha with the exception of the sakalabandhana ūdigaṇasthas, that is, with the exception of the Āryans bound with all the bonds and who are found in the first moment of the Path, and with the exception of the Prthagjanas bound by all the bonds. The others, both Āryans and Prthagjanas, possess pratisarkhyānirodha. 
Hence there is no prāpti of space. 
prāpti and aprāpti are in opposi tion: 
everything that is susceptible of prāpi is also susceptible of aprāpti. 
termed prāpti? 
A Sūtra says, Through the production, the acquisition, and the possession of ten dharmas belonging to an Arhat, the Saint becomes a person having abandoned five things. 
1 If you conclude from this text that prāpti exists, we would remark that one possesses dharmas that do not belong to living beings, and also dharmas that do belong to another. 
In fact, a Sūtra says, Know, Oh Bhikṣus, that the Cakravartin King possesses seven jewels. 
In this text, the expression to possess signifies master of. One says that the Cakravartin King enjoys mastery over jewels, for they go as he wishes. But in the Sūtra on the Possession of the Ten Dharmas of an Arhat , the word possession designates a thing in and of itself. 
If the word possession signifies mastery in the Cgekravartisūtra, how do you ascertain that, in another Sūtra, this same word designates a supposed prāpti; a thing in and of itself? 
In fact 1. 
this prāpti is not directly perceived, as is the case for color, sound, etc., and as is the case for lust, anger, etc.; 2. 
one caṉnot conclude the existence of prāpri by reason of its effects, as is the case for the sense organs, the organ of sight, etc. 
for a similar effect is not perceived. 
Possession has an effect. It is the cause of the arising of the dharmas. This answer is unfortunate. 
As for the conditioned dharmas, there is not now, in any given person, possession of the dharmas that he has not yet acquired, nor does he any longer possess the dharmas whose possession he has abandoned through his changing of his sphere of existence or through detach ment; the possession of the first has never existed, and the possession of the second has perished. 
Hence how can these dharmasr arise if the cause of their arising is prāpti? 
arising and the arisingofarising have no use; 2. 
the dharmas that do not belong to living beings do not arise; and 3. 
how does one explain the difference in the degree of defilement,weak, medium, and strong defilement,among persons who are bound to all bonds?: 
Would you say that this difference proceeds from causes distinct from prāps? 
We would answer that these causes are the only cause of weak, medium, or strong defilements; why would one want to assign it to prāpti? 
Who maintains that prāpti is the cause of the arising of dharmas? 
Let us explain. 
Let us suppose the nonexistence of prāpt: what difference would there be between an Āryan at the moment in which he produces a mundane thought and a Pṛthagjana? Now the difference consists solely in that the Āryan, even when he has a worldly thought, is in possession of a certain number of pure dharmas. 
For us, there is this difference that the first has abandoned certain defilements, while the second has not yet aban doned thern. 
Without doubt; but if we suppose the non existence of prāpti, how can we say that a defilement is abandoṉed or not abandoned? 
There can only be the abandoning of a defilement through the disappearance of the prāpt of this defilement; the defilement is not abandoned as long as its prāpi lasts. 
To us, the abandoning or the nonapandoning of a defilement consists of a certain condition of the person. 
The personality of the Āryan s modified, becoming different from what it was through the power of the Path. The defilement, once it has been destroyed through the force of the Path, cannot be manifested again. 
Like seed which is burned by fire and which becomes different from what it once was, and is no longer capable of germinating, we say that the Āryan has abandoned the defilement, because his person no longer maintains the seeds capable of producing a defilement. The worldly path does not definitively destroy the defilement; it only damages it or disturbs it: 
Because this is our teaching. 
There is threefold prāptś of the dharmas of the three periods. Past dḍharmas can be the object of a threefold prāpti, past, present, and future. The same for present and future dharmas. 
There is good prāpti, etc., of good dharmas, etc. The prāpti of good, bad, or neutral dharmas is, respectively, good, bad, or neutral. The prāptis of the dharmas belonging to the spheres of existence are of their spheres. The dharmas belonging to the spheres of existence are impure dharmas. 
The prāpii of a dharma in Kāmadhātu is, itself, in Kāma dhātu; and thus following. 
There is fourfold prāpti of the āharmas that do not belong to the spheres of existence. 
it belongs to the three spheres, and it is pure. But there are distinctions: The prāpti of apratisakhyānirodha is of the sphere to which the person who obtains it belongs. 
The prāpti of pratisakhyānirodha is of Rāpadhātu, of Ārūpya dhatu, and pure. 
The prāpti of the Path is Śaikṣa; the prāpti of the Aśaikṣa ḍharmas is Aśaikṣa. 
But there is Threefold prāpti of the dharmar which are neither Śaikṣa nor Aśaikṣa. These dharmasthe naivaśaikṣanāśaikṣas,vi.45bare the impure dharmas and the unconditioned dharmas; they are called this because they differ from the dharmas of the Śaikṣa and from the dharmas of the Aśaikṣa. 
The prāpti of the impure dharmas is neitherśaikṣanor Aśaikṣa, 2. 
The prāpti of pratisakhyānirodha is Śaikṣa when this vrodha is obtained through the path of the Śaikṣas; it is Aśaikṣa when this nirodha is obtained through the path of the Aśaikṣas. 
The prāpti of the dharmas to be abandoned either through Seeing, or through Meditation, is destroyed, respectively, either through Seeing or through Meditation; it belongs then, from the point of view. 
The prāpti of apratisakhyānirodha is abandoned through the Path of Meditation. 
But the prāpti of pratisakhyānirodha obtained through the Path is pure and should not be abandoned. 
The same for the prāpt; of the Path.t We have established the general principal that the dharmas of the three periods are susceptible of a threefold prāpri. 
one possesses it when it is present, not when it is past or future. When it is past, the prāpti is past, and when it is future, the prāpti is futuṟe: this by reason of the weakness of this dharma. 
The supernormal faculties of seeing and hearing and the mind capable of creating apparitional beings are strong, for they are realized through a special effort; consequently one possesses them in the past, the present, and the future. 
Certain Masterṣ maintain that the undefiledneutral dharmas of craftsmanship and of attitude , when they have been the object of an intense practice are also possessed in the past and future. 
The same for the prāpti of defiled rāpa. 
This rūpa is bodily action and vocal action resulting from a defiledneutral mind. 
This action, even through produced by a strong mind, is incapable, as is the mind itself, of creating avijñapti , hence it is weak. 
kkk Is the tritemporal character of the prāpti of the good and the bad dharmas subject to any restriction, as is the case with the prāpt of the neutral dharmas? 
This rpa, good or bad, for example the prātrnokṣasarvara , is not possessed previous to its being produced. The prāpti is simultaneous and later, but not earlier. kkk Can nonpossession be, like prāpti, good, bad, or neutral? 
Aprāpti is undefiledneutral. 
Aprāpti of the dharmas of the past or the future is threefold. Aprāpti of past or future dharmas can be past, present, or future. But one necessarily possesses the present dharmas: hence the aprāpti of present dharmas can be only past or future. 
Aprāpti of the dharmas forming part of the spheres of existence, and of the immaculate dharmas, is threefold Aprāpti of the dharmas of the sphere of Kamadhātu belong either to Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, or Ārūpyadhātu accordingly as the person endowed with this aprāpti belongs to such a sphere of existence. The same for the aprāpti of pure dharmas. 
In fact, aprāpti is never pure. 
According to the School, a Prṛthagjana is a petson who has not acquired the Path. 
As it says in the Mūlaśāstra , What is the state of Prthagjana? 
The nonpossession of the dharmas of the Āryans. 
Now the state of Pṛthagjana is not pure; hence their non possession is not pure. 
When the Śāstra says that the state of Prthagjana is the nonpossession of the dharmas of the Āryans, which dharmas of the Āryans does it mean? 
The Śāstra means all these dharmas, since it does not specify any. 
The Śāstra means the nonpossession that is not accompanied by possession: 
This is quite evident, for, in the contrary interpretation, the Buddha the Blessed On, not possessing the dbarmas of the family of the Śrāvakas and Pratyeka buddhas , would be a Prthagjaṉa. Vety well. 
But then the Śāstra would say The state of Prthagjana is the absolute nonpossession of the Āryaṉ dharmas and not . 
According to another opinion, the state of Prthagjana is the nonpossession of the first stage of the Path of Seeing, duḥkhe ḍharmajñānakṣēānti and its concomitant dharmas. 
In this hypothesis, at the sixteenth moment , the saint will be a Prṛthagjana and not an Āryan, for at this moment, the initial kṣāt; is lost.0 No, for the nonpossession. 
Of which of these three types are you speaking in your definition of the state of Pṛthagjana? 
We intend to speak of the nonpossession of the kṛāni which is not accompanied by possession. 
The best explana tion is that of the Sautrāntikas. 
To them, the state of Prthagjana is a series in which the dbarmas of the Āryans have not arisen. 
For example, the nonpossession of the Path, which constitutes the state of Prthagjana, is abandoned when one acquires the Path, and when one passes to another stage. 
The same holds for the nonpossession of the other dharmas. 
Nonpossession is abandoned when one produces the nonpossession of nonpossession, that is to say, when, changing ones stage of existence, one ceases to possess the state of Prṛthagjana; and when the possession of nonpossession is cut off, that is to say, when, acquiring the Path, one cuts off the state of Prthagjana. 
Does this mean that there is possession of possession and non possession, and that there is nonpossession of possession and non possession? 
There is possession and nonpossession of possession and nonpossession, which is called secondary possession , or secondary nonpossession. 
Doesnt this doctrine leed to infinite progression? 
3 the prāpti of this prāpri. The person in question possesses the rnūladharma and the prāpti of the prāpti by the fact of the arising of the prāpr; he possesses this prāpts by the fact of the arising of the prāpri. Hence there is no infinite progression. 
the mūladharma, its prāpti, and the prāpti of this prāp which is the prāpti of the prāptiprāpti of the first moment, plus three anuprāptis through the fact that one is in possession of the three aforementioned prāptis. 
In this third moment eighteen dharmas arise together, namely nine prāptis: the prāptis of the three dharmas produced in the first moment, prāptis of the sīx dharmas ptoduced in the second momenr, plus nine anaprāptis through the fact that one in in possession of the nine aforementioned 5rāptis. 
Thus the prāpts continue increasing in number from momment to moment. 
The prāpśy of present and future defilements , and of innate good dharmas with the dharmas that are associated and coexistent with them throughout beginningless and endless transmigration, aṟise, from moment to moment, in an infinite number. If one considers the series of one single being in the course of transmigration, those prāpts which arise at each moment are infinite in number. Considering all beings together, they are without measure, and without limit. 
If they were material, there could not be found enough room in the universe for the prāptis of one single being, and even less for the prāptis of two beings! 
kksk What is genre or sameness of class designation? 
The Śāstra designates this entity by the name of nkāyasabhāga: 
Yet one has, for all of them, common ideas and designations: 
rkkḵ What is nonconsciousness ? 
Among the beings who take birth among the NonConscious Ones, ie., the nonconscious gods, there is a dharma that arrests the mind and its mental states, and which is called nonconsciousness. 
By this harma, the mind and future dharmas are, for a certain time, hindered from being produced and do not have the power to arise. This āharma is similar to what arrests the water of a river, that is, to a dike. 
This dharma is exclusively Retribution. 
It is exclusively the retribution of nonconscious absoṟption. 
Where do these nonconscious gods reside? 
In the heaven of the Bṛhatphalas there is a raised place which is the dwelling of the NonConscious Ones, in the same way as the dhyānāntarikā, the dwelling of the Mahābrahmā gods, is raised within the heaven of the Brahmapurohitas. 
Are the NonConscious Ones called this because they are always nonṉconscious, or are they sometimes conscious? 
They are coascious at birth and at death ; they are called nonconscious because their consciousness is suspended for a very long time. 
As it says in the Sūtra When they produce consciousness again, they die, like a person awakening after sleep. Dying in the nonconscious heaven, they are necessarily reborn in Kāmadhātu and nowhere else. In fact, the force of aśajñisamā patti , by which these beings are born among the Non Conscious Ones, is exhausted; they have not been in a positioṉ to practice asajñisamāparti: hence they die, as arrows fall to the ground when their impetus is spent. 
On the other hand, beings who are reborn among the NonConscious Ones necessarily possess an action retribative in Kāmadhātu and retributive in the second existence. 
In this same way beings who are reborn in Uttarakuru necessarily possesses an action retributive in a heavenly realm of rebirth immediately after their existence in Uttarakuru. 
They are asarhjñisamāpatt, the nonconscious absorption, and nirodhasamāpaiti, the absorption of extinctioṉ. 
What is the nonconscious absorption? 
Without doubt, an ascetic can fall from this absorption after having produced it; but, he will produce it again and be reborn among the NonConscious Ones. 
That is to say, the absorption of extinction is like āsaṅjñika, the nonconscious absorption: it is a harma that arrests the mind and its menta states. 
It belongs to the sphere of Bhavāgra, that is, one penetrates it upon leaving naivasajñānāsamjñāyatana absorption , whereas the nonconscious absorption belongs to the spbere of the Fourth Dhyāṇa. 
Of what does its retribution consist? 
These thirtyfour moments suffice, for, before entering into the comprehension of the Truths, the Bodhisattva, still a Prṛthagjana , detaches himself through the worldly path from all spheres, with the exception of Bhavāgra. 
240 Although the two absorptions, the nonconscious absorption and the absorption of extinction, present many differences, they have this in common: 
But these two absorptions take place in persons in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
To deny that the nonconscious absorption is produced in Rūpa dhātu is to contradict the Mūlaśāstra, which says, There is an existence in Rūpadhātu that does not admit of the five sēandhas, namely the existence of beings in Rūpadhātu who, conscious by nature, enter into the nonconscious absorption and into. 
the absorp tion of extinction, and the existence of beings in Rūpadhātu who aṟe in possession of āsajñika, and who are born among the Non Conscious Ones. 
From this text it results that the two absoṟptions are cultivated by beings of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
A person who has never produced the nonconscious absorption can produce this absorption either in Kāmadhātu or in Rūpadhātu; but it is necessary to be a human in order to produce the absoṟption of extinction for the first time. 
A humen, an Āryan, who has produced this absorption can fall from it, and losing possession of it, can be reborṉ in Rūpadhātu and produce this absorption anew. 
But the question is raised whether one can fall from the absorption of extinction, which is similar to Nirvāṇa. 
The same here: 
If this absorption is completely free of mind, how is it an absorption ? 
Yes, for they thwart the arising of the mind. 
rkkk What is the vital oṟgan? 
Jīvita is life. 
In fact, the Abhidharma says, What is the jṝvikendriya? 
The āyus of the three spheres of existence.. 
What sort of dharma is the āyus? 
The support of warmth and consciousness. 
For the Blessed One said, When life, warmth and consciousness leave the body, the body lies abandoned, like wood, lacking feeling. 
There exists then a distinct dharma, a support of warmth and of consciousness, a cause of the duration of the series, natmed āyu. 
If these three dharmas,life, warmth, and consciousness, mutually support one another and continue to exist by means of this mutual support, how do they come to an end? 
Which perishes first, the destruction of which entails the destruction of the others? 
The āyus is supported by means of actions; the āyus has been projected through actions and continues to exist as long as the projection of action allows it to do so. 
If this is so, why admit that warmth and coṉsciousness are supported by actions? 
If the consciousness were supported by action, all consciousness from the womb to death, would be retribution; and this is false. 
Hence the necessity of the āyus, supported by action, the support of warmth and consciousness. 
What is the support of consciousness in Ārūpyadhātu if the gyws does not exist? In Ārūpyadhātu, consciousness is supported by action. Do you have the right to change your mind? 
Sometimes you maintain that the consciousness is supported by warmth, and sometimes you rnaintain that it is supported by actions. 
But on the other hand, you have admitted that one should avoid the conclusion that all coṅsciousnesses, from the womb to death, are retṛibution. 
We do not deny the existence of the āyus. We only say that the yus is not a thing in and of itself. 
Then what is the dharma that you call āyus? 
It is a certain power that the action of a previous existence places in a being at the moment of its conception, a power through which the sandhas renew themsleves for a deter mined length of time in this homogeneous series that constitutes an existence , in the same way a seed places a certain power in the sprout by which the plant develops to maturity. In this same way too a shot arrow has a ceṟtain power which causes it to travel for a certain period of time. a certain sort of guṉa or quality, called saskāra or vega arises in the arrow. 
kksḵ What are the characteristics of conditioned dharas? 
Their characteristics are arising, old age, duration, and impermaneṇce. 
These four dharmas, atising, old age, duration, and impermanance, are the chaṟacteristics of conditioned things. A dharma in which these characteristics are found is conditioned; a barma in which they are not found is unconditioned. 
Arising produces ot causes to produce conditioned things; duration stablizes them or causes them to last; old age makes them deteriorate; and impermanence destroys them. 
Does not the Sūtra teach the existence of some three conditioned characteristics of conditioned things? The Sūtra says, in fact, There are, oh Bhikṣus, three characteristics of conditioned things, which are themselves conditioned. What are these three? 
The Sūtra should enumerate four character istics. 
The characteristic that it omits is the characteristic of duration or sthiti. 
Truth to tell, it does use shi in the compound, sthiṭyanyathātva, durationmodification; but srhityanyathātva is an expression that signifies old age. 
As the Sūtra says production in place of arising and disappeaṟance in place of imperma nence , in this same way it also says sthityanyathātva in place of old age. 
If the Sūtra specifies only three characteristics, it is because, with a view to rousing disgust among believers, it points out as the characteristics of conditioned things those dharmas which cause conditioned things to pass through the three timne periods: 
the power of its arising causes it to pass from the future into the present; old age and impermanence cause it to pass from the present into the past, and, after old age has weakened it, impermanence finishes it. 
The School gives a comparision : Suppose there is a maṅṇ in a dark forest, and there are three enemies there who wish to kill him. The first causes this man to leave the forest; the second weakens him, and the third destroys his vital principle. 
Such is the role of the three characteristics with regard to conditioned things. 
Duration, on the contrary, sustains conditioned things and causes them to last; this is why the Sūtra does not count it among the character istics. 
Further, the unconditioned lasts eternally in its own nature: the characteristic of duration is not without resemblance to the persistence of the uncoṇditioned. So in order to avoid any confusion, the Sūtra does not indicate duration as a characteristic of conditioned things. the Sūtra does name duration; it names it by associating it with old age: 
sthityanyathātva, that is to say, sthii and aṇyathātva. 
What advantage is there, would you say, in making one single characteristice out of these two characteristics? 
in order to incite disgust with respect to duration, the Sūtra names it together with old age, like prosperity associated with black ears. 
Conclusion: 
kk The arising, duration, etc., of any sort of dharma is also condi tioned. 
These secondary characteristics, being condi tioned, have in their turn four characteristics, and so we have infinite progression. 
The four secondary characteristics are arisingof arising, durationofduṟation, old ageofold age, and impermanence ofimpermaṅṇence. 
All conditioned things are conditioned by these primary charac teristics; these, in their turn, are conditioned by the four secondary characteristics. You say that each of the primary characteristics should have, exactly as the dharma that it characterizes, foar characteristics, and thus following: 
When a dharma ariseswhich we will term the principle dharma ot mladharma, a mind or a mental statenine dharmas, including it, aṟise together: 
the principal dharma, tour primary characteristics, and four secondary characteristics. 
The first primary characteristic, primary arising causes the principle dharma, plus thtee primary characteristics , plus the four secondary characteristics to arise: in all eight dharmas. 
it arises through the secondary characteristic arisingof arising. 
In the same way a hen lays many eggs and each egg causes the birth of only one other chicken ; in the same way primary arising causes eight dharmas to arise, whereas arisingofarising causes only one dharma to arise, namely primary arising. 
It is the same for the other primary and secondary characteristics. 
Hence the characteristics themselves have characteristics called anulakṣaṇas; they are four in number and not sixteen, and there is no infinite progression. 
kṣkḥ The Sautrāntikas say: 
Arising, duration, etc., are not entities, separate things in and of themselves. We know things either through direct perception, through inference, or through the testi mony of Scripture: 
Ignorant! 
According to us, what one should understand by production or arising is the fact that the series begins; disappearance or imperma nence is the end or cessation of the series; duration is the series continuing from its beginning until its end; evolution or old age is the modification of the continuous series, the difference between its successive states. 
It is from this point of viewthat is, by considering arising, enduring, prolonging itself, and modifying itselfthat the Blessed One says to Sundarananda, who is perpetually attentive to his states of mind, Fine, my man! You know that your sensations arise, last, end, and disappear. 
We would then say, Arising is the beginning of the series, disappearance is its rapture; duration is the ṣeries itself; evoḻution is the difference between its successive states, And again, Arising is existence following upon nonexistence; duration is the series; impermanence is the rupture of the series; and evolution is supposed to be the difference between the successive states of the series. 
Since the dharmas are momentary, would you say that the dharmas will perish if duration is lacking? But , they perish spontaneously: in vain you attribute duration to a momentary dharma. 
Consequently it is the series that the Sūtra refers to when it speaks of duration, and the definition of the Abhidharma is justified, What is duration? 
The saīskāraṣ arisen and not destroyed. The nature of the moment cannot be arisen and not be destroyed. 
Yet the Jñānaprasthāna says, Relative to one mind, what is production? 
It is death. 
What is evolution? 
Thus the subsequent moment can be considered as the duration of the previous moment; the dissimilitude of duration is its transforrnation. 
Would you say that there is no dissimilitude when the successive moments are similar ? 
There is dissimilitude, as this results from the differnce in time of the slower or faster falling of a vajra that is or is not projected, and which is projected with or without force: 
difference due in each case to a traṇsformation or a difference of the primary elements of the vajr. 
When the dharmas succeed themselves in a homogeneous series, the difference is small; that is why, although they differ, they are considered as similar. 
Hence the last moment of a sound, a flame, or an Arhat, has neither duration nor transformation. 
We do not attribute duration to all conditioned dharras! 
In short, conditioned dharmas exist after having existed; after having existed, they no longer exist; the series of dharmas is their duration; dissimilarity of the series is their transformation. 
According to you, arising is the dharma itself in so far as it exists after having been nonexistent. 
The dharma which is the thing characterized , would then be the characteristic also. What is wrong with that? 
The marks of a Mahāpuruṣa are not different or distinct from the Mahāpuruṣa himself. The horns, the hump, the fetlock, the hoof, and the tail of a cow, which are its marks, are not different from the cow. The primary elements do not exist apart from their individual characteristics, solidity, etc. In this same way, for the Vaibhāṣikas who affirm the momentariness of the dharmas, the rising of smoke is none other than the smoke itself Let us look at this a bit closer. 
Although I grasp the individual nature of visible things, etc., which are conditioned, yet as long as I do not know the fact that they did not exist previously, that they will not exist later, and that their series transforms itself, then I shall not know their quality of being conditioned. Consequently, the quality of being conditioned does not have for a mark the quality of being conditioned, but rather previous nonexistence, etc. 
And there do not exist characteristics, things in and of themselves, distinct from visible things and other conditioned things. 
If we admit the reality of characteristics, then since they are giīven as simultaneous, we would have to admit that obe harma arises, lasts, grows old and perishes at one and the seme time. 
It is in vain that the Sarvāstivādins pretend that the characteristics do not exercise their activity at one and the same time; that arising engenders before being born itself, being still in a future state, and that once it is born it does not engender any longer; that duration, old age, and impermanence exercise their activity when they are present and not in a future state; and that, consequently, the last three character istics are active in a moment when the fitst is no longer active, so the four characteristics can be simultaneous without contradiction. 
One must examine whether a future dharma, supposing that it does exist, can be active. 
If future arising produces the operation of engendering, how can one say that it is future? 
You would have to define future. 
On the other hand, when a dharrma has arisen, has been engendered, and the operation of arising is past, how can you ṣay that arising is thn of the present? 
You would have to define present. 
As for the second hypothesis, to admit that the activity of these characteristics is not simultaneous is to adrmit three moments, and this is to renounce the doctrine of momentariness. 
For us, the kṣaṇa or moment is the time during which the characteristics have achieved their operation, Then explain why, in this hypothesis, duration, aṟising at the same time as old age and impermanence, accomplishes its operation of makiṇg last that which should last before old age and impermanence accomplish theit operation of making things age and destroying them. 
If you answer that duration, being stronger, accomplishes its operation first, then we would ask how duration is weakened later in such a manner that, encountering old age and impermanence, it ages and perishes, not alone, but with the dharma that it should have made last. 
You say perhaps that duration, having achieved its task, cannot perform it again, in the same way that arising, having engendered something, engenders no more. The comparison is not legitimate. 
The operation of arising consists of attracting the dharma that it should engender from the future and causing it to enter into the present; once the dharma has entered into the present, arising is incapable of making it enter therein again. 
Duration is capable of making that which lasts last indefinitely. Consequently, duration is capable of repeating its operation. 
Would these forces be old age and impermanence, old age weakening duration which imperma nence then kills? 
Since, in this hypothesis, old age and impermanence are stronger than duration, it is proper then that they exercise their activity first. 
We ask how, and with regard to what object, old age and impeṟmanence exercise their activity of aging and causing to perish? 
It is through duration that one dharma, once it arises, does not perish for a certain time, does not perish as soon as it arises. 
If duration, its task completed, neglects the dbarrma, it will quite certainly not last any longer; that is to say, it perishes in and of itself. 
We well understand the duration and impermanence of the dharma,A dharma, after having arisen, does not perish, A dharma, after having lasted, perishes. 
Now, can one say of a single dharma that it becomes different from itself? 
If it remains this, it is not that; if it is transformed, it is no longer this. 
Hence the transformation of a dbharma is impossible. 
According to another Schoo1, it is with the cooperation of external causes of destruction, fire or a hammer, etc., that the characteristics of impermanence causes certain dharmas to perish, as wood or a pot. 
This is a theory as absurd as a sick person, who, after having takeṉ a medicine, begs the gods to render it efficacious! 
In the logic of this system, it is the external causes of destruction which destroy, and the characteristic of impermanence serves no function. 
The same School admits that the mind and its mental states, like sound or a flame, perish immediately, without any foreign causes intervening, through the chacteristic of impermanence. 
Impermanence and duration accomplish their operation at one and the same time: a dharma lasts and perishes at the same tirme. This is inadmissable. We conclude that it is with regard to the series that the Blessed One teaches the characteristics of conditioned things. 
kkḵ If arising engenders, in a future state, the dharma that it should engender, why do not all future dharmas arise at one and the same time? Arising engenders the dharma that it should engender, but not without the cooperation of causes and conditions. 
Isolated arising does not have the force of engendering the dharma that it should engender independent of the cooperation of causes and conditions. 
If this is the case, we rather believe that it is the cause that engenders, and not arising; this characteristic accompanies the dharma since the beginning of time and causes the dharma to arise when, finally, the cause of this dharma encounterṛs another! 
When the causes are completed, the dharma arises; when they are not completed, it does not arise: what efficacy can we attribute to aṟising? 
Do you pretend to know all the dharmas that exist? 
The nature of dharmas is subtle! Even though one sees them, one does not know their nature. 
Aṇḍ if arising is nothing other than the dharma itself exisitng after having been non existent, the genitive the arising of warmth or the arising of sensation would not be justified; for this amounts to saying the warmth of warmth or the sensation of sensation. 
This is the same for duṟation, old age, and extinction. 
in order to justify the idea of empty , or the idea of the impersonal, yoa would admit the existence of an entity called emptiness or the existence of an entity called nonself. 
And again, in oṟder to justify the ideas of one and two, large and small, separate, associated and disassociated, this and that, existant, etc., you would admit, in agreement with the Vaiśeṣikas, a long series of entities: number, extension, individuality, conjunction, disjunction, quality of being that, quality of being this, existence, etc. 
It obliges you to create a potness in order to justify the idea of a pot. 
As for the genitive, you do not admit that the individual nature of warmth and warmth are different things, and yet you speak of the individual nature of warmth. 
Hence you have not proven that arising is a thing in and of itself; you have not proven that this is not merely a designation of a dharma in so far as it exists after having been nonexistent. 
Since arising is multiple, in order to distinguish it from other arisings, so that my questioner knows that it refers to an arising having the name warmth and not to an arising having the name sensa tion, I will eploy the genitive, the arising of warmth, or the arising of sensation, although the arising of warmth is only the warmth arising. 
In the same way one says, in the world, the odor of sandalwood, although sandaifwood is only odor, or the body of the bust, although a bust is only its body. 
We hold to the existence of the characteristic arising, which belongs to conditioned things and does not belong to unconditioned things, and we can easily explain this by virtue of the fact that unconditioned things do not arise, But if conditioned things arise withont arising, why do unconditioned things, space, etc., not arise? 
We say that conditioned things arise, for they exist after having been nonexistent. But how can unconditioned things arise, since they are eternal? 
You explain that certain dharmas,the unconditioned dharmas,;are devoid of the characteristic arising, because, you say, such is the nature of things : 
we say, rather, that by virtue of the nature of things, none of the dharmas are susceptible of arising. 
Moreovet, according to you, all conditioned things equally possess the characteristic ariṣing that you refuse to unconditioned things: yet you admit that certain causes are capable of producing warmth but incapable of producing sensation. 
ō Should we abandon the Āgamas for the sole reason that there are persons who object to them? 
One does not renounce sowing for fear of deer, and one does not renounce eating dainties because of flies. 
One must refute objections and adhere to the Doctrine. 
and the rest. 
Vyañjana is understood as gkṣara or phoneme , vowels and consonents, for example, 4, 6, etc. 
Kāya or body means collection; samukti, in fact, has the sense of samavāya according to the Dhātupāṭha, iv.114. 
nāmakāya color, sound, odor, etc.; padakāya The saskārar aṭe impeṟmanent, the dharmas are impersonal, Nirvana is tranquil. 
It is thus that the Ancients have invested the sound go with the power to signify nine things: 
The sages have established the sound go in nine things, that is, caṟrdinal region, cattle, land, a beam of light, a word, a diamond, an eye, a haven, and water. 
The philosopher for whom it is the word which illumines the object should admit that the sound go has been endowed by convention with these different meanings. 
Then if a given object is signified to the hearer by a certain word, it is indeed vocal sound and nothing eise, that signifies it. What advantage is there in supposing the existence of an entity you call word? 
A word is either produced by the voice oṟ revealed by the voice. 
In the first hypothesis, since voice is vocal sound by nature, any vocal sound whatsoever, even the cry of an animal, would produce a word. 
If you answer that a word is produced solely through a vocal sound of a certain natuarethe articulation of sound, varṇātmakawe would say that this sort of vocal sound which is capable of producing a word would be quite capable of designating an object also. 
But it is absurd to suppose that the voice produces a word. 
In fact, sounds do not exist at the same timeone has, for example, ripawhereas the word, which you define as a dharmna, an entity, cannot arise in parts. Then how can the voice, when it produces a word, produce it? 
the last moment of the vsjñapti, a coṟpoṟeal oṟ vocal act, creates avijñapti by reason of its previous moments. 
But, we would say, if the last moment of the sound of the voice creates the word, it would suffice to understand the last sound in order to attain or comprehend the object. 
It is not an evasion to suppose that voice engenders the phoneme , that a phoneme engenders a word, and that a word causes comprehension of objects. 
In fact, the same objection is present, The phonemes do not exist at the same tirpe, etc. 
For these same reasons, it is absurd to suppose that the voice manifests a word. 
Experts vainly apply their minds but do not discover a phoneme distinct from the voice. 
Moreover, the voice neither en genders nor manifests the phoneme, for the same reasons that allow that the voice neither engendets nor manifests a word. a word arises with its object, like the characteristic arising. 
In this hypothesis, no present word would designate a past or future thing. 
Moreover, a father, a mother, or other persons arbitrarily fix the word that is the proper name of a son, etc.: how can you admit that the word, like the characteristic ariṣing, arises simultaneously with the object? 
Finally, unconditioned things would not have any ṇame, since they do not arise: a consequence that the Sarvāstivādins cannot admit. 
The Blessed One said, A stanza depends on words, and a poem depends on staḥzas. 
word is a sound upon which persons have come to an agreement that it signifies a certain thing. 
it is in this sense that it, according to the Blessed One, depends on words. 
You might as well maintain that there exists, distinct from ants and minds, things in and of themselves termed a row of ants or a ṣuccession of minds. 
Recognize then that only the phonemes , which are sounds, exist in and of themselves. 
The Vaibhāṣikas admit āmakāya, padakāya, and vyañjanakāya, as saskāras disassociated from the mind, for, they say, none of these dharmas serve as a gate of understanding. 
to which sphere of existence do the phonemes, words, and phrases belong? 
Do they belong to living beings ? 
Are they of retribution, of accummulation or of outflowing ? 
and Are they good, bad, or neutral? 
They exist in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu; they belong to living beings; they are outflowing; and they are neutral. 
The phoṉemes, etc., belong to two spheres of existence. 
According to one opinion, they also exist in Ārūpyadhātu, but there they are unpronounceable. 
They belong to living beings, being produced through the efforts of living beings and consisting of articulated sounds , etc. In fact, they belong to the person who speaks, not to the things that they designate. 
They are an outflowing, being produced through sabhāgahetu ; they are not of retṛibution, since they proceed from the desire of the person who speaks; they are not of accumulation, since they are ṉot material. 
ṭkk We shall briefly explain the characteristics, not as yet mentioned, of the other dharmas disassociated from the mind. 
474 The same for genre, which is also from retribution, and which belongs to the three spheres of existence. 
The same for, that is to say, like phonemes, words, and phrases, sabhāgatā is of the first two spheres of existence; it belongs to living beings; it is from outflowing; and it is nondefiledṉeutral. 
But sabhāgatā is not only from outflowing; it is also of retributiony; it not only belongs to the first two spheres of existence, it also belongs to the third. Possession is of two types. It is of outflowing and of retribution. Its characteristics also. Its characteristics, arising, etc., are of two types, like possession. The absorptions and nonpossession are of outflowing.. 
The two absorptions and nonpossession are only outflowings. 
As for their spheres, their relationship with living beings, their moral qualifications , the explanations have been given above. 
conditions. 
What are the heus, and what are the pruyayas? 
kāraṇahetu, sahabhū sabhāga, saprayūtaka, sarvatraga, aṅd vipāka. 
Kāraṇabetu is teason for existence; sahabhūhetu is coexistent cause; sabhāgahetu is parallel cause; sarprayuktakahetu is associated cause; sarvatragahetu is universal cause, and vipākahetu is retributive cause; such are the six types of causes that the Ābhidhārmikas recognize. 
A dharma is not a kāraṇahetu of itself. 
With this exceptioṇ, that all of the dharmas are kāraṇahetu with regard to all other conditioned dharnas, because no dharma constitutes an obstacle to the arising of the dharmas susceptible of arising. 
Compare this with the name of the rūpāyatanṉa. 
Can one consider them as causes? 
Sahabhūhetu, coexistent causes, namely the elements , the mind and the companions of the mind, character istics and the thing characterized, are the dharmas that are causes one of the other. 
The dharmas that are causes one of the other, are called sahabhābetu. 
The same for the mind and its companions ; the same for the charṟacteristics, atising, etc. 
In the category of sahabhūhetu are then included all conditioned dharmas which are in a mutual relationship of causality. We have reason not to complete the above definition. 
A dharma īs a fahabhūhetu of its secondary characteristics without being in a mutual relationship of causality with them: for the secondary characteristics are not the sahabhūhetu of their dharma. This is a case to be added to the definition. 
kiḥ What dharmas are called the companions of the mind? 
The companions of the mind are: the mental states; the two disciplines ; and the characteristics of the mental states, the two disciplines and the mind. 
These are all the dharmas associated with the mind , the discipline of absorption and pure discipline , and the characteristics, arising, etc. of all these, and also of the mind. 
From the point of view of time, of result, etc., and of goodness, etc. 
they have the same arising, the same duration, and the same destruction as does the mind; they are of the same time period as the mind. 
the companions arise, last, and perish at the same time as does the mind; but their arising is distinct. 
the same for their companions. This is why the phrase, The companions are of the same time period as the mind is added. In regard to the result, etc. Result means pṇruṣakāraphāla and visayogaphala ; and et cetera refers to vipākaphala and niṣyandaphala. The companions have the same result, the same vipāka, and the same niṣyanda as the mind: same indicates identity. 
In regard to goodess, eic. The companions are good, bad, or neutral, like the mind which they accompany. 
There are then ten reasons why the companions are termed companions. 
kkḵ The mind having the least nurmber of companions is a sahabhūhetu of fiftyeight dharmas: namely 1 the ten mahābhmikas with the four characteristics of each of them; and 2 the four characteristis and the four secondary characteristics. 
If, from these fiftyeight dharmas, the four secondary character istics of the mindwhich have no effect upon itare set aside, then we have fiftyfour dbarmas that are sahabhūhetu of the same mind. 
According to another opinion, only fourteen dharmas are sahabhñāhetu of this mind, namely its four characteristics and the ten mahābhūmikas. 
As the secondary characteristics have no effect on the mind, the characteristics of the mahābhūmikas likewise have no effect on the mind. 
Certain Masters, in their reading of the Prakaraṇagrantha, omit the words, and of the dharmas associated with this belief. 
Accoṟding to the Vaibhāṣikas of Ksmiīr, these words figure in the text; or, if they aṟe rnissing, the context indicates that one should supply them and that the passage as it stands is incomplete. 
kkk Aṇy dharma that is a sahabhūhetu cause is a sahabhū or a coexistant item. But there are some coexistant items that are not sahabhūhetuṃ: the secondary characteristics of the principal dharma are not a sababhūbetu regarding this dharma ; 2. these same are not sahabhūhetu among themselves; 3. 
the secondary characteristics of the companions of the mind are not a sahabhūhetu regarding the mind; 4. 
derived matter, blue, etc., susceptible of resistance and which has also arisen together, are not a sahabhūhetu amoṇg themselves; 6. 
a part of derived matter not susceptible to resistance and also arisen together with them, is not a sahabhñhetu; with the exception of the two disciplines ; 7. 
possession , but are not sahabhūheku, because their results, vpāka or niṣyanda, are not identical. 
As for possession, it does not always accompany the dharma: it arises either before the dhara, or after it, or at the same time as it. 
rek All this may be right, that is, what is a sahabhūhetu cause, a mutually coexistant cause, is a coexistant item, and the rest. Never theless, in the world, the relationship of cause to effect is well proven in certain cases: the cause is previous to the effect. It is in this way that a seed is the cause of the sprout, the sprout of the stalk, etc. But one does not prove a similar relationship between simultaneous things. You should then demonstrate that dharmas arisen together can be ina cause and effect relationship. 
Now a lamp is the cause of its light and a sprout is the cause of its shadow. Thus cause and effect can be simultaneous. 
These examples are not proven. 
We mmust examine whether a lamp is the cause of its light, or if, as we think, a lamp with its light are both the effect of a complex of previous causes and conditions, oil, wick, etc. 
In the same way, a complex of previous causes is the cause of the sprout and its shadow, of the sprout with its shadow. 
The relationship of cause and effect is proven by the existence and the nonexistence of what is called effect, similar to the existence and the nonexistence of what is called cause. 
The definition of the Logicians is very good: When A is or is not, and when B is or is not, then A is considered as cause, and B is considered as effect. 
Granted this, if we examine the dharmas that we have defined as mutually coexistent and sahabhhetu, we see that they all exist when oṉe of them exists, and that none exist when one of them is absent. They are then in a relationship of mutual cause and effect. 
But how many simultaneous dharmas are the cause and effect of one another? 
Mutual causality is proven by the definition that we have given of causality. 
In fact, they have denied mutual causality to derived matter although physical matter never exists without taste ; they have denied mutual causality to derived matter and to the primary elements, and mutual causality to secondary characteristics and the mind. 
In the same way that three staffs stand up supported one on the other, the causal relationship of simultaneous.things, the mind and its mental states, etc., is proven. This new example should be examined. 
We ask whether the three staffs stand up together through the force that the three staffs possess through arising together, or rather, if the force of the complex of previous causes which caused them to arise together does not now also cause them to arise supported one on the other. 
Further, there are things here other than the mutual force of support: there is a rope and a hook, and there is the ground. But, mutually coexistant items have causes other than the sahabhūhetu, namely sabhāgahetu, sarvatra ganhetu, aṇd vipākahetu, which have a role analogous to that of the cord, etc. Sahabhūhetu is then proven. kkṣk Śimilar dharmas are sabhāgahetu or similar causes. Similars are sabhāgahetu of similars. 
According to some, neutral rpa is sabhāgahetu of the five neutral ṣbandhas, but the four sbkandhas,:sensation, etcare not sabhāgahetu of tūpa. 
According to others, four skandhas are sabhāghetu of the five; but rūpa is not sabhāgahetu of the four. 
Aṇnd according to others, rūpa is not sabhāgahetu of the four, and vice versa. From the point of view of one existence, the fitst embtryonic state is the similar cause of ten states: 
The second embryonic state is the sabhāgahetu of nine states , and thus following. 
Siṃilar causes are the similar dharmas which Belong to the same category and the same stage. 
These four categories are, respectively, the similar cause of four, three, two, and one category. 
kṭk The mind and its mental states are only saṇīprayuk takahetu, causes through association. 
Is this to say that minds and mental states, arisen at different moments and in different series, are among themselves sanprayuke takahetu? 
Wouid you then say that the mind and mental states of the same aspect, that is, having the same aspect of blue, etc., and of the same object , that is, having for their object the same blue, etc., are samprayuktakahetu? 
minds and mental states of different time periods and of different series can have the same aspect and the same object. 
Would you say that the mind and mental states of the same aspect and the same object, can be, furthermore, of the same time period? 
for many persons can see a new rnoon at one and the same tirne. 
The mind and mental states which have the same support are, amoṅg themselves, sanprayuktakahetu. 
For example, a given moment of the organ of sight is the support 1 of a visual consciousness, and 2 of the sensation and the other mental states which are associated with this conscious ness. And the same for the other organs until vanas: a certain moment of the mental organ is the support of a mental consciousness and of the mental states associated with this consciousṅess. Whatever is saprayuktakahetu is also sahabhūhetu. 
What is the difference between these two causes? Some dharmas are called sahabhūhetu because they are mutually the results of one another. 
As companions in a caravan travel thanks to the support that they give one another, in this same way the mind is the result of mental states, and the mental states are the result of the miṇd. 
Some dharmas are called saprayuktakahetu, mutual cause through association, because they function identically, that is, because there is amoṇg them the five similarities or identities defined above ii.34. 
if one of these five identities is missing, they no longer function in the same way and are not associated. 
ss Former universals are sarvatragahetu or universal causes of the defiled dharmas of their own stage. 
meṇts , arisen previously, that is, of the past or present, and belonging to a certain stage , are the univerṣal cause of later defiled dharmas, of the same stage, which are defiled by nature, either through association or through their origin. 
They then constitute a cause different from sabhāgahetu,. 
hen would the defiled dbarmas of an Āryan ? 
skk S Bad dharmas and impure good dharmas are retributive causes. 
Bad dharmaswhich are all impureand impure good dharmas are only retributive causes, because their nature is to Neutral ḍharmas are not retributive causes, because they are weak: 
as rotten seeds, even though moistened, do not grow. 
Pure dharmas are not retributive causes because they are not moistened through desire : 
as intact seeds, not moistened, do ṉot grow. 
thus to which sphere could the result of retribution that they would produce belong? 
The dharmas that are neither neutral nor pure possess the two qualities necessary for retribution, the proper force, and the moisten ing of thitsr, the same as intact and moistened seeds. 
What is the meaning of the expression vpākahetu? 
vipākahetu signifies either cause of vipāka or ctause which is vipāka. 
To which of these two interpretations do you hold? 
If you accept the first, how would you justify the text , The eye arises from vpāka? 
If you accept the second, how would you justify the expression, vipāka of action? 
We have shown that both explanations of the word vipāka are correct. 
What is the meaning of the compound vipāka? 
The prefix v indicates difference. 
Vipāka is a pāka or resuit dissimilar from its cause. 
In Kāmadhātu, 1 a retributive cause consisting of only one skandha can produce a single result: 
bodily and vocal action with its characteristics; 3 a retributive cause consisting of four skandhas caṇ produce a single result: the mind and its mental states, good and bad, with their akṣaṇas. 
In Ārūpyadhātu, 1 a retributive cause consisting of a single skandha caṇ produce a single result: 
Sarvatragahetu aṇd sabhāgaheṭu are of two time periods; three causes are of three time periods. 
Past, present, and future dharmas can be sarprayuktaka, sahabhū, aṇd vipākahetu. 
The Kārikā does not speak of kāraṇahetu : the conditioned dharmas of the three time periods are kāraṇahetu; the anconditioned dharmas are outside of time. 
By reason of which results are they recognized as causes? 
Coṇḍitioned things and disconnection are results. 
The Mūlaśāstra says, What dharmas are results? 
Conditioned things and praisakhyānirodha. 
If the unconditioned is a result, it should have a cause, from which cause one could say that it is the result. 
Furthermore, since you maintain that it is a cause , it should have a result, from which result one could say that it is a cause. 
Only conditioned things, have cause and result. The unconditioned has neither cause nor result. For we canot attribute to it any of the six causes, nor any of the five reṣults. 
Why not admit that the part of the Path which is called ānantaryamārga is the kāraṇahetu of the result of disconṉection ? 
We have seen that kāraṇaheṭu is a cause that does not create any obstacles to arising; but disconnection, being unconditioned, does not arise. Thus one cannot attribute a kāraṉṇpahetu to it. Then how is disconnection a result? 
Of what is it the result? 
īt is the result of the Path, for it is obtained due to the force of the Path : in other words, it is through the Path that an ascetic obtains possession of disconnection. Hence it is the obtaining or the possession of disconnection which is the result of the Path, and not disconnection itself: 
for the Path is efficacious with regard to the obtaining of disconnection, but not with regard to disconnection. 
The efficacy of the Path possesses diversity with regard to both obtaining and disconnection. 
Hence, although the Path is not the cause of disconnec tion , one can say that it is the result of the Path. 
Since no unconditioned thing has adhipatiphala , how can one define it as kāraṇahetu? 
Any unconditioned thing is kāraṇahetu, for it does not create an obstacle to the arising of any ḍharma,; but it does not have any result, for, being outside of time, it can neither project nor produce a resuit. 
an unconditioned thing is a cause. 
In fact, the Sūtra does not say that a cause can be unconditioned; it says that a cause is only conditioned, All the hetus, all the pratyayas which have for a resuit the production of physical matter. 
Produced by impermanent hetus and pratyayas,how can physical matter. and consciousness be permanent? 
If a permanent thing, that is, an unconditioned thing is not a cause, it will not be an object as condition of the conciousness that it refers to. 
The Sūtra declares that the heus and the pratyayas which are capable of producing are impermanent. It does not say that all conditions of the consciousness are imperma nent. An unconditioned thing could then be an object as condition of the consciousness; for an object as condition is not itself productive. 
The Sūtra says that productive causes are impermanent: hence the Sūtra does not deny that an unconditioned thing is ēraṇahetu, that īs, a cause that does not create an.obstacle. 
The Sūtra admits the existence of an object as a condition ; but it does not speak of a kāraṇahetu, a cause that does not create an obstacle. It is not proven that an uncondi tioned thing is a cause. 
In fact, the Sūtra does not say that that which does not create an obstacle is a cause; but it does not contradict this. 
Many Sūtras have disappeared. How can you be sure that some Sūtra does not attribute the quality of āraṇahetu to unconditioned things? ksksk Ṭ What is the dherma that is called visanryoga or discoṉṉection? 
says that disconnection is pratisakhyānirodha. 
When I asked you what pratisakhyā mirodha is, you answered, It is disconnection; I asked you what disconnection is, and you answered, It is praisakhyānirodha! 
You owe us another explanation. 
This dharma, in its nature, is real, but indescribable; only the Āryans realize it internally, each for himself. It is ony possible to indicate its general characteristics, by saying that there is a real entity , distinct from others, which is good and eternal, and which receives the name of pratisarṅkhyānirodha, and which is also called disconnection or visanyoga. kksk iii. 
The Sautrāntikas affirr that the three types of unconditioned things are not real. The three dharmas that it refers to are not distinct and real entities like color, sensation, etc. 
What is called space is solely the absence of any tangible thing, that is, the absence of a resistant body. Persons say, in their obscurity, that there is space when they do not encounter any obstacle. 
What is called pratisanakhyānirodha or Nirvāṇa iswhen both the defilements already produced and the existence already produced aṟe destroyedthe absence of any other defilements or any other existence, and that by reason of the force of the consciousness. 
When, independent of the force of consciousness and by reason of the mere absence of causes there is an absence of arising dharmas, this is what is called apratisarkhyānirodha. 
According to another school, pratisakhyānirodha is the future nonarising of the defilements by reason of consciousness ; apratisamkhyānirodha is the future nonarising of suffering, that is, of existence, by reason of the disappearance of the defilements, and not directly by reason of coṉsciousness. 
But, the future nonarising of suffering supposes consciousness ; it is then included within pratisakhyānirodha. 
Another School defines apratisakhyānirodha as later non existence of the dharmas which have arisen by virtue of their spontaneous destruction. 
In this hypothesis, apratisamkhyānirodha would not be eternal, since it is nonexistent as long as the dharma as cause has not perished. 
Consequently it too would not be eternal, for, if its antecedent were absent, its consequence would also be absent. 
Let us explain. 
Non arising always exists in and of itself. If pratisarkhyā is absent, the dharmas would arise; but if pratisakhyā arises, the dharmas would absolutely not arise. The efficacy of pratisamkhyā with regard to their nonarising consists in this: 
1 that before pratisakhyā, there is no obstacle to their arising; 2 but given pratisakhyā, the dharmas, the arising of which has not been previously hindered, do not arise. 
kskṅḵ If Nirvāga is simply nonarising , how does one explain the Sūtra which says, The cultivation of the five faculties,;faith, etc,has for its result the abandoning of past, present, and future suffering? 
In fact, this abandoning is nothing other than Nirvāṇa, and there can only be nonarising of a future dharma, not of a past ot present dharma. This Sūtra does not contradict our definition of Nirvāṇa. 
In fact, the abandoning of past and present suffering means the abandoning of the defilements bearing past and present suffering. 
Our interpretation is justified by another text which says, Abandon desire relative to rāpa, to sensation. and to consciousness. When desire is abandoned, 7pa, and consciousness will be abandoned and comprehended by you. 
It is in this manner that we should understand the abandoning of past and present suffering of which the Sūtra speaks when it speaks of the faculties. 
If one adopts another reading of this Sūtra on the faculties, to wit, The cultivation of the faculties. has for its result the abandoning of past, present, and future defilements, the explanation is the same. 
Or rather, past defilement is the defilement of a previous existence; present defilement is the defilement of the present exis tence; these do not refer to the defilement of a given past or present moment. 
The same for the eighteen rṣṇāvicaritas or modes of thirst: the modes that are related to a past existence are called past modes, those that are related to a present existence are called present modes, and those thar are related to a future existence are called future modes. Past defilements and present defilements place in the present series seeds that bring forth the arising of future defilement: 
when these seeds are abandoned, past and present defilement is abandoned: in the same way as one says that an action is exhausted when its retribution is exhausted. The abandoning of future suffering and future defilement is the fact that they absolutely do not arise, given the absence of seeds. 
How does one otherwise understand the abandoning of past oṟ present suffering? 
There is no good reason to make an effort to destroy that which has perished or that which is perishing. 
If unconditioned things do not exist, how can the Sutra say Detachment is the best of all conditioned and unconditioned dharmas? 
How can a dharma which does not exist be the best among the dharmas which do not exist? 
9 We do not say that unconditioned things do not exist. They exist in fact in the manṉer in which we say that they exist. 
Let us explain. Before sound is produced, we say There is nonexistence prior to the sound; after the sound has perished, we say There is nonexistence after the sound, and yet it had not been proven that nonexistence exists: the same holds for unconditioned things. 
Although it is nonexistent, one unconditioned thing merits being praised, namely detachement , the absolute future non existence of any wrong. 
This noṇexistent thing is the most distin guished of all nonexistent things. The Śūtra praises it by saying that it is the best, so that believers shall coṉceive joy and affection with regard to it. 
If pratisakhyānirodha or Nirvāṇa is nonexistent, how can it be one of the Truths. 
What should we understand by Noble Truth or ārayasatya? 
Without doubt the sense of saya is not incorrect The Āryans see that which exists and that which does not exist in a not incoṟrrect manner: in that which is suffering, they see only suffering, and in the nonexistence of suffering, they see the nonexistence of suffering. What contradiction do you find between the nonexistence of suffeting and pratisakhyānirodha being a Truth? 
And this nonexistence is the Third Truth, because the Āryans see it and proclaim it imrmmediately after the Second Truth. 
But if unconditioned things are non existent, the consciousness that has space and the two extinctions for its object would have a nonthing for its object. 
We do not see any inconvenience in this, as we shall explain in the discussion on the past and future. 
What harm do you see in maintaining that uaconditioned things really exist? 
What advantage do you see in this? 
This advantage that the Vaibhāṣika doctrine is found to be safegarded. May the gods be charged with defending this doctrine, if they judge that it is possible! 
But to maintain the existence of unconditioned things in and of themselves is to affirm a nonexistent thing to be real. 
In fact, uaconditioned things are not known through direct perception , as is the case for physical matter, sensation, etc.; and they are pot known through inference , by reason of their activity, as is the case for the sense oṟgans. 
Furthermore, if urodha or extinction is a thing in and of itself, how do you justify the genitive, uhkhasya nrodhaḥ, the extinction of suffering, as the extinction of the defilement, or the extinction of the object of defilement? 
But we cannot conceive of any cause and effect relationship, of any effect and cause relationship, of a relationship of the whole to the part, etc., between the things, that is to say, the defilements, and its extinction conceived of as an entity in itself, which would justify the genitive. 
We affirm, that extinction is a thing in and df itself. 
Yet we can specify extinction as being in a relationship with such things , for one takes possessioṇḥ of extinction at the moment when one cuts off the possession of a certain thing. 
But, we would answer, what is it that determines or specifies the taking of possession of extinction? 
The Sutra speaks of the Bhikṣu who has obtained Nirvāṇa in this life. If Nirvaṉa is nonexistence, how could he obtain it? 
The Bhikṣu, through the possession of the adveṟse force of the antidote, that is, through the possession of the Path, has obtained a personality contrary to the defilements, and contrary to a new existence. This is why the Sūtra says that he has obtained Nirvāṇa. 
Moṟeover we have a text that shows that Nirvāṇa is pure nonexistence. 
The Sūtra says, The complete abandoning, the purification, the exhausting, the detach ment, the extinction, the abatemeat, the definitive passing away of this suffering; and the nonrebirth, the nongrasping, the nonappearanṇce of.apother sufferingthis is calm, this is excellent, namely the rejection of all padhi, the exhausting of thirst, detachment, extinction, Nirvāṇa. 
I do not see that the locative in Nirvāṇa has any force to establish that Nirvāṇa is a thing. 
In what sense do you understand the locative asin? 
If this means asmnin sati, if Nirvāṇa exists, there is no appearance of suffering, then suffering would never appear, since Nirvāṇa is eternal. 
If this means asmin prāpta, Śit Nitvāṇa has been obtained, you would have to admit that future suffering wili not appear while the Pathby virtue of which you suppose that Nirvāṇa is obtainedeither is, or rather has been obtained. 
Consequently the comparison of the Sūtra is excellent, The deliverance of his mind is like the Nirvāṇa of a flame. 
That is to say, as the extinction of a flame is only the passing away of the flame and not a certain thing in and of itself, so too is the deliverance of the mind of the Blessed One. 
are still warranted by the authority of the Abhidharma wherein we read, What are the avastuka dharmas? 
They are the unconditioned things. 
The term avastuka signifies unreal, without selfṉature. 
1026cl1; Vibhāṣa, TD 27, p. 985a22; 2. 
vasṭu in the sense of any object of consciousness, for example All the dbarmas are known through different knowledges, each knowing its own object ; 3. 
vastu in the sense of bond of attachment, for example, Is the petson who is bound to a vastn through the bond of affection, bound to this same vastun through the bond of hostility? 
vastu in the sense of cause, for example, What are the dharmas possessing a cause? 
The conditioned dharmas ; 5. 
In the passage that concerns us, vas has the meaning of cause; avastuka signifies that which has no cause. Unconditioned things, although real, always lack activity, have no cause which produces them, and produce no effects. 
kskḵ We must explain what type of result proceeds from each type of cause. 
Retribution is the result of the last cause. 
The last cause is the retributive cause, vpākahetu, because the retributive cause is named last in this list. 
The first result, vpākaphala , is the result of this cause. 
Outflowing is the result of the similat cause and the univerṣaḷ cause. 
The result of sabhāgahetu and saprayuktakahetu is called prauruṣa or virile, that is, the result of pwruṣakāra or virile activity. 
The reṣuit of virile activity can thus be teṟrmed the virile result. 
Are taprayuktahetu and sahabhūhetu the only causes that result in virile activity? 
A nonneutral action is called this because it produces retribution; noṉneutral actions are bad actions and goodimpure actions. 
From actions of this nature there arises later,not at the same time, and not immediately afterwards,the result that one terms retributive result or matured result. 
Why not consider the dharmas that do not form part of living beings,mountains, rivers, etc,as retributive results? 
The dharmas that do not form part of living beings are, by nature, common in that everyone may partake of them. 
Now retributive results, by definition, are unique: another person never experiences the tetṛibutive results of actions that I accomplish. 
Action produces a predominating result in addition to a retributive reṣsult: all beings experience this result in common, because the collectivity of their actions cooperate in their creation. 
Two causes, the similar cause and the universal cause produce an out flowing result. 
If the result of the universal cause is an outflowing result, a result similar to its cause, why not give the universal cause the name of similar cause? A result of a univeṛsaḹ cause is always similar to its cause 1 from the point of view of the stage: like it, it belongs to Kāmadhātu, etc.; and 2 from the point of view of its moral character: like it, it is defiled. But it can belong to a different category than the category of its cause. 
When there is a similarity between a cause and its result from this last point of view, the universal cause is at one and the same time a similar cause. 
Four alternative cases present themselves: 
A similar cause which is not a universal cause: 
the universal defilements related to a defilement of another category; 3. 
the universal defilements related to a defilement of their own category; 4. 
Any conditioned dharma is the predominating result of conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the dharmas that are later than it. 
Five causes grasp their result in the present. 
Five causes grasp their results only when they are in the present: in the past, they have already grasped their results; in the future, they have no activity. 
The same holds for kāraṇahetu; bat the staṇza does not mention it, because kāraṇahetu does not necessarily have a result. 
Two produce their result in the present. The mutually coexistent cause and the associated cause produce their results only when they are in the present: these two causes in fact grasp and produce their results at the same time. 
Two produce their results in both the past and the present. The similar cause and the universal cause produce their results both when they are in the present and when they are in the past. 
How can they produce their outflowing results when they are in the present? 
When their result has arisen, they are past: they have already produced it; they do not produce the same result twice. 
It happens that, at a gīven moment, a good similar cause abandons at the last moment, grasps a resuḻt, but does not produce a result. 
The possession of the roots of good that the person who again takes up the roots of good acquires in the first moment, produces a result, but does not grasp a result. 
The possession of the bad dharmar that a person who obtains detachment from desire abandons at the last moment. 
The possession that a person who fell from detachment acquires in the first moment. 
the aforementioned possession of an Arhat who has fallen. 
When an undefiledneutral similar cause produces its result, it grasps it , but it can grasp its result without producing it: 
for example, in the case of the last sandhas of an Arhat which have no outflowing. 
If we consider the mind and its mental states in their sucessive moments, we can establish the four following alternatives for good similar causes: 
Two good minds follow one another, the first grasping and producing an outflowing result, which is the second mind. 
We can in like manner establish the alternatives regarding bad similar causes. 
One cause produces its result in the past. 
The retributive cause produces its result when it is in the past, for this result is not simultaneous to, nor immediately following its cause. 
kskṣk Some other Masters, say that there are four results different from the five resuits that we have just mentioned. These four are: pratiṣṭhāphala, a base result: a ciṟcle of water is the result of the circle of wind and thus following to plants; which are the ṛesult of eaṟth; 2. prayogaphala, a result of preparatory exercise: anutpādajñāna, etc. 
is the result of śbhā, etc. 
sāmagrīphala, a result of a complex: the visual consciousness is the result of the organ of sight, of a visible thing, of light and of an act of attention ; 4. bhāvaṇṉāphala, a result of meditatioṉ: 
a mind capable of creating fictive beings is the result of a Dhyāṇna. 
the first of these four results is included in the category of the predominent result; the other three are included in the category of virile result. 
kskiḥ We have explained causes and results. 
We must now examine how many causes produce the different dharrnas. 
the other dharmas, that is, the neutral dharmuas, with the exception of the dharmas of retribution, and the good dharmas, with the exception of the first pure dharṇas. 
1 defiled; 2 arisen from a retributive cause; 3 others; and 4 pure for the first time, arising from causes that remain when one excludes, in this order, 1 the retributive cause, 2 the universal cause, 3 these two causes, 4 these two causes plus the similar cause. 
The associated cause is further excluded with respect to the dharmas that are not mind or mental states, The mind and its mental states, 1 when they are defiled, arise from five causes excluding the retributive cause; 2 when they are retṛibutive, they arise from five causes with the exclusion of the universal cause; 3 when they are different from these two categories and from the fourth, they arise from four causes, with the exclusion of ṭthe retributive cause and the universal cause; 4 when they are pure for the first time, they arise from three causes, with the exclusion of the aforemeṇtioned two causes and the similar cause. 
The dharmas that are not mind or mental states, namely the material dharmas and the saskāras not associated with the mind , accordingly as they fall into one of four categories, arising from causes proper to this category with the exclusion of the associated causes are;: 
defiled and retributive, four causes; different, three causes; pure for the first time , two causes. 
These is no dharma that comes from a single cause: 
the reason for being and the mutually coexistant cause are never absent. 
What are conditions ? 
The pratyayas are said to be four. 
Where is this said? 
In the Sūtra, it says There are four conditions , namely causes as a condition , an equal and immediately antecedent condition , an object as condition , and a predominating influence as condition. Pratyayaṭā means.a type of pratyaya. kksk What is cause as a condition? The pratyaya that bears the name of hetu is five hetus. 
Excepting kāraṇahetu, the five remaining herus constitute hetn pratyayatā, causes as condition. 
If one excepts the last mind and the last mental states of the Arhat at the moment of Nirvāṇa, all minds and mental states which have arisen are an equal and immediately antecedent condition. Only, mind and mental states are equal and immediately antecedent conditions. Of what dharmas are they the equal and immediately antecedent conditions? 
This type of condition is called samanantara because it produces equal and im mediate dharmas. The prefix sarn is understood in the sense of equality. 
Consequently orily minds and their mental states are equal and immediately antecedent conditions, for there is no equality between a cause and its result with respect to the other dharas, for example the material dharmas. 
In fact, after a rūpa of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, there can arise at the same time two rūpar, one of Kāmadhātu, the other from Rūpadhātu , oṟ two rpas, one from Kāmadhātu, the otheṛ 
The appearance of the rāpar is confused: now an equal and immediately antecedent condition does not produce confused results; hence material dharmas are not equal and immediately antecedent conditions. Vasumitra says: 
A second rūpa of accumulation can arise in the ṣame body, without which the series of a rpa of accumulation would be broken; hence pa is not an.equal and immediately antecedent condition. 
The Bhadanta says: A rpa dharma is immediately followed by more or by less. Hence it is not an equal and immediately antecedent condition. Less arises from more: as when a great mass of straw, burned, becomes ash. 
More arises from less: as when a small seed produces the roots of a fig tree, its trunk, its branches, and its leaves. 
When minds immediately succeed one another, do they always admit the same number of types of associated mental states? 
Thus is it only in relation to its own type that an earlier mental sṣṭate is an equal and immediately antecedent condition of a later mental state? 
what state , past, present, or future, are the ḍharmas found with regard to which the diverse conditions exercise their activity? 
Let us first examine cause as condition, that is, as five causes, with the exclusion of kāraṇahetu. Two causes exercise their activity with regard to a petishing dharma. 
Perishing means of the present. A present dharma is called perishing, in the act of perishing, because, having arisen, it is turned towards its destruction. Sahabhūbhetu and saprayuktakahetu operate with regard to a present dharma, because they operate with regard to a dharma that arises at the same time as they do. 
Three, with regard to an arising dharma. An arising dharma means a future dharma, because a future dharma, not having arisen, is ṭurned towards arising. TThe three causes in question are sabhāgahetu , sarvatra gahetu , and vipākahetu. Concerning the other conditions: Two other conditions, in reveṟse order. First in the list of conditions there comes the equal and immedi ately antecedent condition: 
it exercises it activity as do the three causes, namely with regard to an arising dharmna, fot the minds and mental states of a given moment cede their place to the mind and mental states which are arising. 
this perishing dbarma is mind and mental states, the subjects of the consciousness , which, perishing,that is, of the present,;grasp a present object. 
The activity of predominent influence as a condition only consists in not creating any obstacle either to a past, present, or future ḍbarrna. 
rḥk The different types of dharmas arise by reason of how many conditions? 
The mind and its mental states arise by reason of four conditions. Causes as conditions: the five causes; 2. 
equal and imrnediately antecedent condition: the eaṟlier mind and mental states, which have aṟisen not separated by other minds or mental states; 3. an object as condition: 
the five objects of which physical matter is the first, or, in the case of the mental consciousness, all the dharmas; and 4. 
a predominating influence as condition: all the dharmas, except the mind and its mental states whose arising is under consideration. 
The two absorptions, by reason of three. One must exclude the object as condition, because the absoṟption of nonconsciousness and the absoṟption of extinction do not grasp an object. 
causes as coṇditions: two causes, sahabhūḥetu , and sabhāgahetu ; 2. 
an equal and immediately antecedent condition, the mind of entry into the absorption and the mental states that are associated with this mind; the mind of entry is not separated by any mind of any of the moments of the absorption; and 3. 
the predominating influence as condition, as above. 
These two absorptions arise from an application, from an inflec tion of the mind: they then have the mind as an equal and immediately antecedent condition. They hinder the arising of the mind: thus they are not equal and immediately antecedent conditions of the mind leaving the absorption, even though they are immediately contigous to it. 
The other dharmas, namely the other saskāras disassociated form the mind and the material haras, arise by reason of the causes as conditions and the predominating influence as condition. 
The world does not proceed from a single cause that is called God, or Puruṣa, or Pradhāṇna, or any other name., How do you prove this thesis? 
Well said, in truth, is the popular stanza, He is called Rudra because he burns, because he is excited, ferocious, teṛrible, an eater of flesh, blood, and marrow. 
If, modifying their position, they admit the existence of these causes, and pretend that these causes serve God as auxiliaries, this then is no more that a pious affirmation, for we do not maintain any activity of a cause besides the activity of the socalled secondary causes. 
Furthermore, God would not be sovereign with regard to auxiliary causes, since these cooperate in the production of the effect through their own efficacy. 
but creation, dependent only on God, would never have a beginning, like God himself, and this is a consequence that the Theist rejects. 
Like the birds and the animals, truly worth of pity, they go from existence to existence, accomplishing diverse actions; they experience the results of these actions and falsely believe that God is the cause of these results. 
kksk We have seen that the materialdharmas arise by reason of two conditions, causes as conditions and predominating influences as conditions. 
The primary elements are the cause of the derived elements in two ways. 
And of the derived elements, in five ways. 
Jananahety ot generating cause, because the derived elements arise from them, like a child from his parents. 
Niśrayahetu or tutelage cause, because the bhautikas, once arisen, submerge their influence, as a monk is under the tutelage of his Ācārya and his Upādhyāya. 
Pratiṣṭhāhetu or supporting cause, because the derived elements aṟe supported by them, as a picture is supported by a wall. 
Upastambhahetu or maintaining cause, because the primary ele ments are the cause of the noninterruption of the derived elements. 
Upabṛhaṇahetu or growth cause, because the primary elements are the cause of the development of the derived elements. 
This means that the primary elements are, with regard to the derived elements , the cause of arising , the cause of transformation , the supporting cause , the cause of duṟation , and the cause of development. 
Derived elements are the cause of the derived elements in three ways. 
The actions of the body and voice of the category described in ii5la , which are derived elements, are sahabhūhetu. 
All the derived elements which have arisen, are, with regard to similar derived elements, sabhāgahetu. 
The actions of the body and voice are vipākahetu: the eye is produced through retribution of actioṉ, etc. 
And the cause of the primmary elements, in one way. 
The actions of the body and voice produce the primary elements as a retributive result: they are then vpākahetu. 
kkcḥ We have seen that antecedent minds and mental states are the equal and immediately antecent condition of subsequent minds and mental states. But we have not explained how many types of mind arise immediately after each type of mind. In order to define its role, we must first establish a classification of the mind. 
First, we must distinguish twelve categories. 
Good, bad, defiledneutral, undefiledneutral minds in Kāmādhātu. 
Four types of minds belong to Kāmadhātu: good, bad, defiled neutral, and undefiledneutral. 
Good defiledDeutral, undefiledneutral minds in Rūpa dhāṭu and in Ārūpyadhātu. Three types of minds are in the two higher spheres: all of the above, excluding the bad mind. And two pure minds. The two pure minds are those of the Śaikṣa and the Arhat or Aśaikṣa. 
In all, these constitute twelve minds. 
Nine types of minds can arise after a good mind in Kāmadhātu. 
Immediately after a good mind in Kāmadhātu there can arise nine minds, namely the four minds in Kāmadhātu; two minds in Rūpadhātu: 
good, when a ascetic entets into absoṟption, and defiledneutral, when a person who dies in Kāmadhātu with a good mind passes into the intermediate existence of Rūpadhātu ; a mind in Ārūpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind, when one dying in Kāmadhātu is reboṟn in Ārūpyadhātu; not good, for, since Ārūpya dhātu is estranged from Kāmadhtu by four estrangements, one cannot pass directly from Kāmadhātu into an absoṟrption of Ārūpya dhātu; the two pure minds, of Śaikṣa or of Aśaikṣa, at entry into the Understanding of the Truths. 
A good mind can arise immediately after eight minds, narnely: the four minds in Kāmadhātu, two minds in Rūpadhātu, good and defiledneutral minds, upon leaving an absoxption. It happens in fact that an ascetic, bothered by a defiled absoṟp tion, leaves this absorption: 
after the defiled mind, which is this absorption, he produces a good mind of a lower stage ; and two pure minds, of Śaikṣa or Aśaikṣa, upon leaving the Understanding of the Ttuths. 
A bad mind can arise after ten types of minds. 
A klśṣṭa mind, that is to say, a bad and a defiledneutral mind can arise after ten mindsexcluding the two pure minds, for a mind of rebirth into Kāmadhātu is defiled and can follow any kind of mind belonging to the three spheres of existence. 
Four types of minds can arise after such a mind. 
Four minds can arise after a kli5z mind, namely the four minds of Kāmadhātu. The same for a defiledneutral mind. An undefiledneutral mind can arise after five minds. An undefiledneutral mind can arise after five types of mind. Namely the four minds in Kāmadhātu, plus a good mind in Rūpadhātu: for a mind capable of creating fictive beings in Kāmadhātu, a miṇd that has for its object the creation of an object of Kāmadhātu, follows a good mind in Rūpadhātu. Seven types of mind can arise after an undefiledneutral mind. 
the four minds in Kāmadhātu, two minds in Rūpadhātu, good minds, for, after the aforementioned mind of creation, a good mind reappears in Rūpadhātu, and a defiledneutral mind, when a person, dying with this mind, is reborn in Rūpadhātu the first mind of which is necessarily a defiledneutral mind ; a mind of Ārūpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind, when a person, dying with this mind, is reborn in Ārūpyadhātu. 
In Rūpadhātu eleven types of minds can arise after a good mind. 
Eleven minds, excluding an undefiledneutral mind in Ṛūpa dhātu, can arise immediately after a good mind in Rūpadhātu. A good mind can aṟise after nine types of minds. 
A good mind can arise after nine minds, excluding the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu and an undefiledneutral mind in Ārūpyadhātu. 
A defiledneutral mind can arise after eight minds, excluding the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu and the two pure minds. 
Six minds can arise after a defiledneutral mind, namely the three minds in Rūpadhātu, and the good, bad, and defiledneutral minds in Kāmadhātu. An undefiledneutral mind can a:ise after three types of mind. 
An undefiledneutral mind can arise after the three minds in Rūpadhātu. 
Six minds can arise after an undefiledneutral mind, namely: the three minds in Rūpadhātu, the two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu , and the defiled tnind in Arupyadhatu. As above, so too in Ārūpyadhātu, for these. An undefiledneutral mind in Ārūpyadhātu can arise after the three minds of this sphere. Six minds can arise after an undefiledneutral mind in Ārūpya dhātu, namely: 
Nine minds can arise after a good mind, with the exception of a good mind in Kāmadhātu and an undefiledneutral mind in Kāma dhātu and Rūpadhātu. Such a can arise after six types of mind. 
A good mind can arise after six minds, namely the three minds in Ārūpyadhātu, a good mind ia Rūpadhātu, and the two pure minds. Seven types of minds can arise after a defiledneutral mind. 
Seven minds can arise after a defiledneutral mind, namely the three minds in Arāpyadhātu, a good mind in Rūpadhātu, two defiled minds in Kāmadhātu, and a defiled mind in Ṛūñpadhātu. And the same for it. 
A defiledneutal mind can arise after seven minds, with the exception of the two defiled minds in Kāmādhatu, a defiled mind in Rūpadhātu and the two pure minds. 
A Śaikṣa mind can arise after four types of minds. 
A Śaikṣa mind, the mind belonging to the saint who is not an Arhat, can arise after four minds, namely a Śaikṣa mind and a good mind in each of the three spheres. But five types of minds can arise after such. 
Five minds can arise after a Śaikṣa mind, namely the four that have just been named and an Aśaikṣa mind. An Aśaikṣa mind can arise after five types of minds. 
An Aśaikṣa mind can arise after five minds, namely after a Śaikṣa mind, an Aśaikṣa mind, aṇnd a good mind of each of the three spheres. 
Four minds can arise after an Aśaikṣa mind, namely an Aśaikṣa mind and a good mind of each of three spheres. 
The twelve types of mind succeed one another in conformity with these rules. 
And again, The twelve types of mind make twenty. How is this? By dividing the good mind of the three Dhātus into two, the acquired and the innate minds. A good mind of each of the three spheres is divided into two categories, 1. that acquired through effort, and 2. that acquired by birth. 
By dividing an undefiledneutral mind in Kāmadhātu into four: 
By excluding the undefiledneutral mind of application in Rūpadhātu. 
An undefiledneutral mind in Rūpadhātu is divided into only three categories, for Failpasthānika does not exist in this sphere. 
By taking into account the good minds, we obtain a total of twenty. 
Three undefiledneutral minds, the ryāpathia mind and follow. ing, have visible things, odors, taste, and tangible things for their object. The śaipasthānika mind, furthermore, has sound for its object. ṉ These three undefiledneutral minds are solely mental conscious nesses. 
However the five sense consciousnesses preceed and prepare the aryāpathika aṅd śailpasthāntka minds. 
According to another opinion, there is a mental consciousness produced by the airyāpathika mind, which has the twelves āyatanas, from the organ of sight to the dharmāyatana, for its object. 
Twenty minds arise one after another, in conformity with the following rules: Kāmadhātu: eight types of mind of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, namely two good minds, two kisṭa minds, and four undefiledneutral minds. Good Acquired through Effort. Followed by ten: seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñāphala. ; a mind of Rūpadhātu acquired through effort; and a Śaikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. It follows seven: 
four minds of the same sphere, the two good minds and the two bliy minds; a mind acquired through effort and an undefiled mind of Rūpadhātu; a Saikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Good Acquired through Birth. Followed by ten: seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala; undefiledneutral minds of Rūpa dhātu and Arūpyadhātu. 
It follows eleven: seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñāphala; a mind acquired through effort and an undefiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu; a Śaikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Bad and defiledneutral. Followed by seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala. 
They follow fourteen: seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhiñāphala, four minds of Rūpadhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and abhijñāphala, three minds of Arūpyadbhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort. Vipākaja aṇd aryāpathika. Followed by eight: 
six minds of the same sphere, with the exeption of a mind acquired through effort and abhñāphala; an undefiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu and of Arūpyadhātu. 
They follow seven minds of the same sphere follow, with the exception of abhijñāphala. Śilpasthānika. 
Followed by six minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and bhijñāphala. 
They follow seven minds of the same sphere, with the exception of abhijñaphala. Abhiñāphala. 
Followed by two minds, abhiññāphala of the same sphere and a mind acquired through effort in Rūpadhātu. It follows two: the same. ksṣk ii. 
Rūpadhātu: six types of mind of the sphere of Rūpadhātu, namely two good minds, one kdṣṭa mind, and three uṇdefiledneutral minds. Good Acquired through Effort. Followed by twelve: six of the same sphere, three of Kāmadhātu: good acquired through effort, good acquired through birth; and abhiñāphala; 10 a mind of Arūpyadhātu acquired through effort, and a Śaikṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. If follows ten: four of the same sphere, excepting airyāpa thika and vipākaja, two of Kāmadhātu, acquired through effort and abhijñāphala, two of Arūpyadhātu, acquired through effort and defiledneutral; and a Śakṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. Good Acquired through Birth. 
five of the same sphere, except abhi jñāphala; two of Kāmadhātu, bad and defiledneutral; and a defiledneutral mind of Arūpyadhātu. 
It follows five of the same sphere, except abhjñāphala. Detiledneutral minds. 
Followed by nine minds: five minds of the same sphere, with the exception of an abhijñāphala mind; four minds of Kāma dhātu, two good minds and two klisṭa minds. 
five minds of the s same sphere, with the exception of an abhiññāphala mind; three minds of Kāmadhātu, an mind acquired through birth, an aryāpathika mind, and a vipākaja mind; three minds of Arūpyadhātu, with the exception of a mind acquired though effort. 
four minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort and an abhiñāphala mind; two minds of Kāmadhātu, a bad mind aṇd a defiledneutral mind; one mind of Ārāpyadhātu, a defiledneutral mind. 
They follow five minds of the same sphere, with the exception of aṉn abhiñāphala mind. Abhjñāphala. 
Followed by two minds of the same sphere, a mind acquired through effort and an abhi0ñāphala mind. 
It follows two minds: the same. 
kkk iii. Ārūpyadhātu: four types of mind of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu, namely two good minds, a defiledneutral mind and a vipākaja mind. Good Acquired through Effort. Followed by seven mind: four minds of the same sphere; a mind of Rāpadhātu acquired through effort; and a Śaīkṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Good Acquired through Birth. Followed by seven minds: four minds of the same sphere; a defiledneutral mind of Rāpadhātu; a bad mind and a defiled neutral mind of Kāmadhātu.ē It follows four minds of the same sphere. Defiledneutral. Followed by eight minds: 
four minds of the same sphere; a mind acquired through effort and a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu; a bad mind and a āefiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu. 
four minds of the same sphere; a mind acquired through birth, an airyāpathika mind, and an vpākaja mind of Rūpadhātu and Kāmadhātu. 
Followed by six minds: three minds of the same sphere, with the exception of a mind acquired through effort; a defiledneutral miad of Rūpadhātu; a bad mind and a defiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu. 
Four minds follow, of this same sphere. 
Followed by six minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres; an mind acquired through effort of Kāmadhātu; and a Śaiksa mind and an Aśaikṣa mind. 
It follows four minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres; a Śaikṣa mind. Aśaikṣa. 
Followed by five minds: the six minds which follow Śaikṣa with the exception of the Śaikṣa mind. 
It follows five minds: a mind acquired through effort of the three spheres, a Śakṣa mind and an Aśaikṣa miṇd. 
For what reason is this not reciprocally true? 
A vipākaja mind is not favorable to a mind acquired through effort, because it is weak, and because it develops spontaneously. 
Airyāpahika ahd failpasthānika minds are not favoṛable to a mind acquired through effort because their reason for being is the creation of an attitude or a created thing. 
If a mind acquired through effort does not arise immediately after the vipākaja, etc., because these are not favorable to it, still less will it arise after a defiled mind which is contrary to it. 
Yet, when an ascetic is exhausted from the activity of the defilements, a mind acquired through effort arises from the fact that the ascetic lays hold of a perfect consciousness of this activity. 
The innate good mind of Kāmadhātu is sharp; hence it can arise after the two pure mminds and also after a mind in Rūpadhātu acquired through effort, but, as it develops spontaneously, it is not followed by these same minds. 
An innate good mind of Kāmadhātu, being sharp, can arise after a defiled mind of Rūpadhātu; but an innate good mind of Rūpadhātu, not being sharp, cannot arise after a defiled mind of Arūpyadhātu. 
We can distinguish three acts of attention: Svalakṣaṇamanaskāra, an act of attention to specific character istics, for example the judgements Rāpa has rūpaṇa for its charac teristīc. 
Sāmānyalakṣaṇmanaskāra, an act of attention to common or general characteristics, to the sixteen aspects of the Truths, imperma pence, etc., and The conditioned dharmas are impermanent. 
onṉe can realize the Path after these three acts of attention, and, inversely, one can produce these three acts of attention immediately after the Path. 
This opinion is supported by the text, He produces the part of Bodhi called memory in company with the contemplation of repulsive things. 
it is solely after an act of attention to general characteristics that one can realize the Path; after the Path, one can produce the three acts of attention. 
The text refers to this indirect action of the contemplation of repulsive things and so says, aśubhāsahagatam. 
it is only after an act of attention to general characteristics that an ascetic can realize the Path; furthermore, after the Path, he can only produce acts of attention to general characteristics. 
Certainly, we indeed see that an ascetic who has entered into samyaktvaniyāma, onto the Path by relying on one of the thtee lower stages , can produce, upon coming out of the Path, an act of attention to general characteristics in Kāmadhātu and can be established in hearing or in reflection, because the stages in question are near; but, when an ascetic has entered samyaktvaniyāma by relying on the Second, Third, or Fourth Dhyāṇa, to which stage could the act of attention to general characteristics belong that he produces upon coming out of the Path? 
He will produce an act of attention to general characteristics in Kāmadhātu, because Kāmadhātu is too estranged from the higher Dhyānas. 
He will not produce an act of attention to general character istics of the sphere of one of the three higher Dhyānas, because he has not previously obtained conscious acts of attention, except in the course of the practice of the nirvedhabhāgīyas : 
now an Āryan cannot again realize the nirvedhabhāgīyas, fot we cannot admit that he would for a second time realize the preparatory path, since he already possesses its result. 
But, we would say, there exists other acts of attention to general characteristics which have been cultivated at the same time as the virvedhabhgīyar : 
for example, seeing that all saṣkāras are impeṟmanent, all dharmas are impersonal, Nirvāṇa is tranquil. It is this other type of sāmānyamana skāra that an ascetic brings forth upon leaving the Path. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this opinion, because it is illogical. 
When one obtains the result of Arhat based on Anāgāmya , the mind leaving the absoṟption is either of this stage or of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
When one obtains the same result based on Ākiñcanya, the mind of leaving is either of this same stage , or of naivasajnānāsajñāyaśtana. 
When one obtains the same result by relying on any other stage, the mind of leaving is solely of this other stage. 
Three aṟe possible in Kāmadhātu, the first, the second, and the third, for meditation is not of Kāmadhātu. 
Three are possible in Rūpadhātu, the fitst, the second, and the fourth, for, in this sphere, as soon as one meditates or reflects , one enters into absorption. 
Two are possible in Ārūpyadhātu, the first and the fourth. 
The Path is hence produced after five acts of attention, two of Kāmadhātu, two of Rūpadhātu, and one of Arūpyadhātu. 
But, after the Path, an act of innate attention of Kāmadhātu can arise, because it is sharp. 
kkk How many minds are acquired when one manifests each of the twelve types of minds? 
With the defiled mind of each of the three spheres, there is obtaining of six, of sīx, and of two minds respectively. 
Obtaining the six minds with a defiled mind of Kāmadhātu a. 
Oṇe obtains a good mind of Kāmadhātu when one again takes up the roots of good with a mind of doubt, which is defiled ; or when one returns to Kāmadhātu by falling from the higher spheres. 
One obtains a bad mind and defiledneutral mind of Kāma dhātu when one returns to Kāmadhātu by falling from the higher spheres: for then one takes possession of whichever of these two minds manifests itself; or when one falls from the detachment of Kamadhātu. 
One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu when one falls from Ātūpyadhātu into Kāmadhātu. One in fact takes possession of a defiledneutral mind of Rūpadhātu with a defiled mind of conception in Kāmadhātu. One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Ārāpyadhātu and a Śaikṣa miṇd when one falls from the quality of an Arhat thtough the mind of Kāmadhātu. 
Obtaining the six minds with a defiled mind of Rūpadhātu. 
One obtains one undefiledneutral mind of Kāmadhātu and the three minds of Rūpadhātu when one falls from Ārūpyadhātu into Rāpadhātu. 
Oṉe obtains a defiledṉeutral mind of Ārūpyadhātu and a Śaikṣa mind when one falls from the quality of an Arhat through a mind of Rūpadhātu. 
One obtains a defiledneutral mind of Ārāpyadhātu aṇda Śatkṣa mind with the defiled mind of Arūpyadhātu when one falls from the quality of Arhat through a mind of Arūpyadhātu. 
One obtains three minds with a good mind of Rūpadhātu: this mind itself, and the undefiledneutral minds of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu, that is, the minds capable of cteating fictive beings relative to these two spberes. 
When one realizes the first Śaikṣa mind, namely dwhkhe dharma jñānakṣānti , one obtains four minds: 
the Śaikṣa mind itself, two undefiledneutral minds, one of Kāmadhātu and one of Rūpadhātu , and a good mind of Ārūpyadhātu; there is, by virtue of the Path, entry into the Path and detachment from Kāmadhātu and Ārūpyadhāta. 
One obtains these same minds with the other minds. 
One obtains the minds not specified above only when they manifest themselves. 
According to another opinion, without making any distinction among the spheres, it is said that The wise say that, with a defiled mind, one obtains nine minds; with a good mind one obtains six; and with a neutral mind one obtains a neutral mind. 
Concerning the good mind, one should correct this passage so that it reads one obtains seven. 
When a person again takes up the roots of good by means of Right View , he obtains a good mind of Kāmadhātu; when he detaches himself from Kāma dhātu, he obtains the minds capable of creating fictive beings of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu, which are two undefiledneutral minds; when he takes up the absorptions of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, he obtaias the good minds of these two spheres; upon entry onto the Path, he obtains a Śaikṣa mind; upon his entry into the result of Arhatship, he obtains an Aśaikṣa mind. 
Here is a ṣtanza which serves as a memoryaide: 
Āt conception, in absorption, in detachment, in falling, and in the taking up again of the roots of good, one obtains minds that oṉe did not possess. 
What are these three realms? 
Twenty, through the division of the hells and the differences in the continents. 
Above is Rūpadhātu, of seventeen places The seventeen places of Rūpadhātu are above Kāmadhātu, made up of dhyānas which are each of three stages. But the fourth is of eight stages. Each of the dhyānar contains three stages or spheres, with the exception of the fourth. 
Ākāśānantyāyatana, Vijñānāntyāyatana, Ākicanyāyatana, and Naivasajñānāsathjñāyatana constitute Ārūpyadhātu which is thus of four types. 
This series is sttong and can serve as a support. 
Kāmadhātu, the receptacle of bātu of the kāmas; Rūpadhātu, the receptacle of matter; Ārūpyadhātu, the receptacle of ārpya. 
Concupiscence, the desire to eat by mouthfuls and sexual desire. We will see this by the following stanzas. 
Śāriputra said to an Ājīvika, The fine things of this woṟld are not kāmas; kāma is the desire that the imagination nourishes among humans. The objects of the universe are of litle importance; the sage oveṟcomes all desire with regard to them. The Ājīvika answered, If the fine things of this wotld are not amas, if kāma iīs the desire that is nourished by the imagination, thesame Bhikṣu would be a taster of the kāmas when he produces bad imaginations. 
Śāriputra answered, If the fine things of this wotld are āmas, if kāma is not desire which the imagination nourishes, then the Master himself would be a taster of the kāmas when he sees objects. 
kkk Should one consider as intergral to one Dhātu , all the dbarmas that are produced in this Dhātu? 
To whom does this tether belong? 
To the owner of this horse. 
To whom does this horse belong? 
To the owner of this tether. 
This answer does not teach us anything. 
Craving proper to Kāmadhātu is the craving of the being who is not detached from this place, who has not rejected craving with regard to the āharmas of this place. 
Or rather, craving proper to Kāmadhātu is the ctaving of a being who is not absorbed ; craving proper to Rūpadhātu, to Ārūpyadhātu is craving relative to the absorption of dhyāna, to the absorptions of ārāpya. 
kskk The mind by which one creates magical objects in the sphere of Kāmadhātu is the result of a dhyāna. 
This mind is hence of the sphere of Kāmadhātu without there being, with regard to it, any craving of the order of Kāmadhātu: 
This mind is of the sphere of Kāmadhātu because a craving of the order of Kāmadhātu is produced with regard to it in a person who intends to speak of this mind as belonging to another, or who remembers having possessed it previously, or who sees magic creations. 
now a mind of the sphere of Rūpadhātu cannot create odo1s or tastes because beings in Rūpadhātu are detached from both of these. 
tkksk Is this triple Dhātu unique? 
The triple Dhātus are infinite, like space; although there has not been any production of new beings, andalthough innumerable Buddhas convert innumerable beings and cause them to obtain Nirvāṇa, the beings of innumerable Dhātus are never exhausted. kkṣk How are the three Dhātus arranged? 
Horizontally,as the Sūtra proves, as when the cloudĪṣādhāra rains, there is no interval or discontibuity of the drops of water that fall from space, so too towards the East there is no interval or discontinuity of universes in a state of creation and of dissolution; as towards the East,the same towards the South, the West and the North. 
According to another opinion, the universe superimposes itself toward the zenith and the nadir, for, according to other Sūtras, the universes are atranged towards the ten cardinal points. 
There is thena Kāmadhātu above Akaniṣṭha and an Akaniṣṭha below Kāmadhātu. 
rkiek Whoever is detached from one Kāmadhātu is detached from the Kāmadhātus of all the universes; the same for the other two Dhātus. 
Whoever produces the abhiñā or higher knowledge of magical power in the First Dhyāṇa, creates a magical being that can only be the Brahmaloka of the universe wherein the creator of this magical being is born; not in the other universes. 
kskk In these Dhātus, there are five realms of rebirth that have been designated by their names. 
The five gatis or realms of rebirthare hellish beings, anirnals, Pretas, humans, and gods. 
In Kāmadhātu there are the first four realms of rebirth and a part of the heavenly realm of rebirth; the other parts of the heavenly realm of rebirth exist in the other two Dhātus. 
Is there then a part of the Dhātus that are not included in the realms of rebirth? 
Whereas, as for the five destinies They are undefiledneutral, they are the world of beings, and they do not include intermediate existence. 
There are seven bhavas or existences: 
According to the Sūtra : Material beings different in bodies and ideas, namely humans and certain gods, are the first vsjñānasthitis. What are these certain gods? 
The six gods of Kāmadhātu and the gods of the First Dhyāna except the prathamā bhinirvṛttas. 
They are of different bodies, because their color, their marks , and their figures are not identical. 
They are of different ideas, because their ideas, ideas of pleasure, displeasure, neitherpleasurenoṟdispleasure, are not iden tical. 
Material beings different in bodies but of similar ideas, namely the prathamābhinirvṛtta Brahmakāyīka gods, are the second vjñā nasthitis. 
All these prathamābhinirvṛtta gods ere of similar ideas, for all have the same idea of a single and same cause,Brahmā, who thinks, Theyare created by me, and the associates of Brahmā who think, We are created by Brahmā; there is diversity of body, for one is Brahmā, and the others his followers through their height, their greatness, their bodies, their speech, their clothing and their ornaments. 
We read in the Sātra that these gods remember,We have seen this. being of great sight,who lasts so long,and so on to when he made the vow,May other beings be born here in my company!, we were born in his company.. 
We ask then where were these gods when they saw Brahmā? 
According to certain masters , they saw Brahmā when they were in Ābhāsvara Heaven. 
But, we would say, when they fell from Ābhāsvara Heaven,a heaven of the Second Dhyāṇna, they lost the Second Dhyāna, and the Second Dhyāna is necessary to the memory of a past existence in the heaven of the Second Dhyāna. 
Further, they have not reacquired the Second Dhyāna since they have fallen into th erroneous view of cobsideṛing Mahābrahmā as a creator: 
But one would object that this intermediate existence is very short for it cannot have any slowing down of birth in this world. 
How then can they say,We have seen this being of great sight, who lasts so long? 
As a consequence,a third opinion,one would say: It is in the world of Brahmā itself that these gods remember the past of Brahmā. At the moment when they are born there, they saw him who being born before them, who lasts a long time. Having seen him, they think: We have seen this being. 
Material beings similar in body but of different ideas, namely the Ābhāsvara gods, are the third viñānasthii. The Sūtra, in naming the highest gods of the Second Dhyāna, the Ābhāṣsvaras,also designates the Parīttābha and the Apramāṇābha gods. 
If it were otherwise, to which vñānasthūi would these two classes belong? 
There is no difference of color, mark, or figure among them: thus these gods have similar bodies. 
They have ideas of pleasure and of neitherpleasurenordispleasure: thus there is diversity of ideas. 
In fact,it is said ,wrongly according to us ,that these gods, fatigned with the sensation of mental pleasurewhich is the sensation proper to the Second Dhyānapass iato the threshold absorption of this Dhyāna, an ab sorption whichallows the sensationof neitherpleasurenordispleasure. 
Fatigued from this second sensation, they again take up the Second Dhyāna and the sensation of mental pleasure. 
In this same way kings fatiguned with the pleasures of lust take up the pleasure of government ,and fatigued with dharma take up again the pleasure of lust. 
The Śubhakṛtsnas do not become fatigued with the pleasures of the Ābhāsvaras, since they are calm, whereas the pleasures of the Ābhāsvaras, being mental pleasures, trouble the mind and are not calmn. 
They quote the Sūtra : Beings that are born for a short time in Ābhāsvara Heaven know poorly the laws of the destruction of the universe. 
Whben the destruction of the universe takes place through fire, they see the flames risinganddestroying the palace of the worldof Brahmā: theyare frightened, grieved,confused,May theseflames not rṛiṣse up to here! 
But the beings who have lived for along time in Ābhāsvara Heaven know of these cosmic changesand reassure their rightenedcompanions, Do not be afraid, friend! 
Do not be afraid, friend! 
Already previously this fire, having burnt the Palace of Brahmā, disappeared. Then one sees indeed how the gods of theSecondDhyāna have different ideas: 
at the burning up of the worlds in the First Dhyāna, they have ideas of the arriving or the nonarriving of the flames amongst them, and they have ideas of fear and no fear. 
Material beings of similar bodies and ideas, pamely the Śubhakṛtsnas, are the fourth vñānasthiti. 
They have the same ideas, because they have the sensation of pleasure. 
In the First Dhyāna, there is uniformity of ideas, ideas defiled since they are associated with fṝavrataparāmarfa; in the Second Dhyāṇna, there is dīvetsity of ideas, namely good ideas of the Dhyāna proper and of its threshold absorption; and in the third Dhyāṇna, there is uniformity of ideas, ideas arisen from retribution. 
esṅṛḥ What are the vjjñānṉasthitis? 
The five skanhas of Kāmadhātu or Rūpadhātu for the first ones , and four shandbhas for the last three. 
Why are not the rest vijñānasthii The rest reduce the vjñāṉa. 
The rest refers to the painful realms of rebirth , the Fourth Dhyāna, and the Fourth Ārūpya which is called Bhavāgra or the summit of existence. 
Here, in these realms, the vṝñāna is reduced, or cut off: 
in the painful realms of rebirth, painful sensation damages the vrñāna, in the Fourth Dhyāṇa, an ascetic can cultivate asanjñisamāpatti, the ab sorption of unconsciousness , and in this Dhyāna there is also āsajñika, namely the dharma that creates the Unconcsious Gods ; in Bhavāgra, the ascetic can cultivate nirodha samāpatti , the absorption of the cessation of ideas and sensations. 
According to another explanation , vjñānasthiti is the place wheṟe those who are here desire to go, the place from whence those who are there do not desire to fall. 
These two conditions are absent in the painful realms of rebirth. 
As for the Fourth Dhyāṇa, all those who are in it desire to leave it: Pṛthagjanas desire to pass to the realm of the Asajñisattvas; Āryans desire t pass to the Śuddhāvāsikas. 
kkk The seven vijñānasthitis, With Bhavāgra and unconscious beings, are the nine dwellings of beings. 
For creatures dwell therein as they will There are no other dwellings of beings, for elsewhere one lives without desiring it. 
Elsewhere refers to the painful realms of rebirth. Beings are brought there by the Rākṣasa which is Karma and live there without desiring it. 
This is not one of the dwellings in the same way that a prison is not a dwelling. 
kskṣḥ If one Sūtra says that there are seven vijñāṉasthii, according to another Sūtra There are four other sthitis. 
These four are: 
rūpa as an abode of vijñāna, , vedanā or sensation as an abode of viñāna , ideas as an abode of vijñāna , and the saskāras or forces as an abode of vijñāna.They consistof the four impure skandhas,which are of the same sphere as the vzjñāna. 
but it cannot grasp them as object under the impulse of craving; thus they are not considered as its abode or sthiti. 
But why is the fifth sandha, the consciousness itself , not considered as an abode of the consciousness? 
Devadatta is opposed to the horse that he is sitting on. 
Or again vijñānasthiūi signifies an abode of the mind, and the dharmas upon which the mind rides in order to move forward,are like the sailors on the ship: 
now the mind does not ride on the mind in order to move; hence the mind is not an abode of the mind. 
But another Śūtra says, There is delight and attachment with regard to this food which is the consciousness. If there is delight and attachment with regard to the consciousness then the consciousness rides in it and resides in it. 
On the other hand, you teach that the five sandhas constitute the sevenfold abode of consciousness ; why do you not add the consciousness to the fourfold abodes of consciousness? 
When we consider, without making any distinction between the sandhaus, the process attached to the con sciousness with regard to its arising which is made up of the five skandhas, then we can say that the vijñāna is a viñānasthiti. 
But, if we consider the seandhas one by one, we see that matter, sensation, ideas, and the sarskāraswhich are the support of the consciousness,and are associated or coexistent with the consciousnessare the causes of the defilement of the consciousness: 
Thus 7d Taken separately, the consciousness is not defined as an abode of the consciousness. 
Further, the BlessedOne described the four abodes of consciousness as a field, and he describes the consciousness, accompanied by desire, as a seed. 
He does not give the seed as a field of the seed; and we see indeed that the dharmas that coexist with the consciousness merely seṟve as its field. 
kxkk Do the four shitis contain the seven, and do the seven contain the four? 
The correspondance admits of four cases. 
First case; the consciousness is inctuded among the seven, but not among the four. 
the four skandhas of the painful realms of rebirth, the FourthDhyāna andBbavāgra,are inclnded among the four. 
Third case: the four samdhas are incladedamong the seven, and are also included among the four. 
Fourth case; the other dharmas are included neither among the seven nor among the four,. 
kkṣ We have said that the three Dhātus include five realms of rebirth, etc. 
There are here four wombs of beings, beings born from eggs, etc. 
Yomi ot womb signifies birth. 
Eytmologically, yon; signifies mixture; in bitthbirth being common to all creaturesbeings are mixed together in confusion. 
Womb of beings born from eggs are those beings who arise from eggs, geese, cranes, peacocks, paṟrots, thrushes, etc. 
Womb of beings born from wombs are those beings who arise from a womb, elephants, horses, cows, buffalos, asses, pigs, etc. 
ombs of beingsborn fror moisture are thosebeings who arise fromṃ the exudation of the elements, earth, etc,worms, insects, butterflies, mosquitos. 
Womb of apparitional beings are those beings who arise ail at once, with their organs neither lacking nor deficient, with all their major and miror limbs. These are called wupapāduka, apparitional, because they are skillful at appearing , and because they arise all at once ; such as gods, beings in hell, or beings in an intermediate existence. 
Humans and animals are of the four types. 
That they are born from a womb results from a discourse that a Pretī had with Maudgalyāyana, I gave birth to five sons a night, to five sons a day:Iate them and was not satisfied. 
tki What is the best womb? 
The apparitional womb. But the Bodhisattva in his last birth evidently possesses mastery relating to arising. Why did he then choose to be born from a womb? There are two answers to this question. 
The Bodhisattva sees greatadvantage in it: by reason of their relationship with hirn, the great Śūākya clan enters into the GoodLaw; and, recognizing in him a member of the family of the Cakravartins, persons experience a great respect towards him; persons are encouraged seeing that, being a man, he has tealized this perfection. 
In fact nonBuddhists masters caluṃnaniously say that at the end of one hundred cosmic periods there would appear in the world such a magician who devours the world through his magic. 
Others explain that the Bodhisattva has takeṉ up the womb in order that his body remains as relics after his Nirvāṇa: through the adoration of these relics, humans and other creatures by the thousands obtain heaven anddeliverance. 
In fact, the bodies of apparational beings, not having any external seed , do not continue to exist after their deaths, like a flame which disappears without remnant. 
But we see indeed that this explanation caṇnnot be admitted by the masters who attribute rdhi ādhiṣṭhānikī to the Buddba. 
If the bodies of apparitional beings disappear at their deaths, how can the Sūtra say, The apparitional Garuḍa seizes the apparitional Nāga in oṟder to eat it? 
The apparitional womb, for itembraces all hellish realms of rebirth, all heavenly realms of rebirth, plus one part of the three other realmns of rebirth, plus intermediate beings. 
kkḵ What is an intermediate being, and an intermediate existence? 
Intermediate existence, which inserts itself between ex istence at death and existence at birth, not having aṟrived at the location where it should go, cannot be said to be born. 
Between deaththat is, the five rkandhas of the moment of deathand arisingthat is, the five skaṉdhas of the moment of rebirththere is found an existencea body of five seandhasthat goes to the place of rebirth. This existence between two realms of rebirth is called intermediate existence. 
why not say that it arises ; why not attribute birth to it? 
We say that it is arising ; but it is not born. 
In fact as its etymology indicates , to be born is to aṟrrive. 
Intermediate existence , when itbegins, has not arrived at the place where it should go, namely to the place where the retribution of actions is manifested and achieved. 
According to other sects, there is a cutting off, a discontinuity between death and birth: but there is no intermediate existence. 
This opinion is false, as reasoning and Scripture prove. 
Being similar to the series of rice, existence does not reproduce itself after having been interrupted. 
The momentary dharmas exist in a series; when they appear in a placedistant from that in which they have been found, it is because they are reproduced without discontinuity in interrmediate places, such as the series that constitutes a grain of rice and which one transports to a distant village by passing through all the villages in the interval. 
In the same way, the mental series takes up birth after being reproduced without discontinuity from the place where death took place. 
But, one would say, a reflection arises on a mirror, on the water, etc., without being continuous to the image with which itforms aseries. 
Hence the elements of arisingdo notdependon the elements forming an uninterrupted series between the place of death and the place where they reappear. 
The existence of the reflection is not proved; should it be proved, the reflection is not similar; hence it does not serve as an example. 
A reflection is a thing in and of iself namely a certain type of color. 
The existence of the reflection is not proved. 
For two things do not exist in the same spot. 
In one and the same spot, a person placed to the side of a mirror perceives the rpa or physical matter of this mirror, matter derived from the primary elements ; a person placed facing perceives his own reflection, which is a certain type of color, derived matter. Now one can admit only that two derived matters exist at the seme time in the same spot, for each of them should have as its support two distinct groups of primary elements. 
Two persons who both look at the same object, a jar, etc., see it at the seame time. 
Now two persons placed at the two sides of a pond see the reflection of the object that faces them: the same reflection is not seen at the same time by both of them. 
Shade and sunlight do not coexist in the same spot. Now, if one places a mirror inthe shade , in a shed situated close to a pond lit by the sun,one would see in this mirror the reflection of the reflection of the sun on the surface of the water. 
the two things are the surface of the mirror and the reflection of the moon. 
A reflection is thus only an illusory idea taking the form of the reflectrion. 
Incomprehensible is the power of the dharmas and the variety of this power. 
ksksk Let us admit nevertheless the real existence of the reflection. 
It still caṇnot serve asan example in your reasoning, fot itcannot be compared to arising. It is not similar to arising: For it does not form a series. 
Ṭhe reflection does not form a series with the object reflected, because the reflection arises supported by the mirror, and because the reflection is simultaneous to the object reflected. 
But on the contrary death and arising form a series, the second being later to the first and being produced in another place than the fisst without there being a catting off between them. 
For it arises from two causes. It is by reason of two causes that a reflection arises, by reason of the mirror and of the obect. The principal of these two causes is the cause upon which it takes its support in order to arise, namely the mirror. 
But it happens that arising, or birth, proceeds from only one cause; and it never has a principal cause which is not death. 
Arising has no external support in the case of apparitionalbeings, because they appear suddenly in space. 
And these external elements cannot be the principal cause for the beings that arise from semen, blood, or mud, since these items are absent from the mind Reasoning thus proves the existence of an intermediate being since ariṣing proceeds from death without there being any discontinuity between these two existences. 
The Sūtra says, There are seven existences : 
If the school thatwe are combating does not read this Sūtra, at least they read the texts pertaining to Gandharvas. It is the Gandhaṭva. 
the woman must be in good health and fertile, the pair must be united, and a Gandharva must be ready. 
We say that, for the masters who admit these Sūtras, the existence of an intermediate being or the shanāhas in the interval is proved both by Scripture and reasoning. 
We must reconcile the doctrine of an intermediate being with the Sūtra on Māra. 
You should explain the stanza, Your life is approaching its end, Ohḥ Brahmin; youare old and sick; you are in the presence of Yama; there is not for you any intervening dwelling and you have no provision. 
You think that this stanza shows that there is no intermediate existence. 
But we understand the words amarāvāsa in the sense of dwelling among humans: 
Once dead, you shall not reappear here; or rather, the text means that No one can retard the progress of the intermediate being that you are going to become on the way to the place of your rebirth in hell. 
in this manner, the two objections are made equal, what proof can you come to? 
the explanation of the person who denies the existence of intermediate beings, and our explanation, are not contradicted by the text itself. 
The texts are thus not conclusive for or against intermediate beings. 
Being projected by the same action that projects the prvakālabhava, an intermediate being has the form of this being, that is, the being of the realm of rebirth to come after his conception. 
Ñ The action that projects the gatior the realm of rebirthan existnce in hell, etcis the same action that projects the intermediate existence by which one goes to this realm of rebirth. 
As a consequence amtarābhava oṟ intermediate existence has the form of the future pārvakāḻlabhava of the realm of rebiṟrth towards which he is going. 
In the womb of a dog, a sow, etc., there can die in its embryonic stage a being who should then be reborn in any one of the five realms of rebirth. 
This intermediate being,if he has the form of a being in hell, willburn the womb of the dog. 
Even ina perfect state ,beings in hellare not always incadescent, for example the aṇnnexes. 
But even if one believes that intermediate beings bound for hell are incandescent, as their bodies are ethereal , they are not any more tangible than they are visible. 
Thus the wotnb is not burned; moreover the influence of actions is opposed to this. 
The dimensions of an intermediate being are those of a child of five or six years of age, but his organs are perfectly developed. 
The intermediate being of the Bodhisattva is similar to the Bodhisattva in the fullness of his youth; he is adorned with the major and minor marks; that is why, when this intermediate being comes to enter his mothers womb, he illumines a thousand universes with their four continents. But we know that the mother of the Bodhisattva saw in a dream a small white elephant enter her side. This was only an omen, because for a long time the Bodhisattva has been disengaged from animal rebirth. King Kṛkin also saw ten dreams: an elephant, wells, a pole, sandalwood, a park, a young elephant, two monkeys, cloths, and contests, which were omens. 
Furthermore, intermediate beings do not enter into the womb by splitting open the side, but rather by the door of birth: this is why the eldest of twins is the one born last. 
But how do you explain the stanza of the Bhadanta Dharma subhūti, Changing his body into that of a white elephant having six tusks and four feet, he enters the womb and lies therein in full consciousness as a Ṛṣi entering a forest? 
But if it demands an explanation, we would say that this stanza describes the Bodhisattva just as his mother saw him in a dream. 
An intermediate being in Rūpadhātu is complete in size and is dressed by reason of his great modesty. 
The Bodhisattva in his interdiate existence who, through the force of her vow, was clothed in her intermediate existence: 
she entered the womb and left it dressed, and she remained dressed until her Nirvāpa and crermation. 
But lacking modesty, other intermediate beings of Kāmadhātu are nude. 
kkk What is the pārvakālabhava which is parallel to antarābhava? 
This is before death, after conception. 
xpapattibhava, which is the skandhas at the moment of their entry into a realm of rebirth, at the moment of their prarisadhi ; and pārvakālabhava which is all the skandhas of the following moments untildeath, the last moment of the realm of rebirth and which will be followed by a new antarābhava. 
Tbere is no antarābhava in Ārūpyadhātu. 
He is seen by the intermediate beings of the class:heavenly, etc,to which hebelongs. 
He is also seen by the pure divine eye, thatis, by the divine eye that is obtained through higher knowledge , for this eye is very pure. 
He is not seen by a naturaldivine eye oradivine eye obtained through birth,such as the divine eye of the gods. 
According to other masters, a heavenly intermediate being sees all intermediate beings; a human intermediate being sees all intermediate beings with the exception of heavenly intermediate beings, and so on. 
endowed with the impetus which belongs to supernatural power that is, the movement through spacewhich issues from action . 
Even a diamond is not impenetrable to him. 
For, they say, when we splitopen a mass of red hot iron we find that some small animals are born inside it. 
When an intermediate being is to be reborn in a certain realm of rebirth, from this realm of rebirth, by force, He cannot be turned away. 
kkḵk Does an intermediatebeing of Kāmadhātu eat, like the other beings of Kāmadhātu, solid food ? 
Yes, but not coarse food. 
From whence it gets its name of Gendharva, he who eats odors. 
The meanings of the roots are multipler 21v, if one takes it in the sense of to go, justifies he who goes to eatodors.We have gandharva,and not gandhārva,as we have śakandhu, or karkandhṉu. 
How does reincarnation take place? 
The mind troubled by defilements, goes, through its desire for sex, to the place of its realm of rebirth. An intermediate being is produced with a view to going to the place of its realm of rebirth where it should go. It possesses, by virtue of its actions, the divine eye. Even though distant he sees the place of his rebirth. There he sees his father and mother united. His mind is troubled by the effects of sex and hostility. When the intermediate being is male, it is grippedby a male desire with regard to the mother; when it is female, it is gripped by a female desire with regard to the father; and, inversely, it hates either the father, or the mother, whom it regards as either a male or a female rival. 
As it is said in the Prejñāpti, Then either a mind of lust,or mind of hatred iis produced in the Gandharva. 
When the mind is thus troubled by these two erroneous thoughts, it attaches itself through the desire for sex to the place where the organs are joined together, imagining that it is he with whom they unite. 
Then the impurities of semen and blood is found in the womb; the intermediate being,enjoying its pleasures, installs itself there. Then the skandhas harden; the intermediate being perishes; and birth arises that is called reincarnation. 
When the embryo is male, it remains to its right in the womb, with its head forward, crouching; female, to the left of the womb, vagina forward; with no sex, in the attitude in which one finds the intermediate being when it believes it is having sex. 
In fact,when an intermediate being possess all the organs, it then enters as a male or female and places itself as befitting its sex. 
It is only after reincarnation that a developing embryo can lose its sex. 
kṣkōk What is the support of this matter which is from the primary elements, the organs of the new being, its eyes, etc.? 
According to another opinion, their support are some primary elements different from these, arisen from actions, and which repose in the semen and blood. 
First opinion: Semen and blood do not have any organs. When an intermediate being perishes, it has some organs and so constitutes what is called the firstembryonic stage,or alala.1n the same way the arising of a bud takes place at the same time as the destruction of its seed. 
Humans, animals, Pretas, and intermediate beings go in the manner in which humans, etc., go. 
Beings in hell hang from their feet. 
As the stanza says, Those who insult Ṛṣis, ascetics and penitents fall into hell head first. 
isk We have said that the intermediary beings who are reincarnated ina feminine womb go there troubled in mind, through their desire for sex. 
The Sūtra teaches that there are four ways to descend into, the womb. 
The first enter in full consciousness; the second, further, dwell in full consciousness; the third, further, leave in full consciousness; the fourth accomplishes all these steps with a troubled mind. 
The first do not dwell and do not leave in full consciousness; the second do not leave in full consciousness; the third, in all these moments, aṟe in full consciousness; the fourth are, in all these actions, without full consciousness. 
Here are the four garbhāvakrāāntis that the author teaches, in his Flpka in an order different from that of the Sūtra, Beings born from eggs are always troubled in mind. 
But can we say that a being born from an egg enters into a wmb? 
Without doubt.One who is born from an egg isnow entering intoa womb. Or rather we have here an anticipatory designation. 
In the same way that the Sūtra says saskrtam abhisaskaroti, and, in the world, one says, to cook the rice porridge, or to grind the flour. 
A being with little merit enters because he thinks,The wind blows, the heavens rain; it is cold; it storms; people are in an uproar, and because, wishing to avoid these wearinesses, he believes that he is entering into a shelter, a thicket, a hut of roots and leaves, or rather he takes shelter at the foot of a tree or against a wall. Then he imagines himself resting in this thicket, in this hut, and eventually leaves it. 
The same for abeing rich in merits, who believes he is.entering a park, a garden, a palace, a terrace, or a pavilion; he believes this and he rests there and eventually leaves it. 
A being who has full consciousness knows that he enters into the womb, that he dwells there, and that he leaves it. 
Three garbhāvakrāntisthe Cakravartin and the two Svayabhūs,by reason of their great purity of action, of kṇowledge, and of action and knowledge. 
one means tospeak of abeing, who, in this existence, will become a Cakravartiṇ, etc. 
Twhe Cakravartin enters in full consciousness, but does not reside in Full consciousness and does not leave in full consciousness. 
The Pratyekabuddha resides in ful consciousness, bat does not leave in full consciousness. 
both action and knowledge. 
The fourth garbhāvakrāṇnti, that of not full consciousness, pertains to beings without great actions and great knowledge. 
kskḥ The nonBuddhists, who believe in an ātmean, say, If you admit that a being goes to another world, then the āan in which I beḻieve is proved. 
The āman in which you believe, an entity that abandons the skandhas of one existence and takes up the skandhas of another existence, an internal agent of action, a Puruṣa,this āmcaṉn does not exist. 
In fact the Blessed One said, Actions exist, and results exist, but there is no agent who abandons these skandhas here and takes up those skandhas there,independently of the casual relationship of thedharmas. 
What is this causal relationship? 
Namely, if this exists, then that exists; through the arising of this, there is the arising of that; pratītya samupāda.. 
We do not deny an ātman that exists through designation, an āman that is only a name given to the skandhas. 
from us is the thought that the skandhas pass into another world! 
They are momentary, and incapable of traṇsmigrating. 
We say that, in the absence of any āmean, of any permanent principal, the series of conditioned szndhas,made up of defilements and actions , enters into the mothers womb; and that this series, from death to birth, is prolongued and displaced by a series that constitutes intermediate existence. 
In conformity with its projecting cause the series grows gradually, and, by virtue of the defiements and actions it goes again to another world. Actions the nature of which is to be retributed in life differ accoṟding to beings: all the series of s2ṇdhas are not then projected at the same time in the existence where they have arisen. The series continues then to increase to the extent that it was projected. 
This growth is gradual, as Scripture teaches: 
There is first the kalala; the arbuda arises from the kalala; the pesśin arises from the arbuda; the ghaṇaarises from the pesin; and from the ghana there arises the praśakhā, hair,bodybair, the nails,etc.,and the materialorgans with their supports. 
Then, when the embryo, this throne, is ripe, there arises within the womb winds arisen from the maturity of action which causes the embryo to turn and places it towards the portal of its birth: 
it is difficult to move like a great mass of hidden impurity. 
Sometimes, either through the unfavorable conditions of the mothers eating, or by reason of actions, the embryo perishes. 
Then an expert woman, after having anointed them with all sorts of drugs, puts her hands filled with a sharpened blade into this wound hideous, badsmelling, and wet withall sorts of impurities which is the womb. 
She pulls out the embryo after having cut itup limb by limb. 
And the series of the embryo, by virtue of aparaparyāyavedanīya action , goes somewhere else. 
Or else the birth is fortunate. The mother and the servants take the newborn baby into their hands which are like knives and acids for this body now as sensible as an open wound. 
One washes the child; one nourished it with milk and fresh butter, and later with solid foods: thus does he grow. By reason of this development, the organs mature and the defilements enter into activity, from whence actions arise. 
And when the body perishes, the series passes into another existence by reason of these defilements and actions, through the medium of the intermediate existence, as mentioned previously. 
Arising by reason of the defilements and actions; defilements and actions by reason of arising; arising by reason of the defilements and actions: the circle of existences is thus without beginning. 
In order for it to begin, it would be necessary for the fitst iem to have no cause: 
and i oṉe dharma arises without a cause, then alldharrṇas would arise without causes. 
Now the determination of time and place show that a seed produces a shoot, that a fire produces cooking: hence there is no arising that does not have causes. 
On the other hand, the theory of a singleand permaṉent cause has been refuted above : 
hence the cycle of existence has no beginning. 
But birth, coming from causes, would not take place if its causes are destroyed, in the same way that a shoot would not arise if its seed is burned. 
kskṣk The series of rkandhas develops in three existences, Pratūyasamutpāda or dependent orgination has twelve parts in three sections or time periods. 
Two for the first, two for the third, and eight for the middle. 
Igroraṅce and the saiskāras existed in a past existence, birth and old age and death will exist in a future existence, and the eight other parts exist in the present existence. 
Are the middle parts to be found in the present existence of all creatures? 
No, they are not. 
Why is this? 
Such persons are not beings who die before their time, , nor are theybeings of Rāpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu.It is ceṛtain that ṭthe Sūtra that enumerates these eight parts refers to beings in Kāmadhātu: 
What are, in this conception of pratīyasamutpāda, its different parts? 
Ignorance is, in a previous life, the state of defilement. 
All the defilements in factaccompanyignorance, andare activated through ignorance.In the same way, when one says that the king is coming, one understands that his courtiers are accompanying him. 
The sarskāras are, in a previous life, the state of action. 
The consciousness is the skandhas at conception. 
The five skandhas, in the womb, at the moment of reincarnation from this moment on, until the production of the six āyatanas. 
Nāmarūpa is made up of the five skandhas, in the womb, from arṟising, as long as the six organs are not manifested. 
Sīx āyatanarbefore coming together of the three or contact. 
There is then in activity concupiscence relative to the objects of desire , visible things, etc., and sexual union. 
This state of thirst or desire ends when one begins, under the influence of this desire, to search out these pleasures. 
momentary or of one moment ; prolongued ; serial ; and static. 
The Prakaraṇa says,What is pratāyasamutpāda? 
According to the School the Blessed One distinguishes the twelve parts only with respect to static pratīyasamuṭpāda. 
kksk But if each of the parts is acomplex of the five skandhas, why use the designations ignorarce, etc.? 
Because the Sūtra expresses itself in an intentional manner, whereas the Abhidharma teaches the characteristics of things. 
she Why does the Sūtra teach pratūyasamutpāda as only pertaining to living beings?In order to have aberration cease with regard to the past, the future, and the interval in between. 
And it is for thissame reason that it teaches apratīyasamutpāda in three sections. 
Ignorance or aberration relating to the past, as when one asks, DidI exist or not exist in the past? 
How and as what didI exist? 
Will I exist in the future? 
What is this? 
How is this? 
What are we? 
What will we be? 
165 ē This threefold aberration is destroyed by the teaching of the succession: ignorance. old age and death. 
For its is said in the Sūtra, Whoever, Oh Bhikṣus, knows, through prajñā, praūyasamutpāda aṇd the dharmas produced through dependence, will not turn himself towards the past by asking if he existed. 
ṉ According to others, the last three terms of the middle section, thirst, attachment, and bhava,are also taught in order to cause aberration relating to the future to cease; for they are the causes of future existence. 
kkk This twelvefold pratīyasamupāda is also threefold, defilement ,action ,and foundation ; it is twofold, cause and result. 
Three parts are defilement, two are action; seven are foundation and also result. 
Ignorance, thirst, and attachment are, by their nature, defilements; the sanskāras and bhava are action; consciousness, nāmarpa, the six āyatana,conṇtact,sensation,,ār,and old age and death are foundation, so called because they are the support of the de filements and action. 
The parts that are foundation are result: the five that are not foundation are cause, being both defilement and action in nature. 
Why are cause and result taught at length in the section of present existencetwo parts of defilement, two parts of action, five parts of foundationwhereas, a similar exposition is absent for the past and future? 
In the future, one has two parts for result. 
In two sections, cause and result are abbreviated, for one can infer them from the teaching of the middle. 
teḥ But if pratītyasamutpāda has only twelve parts, transmigration would have a beginning, since the cause of ignorance is not indicated; and it would have an end, since the result of old age and death is not indicated. 
Thus one must add new parts, and to infinity. 
No, for the Blessed One has implicitly indicated the cause of ignorance and result of old age and death. 
A foundation arises from action, as vrñāṇa from the sa?skāras, or birth from existence. 
Defilement arises from a foundation, as desire from sensation. 
Since such is the manner of existence of the various parts of dependent orgination it is clear that ignorance has either adefilement or a foundation for its cause; it is clear that old age and death for its cause, and, in still another Śūtra, that incoṟrect jadgment has ignorance for its cause. 
But incoṛrrect judgment is not named in the Sūtra in question, the Pratīṭyasamutpādasūtra. 
How is incorrect judgment included in attachment? 
Indeed, it is associated with attachment, but it can as equally well be associated with ignorance or with desire. 
Let us admit that it may be included in attachment, but caṉ onedraw from this the conclusion that the Sūtra,by naming attachment, says that incorrectjudgment is the cause of ignorance? 
from whence we conclude that sensation is a cause of desire only when it is defiled, associated with ignorance. 
we prove that, according to the Sūtra, incorrect jadgment is produced at the moment of contact. 
Samutpāda is the cause, whereas samutpanna is the result. The part that is a cause is pratīyasamutpāda, because, there takes place arising from it. 
The part that is a result is praīyasaṃutpanna, because it arose; but it s also prasīṣyasamutpāda,because,from it, rising takes place. 
Allthe parts, being cause and result are at one and the same time both pratītyasamutpāda and pratītyasamutpanṇa. 
Without this distinction, nevertheless, there would be nondetermination and on fusion , for a part is not prañyasamutpāda through connection to the part through connection to which it is also pratīṭyasamutpaṉna. 
In the same way a father is father through connection to his son; and a son is son through connection to his father; in the same way cause and result, and the two banks of a river. 
But the Sthavira Pūrṇāśa says: What is pratīiyasamutpāda caṇṉṉot be pratītyasamutpanna. Four causes: 
future dharmas ; 2. 
the last dharmas of the Arhat ;. 
past and present dharmas, with the exception of the last dharmas of the Arhat, ; and 4. 
the unconditioned dharmas,. 
The Sautrāntikas criticize: to What is pratīyasamutpāda caṉot be pratīṭyasamuṭpanṇa, are these personal theses, fantasies, or the sense of the Sūtra? 
You say in vain that it is the sense of the Sūtra. 
You speak of a static pratṝyasamutpāda of twelve paṟts which are so many states made up of the five skandhas: 
this is in contradiciton to the Sūtra wherein we read, What is ignorance? 
Nonknowledge relating to the past. 
This Sūtra is of explicit sense, clear ; you caṉṇṉot make it a Sūtra whose sense is yet to be deduced. 
Nothing proves that this Sūtra is of clear sense; the fact that itexpresses itself by means of a definition does not prove anything; for the Blessed One gives definitions which solely bear on the essential or major elements of the object to be defined. 
For example, in the Hastpadopamasiūtra, to the question What is the internal earth element?, the Blessed One answers, The hair, the bodyhair, etc. 
Certainly hair, etc., are still other dharmas,visible things, smells, etc,.but the Blessed One refers to their principal element, which is the earth element. 
In the same way, the Blessed Oṉe designates a state in which ignorance is the major element as ignorance. This example proves nothing. In fact, in the Hastipadopamasūṭra, the Blessed One does not define hair, etc., by the earth element; he does not say What is hair, etc.? The earth element, in which case the definition would be incomplete. But he defines the earth element through the hair, etc.; and his definition is complete, for there is no earth element in the body which is not included in the description, hair, etc. 
In the same way, the definition of pratīyasamupāda is complete; there is nothing to add to it. The definition given in the Hastipadopamasūra is not complete. 
In fact there is earth element in teaṛs, mucus, etc., as one caṅ see by another Sūtra. Yet the earth element of tears is not indicated in the Hastpadopamasūra. Perhaps the definition of the Huastipadopamasñtrais incomplete, seeing that you are able to show that there issomething lacking in it. 
It remains for you to say what is lacking in the definitions that the Sūtra gives for ignorance, etc. 
Why define ignorance as a state with five skandhas by introducing heterogeneous dharmas into ignorance? 
The five skendhas exist in the Arhat, but he does not possess any sahskāras which could produce a consciousness part of dependent orgination, that is, a pnuṃyopaga, apuṇyopaga, ot āninjyopapaga vijñāna. 
As for the four cases of Pūrṇāśa, his first casethat the future dharmas are not produced by dependenceis contradicted by the Sūtra which gives birth and old age and death as produced by dependence: 
Whatare the prattyasamutpannas? 
Ignorṟance.. biṟth, and old age and death. Would one say that birth and old age and death are not future states? 
This is to take away the three sections from the theoty of pratītyasamutpāda. 
Certain schools rnaintain that pratīyasamutpāda is uncon ditioned because the Sūtra says, Whether the Tāathāgatas appear or not, this dharma nature of the dharmas is unchanging. 
This thesis is trne or false according to the manner in which one interprets it.If one means to say that it is aiways by reason of ignorance, etc., that the saṛkāras, etc.,are produced,but not by reason of any other thing, and not without cause; that, in this sense, pratīyasamutpāda is stable, and eternal , we approve. 
If onne means to say that there exists a certain eternal dharma called pratīyasamutpāda, then this opinion is inadmissible. 
For wpāda, production or arising, is a characteristic of anything that is conditioned , an eternal dharma, as arising or pratīyasamupāda would be by supposition, cannot be a characteristic of a transitory or conditioned thing. 
what relationship can one suppose exists between an unconditioned arising and ignorance, etc., a re lationship that would permit one to say pratīpyasamutpāda of ignorance, etc.? 
Finally the expression pratñyasamutpāda would become absurd: since pratiiyasamutpāa sīgnifies production by having gone to the cause ,how could a dharma be both eternal and pratīyasamutpāda at oṉe and the same time? 
Now one cannot imagine a harma that, existng before having been produced, goes first towards the pratyayas, and is then produced. 
There is no action without an agent. 
Leṭ us ask them if that whicharises is presentor future. 
Do you say that a present thing arises? If it has not already arisen, how can it be present? 
Iif it has already arisen, how could itbe reborn without being reborn indefinitely? 
Do you say that a future thing arises? 
How can you attribute to that which is future, and nonexistent, the qnality of agent in this action of arising? 
Consequently we wouldanswer the Grammarians that the dharma goes towards the prakyayas in the same condition in which, according to them, the dharma arises. 
So too the dharma that goes toward the pratyayas. 
Yet the theory of the Grammarians and the manner in which they oppose an agent and action, is not tenable. 
Now one does not maintain that the action of arising is distinct from the one who arises . 
prati has a distributive meaning; sav signifies coming together; ya signifies good at leaving, that which does not last; and the root pad preceeded by 2 signifies appearance, arising. 
We then have pratīyasamuṣpāda which signifies arising together, by reason of such and such a coming together of causes, of perishable things. 
This explanation holds for the expression pratāyasamutpāda; but it does not take into account texts suchas: 
a visual consciousness arises By reason of the eye and visible things. 
kei Why does the Blessed One define pratītyasamutpāda in two ways, 1. If that exists, then this exists; and 2. From the arising of that, this aṟisesṣ? Por many reasons: to be more specific. 
In the first formula, it resultsthat the saskāras exist when ignorance exists; but it does not result that the saskāras come into existence through the sole existence of ignorance. 
in order to indicate the succession of the parts of dependent orgination: if that exists, then they exist; from the arising of that and not from any other thingthis arises; 3. 
if previous existence existed, then theṟe is present existence; from the arising of present existence future existence arises; 4. 
But ignorance is the immediate cause of the saskāras, and a mediate cause of consciousness. 
According to another explanation, the Blessed One taught in this manner in order to refute the theory of noncausality , the thesis that a thing exists in the absence of a cause, and the theory of one nonarisen cause, such as Prakṛti, Puruṣa, etc. 
But certain nonBuddhist teachers imagine that since the āmpan exists as a support , then the saūskāras, consciousness, etc., exist, being produced; that if ignorance is produced, then the saskāras are produced, and so on. 
Inother wotds, they positan āman which serves asa substrate to thesuccessive causation of thedharmaas.In order to refute this opinion, the Blessed One specified, That which arises through the arising of such a thing exists by reason of the existence of this one thing that arises, and not by reason of the existence of a certain substrate. 
The formula: If that exists, then this exists, signifies: If the result exists, then the destruction of its cause exists. But let us not think that a result arises without a cause: From the arising of that, this arises. 
If the Śūtra should be understood as this master understands it, how does it happen that, wishing to explain pratītyasamutpāda, the Blessed One first explained the destruction of its cause? 
kksk How do the saskāras exist by reason of ignorance? How does old age and death exist by reason of birth? 
Let us briefly answer this question. 
The fool or Prṛthagjana does not understand that pratūyasamutpāda is merely the sanṣkāras, that is, conditioned dharmasand this produces a belief in an ātman , and egotism ; it accomplishes the threefold action,bodily, vocal, mental,witha view to agreeable sensation, and to the sensation of indifference; nonmeritorious action, with a view to agreeable sensation in this life, meritorious action, with a view to agreeable seṅsation in a future life in Kāmadhātu; and unmoveable action, with a view to agreeable sensation of the first three Dhyānas and the sensation of indifference of the higher stages. 
These actions are the serskāras that exist by reason of ignorance. 
Given the force of the projection of action, the series of the consciousness, due to the series of the intermediary existence, goes into such and such a realm of rebirth, as long as it may be, in the manner in which a flame goes, that is, in a perpetual renewing. 
in thus understanding the consciousness, we are in agreement with the definition that the Pratīyasamuutpādasñra gives for the consciousness: What is the consciousness? The six groups of consciousnesses. With the consciousness as an antecedent, nāmarpa arises in this realm of rebirth. 
Then, through the development of nmarpa, there arises in their times, the six organs: these are the six āyatanṇas. Then, encountering their object,a consciousness arises, and, through the coming together of the three , there is contact, which is susceptible of being experienced agreeably, etc. 
From this threefold sensation, there arises a threefold desire; desire for kāmma or desire for agreeable sensation of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, in a being tormented by suffering; desire for rpa,or desire for agreeable sensation of the three Dhyāṇas and the sensation of indifference of the Fourth; all desire for Ārūpya. 
Then, from the desire relating to sensation, there arises a fourfold attachment : 
The kāmas are the five objects of pleasure. 
According to another opinion, āmavāda is both a view of soul and thoughts pertaining to a soul , for it is by reason of these two that one says ātman, that one affirms the existence of an ātman : 
It is in this manner that, sufficient unto itself that is, without any relation to an āmanthere is produced this great mass of suffering, great because it has neither beginning nor end. 
The theory that has just been taughtaccording to which the twelve parts of dependent origination are twelve states made up of the five skandhasis a theory of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
The nonvidyā, that which is not vidyā. 
Impossible; for the eye is also nonvidyā. 
It is an absence of vdyā, ignorance. 
This is also impossible, for an absence is not a thing and avśdyā must be a thing, since it is a cause. 
Thus Avidyāis aseparate entity , the opposite of vidyā or knowledge, like a nonfriend, the untrue, etc. 
The nonfriend is the opposite of a friend, not a nonfriend, that is, anyone other than a friend, not the absence of the friend. 
Ṛa or satyais ttuth; nontruth is speech contrary to true speech; so too nonrighteousness , nonuseful and the nottobe done are the opposite of righteousness, useful, and duty. 
Thus avidynonknowledgeis the opposite of vidyā, a real separate dharma. 
The Sūtra defines it as the cause of the sanskāras, from whence it results that it is not a mere negation. 
Thus ignorance cannot be a mere negatiom; it cannot be everything that is not vidya, the eyes, etc. 
One terms a bad wife a nonwife , and a bad son, a nonson. Śhould we not think then that 4vidyā is bad vidyā, that is, bad prajñā? 
Avidyāis bot bad prajñā,because this is seeing. Bad prajñā or defiled prajñā would be a type of seeing. 
Now avidyā or ignorance is certainly not seeing, for ignorance and seeing are two distinct yokes. 
This is impossible, Because views are associated with ignorance, In fact moha , which is defined as aviyā is among the mahābhāmika kleśas ; now all the mahābhūmika kleśas are associated with them, thus vṅdyā is associated with seeing which is prsjñā n nature, thus avidyā īs not prajñā,for two items of prajñā cannot be associated. 
29d, and because ignorance is defined as a defilement of prajñā. The Sūtra says, The mind defiled by desire is not liberated; pr4j0ā defiled by ignoranceis not purified. Now prajñācannotbe defiledby prajñā. 
if desire isa defiement of the mind, then desire is not the mind; if ignorance is a defilement of prujñā, then ignorance is not prajñā. 
Good prajñā can be mixed with defiled prajñā, as when moments of good and defiled prajñ succeed one another. In the same way, when one says that a mind defiled by desire is not liberated, one is speaking of a mind that is not necessarily associated with craving, but which is oppressed by craving. 
When an ascetic avoids craving, , then the mind is liberated. 
In the same way prajñā, defiled by ignorance , is not pure: it is oppressed, even when it is good, by ignorance. 
Ignorance is not, in its nature, prajñā. 
The scholar who maintains that ignorance is all the defilements is refuted at the same time. 
If ṟgnoṟance is allthe defilements, itcannot be named separately among the yokes , etc.; it is not associated with views and with the other defilements; Scripture should not say, The mind, defiled by desire, is not liberated, but rather, The mind defiled by ignorance. 
Do you say that one expresses oneself in this nanner in order to be more specific, and that the Sūtra should say, The mind, defiled by ignorance which consists of desire, is not liberated? 
If you hold that ignorance is a separate dharma, and not merely a certain type of prajñā, you should define it. 
Ignorance is the nonsarprakhyāna.of the Four Truths, the Three Jewels, of action and its result. 
What is nonsaeprakhyāna? 
GGood enough; but as for ignorance, you have not told us the nature of asaprakhyāṇa. 
Forexample, the eye is defined as the pure pa that serves as a support for the eye consciousness because one does not know this invisible pa except through inference. 
hksk The Bhadanta Dhatmatrāta defines ignorance in the following terms: afniti śatvamayanā, Does this mayanā differ from asmimāna ? 
As the Sūtra says, I know, I see through the perfectabandoning and the perfect knowledge of desire, of views, wayanās, attachments and latent defilements to the idea of self , to the idea of mine , to asmināna,? 
Because one cannot identify zayanā with any other defilement, since it is named separately from desire, views, and asmimṇa. 
However we would have to say too much in order to complete this examination. 
Let us stop here. 
Nāman are the skandhas that are not rāpa. 
The four nonmaterial skandhas,sensation, ideas, saskāras, and consciousness, aṭe called āman,for nāman signifies that which bends, yields,. 
The nonmaterial skandhar bend, , towards the object by reason of name , the organs, and the object. 
Ñ In this phrase, by reason of name, one takes the word nare in its popular sense, , as a designation, which designates and causes to be understood either a collection, cattle, hoṟses, etc., ora single thing, rpa, taste, etc. 
Why is sajñākaraṇa termed name? Because the samjñākaraṇa causes the nonmaterial shaendhas to bend towards their object. 
According to another explanation, the nonmaterial sbondhas are termed nāman, because, then the body dissolves, these skundhas bend, that is, go towards another existence. 
kkōk We have already explained the six āyatanas. 
kkk There are six contacts. 
The first is the contact of the eye, and the sixth is contact of the maṇas oṟ mind They arise from the coming together of three things, an oṟgan, its object, and a consciousness. 
Opne can see indeed that there can be a coring together of the five material oṟrgans, with their objects and their corresponding con sciousnesses, for the three are simultaneous. But the mental organ oṛ manas is destroyed when a mental consciousness arises ; and the object of this con sciousness can be future: 
There is e coming together because the organ and the. 
object are the causal conditions of the mental con sciousness; or rather because the organ, the objectaṇḍ the consciousness produce the same single effect, namely the contact. 
The masters are not in agreement. 
Somesay: Contact is merely the coming together itself. 
According to the Sūtra, The coming together, the encounter, the meeting of these dharrnas is contact. 
Otherssay: Contact is a dharmma associated with the mind , distinct from any coming together. 
According to the ŚSūra of the Six Hexades, The six internal sources of consciousness , the six external sources of consciousness , the six consciousness, the six contacts, the six sensations, and the six desires. 
The Sūtra thus knows of the six contacts, together with the six categories of internal āyatanas, exterṇal āyatanas, aṇd the consciousnesses:. 
If the Sūtra does not contain any repetition, it follows that sensations and desires existapart from the dharmāyatana which is the sixth internal source of consciousness , since you can hold only that the first two categories refer to the organs and their objects without any relation to the consciousness. 
Every eye and visible thing is not the cause of a visual consciousness, as all visual consciousness is not the result of the eye and a visible thing. Thus what is defined as contact in the ūtra, Six collections of contacts, is the eye, a visible thing and the consciousnesses which are cause and effect. 
But how do the Sarvāstivadins, who maintain that contact exists apart from the coming together of any eye, a visible thing and a consciousness, explain the Śūtra, The coming together , the enconnter, the meeting of these dharmas is contact? 
They do not read the Sūtra in this form; oṟ rather they say that the expression is metaphorical: 
But this discussion is taking us too far afield. 
kkk The Ābhidhārtnikas think that contact is a dherma, a separate entity. 
Five are contact through contact; the sixth is socalled through denornination. 
The contact of the eye, the ear, etc., have sapratigha oṟgans for their support ; thus they are termed praśgha sparfa taking their name from their support. 
The sixth, the contact of the mental organ, is called adhivaca nasasparśa. 
Thus the contact of the mental organ takes its namea contact of denominationfromm its characteristic object. 
kksk The sixth contact is of three types: 
which are respectively pure, defiled, other. 
These are the contacts associated with vidyā, that is, with pure prañā, with avidyā, that is, with defiled nonknowledge; and with naivavidyānāvidyā, that is, with good, but impure prujñā. 
esicḥ In considering the contact of nonknowledge which is associated with all the defilements and which is always active, one distinguishes the two: Contacts of antipathy and sympathy which are associated with hatred and with desire. 
kkk Contact in its totality, is threefold. Three contacts, leading to pleasure , etc. These are contacts that lead to the acquisition of pleasure, of suffering, and of neither pleasure nor suffering. 
These contacts are so called because they are beneficial to pleasure, to suffering, and to neither pleasure nor suffering ; oṟ rather because that is felt or can be felt . 
That is sensation, vedanā. 
The contact where a pleasure should be felt , is a contact that is called suvkhavedya. 
kkk We have defined the sixfold contact, contact of the eye, etc. 
The five sensations that arise from the contact of the eye and from the other bodily oṟgans, having for support the bodily organs, are bodily. 
The sixth sensation arises from contact with the zanas: 
its support is the rnind so it is mental or cwitasī. 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that sensation and contact are sitnul taneous, being sahabhūhetu, reciprocal causes. 
How can two things arisen together be that which produces and that which is produced ? 
Why would they not be? 
When two things arise together, how could the dharma which produces have any efficacy with regard to the dharma to be produced, which has already arisen? 
We would say then that, in your hypothesis, there would be reciprocal causality of two dharmas arisen together. 
But this is not a fault, for we admit this consequence. 
We define suhabhāhetu as ye mithabphalāḥ, The dharmas that are results of one other are a sahabh cause. 
But the Sūtṛa condemns this system. 
It says, By reason of the contact of the eye, there atises a sensation which arises from the contact of the eye; it does not say, By reason of the sensation which arises from the contact of the eye, the contact of the eye arises. 
And again the thesis that Two things arisen together can be cause and result is in contradiction to the characteristics of a cause. 
It is taken for granted that the dharma which produces another dharma is not simultaneous to this other dharma: 
a seed precedes its shoot; milk precedes dadhi; a bbow precedes the noise; and the znas precedes the mental consciousness . We do not deny that a cause is sometimes earlier than its result; but we affirm that a cause and its result can be sirmultaneous: 
for ekample, the visual organ and color, and the visual consciousness; or the primmary elements and secondary matter. 
the visual organ and color precede the visual consciousness; but the primary elements and derived matter, which are simultaneous, arise together from a complex of earlier causes. 
Contact and sensation are simultaneous, like the shoot and its shade. 
kkṣk Āccording to another opinion, : Sensation is later than contact. There is first the organ and the object , then the consciousness ; contact is the coming together, that is,the quality of cause and result of these three: oṟgan and object, and consciousṉess; finally there arises sensation which has contact for its cause. The Vaibhāṣikas: In this theory, there is no sensation wherever there is consciousness: for there is consciousness in the secondand third moment, but sensation only in the third. 
And all consciousness is not contact, for there is contact only in the first two moments. 
No.One sensation,having for its cause an earlier contact, exists at the moment of a later contact: thus all contact is accompanied by sensation. 
a sensation produced by earlier contact of color would exist at the moment of a second contact of sound. 
Now a sensation produced by a contact of color should have this color for its object, for a sensation cannot have an object different from the object of the consciousness with whichit is associated. 
Let us say then that consciousness is not altways contact, and that it is notalways accompanied by sensation. The consciousness of color, contemporaneous with the contact of sound, is not contact, but is accompanied by sensation. 
The consciousness of the sound is contact, but it is not accompaned by sensation. 
This rule establishes that ten dharmas,sensation, contact, idea, etcare associated with every mental state. 
Upon what authority does this rule rest? 
We recognize Sūtra and not Śāstra as authority. 
For the Blessed One said that recourse is to the Śūtra. 
What then is the meaning of the expression mahābhūmika? 
There are three bhāmis or spheres, 1. saviarka savicāra: Kāmadhātu and the First Dhyāna, 2. gsvitarkasavicāra: 
This same sensation is of eighteen types by reason of the objects of the mind. 
Mental sensation is made up of eighteen types, because there are six upavicāras of satisfaction , six of dissatisfaction ,and six of indifference : 
How does one distinguish these eighteen? 
of satisfaction, dissatisfaction, and indifference; coṇsidering their quality of associates, they are one, all being associated with the mental consciousness; and considering their objects, they are six: 
It is free from vikaḷpa ; and it is no longer pavicārikā,. 
The upavicāras are no less that the sphere of the single vanas: 
there is pavicāra of the visible things, etc.,without having seen them, etc. 
II it were otherwise, a being in Kāmadhātu could not consider the visible things, sounds and tangible things of Rūpadhātu , anda being of Rūpadhgtu would not be able to consider the smells and tastes of Kāmadhātu; 4. 
Three, namely the dharmanopavicāras, ca have Ārūpyadhātu for their object, but not the fifteen others, since visible things, etc., do not exist in Ārūpyadhātu. 
ṅt In Rūpadhātu, one must distinguish the first two Dhyāṇas and the last two. 
In two Dhyānas, twelve. 
These twelve can have Kāmadhātu for their object. Eight have their own Dhātu for their object. Eight of them can have Rūpadhātu for their object, with the exception of the pavicāras of odor and taste. ā Two have Ārāpyadhātu for their object.9 Two can have Ārūpyadhātu for their object, namely the dharmo pavicāras of satisfaction and indifference. 
But, in the other two Dhyānas, six. The wpavicāras of dissatisfaction and satisfaction are absent in the last two Dhyāṇnas. Kāmadhātu is the object of six. There remains then the six pavicāras of indifference which have the visible things,sounds, odors, tastes, tangible things, anddharmnas of Kāmadhātu for their object. Of their own Dhātu, four. 
The visible things, sounds, tangible things, and dharmas of Rūpadhātu. 
kskḥ In Ārūpyadhātu,one must distinguish the preliminary absorption of Ākāśānantyāyatana and the absorption which follows it: 
it considers the five skandhas of the Fourth Dhyāna without any distinction; for these masters, this absoṟption is thus made up of only one pavicāra which has for its object the Fourth Dhyāna, namely the dharmopavicāra of mixed objects. 
Oṉe has the highest sphere for its object. 
In Ārūpyadhātu itself, one, In the principle Dhāṭu, or Ārūpyadhātu itself, there is only one pavicāra, dharmopavicāra which has its own Dhūātu for its object. 
As we shall see, the mind, in the principle absorption of Ārūpyadhātu, does not grasp lower Dhātus for its object. 
All of these eighteen are impure. 
There is no upavicāra which is pure. 
A being born inKāmadhātu who has not taken possession of a good mind of Rūpadhātu , is in possession of : 
the eightpavicāras of the First and Secoṇd Dhyiṇa. 
The upavicāras of satisfaction and indifference, having for their object the odors and tastes of Kāmadhātu, which are produced in the Dhyāṇnas, are not defiled : 
four wpavicāras, defiled, of satisfaction, by omitting the pavicāras of odor and taste, and the six pavicāras of indifference of the sphere of Anāgamya; 3. 
One can decide any other case on the basis of these principles. 
A being in one sphere of Dhyāna is in possession of a single upavicāra of Kāmadhātu, the dharmopavicāra of indifference associated with a mind capable of creating fictive beings. 
It is in this way that the Vaibhāṣikas understand the upavicāras; but we understand the Sūtra in a different way. 
One cannot say of one who is detached from an object, a visible thing, etc., thathe produces pavicāras with regard to this object. 
They are pavicāras when they are defiling , following the expression of the Sūtra, when one has sympathy, antipathy, or indifference not proceeding from exact consciousness. 
And it is in order to combat these wpavicāras that the six manners of being, or perpetualmethods are taught, Having seen a visible thing with the eye, there is no sympathy and no antipathy: be remains indifferent in full mindfulness and conscious. 
We can show that our interpretation iscorrectby observing that the Aṛhat is not without experiencinga satisfaction of a worldly order , but good, having a dharma for its object. 
By distinguishing those states of satisfaction, dissatisfaction, and indifference on the basis of those which have craving for their principle component and those which have leaving for their principal component, we have the thirtysix points of the Master , so called because this distinction has been taughtby the Master. 
krk The divisions of the parts of existence called sensation, and which we have just described, are still very numerous. 
kōkk The other parts of existence will not be explained here. 
The others have been explained or will be explained later. 
The consciousness and the six āyatanashave been explained in the rsfīk We have said that pratīyasamutpāda is defilement , action and a substantial entity. 
It is explaiped that defilement is like a seed,a Nāga, a root, a tree, a husk of grain. 
As a stalk, leaves, etc., arise from a seed, so too defilernent arises from defilement, action, and a real, substantial entity. 
A pond where Nāgas live does not dry up; in thesame way the ocean of births where thisNāga which is defilement remains does not dry up. 
The tree whose root is not cut off continues to grow even through one cuts and recuts its greenery; in the same way, as long as this root, defilement, is not cut off, the realms of rebirth continue to grow. 
A tree gives forth fliowers and fruits at different times; in the same way it is not at one and the same time that this tree, the defilement, gives forth a defilement, action aṇd a substantial entity. 
Graiṇ, even though intact, does not germinate when it is stripped of its husk; in the same way action must be associated with this husk which is defilement in order to bear fruit in a new existence. 
Action is like grain with its husk, grass, flower. 
It is like grass that dies when the fruit is ripe: in the same way, when the action has matured, it no longer matures any more. 
Īt is like a flower, the immediate cause of the arising of the fruit. 
in the same way it is the immediate cause of retribution. 
Food and drink are not reproduced in food and drink: they are not good except by being consumed: so too the entity which is retribution. 
A new retribution does not preceed from retribution, for,. in this hypothesis, deliverance would then be impossible. 
kkīk The series of the skandhas, in its continual process, is only a succession of the four existences that we have defined , namely inteṟmediate existence , existence as arising , existence in and of itself , and existence at death. 
37d Among the four existences, existence as arising is always defiled, and by all the defilements of the sphere to which it belongs. 
When arising takes place in a certain sphere , all the defilements of this sphere defile it. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say, Among the defilements, there is not a single one that does not defile the mind at rebirth ; but rebirth takes place solely through defilements, not by the wrappings called svatantra . 
Although this statethe state of deathis bodily and mentally weak , when a person has habitually practiced a certain defilement, this defilement, thus projected, becornes active at the moment of death. 
The other existences are of three types. Intermediate existence , existence in and of itself , and existence at death can be good, bad, or neutral. 
Three in the Ārūpyas. With the exception of intermediate existence. 
All four existences exist in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
Food by the mouthful is coarse or subtle. 
Food by the mouthful of intermediate beings , the food of the gods, and the food of humans at the beginning of the cosmic age is subtle, because this food, like oil poured out into the sand, completely penetrates into the body and does not give forth any excrement. 
Oṟ rather the food of subtle beings is subtle, for example a being born from moisture , one newlyborn , etc. 
Only beings free from desire with regard to this food arise in the two higher Dhātus; thus this food exists only in Kāmadhātu. 
In fact, odors, tastes and tangible things are put in the mouththat is, in piṇḍas or small ballsand then swallowed. 
But how does one attribute the quality of food to odors, etc., which are also found in shade and warm light , in flames , and in the light ? 
But we think that, even though they are not swallowed, iike the others, since they contribute to the duration of a being, these odors are included in the category of subtle food; as for example bathing and unguents. 
But why is rāpāyatana,a visible thing not a food? In fact, one swallows it by the mouthfuls. 
Rāpāyatana is not food, for it comfo1ts neither its organ nor those delivered. 
Food is that which comforts the organs and the primary elements which are the support of the organs. 
Now a visible thing,at the moment when it is swallowedwhen this food, introduced into the mouth, is eatendoes not comfort either its organ , or the primary elements which are the support of the eye. 
but, what is comfort and food in this case is not the visible thing, but the agreeable contact which has the visible thing for its object. 
If visible thing were to performn the function of food when one sees it, it would comfort persons delivered from the desire for mouthfuls of food, namely the Anāgāmins and Arhats, as odors, tastes, etc. 
Contact is what arises from the cooperation of the three ; mental volition is mental action ; and con sciousness is the consciousness skandha. 
Why are they not food when they are pure? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say, Food signifies that which makes existence grow; now if it were pure, it have the destruction of existence for its result. 
It is a doctrine conforming to that of the Sūtra, that food has for a result causing to endure , causing to go those that exist , of favoring those desiring reexistence. 
Now contact, volition, and consciousness, when they are pure, do not produce any of these two results. 
Those that exist signifies beings who have been born; but what is the meaning of the expression desiring reexistence? 
It refers to antarābhava, intermediate existence or being, which the Blessed One designated by five names: 
An intermediate being is called manomayau, because he is produced by the anas alone, and because he exists without being supported by any exterior element, semen, blood, flower, etc. 
He is called abhinirvrṣti,because his nsrvṛtti or arising is witha view toarising proper. 
in a painful world; and also from the Sūtra that says, Such a person has abandoned the bonds which cause ubhinrvrtt, without having abandoned the bonds which cause upapatti or existence. 
he is bound with the bonds of abhinirvrti, but freed from wpapatti, an Arhat, who has abandoned the two types of bonds; and 4. 
According to another explanation, the bhātas are the Arhats: 
kkṅkḵ What are the foods that fulfill these two functions of causing to last and favoring ? 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the four foods perform these two functions. 
Food by the mouthful has for its result the reexistence of those who are attached to it. This is proved by the Sūtra. The Blessed One said, The four foods are the root of sickness, abcesses, and thorns. ; and are the condition of old age and death. 
But how does mental intentional action, or volition , possess this power? 
Once upon a time there was a man, who in a time of poverty desired to go to another land. 
But he was exhausted by his hunger and his two sons were young. Feeling that he was going to die, he filled a sack with ashes, placed this sack on a wall,and encouraged his sons by telling them ṭthat this sack contained grain. 
The two children, through hope, lived a long time. But another man came and took the sack and opened it. The children saw that it was ashes, and their hope being crushed, they died. 
So too oṅce upon a time some merchants travelled by ship on the open sea; tormented by hunger and thirst, they saw in the distance a mass of foam andbelieved that it was a river; hope gave them the force to go to that place and prolong their life; but, arriving, they found out what it was, and their hopes being crushed, they died. We also read in the Sargīiparyāya, Large marine animals reach firm ground, lay their eggs on the beach, bury them in the sand, and go back to the ocean. If the mother forgets the eggs, they will perish. 
This edition cannot be correct, foṛ 
it is impossible that the mind of another would be food. 
Thus we should read, If the eggs think of their mother, they will not perish; but if they forget their mother, they will perish. 
kkk Yet one cannot doubt that all the impuredharmas increase bhava or existence. 
Why did the Blessed One teach that the foods are four in number? 
Among the foods, two have for their result the growth of the āśraya and the āśrita , and two have for their result the projection and the production of a new existence. 
The āraya is thebody with its organs, which is the support of what is supported by it: 
Food by the mouthful makes the body grow, while coatact makes the mind grow. 
These two foods which cause that which is born to live, and which are similar to a wetnurse, are the major items for the duration of a being who is born. 
Mental volitionalaction which is active, projects a new existence; this new existence, thus projected, is produced from the seed which is the consciousness informed through action. 
Mental volitional action and the consciousness are thus the two foods which cause birth, which are similar to a mother, and which are the major items for the production of the existence of a being who has not yet been born. 
Is everything which is by the mouthful food? 
There are mouthfuls which ate notfood. Four cases: 
that which, being taken in the mouth, has for its result the diminution of the organs and the destruction of the primary elements which support them; 2. 
Is there contact, mental volitional action, and consciousness, which has for its result the growth of the organs and the increase of the elements, without this contact, etc., being food? 
those which belong to a sphere different from the sphere in which the being in question is born, and, in all the spheres, those which are pure. 
ssksk That which consumed is harmful to one who has consumed it nevertheless receives the name of food. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, in fact, it is for two moments that the thing consumed performs the function of food: as soon as it is consumed, it dispels hunger and thirst; and 2. 
digested, it increases the organs and the primary elements. 
How many foods are there is the different ealms of rebirth, and in the different wombs? 
All are in all How can you say that there is, in the hells, food by the mouthful? 
The red balls of fire and molten copper are food. 
If this is the case, if that which is harmful is food, then the theory of the four cases is rejected, as well as the definitions of the Prakaraṇagrantha which says, What is food by the mouthful? 
Mouthful by reason of which there is inctease of the organs, and the increase and maintainance of the primary elements, and the rest. 
These definitions, in fact, are applied to food insofar as it increases. 
But the objects of consummation which have for their result to diminish, nevertheless possess, in the hells, the characteristics of food: they dispel, at least for a time, hunger and thirst. 
Further, in the prādefika ells , food by the mouthful exists as among humans. 
Hence food by the mouthful exists in the five realms of rebirth. 
There is one who feeds one hundred nonBuddhist Ṛṣis detached from Kāmadhātu, and there is one who feeds a single iambuṣaṇḍagata prthagjana: 
What does the expression Śambuṣaṇḍagata pṛthagjana mean? 
According to the first opinion,jambuṣaṇḍa signifyingJambudvīpa, so this signifies, All beings inhabiting Jambudvīpa who have a storhach. 
This explanation is inadmissable; for the expression a Prthag jana.. 
Were it to have such a value, we do not see why the Sūtra would teach that a gift made to an infinite number of Pṛthagjanas is more meritorious that one made to a smaller number, to one hundred Ṛṣis: 
According to thesecond opinion, the Pṛthagjana inquestion is the Bodhisattva close to Bodhi. 
infact a gift made to such a Bodhisattva is of incalcalable merit, and is of a merit superior to a gift made to one hundred ois of Arṟhats. 
Thus, say the Vaibhāṣīkas, this Prthagjana is the person who has obtained the socalled nrvedhabhāgīya roots of good. 
In our opinion, the expression jambuṣaṇḍagata does not ety mologically signify possessor of the nsrvedhabhāgīyas; the usage does not give that sense to this expression; neither the Sūtra nor the Śāstra uses it in this sense: 
the wordjambuṣaṇḍagata,seatedunder the Jambu tree, refers to but one Bodhisattva, The Bodhisattva is a Pṛthagjana, detached from Kāmadhātu: 
Without doubt, a gift made to this Bodhisattva is more meritorious than a gift made to an infinite number of Ṛṣis: 
and if the Sūtra says that it is more meritorious than a gift made to one hundred Ṛṣis, it is because the Sūtra explains the gradation of merit by multiples of one hundred: 
we observe that, to proceed with these compaṛrisons, the Sūtra does not further speak of a fambuṣaṇḍagata. 
It does not say, A gift made to a candidate for the results of Srotaāpanṇna is incomparable greater than a gift made to ajambuṣaṇḍagatawhich it would say if janbuṣaṇḍagata were to signify a possessor of the nirvedhabhāgīyasbut rather, taking up again the Ṛṣis as the teṟrm of comparison, A gift made to a candidate for the results of Srotaāpanna is incomparably greater than a gift made to one hundred nonBuddhist RṚṣis. 
ksk We have seen what the pratīyasamutpāda of beings is, and how beings last. 
We have seen also how death results frm the exhaustion of life , etc. 
It remains for us to say which consciousness is present at the moments of death and birth. 
Breaking, taking up again, detachmeṇnt, loss of detach ment, death and birth are regarded as proper to the mind consciousness. 
It is through a single mental consciousness that the breaking and the taking up again of the roots of good take place; the detachment either from a Dhātu, or from a bhmi , and the loss of this detachmeṉt; and death and birth. 
What is true of birth is evidently true of the beginning of the intermediate existence: it is useless to speak of it, Death and birth, with the sensation of indifference. 
The mind consciousness, at death and at birth, is associated with the sensation of indifference, xpekṣa, that is, with the sensation that is neither agreeable nor disagreeable. This sensation is not active; the other sensations are active and, as a consequence, an aṛising and a dying consciousness cannot be associated with them, for, in this hypothesis, it would itself be active. 
Neither the one nor the other in absorption, nor for one without thought. 
On the other hand, if we consider a being who dies or who is born in a sphere of absorption, then his mind is certainly not absorbed, for an absorbed mind is only absorbed through effort; it is ābhsaskārika: thus it is atways active. 
There is no longer any death or birth for one without thought,. 
when his body begins to decayeither by the action of the sword or of fire, or by the exbaustion of retribution of the absorptionsthen, of necessity, the mind bound to the body becomes present and dies. 
The state of nonthought is also incompatible with birth, for it is lacking any cause for the cutting off of the mind, and because there cannot be a birth without defilement. 
Concerning the death of the Arhat, He obtains Nirvāṇa in two neutral minds. 
Namely, in an airyāpathia mind or in a vpākaja mind. 
At least according to the masters who believe that, in Kāmadhātu, a vipākaja mind can be indifferent ; but, for the masters of an opposing opinion , one caṉṉot obtain Nirvāṇa in an aryāpathika miṇḍd. 
Because this type of mind, being very weak, is suitable to the cutting off of the mind, that is, to the definitive cutting off of the mind. 
rkkk In which part of the body does the consciousness perish at death? 
When death or falling takes place at once, the kāyendriya perishes at the same time as does the manṅās. 
43c When death is gradual, the anas dies in the feet, at the mavel, in the heart, accordingly as the being goes below, among humans, among the Suras, or is not reborn. 
The consciousness of these beings dies respectively, in the feet, the navel, or in the heart. 
Aja,who is not reborn, is the Arhat: his consciousness also dies in the heart; but according to another opinion, ia the head. 
The consciousness dies through the de struction of the organ of touch, which takes place in a certain place. 
Towards the end of life, the organ of touch perishes bit by bit; at the end it remains only in a certain part of the body where it finishes by disappearing; in the same way water placed on a hot rock diminishes gradually and finishes by disappearing in a certain place. 
kskk It is thus that gradualdeath takes place; in general, thedying person is afflicted by some sensations which break the vital parts. 
Marmāṉṇi oṟ vital parts, are those parts of the body which canṉot be damaged without death ensuing. 
When one of the elements,water, fire or wind,is extremely troubled, the vital parts are as if they were split by terrible sensations which are like sharpknives. 
By saying that the vita! parts are split, we do not mean to say that they are split lke wood. 
Why are the vital parts not split by ttrouble of the earth element? 
Because there are only three doṛar, namely bile, phlegm, and wind, which are in order the elements of water, fire, and wind. 
According to another opinion, since the world perishes by these three elements , death also takes place by these three elements. 
But five premonitory signs appear to a god being approached by death: some of his clothes and some of his ornaments give off unpleasant sounds; 2. 
the light of his body diminishes; 3. 
some drops of water remain attached to his body after his bath, 4. 
in spite of his natural mobility, his mind is fixed o an object; and 5. 
his eyes, naturally fixed, are troubled, opening and closing. 
And there are five signs of death: 
sweat appears in his armpits; 4. 
his body emits a bad odor; and 5. 
the god no longer enjoys his seat. kḥrk The Blessed One classified beings who arise, last, and die, into three categories: 
An Āryan and one guilty of ānantarya transgressions are predestined, the first to health, the second to loss. 
What is health, samyaktua? 
According to the Sūtra, the complete abandoning of affection, hatred, error, and all of the defilements,. 
One in whom the Path arises, that is, the Pure Path. He is an Āryan because he has gone far from evil, since he possesses disconnection from the defilements. How is the Āryan predestined to health? Because he will certainly obtain Niṟrvāṇa. 
But a person who acquires the mokṣabhāgīyas will also certainly obtain Nirvāṇa. Why not consider him predestined to health? 
Because he can comnmit transgressions which make him pre destined to loss; or rather because, if he is in fact predestined for Nirvāṇa, the moment of his aṟrival atNirvāṇa is not fixed, as is the case for the Āryans beginning with he who, at a maximum, will be reborn seven times. 
What is loss, mithyātva? 
The hellish, animal, and Preta realms of rebirth. 
A person who commits āṉantaryatraṇsgressions will cerainly be reborn in hell; he is thus predestined to loss. 
Ñ One who is not predestined is one who is not predestined to health or loss. 
kkṣk We have described the world of human beings; let us pass to a description of the receptacle or physical worṟld. 
at the bottom there is a circle of wind, immeasurable, with a height of sixteen hundred thousand leagues. The great chiliocosm is arranged as we shall explain. At its bottom there arises, through the force of the predominent actions of beings , a circle of wind which rests on space. 
a ahānagna could strike at it with his vafra and his vajra would break without the circle of wind being scratched. 
By the predominate actions of beings, there falls from massed clouds, upon the circle of wind, a rain the drops of which are like the shafts of a carriage. 
This water forms a circle of water, with a thickness of eleven hundred twenty thousand yojanas. 
How do these waters not flow over the edge? 
Some say that the waters are sustained by the force of theactions of beings, as food and drink which do not fallin the intestines before being digested. 
According toanother opinion, the waters are sustained by the wind, like grain in a basket. 
Then the water, agitated by a wind which the force of actions gīves rise to, becomes gold in its upper part, as churned milk becomes cream: Then, the ciEcle of waters is no more than eight hundred thousand leagues in height; the rest becornes gold. Then there is above the circle of water now reduced to eight hundred thousand yojanas, a sphere of gold, three hundred twenty thousand yojanas thick. 
47a The ciṟcle of water and gold have a diameter of twelve hundred three thousand four hundred and fifty leagues; triple for its perimeter. 
On the circular sphere of gold which thus rests on the water, 48b There are Meru, Yugandhara, Īṣādhara, Khadiraka, Mount Sudarśana, Aśvakarṇa, Vinataka, and Mount Nimin dhara; beyond are the continents; on the edge is Cakravāḍa. 
Nine great mountains rest on the sphere of gold. 
In the center there is Meru; concentrically, the other seven are atranged around Meru; Nimindhara forms the exterior rim that envelops Meru and the six inner wallmountainswhence its name. 
49d Seven mountains are made of gold; the last is made of iroṉ; and Meru is made of four jewels. 
Yugandhara and the six mountains that surround it are made of gold; Cakravāḍa is made of iron; Meru has four faces which are respectively, from porth to west, made of gold, silver, lapis and cristal. Each of these substances gives its own color to the part.of space which faces it. 
Since the face of Meṟu which is turned towards Jambudvīpa is made of lapis, our heaven is thus similar in color to lapis. 
What is the origin of the different substances that make up Meru? 
The waters which have fallen on the sphere of gold are rich in different potentialities; under the action of the winds which possess different efficacies, they disappear and make room for different jewels. 
It is thus that the waters are transformed into jewels: the water is the cause, the jewels are a result different from the cause, and there is no simultaneity. 
This is quite different from the concept of transformation that the Sākhyas imagine. 
They admit that ḍharmas arise and disappear within a permanent substance. 
How is this incorrect? 
Oṇne cannot admit the simultaṉneous existence of a permanent dharmin, and of dharmas arising and disappearing. 
this dharma they call dharmin. In other words, transformation is only the modification of a substance. 
This thesis is not correct. 
Why is it not coṟṟect? 
you admit that that is identical to this , but that this is not like that. 
The gold, silver, jewels and the land thus formed are brought together and piledin heaps by the winds which are produced by the force of actiohs. They meke up the mountains and the continents. 
The mountains rest on the sphere of gold and are in the water to a depth of eighty thousand yoanas. Meṟu rises out of the water for the same number of yojanas, and is thus, both in and out of the water, one hundred sixty thousand Jojanas in beight. 
Yugandhara rises out of the water for forty thousand yojanas,Īṣādhara for twenty thousand yojanas and thus following until Cakravāḍa which rises out of the water for three hundred twelve yojanas and a half. The mountains are as wide as they extend out of the water. kksk 51c The seven Sītās, of which the first is of eighty thousand leagues, form the interval between the mountaims. This is the inner ocean, triplein circumference. The other Sītās diminish by a half. 
The Sītās are located between the mountains, from Meru to Nimindhara: 
The first,between Meru and Yugandhara, is eighty thousand leagues in width. 
In exterior circurmferance, to the shore of Yugandhara, it is triple this, thus two hundred forty thousand yojanas. The size of the other Sītās diminishes by a half: 
the second Sītā, between Yugandhara and Īṣādhara, is forty thousand yojanas in width, and so on to the seventh, between Vinataka and Nimindhara, which is twelve hundredfifty yojanas wide. 
The rest, that is, the water between Nimindhara and Cakravāḍa, is the great outer sea; it is full of salt water, and is three hundred twentytwo thousand yojanas wide. 
cṅskk 53b There is Jambudvīpa, three sides of two thousand, in the form of a carriage, and one side of three and a half; eastern Videha, like a halfmoon, three sides like Jambu, and one side of three hundred fifty; Godānīya, of seven thousand five hundred, round, with a diameter of two thousand five hundred; and Kuru, of eight thousand, square, parallel In the outer sea, corresponding to the four sides of Meru, there are four continents : 
Eastern Videha or Pūrvavideha has the shape of a halfmoon; it has three sides of two thousand yojanas, thus of the same dimension as the long side of Jambu, and one side of three hundred fifty yojanas. 
Godānīya, which faces the western side of Meru, is round like the moon; it is seven thousand five hundred yoanṇas , and two thousand five hundred through the center. 
Facing the northern side of Meru is Kuru or Uttarakuru which has the shape of a seat; it is square: its sides, of two thousand yojanṇar each, form a circumferance of eight thousand yojanas. To say that Kuru is parallel means that its four sides are of the same dimension. 
Such is the shape of the continents, and such is the shape of the faces of the persons who reside in them. 
There are eight intermediate continents: 
Dehas, Videhas, Kurus, Kauravas, Cāmaras, and Avaracāmaras, Śāṭhas and Uttaramaṇtrins. 
Dehas and Videhas are located on both sides of Pūrvavideha; Kurus and Kauravas on the sides of Uttarakuru; Cāmaras and Avaracāmaras on the sides of Jambudvīpa; and Śāṭhas and Uttaramantrins on the sides of Godāṇnīya. 
All of these continents are inhabited by human beings. 
kkḵ 57. Here, to the north of the nine antMountains, lie the Hirmavat; beyond it,but on this side of the Mountain of Perfume, is a lake deep and wide by fifty leagues. 
By going toward the north in this Jambudvīpa, one encounters three antMountains, ; then three other antMountains; then three other again; and finally the Himavat. 
Beyond that, this side of the Gandhamādana , liesLake Anavatapta from whence there flows out four great rivers, the Gaṅgā, the Śindhu, the Vakṣu and the Sītā. 
This lake, fifty yojanas wide and deep, is full of a water endowed with the eight qualities. Only persons who possess magicalpowers can go there. 
The Jambu tree is located near this lake. Our continent receives its name of Jambudvīpa, either from the tree, or from the fruit of the tree which is also called Jambu. 
xskṣk Where are the hells, and what are their dimensions? 
At the bottom, at twenty thousand leagues, is Avīci, of this same dimension; above; the seven hells; all eight have sixteen utsadas. 
Beneath Jambudvīpa, at a distance of twenty thousand yojanar, lies the great hell Avīci.It is twenty thousandyyojanas high and wide; its sun is.thus found forty thousand yojanas below the sun of Jambudvīpa. 
because there is not, in this hell, any interruption of suffering. 
In Sajīva, for example, bodies are first ctrushed and reduced to dust; then a cold wind revives them and gives them feeling: from whence the name of Sajīva; 2. 
because there is no agreeable state there.. 
Above Avīci areseven hells one above the other: 
According to another opinion, these seven hells are placed at the same level as Avīci. 
There aṟe eight hells there that armed with swords, lances and javelins, who push back the damned who would getout. 
Whether they plunge iato the water oremerge,whether they go up or down the current,whether they travers in the twodirectioas or are tossed about, thedamned are boiledand cooked, as the grains of sesame or corn poured into a cauldron placed over the fire. 
The river encircles the great hell like a moat. The four wsadas are sixteen in number by reason of their difference of place, since they are iocated at the four gates to the great hell. 
They are called wsadas because they are places of supplementary torment: 
According to Manoratha , after having been shut up in the hells, the damned then fall into the w5adas. 
Through the actions of beings, like the wind of creation.1 Then how do you explain what the Venerable Dhārmasubhūti said, Those who are angry, who take pleasure in cruel actions and transgressions, who rejoice in the sufferings of others, are reborn as Yamarākṣasas?11 The demons who torment the beings in hell are not termed Yamarākṣasas, the guardians of hell as you think; but rather the servants of Yema who, on the order of Yama, throw the damned into hell. 
TWhere does the retribution of the cruel acts take place that these guardians commit in the hells? 
In the same hells. Since the retribution of ṉantarya transgressions takes place in these hells, why would the retribution of the actions of the guardians not be possible here? 
But why are not the guardians, who are found in the midst of fire, burned? 
Because the force of action marks a boundary to the fire and prevents it from reaching the guardians, or rather because this same force causes the bodies of the guardians to be made up of primary elements of a special nature. 
kkṣk There are eight other hells, the cold hells, Arbuda, etc. 
These hells are called Arbuda, Nirarbuda, Aṭaṭa, Hahava, Huhuva, Utpala, Padma, and Mahāpadma. 
they take the foṟmof an zrbuda,a lotus.., the others indicate the noise that the damned make under the bite of the cold: 
aṟa These cold helis are located under Jambudvīpa, on a level with the great hells. 
kksk How is there place, under a single Jambudvīpa, for the hells which are indeed wider than Jambudvīpa? 
The continents,like piles of grain,are wider at their bases. The great ocean does not sink into a deep, steep cavity around the continents. 
The sixteen hells are created through the force of the actions of beings ; there are hells.the prādeśika hells,created through the force of individual actions, the actions of one being, of two beings,of many beings. 
Their variety is great; their place is not determined: river, rountain, desert, and elsewhere. 
The principal place of the hells is below. 
As for the animals, they have three places, the land, the water, and the air. 
Their principal place is the Great Ocean; the animals that are elsewhere are the surplus of the animals.1 kksk The king of the Pretas is called Yama; his residence, which is the principal dwelling of the Pretas, is located five hundred leagues under Jambudvīpa; it is five hundred leagues deep and wide. 
The Pretas differ much one from another; certain of them possess supernatural powers and enjoy a glory similar to that of the gods; see the Avadānas of the Pretas. 
ksleṭ Upon what do the sun and the moon rest? 
Upon the wind. 
The collective force of the actions of beings ptoduces the winds which create the moon, the sun and the stars in heaven.All these astral bodies revolve around Meru as if transported by a whirlpool. 
The moon and the sun move at a level with the summit of Yugandhara. 
What are their dimensions? 
Fifty and fifty and one leagues. The disk of the moon is of fifty yojanas; the disk of the sun is of fiftyone yojanas. 
The smallest among the houses of the stars is of one krośa ;. 
The force of the actions of beings forms, smaller than and external to the house of the suṇ, a disk of firestone, hot and luminous; and, for the house of the moon, a disk of waterstone, cold and luminous. 
Their function, according to circuamstances, is to cause to arise and last the eye, the body, fruits, flowers, crops, and herbs; and to destroy them. 
Yet the sun does not fulfill its functionat the same time in the four continents. 
Midnight it sets, midday it rises at the same moment. 
Ḷ By reason of the variety of the progress of the sun, the days and nights grow longer and shorter. 
61c The nights grow longer after the ninth day of the second quarter of the second month of the rains, and they grow shorter after the ninth day of the second quarter of the fourth month of winter. Reverse for the days. The days and the nights grow longer little by little accordingly as the sun goes towards the south or towards the north. 
The nights grow longer from the ninth day of the clear quarter of Bhādrapada on, andgrow shorter from the ninth day of the clear quarter of Phālguna on. Reverse for the days: 
when the nights become longer, the days become shorter, and vice versa. 
The days and the nights grow longer and shorter gradually, in proportion to the sun going towatds the south or towards the north of Jambudvīpa. 
Why does the disk of the moon not appear completely full at the beginning of the bright quarter? 
The moon is covered by its shadow by reason of its proximity to the sun, and one sees it incompletely. This is the teachingof the Prajñāpti,When the house of the moon moves in the vicinity of the house of the sun, then the light of the sun falls on the house of the moon. Consequently, the shadow falls on the opposite side, and the disk appears incomplete. 
But, according to the ancient masters, the Yogācārins, the manner of its moving is such that the moon appears sometimes complete, sometimes incomplete. 
To what class of beings do the inhabitants of the houses of the sun, the moon and the stars belong? 
These are the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, and the only ones among these gods who inhabit houses; but there is a great number of Cāturmahārājakāyikas who inhabit the earth, in the parisaṇḍāsthe stages or terracesof Meru and elsewhere. 
There are four terraces, the distance between them being ten thousand leagues,extending out sixteem, eight, four and two thousand leagues. 
They are the Karoṭapāṇis, the Mālādharas, the Sadāmattas and the two Mahārājikas; and also on the seven mountains. 
The first terrace is ten thousand leagues above the water, the second ten thousand leegues above the firstandso on. 
The first terrace extends out from Meru sixteen thousand leagues; the others, in their order extend out eight, four, two thousnd leagues. 
On the first terrace reside the Yakṣas Pitcher in their Haṇd: on the second, the Wearers of Crowns; on the third the Always Intoxicated : all these gods belong to the Cāturmahārājakāyikas. At the fourth terrace are the Four Kings in person with their attendants: these gods are called the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, the Four Great Kings. 
As the Cāturmāharājakāyikas inhabit Meru, so too they have villages and towns on the seven mountains of gold, Yugandhara, etc. 
Also the gods of this class are the most numerous of the gods. 
The Thirtythree Gods are at the summit of Meru, the sides of which are eighty thousand. At the corners, four peaks which the Vajrapāṇis inhabit. 
In the middle, with sides of two thousand five hundred, with a height of one and a half, is a village called Sudarśana, of gold, with a varigated and smooth sun. 
On the outside, this village is adorned with Caitraratha, Pāruṣya, Miśra and Naṇdana ; at a distance of twenty thousand leagues from these Parks, at the four sides, there are excellent fields. 
At the northeast Pārijāta, in the southwest Suḍharmā. 
The Trāyastriśas or Thiṛtythree Gods iahabit the summit of Meru; the sides of this summit are of eighty thousand yojaṇas. 
According to other masters, the sides of each are twenty thousand, and the circumference is eighty thousand. 
At the corners, there are peaks , five hundred yojanas high and wide, where the Yakṣas called Vajrapāṇis reside. 
3.In the middleof the plateau of Meru there is the royal city of Śakra, the chief of the gods, a city called Beautiful to Look At.Its sides are two thousand five hundred yojanas; its cir cumference is ten thousand; its height one yoana and a half; it is of gold; it is adorned with one hundred and one types of colors; and the same for its sun. This sun is soft to the touch, like the leaf of the cotton tree; it rises and falls to faciḻitate its progress. 
In the middle of this city there is the palace of Śakra, the chief of the gods, called Vaijayanta: it makes all the other residences blush by its richness and its gems. Its sides are two hundred fifty yojanas. 
Such are the adornments of the city itself. 
Ornaments outside of the city are the four Parks: Caitraṟatha, Pāruṣyaka, Miśraka, and Nandana, fields of play for the gods. 
At the four sides of these Parks, from a distance of twenty yojanas on, there are four fields of play with a marvellous sun, delightful and which appears to rival them. 
The magnolia tree called Pārijātaka is, for the Thirtythree Gods, the place par excellence for pleasure and for love; its roots go down fifty yojanas;. 
it is one hundred yojanas high; with its branches, leaves and petals, it covets fifty yojanas. The fragrance of its flowers spreads one hundred yojanas away with the wind, fifty against the wind. 
So be it, it can spread to one hundred yojanas with the wind, but how can it go against the wind? 
According to one opinion, one says that it spreads to fifty yojanar against the wind,because it does not go beyond the tree. 
but such is the quality of this fragrance that, even though it would be arrested by the lightest divine wind, it gives birth to a new series of identical fragrances. 
Nevertheless, the fragrances become weak, weaker, entirely weak and are completely arrested, incapable of going as far as itdoes when the wind is favorable. 
Does the series of this fragrance have for its support only its own primary elements which constitute the fragrance? Or rather should one suppose that the wind becomes perfumed? 
The opinion of the masters is not fixed on this. 
Yet the Blessed One said, The fragrance of flowers does not go against the wind, neither does the fragrance of good go against the wind; but the sapuruṣa goes in all directions. 
How do you reconcile this statement with the theory that fragrance goes against the wind? 
This statement refers to odors of the world of humans, which, it is quite evident, does not go against the wind. 
The Mahīśāsakas read, The fragrance go with the wind for a hundred yojanas; in the absence of wind, to fifty. 
8.In the southeast lies Sudharmā, the room where the gods come together in order to examine the good and the evil deeds committed by human beings. 
Such is the arrangement of the receptacle or physical world of the Thirtythree Gods. 
kṣkḥ Above, the gods reside in houses. 
The gods higher that the Thirtythree Gods reside in vmnas or aerial abodes. 
These gods are the Yāmas,the Tuṣitas, the Nirmāṇaratis, and the Paranirmitavaśavartins, plus the gods of Rūpadhātu, namely sixteen categories of gods beginning with the Brahmakāyikas. In all, twentytwo types of gods live in the physical world and occupy set residences. 
xxskt There are six gods who taste pleasure; they unite through coupling, an embrace, the touch of hands, a smile, and a look. 
The Cāturmahārājakāyikas, Trāyastriśas, Yāmas, Tuṣitas, Nirmā ṇaratis and Paranirmitavaśavartiḥs are the gods of Kāmadhātu. 
The Cāturmahārājakāyikas and the Trāyastrithśas live on the ground; thus they unite by coupling, like humans; but they appease the fire of their desire through the emission of wind, since they do not have aṉy semen. 
The Yāmas appease the fire of their desire byembracing, the Tuṣitas by the touch of hands, the Nirmāṇaratis by smiling, and the Paranirmitavaśavartins by looking at each other. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , these expressions of the Prajñapti,embracing, touching of the hands, etc., do not indicate the mode of unionfor all the gods couplebut the duration of the act. 
The more ardent the desire by reason of the more pleasurable object, so much shorter is the duration of the union. 
kkk A small god or goddess appears on the knees, or from out of the knees of a god or goddess; this small god or goddess is their son or daughter: all the gods are apparitional. 
Among these gods, their newborn are similar to infants of five to ten years. 
From five to ten years according to the category of the gods. 
The gods of Rūpadhātu are complete and clothed. The gods of Rūpadhātu, from their birth, are complete in their development; they are boṟrn fully clothed. 
All the gods speak the Āryan language. 
In Kāmadhātu, There are three arisings of the objects of desire: the gods of Kāmadhātu together with humans, 1. 
There are beings whose objects of desire are placed at their disposition; but they are able to dispose of these objects. Theseare humans and certain godsnamely the first four classes of gods. 
There are beings whose objects of desire are created by themselves; and they dispose of these objects which they create. 
There are beings whose objects of desire are created by others but who themselves dispose of these objects created by others. These are the Paranirmitavaśavartiṇs. 
The firstenjoy the objects of desire which are prcsened to them; the second enjoy objects of desire which they create at their will; and the third enjoy objects of desire that they create or have others create at their will. These are the three arisings of the objects of desire. 
The nine spheres of the first three Dhyānas are the three arisings of pleasure. The gods of the first three Dhyānas,for long periods, pass their time pleasantly through pleasure born from separation from the defilements, through pleasure consisting of joy atisen from absorption aod through pleasure free from joy.By reason of their absence of suffering, and by reason of their duration, these arisings are indeed arisings of pleasure. 
In dhyānāntara there is no pleasure consisting of joy. Is this an arising of pleasure? 
This is to be discussed. kkk At what height are the twentytwo heavenly residences situated, starting from the Cāturmahārājikas to the highest gods of Rūpadhātu? 
It is not easy to calculate this height in yojanas, but To the extent that there is descent from one residence, to this extent there is ascent towards a higher residence. 
In other words, to the extent that a residence is above Jambudvīpa, to that extent it is below its next higher residence. 
For example, the fourth house of the Cāturmahārājikas, the dwelling of the Cāturmahā rājikas themselves is forty thousand yojanas above here; to the extent that this residence descends to here, to that extent this residence ascends to the residence of the Trāyatriśas,. 
As many yojanas as there are from Trāyastrithśas to here, that many are there from Trāyastriśas to the Yāmas. 
the Akaniṣṭhas are above the Sudarśanas the same number of yojanas that the Sudarśanas are above Jambudvīpa. 
This is.because this residence is higher than the others, no residence is superior to it, and so it is called 4niṣrha. 
Accoṟding to another opinion, this residence is called aghanisṭha, because agha signifies assembled matter, and this residence is the limit of this matter. 
kskṣk Can a being born in an inferior residence go to a higher house and see its superior beings? 
The gods do not see their superiors without magic or the assistence of another. 
When they possess magical powers, or when they are assisted by a being possessing magical powers or by a Yāma god, the Trāyastriśas can go to the Yāmas; and thus following. 
A being born in an lower residence can see a being born in a higher residence who makes a visit to an inferior residence,but not if this being belongs to a higher Dhātu, or to a higher hmi; in the same way that one cannot feel a tangible things ,because it is not of the sphere. 
This is why beings higher through their Dhātu or bhmi do notdescend with theirown bodies, but with a magic body of the sphere of the bhāmi to where they wish to descend. 
According to another schoo1, if a being of a higher bhāmi so desires, lower beings can see him in the same way as they see a being of their own bhāmi. 
xskk What are the dimensions of the houses of the Yāmas and the other According to one opinion, the houses of the four types of higher gods of Yāma have the dimension of the summit of Meru. 
According to others, the dimension of the First Dhyāna is the dimension of the universe with its four continents; that of the Second, the Third, and the Fourth Dhyāna is, respectively, the dimension of a small, medium and great chiliocosm. 
According to anothers, the first three Dhyāṇnas have, respectively, the dimension of a small, medium and great chiliocosm; the Fourth Dhyāṇna is without measure. 
kskṣk What is a small, a second, and a third chiliocoṣsm? 
small chiliocosm is made up of one thousand Jambudvīpas, Pūrvavidehas, Avaragodānīyas, Uttarakurus, mmoonṅs, suns, Merus, dwellings of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas and the other gods of Kāmadhātu, and worlds of Brahmā. 
Oṉe thousand universes of this type make a dichiliocosm, a middle universe. 
Oṇṉe thousand universes of this type make a trichilomegachiliocosm. 
The periods of desttuction and cteation are equal in length. 
kṣk In the same way that the dimensions of the physicalworlds differ, in that same way the dimensions of the beings inhabitating them differ: 
The inhabitants of Jambudvīpa have a height of fout, or of three elbows anda half; those calledPūrva, Goda and Uttara, by doubling each time. 
The bodies of the gods of Kāmadhātu increase,by quarters of krosśa, until a r052 aṇḍ a half. 
The bodies of the gods of Rūpadhātu are at first a half yojana; then increase by a half; beyond the Parīttābhas, the bodies double, and reduce three yojanas from the Anabhṛrakas on. 
Humans of Jambudvīpa generally are three elbows and a half, sometimes four elbows in height; the Pūrvavidehakas, the Avara godānīyakas, and the Auttarakauṟavas are reṣpectively eight, sixteen, and thirtytwo elbows in height. 
the Trāyastriśas,by half a roa; the Yāmas, by three quarters ofa krośa; the Tuṣitas,by one rośa; the Nī irmāṇaratis, by a krośa and a quarter; and the Parinirmitavasśavartiṉs, by a krośz and a half. 
xkōk The length of life of these beings also differs. 
Life, amoṇg Kurus, is one thousand years in length; in the two continents, it diminishes twice by half; here, it is in determinate: nevertheless it is ten years at the end and incalaalable at the beginning. 
The lifespan of beings in Godānaīya is half the lifespan of beings in Uttarakuru, thus five hundred years in length; the life of beings in Pūrvavideha is two hundred and fifty years in length. 
At the end of the cosmic age or kalpa , at its minimum, it is ten years; whereas the lifespan of humans at the beginning of the cosmic age is incalculable: ōne cannot measure it by counting in thousands, etc. kkk The lifespan of the gods of Kāmadhātu is an integral of the length of a day: 
For the higher gods, double the day and the life. 
Fifty human days make a day in the life of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, whose lifespan is of five hundred years of twelve month of thirty days. 
For the Trāyastrithśas, one day equals one hundred human years, and their lifespan is one thousand years in length; for the Yāmas, one day equals two hundred human years and their lifespan is two thousand years in length; and so on. 
But there is no sun or moon above Yugandhara; how is a day of the gods determined, and how are the gods illumined? 
80b There is no day and night for the gods of Rūpadhātu; their lifespans are calculated in lpas whose number is fixed by the dimensions of their bodies. 
kḥik What is the length of a lifespan in the painful realms of rebirth? 
82.In six hells,Sajīva, etc.,a day and night has the length of the life of the gods of Kāmadhātu; with such days, life as for the gods of Kāmadhātu. 
A day in the six hells,Sajīva, Kālasūtra, Saghāta, Raurava, Mahūraurava, and Tapana,is equal in this order to the life of the gods of Kāmadhātu, the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, etc. 
The damned in Sajīva have, like the Cāturmahārājakāyikas, a life of five hundred years of twelve months of thirty days; but each of these days has the length of the total lifespan of the Cāturmahārājakāyikas. 
In Pratapana, a lifespan lasts one half of an ansarakalpa; in Avīci, oṉe antarakalpa. 
The animals that live the longest time live one anarakalpa; these aṟe the great Nāga Kings, Nanda, Upananda, Aśvatara, etc. 
The Blessed One said, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, eight great Nāga Kings who live a kalpa and who sustain the eaṟth. 
The days of the Pretas have a length of one human month; they live five hundred years made up of days of this length. 
Life in the Arbudas is the time of the exhaustion of avāha, by taking a grain of sesame every one hundred years; the others by multiplying each time by twenty. 
The Blessed One has indicated the length of a lifespan in the cold hells only through comparisons, If, Oh Bhikṣus, a Magadhan vāha of sesame of eighty khāris were full of sesame seeds; if one were to take one grain each one hundred years, this vāha would be empty before a lifespan of beings born in the Arbuda hell would end: 
And, Oh Bhikṣus, twenty Arbudas make, Oh Bhikṣus, one Nirar buda. 
keeḥ Do all beings, whose length of lifespan has just been indicated, live the full length of this lifespan? 
With the exception of Kuru, there is death before their time. 
The life of beings in Uttarakuru is fixed; they necessarily live one thousand years: their length of life is complete. 
Everywhere else there is antarāmrtyu,death in the course of, in the middle of, a complete life, or premature death. 
kkḥ We have explained the residences and the bodies by measuring them in terms of yojanas,and lifespans by measuring them in terms of years; but we have not explained yoanas and years. 
An atom , a syllable , and an instant is the limit of matter, of words, and of time. 
A paramāṇu īs the limit of physical matter ; so too a syllable is the limit of words, for example, go; and an instant, the limit of time. 
What is the dimension of an instant? 
According to the Ābhidhārmikas,there are sixtyfive instants in the time that it takes a healthy man to snap his fingers. 
jṇu, aṇu, loharajas, abrajas, faśarajas, avirajas, gorajas, chidrarajas,likṣā,that whichcomes out of thekā, yava, and aṅñguliparvan, by multiplying each time by seven; twenty four añguls make one hasta; four hastas make one dhanus; five hundred dhanus make one krośa, the distance a hermitage should be located; and eight krośas make what is called one yojana. 
A hermitage, ṣraṇya, should be located one krośx from a village. 
kksk 88b One hundred and twenty kṣaṇar make one tatkṣaṇa; sixteen tatkṣaṇas make one lava; we obtain a muhrta or hour, an ahorāa or one day and night, and a wmāsa or month, by multiplying the preceeding termby thirty; a sarvatsara or yeat, is of twelve months by adding the narātras. 
Thirty muhrias make oṉe day and night; a night is sometimes longer, sometimes shorter, and sometimes equal to a day. 
There are four months of winter, of heat, and of rain; twelve months which, with the days called narāras, make a year. 
The ānarātras are the six days which, in the course of the year, one should omit. 
When one month and a half of the cold, hot, rainy season has elapsed, the learned omit one narāra in the balfmonth that remmains. 
kskk We have explained the year; we must explain the kalpa or cosmic period. 
There are different types of kapa: 
A kalpa of disappearance lasts from the nonproduction of the damned to destruction of the receptacle world The period thatextends from the mmoment when beings cease being reborn in hell until the moment when the world is destroyed is called a savartakalpa, a kaḻlpa of destruction. 
Destruction is of two types: 
It is again of two types: destuction of living beings, and destruction of the physical wotld. 
A stanza says,An inferior person searches out,by all means, his personal wellbeing; a mediocre person searches out the destruction of suffering, not wellbeing,because wellbeing is the cause of suffering; an excellent person, through his personal suffering, searches out the wellbeing and the definitive destruction of the suffering of others, for he suffers from the suffering of others.! 
kṣkk During what periods do the Buddhas appear, during a period of increase or during a period of decrease? 
They appear during the decrease to one hundred. 
The Buddhas appear during the period of the decrease of lifespan, when the length of life decreases from eighty thousand years to one hundred years in length. 
Why do they not appear when life decreases from one hundred to ten years? 
Because the five corruptions then becomne very strong. 
In the final period of the decrease of lifespan, the leṉgth of life becomes bad, base; being corrupted, it is called a kasāya or corruption; the same for the other corruptions. 
The first two corruptions deteriorate the vitality and the means of subsistance.1 The next two coṟruptions deteriorate the good; the corruption of defilements deteriorate beings through laxity ; the corruption of views through the practice of painful asceticism; or rather the coṟruption of defilement and the corruption of views deteriorate respectively the spiritual good of householders and of wanderers.1 The corruption of beings deteriorates beings from the physical and the mental point of view; it deteriorates their height, beauty, health, force, iatelligence, memory, energy, and firmness. 
They appear during the period of increase and during the period of decrease of lifespan. 
One distinguishes in fact two types of Pratye kabuddhas: 
The Cakravartin Kings do not appear when lifespan is under eighty thousand years in length; they have a wheelof gold, a wheel of silver, a wheel of cooper, and a wheel of iron; in inverse order, he reigns over one, two, three, or four continents; but never two at once, like the Buddhas; they trumph through spontaneous default, personal influence, fighting, or the sword, but always without doing evil. 
The Cakravartin Kings appeer from the periodwhen the lifespan of humans is infinite to the petiod when their lifespan is eighty thousand years in length; not when life is shorter, for then the world is no longer a suitable receptacle for their glorious prosperity. 
They ate calledCakravartins,because their nature is to reign. There are four types of Cakravartin Kings, Suvarṇcakravartin, Rūpyacakravartin, Tāmracakravartin,and Ayaścakravartin, acgordingly as their wheel is of gold, silver, copper, or iron: the first is the best, the second is almost best, the third is mediocre, and the fourth is inferior. 
The Cakravartin whose wheel is iron reigns over one continent, the Cakravartin whose wheel is copper reigns over two continents, and so on. 
A Sūtra,in fact,speaḵs only of a Cakravartin King having a wheel of gold, by reason of his greater importance,When, to aking of royaland coṉsecrated racewho, even in the days of his youth, on the fifteenth day, having washed his head, having undertaken the obligations of youth, ascends accompanṅied by this ministers tothe terrace of his palacethere appeats in the east the jewel of a wheel having a thousand rays,a wheelhavinga rim, havinga hub, complete inall ways, beautiful, not made by the hand of an artisan, all in gold?this king is a Cakravartin King. 
Two Cakravartins, the same as two Buddhas,do notappear at the same time. The Sūtra says, It is impossible in the present, or in the future, for two Tathāgatas, Arhats, perfect Buddhas to appear in the worldwithout one preceding and theother following.It is impossible.It is the rule that there is only one. 
And this holds for the Cakravartins as for the Tathāgatas. 
According to one oōpinion, the Buddhas do not appear elsewhere because the coexistence of two Buddhas would create an obstacle to the power of the Blessed Ones. 
A single Blessed One applies himself wheresoever: 
where a Blessed One does not apply himself to the converting of beings, other Blessed Ones do not apply themselves either. 
Further, we read in the Sūtra, Śāriputra, ifsomeone comes and asks you if there now exists someone, a Bhikṣu or a Brāhmin, who is equal to the ascetic Gautama with regard to Samyaksabodhi, what would you answer him? 
If someone were to interrogate me thus, Oh Venerabie One, I would answer him that there does not exist now anyone, Bhikṣu or Brāhmin, who is the equal of the BlessedOne. And why would respond in this manner? 
Because I have heard and understood of the Blessed One, that it is impossible, both in the present and in the future, for two Blessed Ones, Arhats, perfect Buddhas to appear in the world without one preceding and the other following,. 
How then are we to understand what the Blessed One said in the Brahmasūra, I exeṛcise my power even over a great Trtisāhasra universe? 
This text should not be taken literally; it means that without making an effort , the Buddha sees as far as this limit. 
Whn he desires it,his seeing goes wherever he wills it without lirait. 
According to other schools, the Buddhas appear at the same time, but in many universes. 
Here are their arguments. 
Certainly, it is not proper that many Buddhas should appear at the same time in the same spot ; but, on the other hand, nothing prevents many Buddhas from appearing at the same time: 
thus they appear indifferent universes. 
The universes are infinite in number, so even if the Blessed One lives an entire kapa, he cannot go about in the infinity of the universe as he does here; all the more so if he only lives a human lifetime. 
What is this activity of the Blessed One? 
He wills that a persons facalty. 
their death, they are reborn among the gods. 
The Sūtra says, When Cakravartin Kings appear in the world, the seven jewels also appear: 
a wheel, an elephant, a horse, a treasure, women, a treasurer, and a military advisor. 
Do these jewels which are living beings.the jewel of elephants, etc.,.arise through the actions of others? 
There are many differance between the Cakravartin Kings and other men, notably that these Kings possess, like the Buddha, the thirtytwo marks of the Mahāpuruṣa. 
But the marks of the Buddha outweigh those of the Kings in that they are better placed, more brilliant, and complete. 
Did humans have kings at the beginning of the kalpa? No.ē 98. 
In the beginning, beings were similar to the gods of Rūpadhātu; then,little by little, through attachment to taste, and through laziness, they made provisions and attributed parts to themselves; a protector of the fields was, by them, retributed. 
Humans at the beginning of the cosmic age were similar to the beings of Rūpadhātu. The Sūtra says, There are visible beings, born of the mind, having all their members, with complete and intact organs, of fine figure, of beautiful color, shining by themselves, travelling through the air, having joy for ther food, and living a long tirne. 
Yet there appeared the Jjuice of the eaṛth, the taste of which bad the sweetness of honey. 
One being, of greedy temperament, having perceived the smell of this juice, took pleasure in it and ate it, the other beings thendid the same. 
This was thebeginning of eating byBmouthfuls. 
This eating made their bodies become coarse and heavy and their luminosity come to anend: and then darkness appeared. And then there appeared the sun and the moon. 
Because of the attachment of beings to taste, the juice of the earth gradually disappeared. Then pthivāparpaṭaka appeared, and beings attached themselves to it. 
Prhivīparpaṭaka dīsappeared and a forest creeper appeared and beings then became attached to it. 
This creeper disappeared and then rice grew, unworked and unseeded: this rice, a coarse food, gave forth waste: beings then developedorgans of excretion and sexual organs; they then took different forms. 
Beings with sexual differences, by reason of ther previous habits, were seized by this ctocodile which is wrong jadgment; they conceived an active desire for pleasure and so had sexnual intercourse. 
t is from this moment on that the beings of Kāmadhātu were possessed by the demon which is craving. 
then the rice, cut and recaut, stopped grovwing. 
Then they distributed the fields.One was the owner of one field; one seized the goods of another. This was the beginning of robbery. 
ĪIn order to prevent robbery, they came together and gave a sixth part to an excellent man in order thathe protect the fields: this man was given the name kṣerapa or guardian of the fields, and, as he was a kṣetrapa, he received the name of kṣarriya. 
Because he was very esteemed by the multitude , and because he charmed his subjects, hebecame the RājaMahāsarhmata. This was the beginning of dynasties. 
Those who abandoned the householders life received the name of Brahmiṇs. 
Then, under a certain king, there were many bandits and thieves. 
The king punished them by the sword. 
What happens then? 
The kalpa terminates through iron, sickness, hunger, which last respectively seven days, seven months, and seven years. 
The end of the kalpa is marked by three calamities. 
In the period when the alpa draws to its end, their lifespans being reduced to ten years in length, persons, full of forbidden craving and slaves of unjust greed, profess false doctrines. 
The spirit of wickedness arises in them: they conceive thoughts of hatred; as soon as they see one another, as a hunter who sees game, everything that falls into their hand,a piece of wood, aconite plants,.becomes a sharp weapon, and they massacre one another. 
In the period when the kalpa draws to its end, their lifespans being reduced to ten years, persons, full of forbidden craving and slaves to unjust greed, profess false doctrines. Nonhuman beings emit deadly vapors, from whence incurable sicknesses arise by which humans die. 3.1n the periodwhen the kapadraws to itsend.. 
the heavens cease to rain, from whence three famines arise, the famine of the boxes , the famine of the white bones, and the famine when one lives by tokens. 
The famine of the boxes is called this for two reasons. 
Persons, overwhelmed with hunger and weakness, die all in a group; and, with a view to being useful to petsons of the future, they place seeds in a cecw. 
This is why this famine is called cañcu. 
The famine of the white bones is called this for two reasons. Bodies become dry and hard, and when they die, their bones soon become white. 
Persons gather up these white bones, boil them and drink them, The famine of tokens is called this for two reasons. 
Beings, in houses, eat according to the indication of tokens, Today it is the turn of the master of the house to eat; tomorrow it is the turn of the mistress of the house. 
And, with the tokens, persons search out grains in the empty earth; they are boiled in much water, and drunk. 
Scripture teaches that person who have, for a single day and night, undertaken abstention from murder, or have giīven one myrobalan fruit or a mouthful of food to the Saṅgha, will not be reborn here in this world during the period of knives, sickness, or famine. 
Killing lasts sevendays, sickness lasts seven months and seven days, and famine last seven years, seven months and seven days. The coṇjunction cz in the stanza shows that one rnust add the different lengths of time. ākā The continents of Videha and Godānīya do not know the three calamities: 
yet wickedness, bad color and weakness, and hunger and thirst reign therein when Jambudvīpa is overwhelmed by knives, sickness, and famine. 
kk We have described destruction by fire, and have said that the other destructions are accomplished in a similar manner. 
When all beings have disappeared from the lower physical worlds, having come together in a dhyāna heaven, the destructions take place: 
through fire, by reason of the seven suns; through water, by reason of the rain; and through wind, by reason of the disorder of the wind element. 
The effect of these destructions is that not one atom of the destroyed physical world remains. 
Certain nonBuddhist masterssay that the atoms are eternal, and that, as a consequence, they remain when the universe is dissolved. 
But we have explained that the seed of a new universe is wind, a wind endowed with special powers which have their beginning in the actions of creatures. 
And the instrumental cause of this wind is the wind of Rūpadhātus which is not destroyed. 
Further,a Sūtra of the Mahīśāsakas says that the wind brings the seeds in from another universe. 
But even if the seeds were so brought in, we do not admit that gross bodies,shoots, stalk, etc.,.arise from a seed, from a stalk, etc.; we say rather, that the shoot, etc.,arises from its parts, and that these parts arise in turn from their parts, and so on to the most minute parts which arise from the atoms. 
What then is the efficacy of a seed with regard to its shoot? 
The seed has no efficacy with regard to the eneration of the shoot, except that it provokes the aggrega on of the atorns of the shoot. 
It is impossible in fact for a certain thing to arise from a thing having another nature: 
Your examples are not valid. 
We admit that gnuṇadharas or attributes arise either from that which is similar or from that which is different ; but this does not hold in the same way for dravyadharmas which arise from the similar things. 
It is thus that vrapa threads,:and not other threadsgive rise to a mat, and that only cotton threads give rise to cotton cloth. 
Your example does not prove this, for it is not, itself, proven. 
You say that a thing arises from a similar thing, since a mat arises from vṝaṇa threads: 
How do you prove that cdloth is nota thing distinct from threads? 
When an organ is in relation with a thread, the cloth is not perceived. 
Now, if the clothexists why would it not be perceived? 
You say that the cloth does not exist, integrally, in each thread: 
this is to acknowledge that the cloth is only the collection of its parts which are each constituted by a thread: 
for how would you prove that the parts of a cloth are a thing other than the threads? 
in this hypothesis, it would suffice to see the fringe inorder to see the cloth. 
this is to admit then that one would never see the cloth, for the central parts and the extremes whichare supposed tocreate the clothare not perceived together. 
this is to acknowledge that the whole is not perceived; and this is to aaknowledge too that the idea of cloth or of mat has for itssole object the pazts of thecloth or the mat.How do we have, from all evidence, the idea of a ciccle from the cicle formed from the circular ttajectory of a brand? 
Farther, cloth cannotbea thing other than thread, for, in the hypothesis where it would be otherwise, when the threads are different in color, different in nature, and different in disposition, one could not attribute either color, or nature, or disposition to the cloth. 
You say that the cloth is different in color: 
this is to acknowledge that different creates different; farther, to suppose that one of the sides is not variegated, in looking at it one would not see the cloth, but rather would see it variegated. 
But do you dare say that the cloth, made of threads of different dispositions, is of different dispositions? 
Consideragain the entity which is the light of fire: its heating and illuminating power yvaries from beginning to end; one cannot recognize in it either color or tangible qualites. 
the Vaiśeṣikas also attribute the power to create coarse bodies to the united atoms; the factors of visual consciousness should be united in order to produce a consciousness; and persons who suffer from ophthalmia see masses of hair, not hairs one by oṉe. 
What one understands by atom is physical matter , etc., it is thus certain that atoms perish at the destruction of the universe. 
An atom is a thing in and of itself ; a thing in and of itself is distinct from physical matter, etc.; and physical matter can perish without an atom perishing. 
The distinction between a thing and i its attributes is inadmissible: 
thus the idea has for its object,not a thing inandof itself whose color would bean attribute,bbut its color, its taste, etc. 
But, in fact, if we were to recognize the unfired jug in the fired jug, it is because its figare remains similar: 
In fact, who would recognize the jug if one does not see in it certain characteristics observed initially? 
Let us here stop this discussion of these infantile theories. 
The Secoṇnd Dhyāna is the limit of the destruction by fire: 
everything below it is burned; the Third Dhyāna is the limit of the destruction by water: 
everything below it is dissolved; the Fourth Dhyāṇna is the limit of the destruction by wind: everything below it is dispersed. 
The top of the destruction is the name of that which remains when the destruction is finished. 
The heaven of the First Dhyāna then perishes by fire; in fact, the vice or imperfection of the First Dhyāna is vitarkavicāra; these burn the mind and are thus similar to fire. 
The Second Dhyāṇna perishes by water: in fact, it has joy for its vice. This, being associated with physical wellbeing, rends the body soft and flabby: it is similar to water. This is why the Sūtra teaches that the sensation of suffering is destroyed by the suppression of all solidity of the body. 
The ThirdDhyāna perishes by wind: in fact, it has inbreathing and outbreathing, which are wind,for its vice. 
The external vices of a Dhyāna are of the same order as the internal vices which affect the person who has entered into this Dhyāna. 
Why is there no destruction by the earth element as by the fire elermeṇnt, etc.? 
What one calls the physical world is earth, and as a consequence can be opposed by fire, water, and wind, but not by earth itself. 
The Fourth Dhyāna is not subject todestruction, because it is free from agitation. 
The Buddha said in fact that this Dhyāna, being free from internal vices, is nonmovable. 
The exteṟrnal vices have thus no hold on itand, as a consequence, it is not subject to destruction. 
These gods are incapable of entering into Ārūpyadhātu, and are also incapable of going elsewhere. 
The receptacle world of the Fourth Dhyāṇa is not eternal, but by this fact, it does not constitute a sphere; like the stars, it is divided into diverse residences; these different mansions, the abodes of beings, arise and perish with these beings. 
kskōk What is the order of succession of these three destructions? 
Seven by fire,one by water; and when seven destructions by water have thus taken place, seven by fire followed by the destruction by wind. 
After seven series of seven successive destructions by fire, de struction is then done seven times by water; the eighth series of seven destructions by fire is folllwed by onedestruction by wind. 
The physical worlds, in fact, lastby reason of the duration of the gods who are reborn therein by the force of their absorptions. 
this is what justifies the declaṟation of the Prajñāpti that the Śubhakrtsṇa gods live sixtyfour kalpas. 
kkṣḵ Karma OR Homage to the Buddha Who created the variety of the world of living beings and the receptacleworld which we have described in the preceding chapter? 
The variety of the world arises from action. 
The variety of the world arises from the actions of living beings. 
But, in this hypothesis, how does it happen that actions produce at one and the same time, pleasing things,;saffron, sandalwood, etcon the one band, and bodies of quite opposite qualities on the other? 
The actions of beings whose conduct is a mixture of good and bad actions produce bodies resembling abscesses whose impurities flow out through the nine gates,and, in order to serve as a remedy to these bodies, they also produce objects of pleasing eṉjoyment, colors and shapes, odors, tastes and tangibles. 
But the gods haveaccomplished only good actions: their bodies and their objects of enjoyment are equally pleasing. 
kkḵ What is action? 
It is volition and that which is produced through volition. 
The sūtra says that there are two types of action, volition and the action after having been willed. Action after having been willed is what the kārikādesignates by the woṟds that which is produced through volition. 
These two actions form three actions: bodily action, vocal action, and mental action. 
How do you establish this division, according to the support of its action, according to its nature, or according to its original cause? 
To what does this question tend? 
If one were to regard its support, there is nothingbut an action, for allactions are supported on a physical support, a body. 
If one were to regard its nature, there is only vocal actioṉ, for, of these three,;body, speech and anas,only the voice is ultimately actionby its nature. 
If one were to regard its origional cause, we have only mentalaction, for allactions have their origin in the mind. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that the three types of action are established by reason of all of these three causes, support, nature and original cause, in this order. Volition is mental action: it gives rise to two actions, bodily and vocal action. 
Volition is called mental action; that which arises from volition, namely action which has been willed, is made up of the two other actions, bodily and vocal action. 
These two actions are informative and noninformative. 
Bodily action and vocal action are informative and non informative ; we then have bodily informative action, vocal informative action, bodily noninformative actioṉ, and vocal noninformative action. 
What action is bodily informative action? 
2b Bodily vrjñapti is shape. 
on the other hand, pothing does not perish without a cause and the creative cause would be at the same time destructive. 
Bodily viñapti is such and such a shape of the body by reason of a volition According to others, bodily vijñapti is dis placement, for it takes place when there is movement, and not when there is no movement. 
This is not so, because all conditioned things re Tṉnoeṇtary. 
What is understood by momentary ? 
kksk The Vaibhāṣikas say that shape exists in and of itself, and thatbbodily vijñapti is shape. 
Scrīpture says that rāpa is of three types and that there is a pure vpa; there is increase of merit; and there is a course of action for him who is not concerned with himself, etc. 
A scripture says that there are three types of rpa: Rpa is embraced within a threefold rpa: there is visible rūpa susceptible of destruction ; there is an invisible rpa susceptible of destruction ; and there is an invisible r7p, free from destruction, and this latter can only be the gvjñapti. 
But it is evident that the nature of this action is not modified by the execution of the order. 
He did not say that the dharmāyatana īs nonrūpa. 
Let us examine them one by one. 
their series undergo a subtle ascending transformation and aṟṟives at the state where they are finally capable of bringing forth many results. 
And it also satisfies us that the result arises from a transformation of the series and not from an avjñapti. 
What is noncommission? 
From the firstmoment, the vjñapti of Kāmadhātu arises derived from past primary elements. 
From this first moment on, avijñapti of the sphere of Kāmadhātuin opposition to the avjñapti arisen from the dhyāna, and pure avijñapti arises, that is, it continues to be reborn, being derived from the same primary elements of the first moment, which are now past: 
In the same way, the hand that has hurled the wheeland the ground that the supports the wheel, are the causes,respectively, of the prevṛzti and the anuvṛtti of the movement of the wheel. 
When impure, bodily and vocal action derive from the primary elements of the sphere to which they belong. 
Bodily and vocal actions of Kāmadhātu derive from the primary. 
elements of Kāmadhātu, aṇd so on to the bodily and vocal actions of the Fourth Dhyāna which derives from primary elements of the Fourth Dhyāṇṉa. 
What are the characteristics of the primary elements from whence they derive? 
The avijñapti is a derived rūpa exempt from mass , nonextended ; thus it cannot be a support of the mind and of mental states; thus it is axepātta, not integral to the sense oṟganisrm. 
The avrñapti is never moṟally neutral : 
hence it is not aṟisen from retribution ; it is notof increase ; it remains then that it is an outflowing , that is, produced by sabhāgahetu. 
Not absorbed or, in other words belonging to Kāmadhātu, it derives from primary elements which are an outflowing, and which are integral to the organism. 
Arisen from absorption, it derives from nondifferentiated primary elements, not integral to the organism, and increase. 
Avjñapti which arises from samādhi, is divided into two types, that is, absorption, and pure discipline. 
They are both arisen from undifferentiated primary elements. 
In the same way that the mind which engenders these renouncings is a unity, the primary elements upon which the renouncings are based constitute a unity. 
The vijñapti is an outflowing; being bodily, it is integral to the organism. 
Does bodily vjñapti, by arising, destroy or not destroy the preexistent bodily figure which is retribution ? 
That it destroys it, is impossible; for it is contrary to the principles of the Vaibhāṣikas that a rpa, retribution by nature, continues again, after having been interrupted. 
If on the contrary, bodily vsjñapt does bot destroy the previous figure, two figares,:the first of retribution, the second of out flowing,;would be found to coexist in one and the same spot. 
We must admit that bodily viñapti arises deriving from new primary elements, outflowing in its nature, and that it does not destroy.the previous figure. 
If this is the case, the part by means of which a bodily vrñapti is produced would be greater than has existed previously, being pene trated by new primary elements from whence this viñapti derives. 
If the part has not been penetrated by these new elements, one could not say that the vñap is cteated by the whole part. 
The avijñapti is never neutral. It is either good or bad. 
In fact, neutral volition is weak; it is not capable of engendering a powerful action as is the vrñapti, which continues reproducing itself after its initial cause has disappeared. 
Other actions, namely volition and the vñapti, can be good, bad, or ṉeutral. 
Bad action exists in Kāmadhātu. 
The restriction of the stanza refers only to bad actions; hence good actions and neutral actions are in all of the Three Dhātus. 
Avṣjñapti also exists in Rūpadhātu. Also that is to say: in Kāmadhātu as well as in Rāpadhātu; not in Ārūpyadhātu, for the primary elements are missing there. 
Only where body and voice exist, do we find is the discipline of the body and voice. 
There are no pure primary elements and yet there is a pure aviñapti.Pure avijñapti derives from the primary elements of the sphere wherein the person arises who produces the pure vijñaptin the same way, when a person arisen in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu enters into an ārūpya absoṟption, he produces an avijñapti of Ārūpyadhātu deriving from the primary elements of Kāmadhātu or Rūpadhātu. 
The case is not the same, for the pure avñapti ttranscends the spheres; it has nothing in common with the defilements of the sphere where the personwho has produced it is found; it is neither of the same type, nor of adifferent type through rapport with the primary elements of the sphere. 
On the contrary, an avājñapti of Ārūpyadhātu cannot derive from the primary elements, of a different type,of Kāmadhātuor Rūpadhātu. 
Further, turning away from all āēpasince any idea of rūpa is absent in itan ārūpya absoṟption is not capable of producing an avijñapti, which is rūpa. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: Morality exists in opposition to immorality. 
Vijñapti exists in the two spheres where there is vcāra, There is vñapti, bodily and a vocal action, only in the spheres of Kāmadhātu and the FirstDhyāna, where there is vicāra. 
Such vjñapt does not exist in Kāmadhātu, This means that vñaptś of the anivṛtāvyākrta class exists only in the world of Brahmā. 
It is reported that Mahābrahmā produced a false vocal action: in his assembly Mahābrahmā boasted falsely, in order to avoid the inquires of the venerable Aśvajit.2 ksek. 
But if vocal avjñapti is absent above the First Dhyāna, how can sound exist in the Second Dhyāna and above? 
It exists there, but it has for its cause the external primary elements: sound caused by the wind, etc. 
In fact the beings who are born in these Dhyānas do not call fortha good or defiled mmind of a lower sphere, by which mind they would be able to produce a good or defiled vijñapti.For the good mind of a lower sphere is of an inferior oṛder; and the defiled mind has been abandoned. 
But defend the first opinion. 
Why is the vjñapti, whatever it may be, absent above the world of Brahmā? 
Why is the vzjñapz of the defiledneutral class absent in Kāmadhātu? 
such a mind is absent in the Second Dhyāna and above. 
The nvṛtāvyākṛṣta mind gives rise to a vtjñapi of the same characteristics, since this mind belongs to the class to be abandoned through Mediation. 
kkk Is it solely by reason of the nature of the mind which gives rise to themgood or bad naturethat the ḍharmuas are good or bad? 
absolutely , in and of themselves , through association , and through their original cause. 
Deliverance is absolute good. Nirvāṇa, being the cessation of all suffering, is perfectly tranqnil andhappy; hence it is absolute good. Comparison: like the absence of sickness. 
The roots, respect and fear, are good in and of them selves. The three roots of good, respectand fear , independent of their associations and of their causes, are good in and of themselves. Comparison: like a salutary medicine. That which is associated is good through association. 
The dharmas, volitions, and mental states, which are associated with the roots of good, with respect, and with fear, are good by association. Associated with these principles, they are good; not associated with these principles, they are not good. Comparison: like a drink wherein one has mixed a salutary medicine. Actions, etc. are good by reason of their original cause. 
Having their origin in dharmas good in and of themselves or good through association, bodily action, vocal action, prāptis, nirodhasamāpatti, asajñisamāpatt , are good by reason of their original cause. Comparison: like the milk of a cow which has drunk a drink mixed with a salutary medicine. 
How can prāptis be good when they have their origin in a mind which is not good? 
Evil is the contrary. 
The contrary of good is as shall now be taught: 
Sasāraoṟ existencehas for its nature the process of all suffering: it is thus perfectly unhappy, and so absoḻute evil. 
The roots of evil,the absence of shameand imprudence are bad in themselves. The dharmas associated with these principles are bad in themselves. 
Having their origin in the roots, etc., and in the dharmas associated with these roots, etc., bodily action, vocal action, their characteristics and the prāptis of the baddharmuas, are bad by reason of their original cause. 
But, one would say,everything that is impure is integral to samsāra: hence can nothing which is impure be good or neutral? 
From the absolute point of view, this is true. 
But putting oneself in the point of view of retribution, the impure dharma which is not defined as to how it should be retributed is called undefined, or neutral , and the impure dharma which produces an agreeable retribu tion, is called good. What is absolutely neutral? 
The two unconditioned things , namely space and apraṭisakhyānirodha, are, without ambiguity, neutral. A difficulty. 
The Vaibhāṣikas teach that action, bodily or vocal, is good or bad by reason of its original cause, JThe same rule should apply to the primary elements which conṇstitute bodily or vocal action. 
The agent, entered into absorption, does not have any intention with regard to the avrñapti and so does not think, Let us create an gvjñapi We cannot admit that the avñapti produced by the absoṟption has its origin in a nonabsorbed mind which proceeds from the absorption, for this mind is of another class. 
Thus the avjjñapti produced by the absorption is not good; or rather, if the Vaibhāṣikas maintain that it is good, they should consider as good the divine eye and the divine ear which they regard as neutral. 
Īt has been said above that the mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing does not give rise to vsjñapr.Yet the Blessed One said, From bad views there proceeds bad resoḻution, bad speech, bad action, bad livelihood. 
This Sūtra does not contradict this theory. 
In fact That which gīves rise is of two types, which are known as hetusamutthāna aṅd tatkṣaṇasamutthāna. 
The mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing is exclusively agent. The five sense consciousnesses are exclusively mover. iii The mental consciousness susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation is both promoter and mover. The pure mind is neither promoter nor mover. ēkkīṭ Is the mover of the same as the agent? 
There is no rule on this subject: From a good agent, etc., a mover of three types. A good, bad, or neutral mover can come from a good agent. The same for a bad or neutral agent. With regard to the Muni, mover of the same type. 
This is why the Sūtra says, The Nāga is absorbed when he walks, when he stands still, when he dreams, and when he is seated. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: The Sūtra expresses itself in this manner because the mind of the Blessed One does not disperse itself towards objects without his wishing it. 
The mind that has arisen from retribution , is produced without effort, spontaneously, Is the vñapti good, bad, or neutral, 1. according to the character isties of the agent, or 2. according to the characteristic of its mover? 
To what does this question lead? 
.If you maintain your opinion with regard to this point, you must then admit, that all thoughts susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing are not agents: 
The vjñapt through which a person under takes thePṛātimokṣa discipline will not be good, if this person, while he is receiving the ordination, has a bad or neutral mind. 
The vñapti is of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation.It is not of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing, for example, the thought the soul exists, for, in this case, another agent arises between the promoter and the action , a thought susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation, turned inward, accompanied by vicāra and by vitarka, through which, for example, one preaches the existence of a soul. 
But if the action is not good, bad, or neutral by reason of the mover, the explanation that you have given of the Sūtra does not hold. 
Oṇe must say that the Sūtra considers a wrong view as an agent to which there follows, separating it from the action , another agent which is susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation. 
Avijñapii is threefold, discipline , undiscipline ,anddifferent from either discipline or undiscipline. 
savara, discipline, so called because it constrains the flix of immorality, because it destroys or arrests the flux of immorality; 2. 
asanvara, the opposite of discipline, undiscipline , and 3. 
naivasavaranāsavara, Prātimokḵṣa discipline, pure discipline, discipline arising from dhyāna. 
There are three types of discipline: the discipline called Prātimokṣa: this is the morality of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, the morality of beings of this world; 2. the discipline produced through dhyāna is morality of the sphere of Rūpadhātu; and 3. pure discipline, which arises from the Path, pure morality. 
thus, from the point of view of the names given to them, the discipline of the Pṛātimokṣa is of eight types. 
In substance however, the Pṛātimokṣa is of four types. 
They can coexist:by undertaking the following disciplines,one does not abandon the preceeding ones. 
Thus the fact that a Bhikṣu who renounces his quality of Bhikṣu remains in possession of the discipline of Upāsaka and Śrāmaṇera is explained. 
By undertaking the renouncing of the five things to avoid, of the eight, the ten, of all the things to avoid, one obtains the quality of Upāsaka, Upavāsastha, Śrāmaṇera, and Bhikṣu. 
By undertaking the renouncing of five items: 
By undertaking the renouncing of eight items: 
By undertaking the renouncing of these same items and, further, goldand silver, which make ten,one places himself in the discipline of a Śrāmaṇera. 
These make ten items, for one counts scents, garlands, and unguentsseparately from dances, songs, and music. 
By undertaking the renouncing of all the actions of the body and the voice which should be avoided, one is a Bhikṣu. 
kṣk The Pṛātimokṣa discipline is Morality, good conduct, action and discipline. 
It is morality , because it redresses that which is unjust, for transgressors conduct themselves in an unjust manner with regard to beings. 
Etymologically, because it cools , as it says in the stanza, Happy is the undertaking of morality, because morality does not burn. 
Good conduct, because it is praised by the wise. 
Action , because it is action by naṭure. 
Does not the Sūtra say that evpñapti is not doing ? 
Without doubt, the aviñapti makes the disciple, endowed with shame, to abstain from transgression; it is thus not doing. 
But it is action, according to the etymology riyata iti kriya. 
According to others,avifñapti is action because it is thecause and the effect of an action. 
4.Discipline ,because itdisciplines or constrains the body and the voice. 
They are courses of action, that is courses of action properly so called. 
The Āryans,the Śaikṣas and Aśaikṣas,possess pure discipline. 
Arising in the ānantaryamārgas, in anāgamya, they are called abandoning,. 
In the nine nantaryamārgas of anāgamya these two disciplines,the discipline of dḥyāna and pure discipline, are abandoning disciplines , for through them one abandons immorality and the defilements which produce them. 
kkk The Blessed One said, Good is discipline of the body, discipline of the voice, discipline of the mind, discipline in all things; and again, He lives disciplined through the discipline of the organ of sight. 
What is the nature of these two disciplines, discipline of the mind, and disciplipe of the organs? 
In order that the reader should not come to believe that the first discipline is consciousness and the second mindfulness , the author says that each of them is two things. 
kḥrk Let us examine who possesses vñapts and avi ñapt and to what period these belong in each case. 
He who is in Prātimokṣa always possesses avsjñapti of the present moment, as long as the does not reject the gvijñapti. 
As we have said previously the person who dwells in thePrātimokṣa discipline ,always possesses presentavjñapti as long as he does not reject the avñapti which coṉstitutes this discipline. 
After the first moment, he also possesses avijñapti. 
After the first moment, which is designated by the expression Prṛātimokṣa , he also possesses earlier, past avjñapi: this of course, as long as he does not reject the discipline. As he who dwells in the Prātimokṣa discipline, So too is he who dwells in undiscipline. He who dwells in undiscipline , always possesses avijñapti of the present moment as long as he does not reject it; He who possesses discipline aṟisen from dhyāna always possesses past and future avsjñapti. 
He who possesses the discipline arisen from dhyāna always possesses avsjñapti of the past, and vijñapti of the future as long as he does not lose i1,. From the first moment when he acquires the discipline of dhḥyāna, he takes possession of the discipline of former dhyānas, either of this existence, or of a previous existence, that he had lost. 
he possesses his past and future vjñapti; but with the difference that, when in the first moment of the Way he takes possession of pure avijñapti fr the first time, he cannot, evidently, possess pure avsjñapti of the past. 
The person who is in a state of absorption, the person who is placed in the Way, possesses aviñapti of the present moment. The person who is absorbed , the person who is cultivating the Way , possesses, at present, the vijñaptiwhich is proper to him, arisen from dhyāna,and pure. 
But when he leaves the absorption, he does not kkk As for the intermediary The intermediary, at the first moment, possesses,. 
medially, gvjñapti, when the avijñapti is produced. 
Action , or aviñapti created by an act of morality , or avijñapūi is cteated by some other good or bad acts, the worship of a Śtūpa, hitting and woundinghe possesses this aviñapti of the present, at the moment when it arises. 
Afterwards, of the present and the past. 
krḥṣḥ Can a disciplined petson possess bad avijñaptiz Can an un disciplined person possess good avijñp? 
As long as he is endowed with faith or with very active defilements, the undisciplined person possesses good zvsjñapti, and the disciplined person possesses bad gvñapti. 
As long as there continues, in anundisciplined person, the strength of faith by which, accomplishing actions such as the worship ofa Stūpa, he has created goodavsjñapti; as longas there continues, ina disciplined persoṉ, the power of the defilements by which, accomplishing actions such as killng,hitting,binding,he has created badavjñapti, goodo bad avijñapii coṇtinues. 
At the moment of the action in question, the agent possesses avij ñapri of the present; then he possesses aviiñapti of the present and of the past. 
AIl those who accomplish a bodily or vocal action whether they aredisciplined, undisciplined, or intermediaries, so liong as they are accomplishing this action, possess it in the present. 
From the secondmmoment onward, that is,after the first moment. One cannot possess future viñapti. No one possesses future vijñapti, because such vijñapti does not now accompany the mind. One does not possess past vjñapti of the nivṛta and anivṛśa classes. 
One does not possess these actions, once they are past, because the possession of a weak dharma, being weak itself, is not prolonged. 
Why is this dharma, a neutral action, weak? 
By reason of the weakness of the mind which gives rise to it. 
But then the possession of this mind too will not be prolonged. 
The vijñapti, in effect, is stupid, for it does not know an object; furthermore it is dependent, for it depends upon the mind. 
Thus the vijñapti producedby a neutral mind is weaker than this mind itself; the possession of the vjñapti is not prolongued, whereas the possession of the mind is prolongued. 
kkk We have spoken of an undisciplined person, one who is in undiscipline. What is undiscipline ? Undiscipline, bad conduct, immorality, action, course of action. 1.It is undiscipline,because there is no constraining of the body and voice. 
It is immorality, because it opposes morality. It is an action, as it is created by the body and the voice. 
It is a course of action, as it is included in the principal action. 
He who is in neitherdisciplinenornondiscipline and who, with a weak volition, does good or bad action , possesses solely this act ,anddoes not possess any avñapti. 
Allthe more reason that there is no possession of aviñapti by an agent when his action is neutral. 
The Āryan possesses a single vijñapi when he has not produced, or has abandoned, the vijñapti. 
The discipline that arises from dhyāna is acquired by one thought of the sphere of the dhyāna. 
It is through one thought of the sphere of the dyāna, that īs,of the mauladhyāna and the sāmamtakas , and with an impure mind, that is, with a mind not forming part of the Way, that the discipline of dḥyāna is acquired; this is a discipline concomitant with this type of mind. 
We will explain below that the Āryan mind exists in six spheres of dhyāna,namely the Four Dhyānas, thedhyānāntaras and the anāgamya. 
Paravijñapana is informmative action to or from another: the candidate makes known something to another, avnd another makes something known to.him. 
Another is the Saṅgha, through the acquisition of the disciplines of Bhīkṣu, Bhīkṣuṇī, or Śikṣamāṇā; or a person , the acquisition of the five other prāimokś 
disciplines. disciplines. According to Viṇaya scholars of the Vaibhāṣika School, there are six types of ordination. In order to include them all within his definition, the author says, . from the information of another e? cetera. 
Ordination by oneself, in the case of the Buddha and.the Pratyekabuddhas. 
Through entry into thePath , in the case of the Five, that is to say of Ājñatakauṇḍinya and his companions. Through the summons, Come, Oh Bhikṣu!, in the case of Ājñata. 
kkk When one undertakes the Prātimokṣa dsciplne, for how long a tiṃe does one undertakes it? 
One undertakes the discipline for a lifetime or for a day and a night. 
wThe first seven categories of the Prātimokṣa discipline are undertaken for a lifetime; the fasting discipline is undertaken for a day and a night. 
Such is the rule. 
Because there are two limits of time, the period of a lifetime, and the period of a day and a night. 
kksk What is the dharma that we term time ? 
When it is light in the four continents,it isdaytime; when it is dark it is night. 
But if a petson assames the duties of a faster for more than a day and a night,for five days, or for ten days,.what obstacle would this be to his producing in himself many disciplines of the fast? 
It needs be that there wouldbe an obstacle since the Blessed One, in a Sīūtra, says that one undertakes the fast for a day and a night. Why did the Blessed One express himself in this manner: did he think that the discipline of fasting could not be produced for a longer duration? 
He thought that persons in whom the senses are difficalt to subdue would be well capableof undertaking the fast for a day and a night.But, in truth, nothing is wrong with producing the discipline of the fast for more than one day. 
As the Blessed One does not speak of the fast as lasting any longer, the Vaibhāṣikas do not admit this manner of viewing the matter. esk What is the duration of undiscipline. 
There is undiscipline for a day and a night. 
Undiscipline never last longer than a day and a night, like the discipline of the fast,for it is produced by the acceptance of transgression for ones entire life. 
How is this? 
For, says the School, one does not undertake it thus. 
No one undertakes undiscipline in the manner in which one undertakes the fast, by saying, I wish to remain a day and a night in undiscipline. Rather, he carries out, in effect, shameful actions. Objection: 
No one undertakes undiscipline by saying, I wish to remain for my life undisciplined Thus one coes not undertake undiscipline for an entire lifetime. 
One acquires undiscipline by acting with the intention of always acting badly; one does not acquire undiscipline by the intention of acting badly for a time. 
If someone desires undiscipline, he could without doubt give himself over to undiscipline for this period of time. 
kksk Āccording to the Sautrāntikas, undiscipline does not exist in and of itself apart from volition. 
Undiscipline is the intention tō commit evil, that is, a certain volition with the traces which allow this volition. And, as long as this volition with its traces has not.been destroyed by a contrary volition, the person, even when he has a good thought, remains filed with undiscipline, a person undisciplined. 
kk How should one undertake the discipline ofa day anda night, or the discipline of the fast? 
One should undertake the fast in a humble attitude, speaking after, with ornaments removed, until the morrow, complete, the morning, from another. 
1.In a humble attitude,squatting or kneeling; with the hands joined in kapotaka or in the position of eñal;; except in the case of sickness. 
Without a respectful attitude, discipline is not produced. 
2.The candidate does not speak before the ordainer or the giver, the person who gives the fast; nor at the same time. 
In this way, it is from another that oneundertakes the fast; otherwise, there would be neither receiving nor a thing received. 
The candidate does not wear any ornaments; he wears his normal dress, because he does not draw forth vanity from it. 
One undertakes it until the morrow, until the rising of the sun. The morrow, at the rising of the sun, since this is a discipline lasting a day and a night. 
When these rules are not observed, one has nevertheless done a good action ,but one does not obtain the discipline of the fast. 
When the rules are observed, the fast is even more useful for the person who commits transgressions by day and by night. 
The fast is termed pavāsa, because, embracing a way of life conforming to that of the Arhats, he places himself near the Arhats. 
Accoṟding to another opinion, it isbecause he places himself near the lifelong discipline. 
It has for its end procuring an increase of the roots of good of persons who have only small roots of good. 
As it procures an increase of good, the Blessed One said, It is called poṣadha. 
ksks Why is the discipline of the fast undertaken with eight parts? 
Part of morality , part of vigilence , parts of ascetic vows , have respectively four, one, three parts. 
Four parts:the renouncing of killing, stealing, adultery and lyingconstitute the parts of morality by which what is transgression by nature is abandoned. 
One part, the renounxing of intoxicating drinks, constitutes the rule of vigilence by which nonvigilence isarrested, For even if a person who has undertaken morality drinks intoxicating liquor, he will be noo vigilent. 
Three parts,:the renouncing of high beds, music,etc.,and meals at forbidden times,constitute the rule of asceticism, for they are favorable and conform to disgust. 
In order to avoid weakness of mindfulness and arrogance. When one drinks intoxicating liquor,one loses ones mindfulness of what one shouldand should not do. 
When one uses high and wide beds, when one attends dances, singing and music, the mind becomes arrogant. 
When one observes the rule of eating at the proper times, and when one avoids eating outside of this time, one retains a mindfulness of the obligations of the fast, and disgust is produced. 
Accotding to certain masters, the fast or pavāsa consists of the fast proper, and the renouncing of food at forbidden times; whereas the other renouncings are the rules or parts of the fast.The abstention fromfood is not a part; thus, with an end to the obtaining the number of eight parts, one should distinguish two parts in the seventh rule; first, the renouncing of dancing, singing, and music; and the second, the renouncing of perfumes, garlands, and unguents. 
This interpretation is not in accord with the Sūtra, ; for, according to the Sūtra, immediately after the renouncing of meals at forbidden times, the faster should say, By these eight rules,I imitate the rule,I conform myself to the rule of the Āryams, the Arhats.1ī ii. 
Then what would the fast be, distinct from its rules, and yet embracing eight parts? 
Accoṟding to theSautrāṇtikas, it is the very collection of parts which one says possesses parts; it is to this very collection that one attributes parts. 
The expression, a fast having eight parts should be understood in the same way as the expressions, a part of a carriage, a fouṟpart army , or a powder made up of five parts. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the abstaining from food at forbidden times is at one and the same time the fast and a part of the fast.In the same way that Right Views are at one and the same time the Pathand a part of the Path ; in the same way that Investigation into the Dharmas is at one and the same time Bodhi and.a part of Bodhi ; and in the same way way that Samādhi is at one and the same time dhyāna and a part of dhyāna. 
But we would say that it is impossible for Right Views, Investigation into the Dharmas, and Samādhi to be parts of themselves. 
Would you say that earlier Right Views, etc., are parts of later Right Views, etc.? This would be to admit that the first moment of the Path does not have eight parts. This would be to admit that the last moment of the parts of Bodhi is itself not a part. 
kkk Is the possession of the discipline of the fast kept only by Upāsakas? 
Others can possess the fast, but not without taking the Refuges. 
When a person who is not a Upāsaka, takes, in the same day and night, the Three Refuges before he undertakes the rules of the fast, then the discipline of the fast is produced within him. 
The Mahānāmasūtrasays,Oh Mahāṇāma, the layman with white clothes, male and possessing the male organ, who, after having taken refuge in the Buddha, in the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, pronounces these words, Consider me as an Upāsaka: only through this does he become an Upāsaka. 
Does this mean that one becomes an Upāsaka by only taking the Three Refuges? 
The Aparāntakas answer yes. 
The Kaśmīreans affirm that one cannot be an Upāsaka when one does not possess the Upāsaka discipline. 
But does this not contradict the Sūtra? 
Because The discipline is produced through the fact that he accepts the qualities of an Upāsaka. 
The discipline of the Upāsaka is produced in him by the mere acceptance of the quality of the Upāsaka, when he says, Consider me, from today onwards,for the rest of my life,as a prāṇāpeta Upāsaka. 
One should understand, prāṇātpātāpeta through ellipis, as free from killing, having renounced killing. 
Yet, in order that he understands the points of the rule , One explains them to him, as is also the case for a Bhikṣu. 
The same holds for the Śrāmaṇpera. 
Thus one is not an Upāsaka without possessing the discipline of the Upāsaka.If allUpāsakas possess the discipline of the Upāsaka, how can an Upāsaka be an ekadefakāriṇ, etc.? 
If all Upāsakas place themselves within the discipline of the Upāsaka, why did the Blessed One describe four types of Upāsakas, the Upāsaka of one rule , of two rules , of three or four rules 0adbhhyaskārīn, and of five rules ? 
These terms, say the School, refer to the fact of observing the ruḹes. 
The Upāsaka who in fact observes one of the rules is said to practice this rule. 
Your doctrine contradicts the Sūtra. 
In what way does it contradict the Sūtra? 
You hold that you are authorized by another Sūtra, which has, From today, for the rest of my life,, risking my life , having taken refuge, believing perfectly.Now this text refers to persons who have seen the Truths, who have acquired the faith of intelligence , and who, as a consequence, adhere to the Good Law even at the price of their lives: 
How can we know the extent, the number of the rules of the disciplines of the Upāsaka,theŚrāmaṇera,or theBhikṣu? 
All the disciplines are weak, etc., according to the mind. 
The weakness, the mediocrity, and the force of the eight rules depend on the weakness, on the mediocrity, or on the force of the mind through which one has undertaken them, But if such is the case, the Pṛātimokṣa discipline of an Arhat could be weak, and that of a Prṛthagjana could be strong. 
ṉ Is one an Upāsaka if one solely undertakes the discipline without.undertaking the Refuges? 
No; except in the case of ignorance by the person who gives and by the person who receives. 
kkṣk When a person takes refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, what does he take refuge in? 
He who takes the Refuges takes refuge in the afukṣa dharmas which form the Buddha, in the two types of dharmas which form the Saṅgha, and in Nirvāṇa. 
He who takes Refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the dharmasr of the Arhat which form a Buddha, the ḍharṇeas which are the causes of the designation Buddha, that is, the dharmas by reason of which, as principle cause, a certain person is called a Buddha; or rather the dharmas by the acquisition of which a certain person,understanding all things, is called a Buddha. 
As for the material body of the Buddha, that is not subject to modification through the acquistion of the quality of Buddha. 
Does one take refuge in all the Buddhas or in one Buddha? 
According to the nature of things, and in the absence of an explicit declaration, in all the Buddhas. For the Buddhas have always followed the same path, a worldly path and a transworldly path.1 ii. 
He who takes Refuge in the Saṅgha takes refuge in both the Śaikṣa and the aśaikṣa ḍharmas, of the nonAṟhat and of the Arhat, which form the Saṅgha, that is,the dharmuas through the acquisition of which the Eight Saints become a Saṅgha; becoming unanimous they cannot be divided with regard to that which concerns the Path. 
Does one take refuge in all the Saṅghas or in one Saṅgha? 
for the Pathfollowed by the Saints is always the same. 
Without doubt, the Buddha said to the two merchants, Also take refuge in the Saṅgha which shall exist in the futre, but the Master expressed himself in this manner in order to exhault the qualities of the Jewel of the Saṅgha which would soon be visible to the merchants. 
He who takes Refuge in the Dharma takes refuge in Nirvāṇa, that is to say, inpratisakhyānirodha. 
He takes refuge inall Nirvāṇa, for Nirvāṇa has for its unique characteristic the cessation of the defilements and suffering of oneself and others. Discussion. 
If the Buddha is none other than the afxikṣa dharmas, the dharmas pertaining to an Arhat, how could the fact of wounding the Buddha with a bad thought constitute a mortal transgression ? 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: When one wounds the materialelements which are the supportof these dbarmas, these dharmas themselves suffer injury. 
But the Śāstra does not say that the Buddha is solely ikṣadharmas.It says that the Buddbha is thedharmas that form a Buddha, that is to say, either the worldly or transworldly dharmas which are the object of the designation Buddha, are the Buddha. 
Hence the objection taken from wounding the Buddha is without value. 
If it were otherwise, if the Buddha was only asukṣadharmas, and if the Sañgha were only fxikṣaand aśaikṣadharmas,a person whose mind is presently worldly would not be able to be either a Buddha or a Saṅgha. 
And by virtue of these same principles, one would have to say that a Bhikṣu is only morality, the discipline of a Bhikṣu. 
In the same way that one who honors Bhikṣus, honors the morality which makes up the Bhikṣus. 
According to another opinion, one who takes refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the eighteen āveṇikadharmas of the Buddha. śkkṣk What is the nature of the undertakings of the Refuges? 
They are vocal vñaptś. 
What is the meaning of Refuge ? 
The Three Refuges are so named because, by going to them for refuge one obtains definitive deliverance from all suffering. 
The Blessed One said in fact, Tormented by fear, persons most frequently take refuge in mountains, in forests, in woods, and in sacred trees. 
This is nota good refuge, the supreme refuge; it is not by taking refuge in these that one is delivered from all suffering. 
But one who takes Refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, when one sees through wisdom the Four Noble Truths,Suffering, the Arising of Suffering, the Extinction of Suffering, and the Holy Eightfold Path which leads to Nirvāṇa,this is the good refuge, this is the supreme refuge; by taking refuge in this, one is delivered from all suffering. 
This is why the undertaking of the Refuges is the enterance to the undertaking of all the rules of discipline. 
kedk The other rules of discipline contain the renouncing of all sexual activity ; but the discipline of the Upāsaka only contains the renouncing of sexualmisconduct. 
Sexual misconduct, because it is much censured, because one easily abstains from it, because the Āryans have obtained abstention from it. 
Sexual misconduct is much censured in the world because it is the coṟṟuption of anothers wife, and because it leads to retribution in a painful realm of rebirth. 
Ī They have acquired it as they have accepted the discipline; they have not accepted it with regard to some persons. 
They have acquired it as they have undertaken the discipline. 
They undertake it by saying, I renounce sexual misconduct, that is, I renounce all sexual activity with all prohibited females; they do not undertake it by saying, I shall refrain from all sexual activity with such persons. 
Consequently, they do not violate the discipline by getting married. 
kṣṅk Among the transgression of speech, why does the renouncing of lying constituteone of the rulesof the Upāsaka,whereas the renouncing of other transgressions of speech are omitted? 
because lying is much censured in the world, because householders abstain from it easily,and because the Āryans are not capable of lying; and also for a fourth reason: 
Because, having violated any other rule he would lie. 
, he would lie when he violates any other rule, saying, Īi have not done it. 
Consequently the Upāsaka should renonnce lying, thinking, I shall coṉfess what I transgress. 
kḥ Why are not the transgressions of disobedience included in the discipline of the Upāsaka? 
Oṉe renounces strong liquor, which is a transgression of disobedience, Why should the Upāsaka renounce a single transgression of disobedience and not others? 
In order that the other rules may be kept. 
One who drinks strong liquor will not keep the other rules. 
ī.The Ābhidhārmikas maintain that strong liquor does nothave the characteristic of being a transgression by its nature. 
now it happens that, as a remedy, one can drink strong liquor in a quantity where it is not inebṛiating. 
But the mind of one who drinks knowing that such a quantity is inebriating is defiled; the mind is not defiled when one drinks knowning that such a qnantity is not inebriating. 
though solely a transgression of disobedience, it is forbidden to the ill, and this witha view to preventing theupleasant consequence of strong liquor, because its inebriating quantity is undetermined. 
Ścripture considers strong liquor as a bodily misdeed, because strong liquor is a cause of nonvigilence. 
esksk Do the three discipline have the same object? 
One acquires the discipline of Kāmadhātu relative to all actiops, relative to the two types of beings and to the two types of actions, relative to things of the present. 
There are thus some skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus relative to which one acquires the Pṛātimokṣa discipline and not the two others. 
ikōk Does one acquirediscipline or undiscipline with regard to allbeings, relative to all of their parts, and by reason of all causes? 
One acquires discipline with regard to all beings; one must distinguish regarding the parts and the causes. 
One acquires discipline with regaxrd to all beings, not with regard to only some of them. The discipline of the Bhikṣu is acquired relative to all parts: 
The other disciplines are acquired relḹative to four parts: 
abstention from killing, from stealing, from forbidden sexuality, from lying, for, by parts of the discipline, one should understand abstention from the courses of action. 
sttong mind, mediocre mind, weak mind. 
The discipline is acquired by reason of one of these three minds. 
There is a person abiding in discipline,disciplined with regard to all beings, but notdisciplined relative to all the parts, nor disciplined by reason of all causes: 
There is a person abiding in the disipline,disciplined with regard to allbeings and relative to all the parts, but not disciplined by reason of all causes: he who has acquired the discipline of the Bhīkṣu through a sttong, mediocre, or weak mind. 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, relative to all the parts, by reason of all the causes: he who has acqnired each of the three disciplines of the Upāsaka, the Śrāmaṇera and the Bhikṣu through minds which are, respectively,weak, mediocre, and strong. 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, disciplined by reason of all the causes, but not disciplined relative to all the parts: he who has acquired each of the three disciplines of the Upāsaka, the Upavāsastha and the Śrāmapera through minds which are, respectively, weak, mediocre, and strong. 
No one abides indiscipline who is not disciplined with regard to all beings: he acquires the discipline through a good mind having for its object all beings. The person who makes a restriction is not completely rid of the intention of transgression. 
with regard to beings, I renounce transgressions with regard to certain beings; 2. 
with regard to parts of the discipline, T renounce certain actions; 3. 
with regard to place, I renounce committing transgressions in a certain place; 4. 
with regard to time, I renounce transgressions for a month; 5. 
with regard to circumstances, I renounce transgressions except in the case of a quarreL He who undertakes such undertakings does not acqnire thediscipline; rather, he does a good action similar to the acquisition of the discipline. 
How can one acquire the discipline with regard to all beings? 
Because, we believe, one acquires the discipline through the intention of pot killing any being. 
The Vatbhāṣikas givea different explanation.If the discipline was acquired only with regard to beings who are within range, the discipline would be liable to augmentation and to diminution: 
For the discipline that oneundertakes with regard to grass neither increases nor diminishes when new grass arises, nor when old grass dries up. The Vaibhāṣikas deny the value of this comparison. 
Living beings, on the contrary, continue to exist,sometimes as humaṉs, and sometimes as gods. 
But when living beings enter into Nirvāṇa, they no longer exist, exactly like grass, so the discipline acquired with regard to living beings is subject to diminution. 
Thus the explanation of the Vaibhāṣikas is invalid. 
If one objects,In the case where the Prātimokṣa discipline wouldbe acquired with regard to all beings, then the discipline of later Buddhas would be reduced in comparason with that of former Buddhas, for it would not be relative to beings who have alteady entered into Nirvāṇa, to former Buddhas and their disciples, we would reply: 
all the Buddhas disciplineall beings; and if former Buddhas were to exist again, later Buddhas would be disciplined by them. 
Onṇe acquires undiscipline with rgard to all beings and relative to all courses of action. No one is undisciplined with an incomplete undiscipline. 
One is not undisciplined by reason of all causes, un discipline being undertaken by aweak,mediocre,or strong mind.Let us suppose that an undisciplined person has undertaken his undiscipline with a weak mind and commits a murder with a strong rmind: 
his undiscipline remains weak, but he is adorned with a strong vijfñapti, with a strong murder. 
The butchers of sheep, birdcatchers, the butchers of pigs, fisher maṉ, hunters, bandits, exceutioners, jailers, elephant hunters, the slaughterers of dogs, and the vāgurikas are all undisciplined. 
It also holds that kings, office holders, judges, etc., are undisciplined. 
A butcher of sheep is the person whose profession is to kill sheep.The same etymology holds for the names of the other professions. 
ii.We understand that discipline, undertaken with the intention of universal benevolence, would be acquired with regard to all beings. But the butchers of sheep do not have the intention of maltreating their parents, their children, or their servants; they would not want to kill them, even at the price of their lifes. How, , can one say that they are undisciplined with regard to all beings? 
Because they have the intention of killing with regard to their parents who have become sheep through trans migration. 
But they do not kill their parents who have become sheep knowing that they are their parents! 
Furthermore, if their parents obtain the quality of an Āryan, these parents will not be reborn as sheep or as animals: 
hence the butcher is not undisciplined with regard to them. 
if the butcher is undisciplined with regard to his present parents because he willkill his parents who have become sheep, one would say as well that he is not undisciplined with regard to some other sheep since he is not disposed to kill the sheep which are reborn as humans, as his own children. 
He who has the intention to kill his parents who have become sheep is certainly undisciplined with regard to them. 
But, he who does not have the intention of killing the sheep who bave become his children is certainly not undisciplined in their regard. 
how can the butcher who does not steal, who is not an adulterer, and who is mute, be undisciplined relative to all these transgressions? 
Because his intention is perverted. 
A mute can express himself through gestures. 
But what is there to say of a man who has accepted two or three parts of morality? 
For the Vaibhāṣikas, nondiscipline is never incomplete, that is, relative only to certain parts; nor is it partial, that is, including restrictions in the practice of a certain transgression. 
For the Sautrāṇtikas,discipline apd undiscipline with the exception of the Prātimokṣa discipline can be incomplete and partial. 
one binds oneself to a part of immorality, or to a certain part of morality. 
kk How does one acquire undiscipline? 
How does one acquire the avijñaptis which are neither discipline, bor undiscipline? 
One acquires undiscipline through action or through accepting it.! 
Persons born in a family of undisciplined petsons acquire un discipline when they accomplish the actions preparatory to kiling. 
Persons born in other families acquire undiscipline when they adopt such a style of life, thinking We too shall live in this manner. 
2.One produces viñapti by undertaking vows, for example,I shall not eat unless I have paid homage to the Buddha, I shall give alms food on the fast day, for a fortnight, for a month, for a year, etc. 
Action undertaken seriously, witha burning faith, with a burning passion , produces evṝñap. 
kḵsk How does one lose discipline? 
The Prātimokṣa discipline is lost through abjuration, through death, through hermaphroditism, through the cutting off of the roots, and by the night coming to an end. 
through abjuration, intentionally renouncing the rule in the presence of a person capable of understanding it; 2. 
The discipline of fast is iost through these four causes and, further, when night come to an end. Abjuration constitutes a vñapt in contradiction to the under taking; death and hermaphroditism constitute the abandoning and the overturning of the personality who undertook the Prātimokṣa ; the catting off of the roots is the cutting off of the foundation of the disciplipe itself. Finally the discipline of the fast has been created, or projected, for a day and a night; it comes to its end when the night is finished. Some say through a patanīya. 
According to the Sautrāntikas, the discipline of the Bhikṣu and the novice is also lost through any one of the four patanyas, or transgressions involving a falling away. 
Through the disappearance of the Good Law, say some other masters. According to theDharmaguptakas, the Prātimokṣa discipline is lost when the Good Law disappears: there are no longer any rules, any boundaries, nor any ecclesiastic actions. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr say: A monk guilty of a grave transgression, that is,of apaanīya,does not lose hisBhikṣu discipline.It is notadmissible that one loses the entire discipline by destroying only a part of the discipline. 
He who comrnits a transgression other than a patanya is not immoral. 
He who commits a paanya is at one and the ṣame time moral and immoral: as a person who has both riches and debts; but when this transgressor has confessed his transgression, he is no longer immoral,but solely moral: as a person who has paid his debts. 
But the Blessed One has said, He is not a Bhikṣu, he is not a monk; he no longer belongs to the sons of Śākya; he falls from the quality of Bhikṣu; his quality of monkhood is cut off, falen, eṟased, tumbled down, annihilated. 
In this text Bhikṣu signifies a true Bhīkṣu: 
An inadmissable explanation: 
furthermore, you lead defiled persons to the practice of immorality. 
How can you prove that this quotation is of clear sense and should be taken liteṛally? 
a sañābhūṣu, a Bhīkṣu in name only, is a person who is called Bhikṣu without his having been ordained; a pratñābhikṣu, a selfstyled Bhikṣu, is one who is immoral, unchaste, etc;; a person called Bhikṣu because he begs, is a begger only; and the person who is called i Bhikṣu because he has cat off the defilements, that is to say, the Arhat. 
, this refeṛs to a fifth Bhikṣu, namely a person who has been properly ordained but who, through patanya, loses this quality and this discipline; it is certainly not a question of his being a true Bhikṣu,an Arhat, for one capable of a patanāya is not a ttrue Bhikṣu,an Arhat,but is susceptible of losing the quality of being a true Bhikṣu. 
The aṟgument that one does not lose the entire discipline through the losing of one part of it,is refuted by theMaster himself who in fact compares a transgressor monk to a palm tree whose head is cut off, henceforth incapable of becoming green, of growing,of developing, or of growing larger: 
this means that, when one part of the discipline, the part which is the root of the discipline, is cut off, the rest of the discipline is incapable of growing. 
The patanhya or the maui āpatti is in contradiction to the state required of being a Bhikṣu; he embraces an extreme absence of fear of transgression ; he breaks off the root of discipline: 
all his discipline is lost. 
The Master excludes persons guilty of paanāya from all com merce with the Bhikṣus, he prohibits them from participating with them for even one mouthful of food, he forbids them from even setting one foot into the monastery. 
The good of the sphere of dhyāna is lost through a change of state and through falling. 
Pure good is lost through the obtaining of a resuit, through perfection of the faculties, or through falling away. 
when he perfects his faculties , he abandons the path of weak faculties; and 3. 
when he falls, he abandons the result or the path of a superior result. 
Undiscipline is lost through the acquisition of discipline, through death, or through hermaphroditism. 
The discipline of dhyāna cuts off undiscipline, being a threefold change hostile to undisciplipe. 
Death and hermaphroditism are, respectively, the abandoning and the overturning of the person through which undiscipline had been undertaken. 
An undisciplined person who rejects the tools of his work,dagger and net, even with the intention of no longer committing murder, does not by this cut off his undiscipline if he does notundertake the discipline. 
Iiness does not improve without medicine, even though one may avoid the causes of illness. 
Does an undisciplined person who undertakes the discipline of the fast remain undisciplined when he departs from the fast, or rather, does he find himself in the intermediary state, neitherdisciplinednor undisciplined? 
For some, he is found to be undisciplined, for the petson who undertakes the fast does not have the intention of definitively renouncing transgressions: a mass of iron turṇed red retuṟns to its original state. 
For others, once an undisciplined person has departed from the fast, he is no longer undisciplined, for the acquisition of indiscipline supposes a physical or vocal action. 
kii How does one lose avjñap which is neither discipline nor undiscipline ? 
when the intense force of faith, or the defilements which have projected the avjñapti, come to an end. 
Example: 
the caiya, the garden, the monastery, the bed, the seat, which one was in engaged in venerating or in giving; the instrument, the net, etc.; when life is cut off; and when one begins to cut off the roots of good. 
Good nonmaterial action, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, is lost through the cutting off of the roots, and througharisingina superior sphere.ē We have explainedhow material action, namely bodily action, vocal action, and the avjñapati, is cat off. 
Good nonmaterial action of Kāmadhātu is lost thorough the cutting off of the roots of good, and through birth in Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
That which is defiled and nonmaterial is lost through the arising of its opposite. 
All that which is defiled, of whatever sphere, is lost through the arising of the Path which opposes this defilement. 
This Path causes the abandonment of a certain category of wpakleśa and, with it, all its attendant prāptis, etc. 
xc What beings are susceptible to discipline and to undiscipline? 
Humanswith the exception of the two categories of eunuchs, hermaphrodites, and the Kurusare susceptible of undiscipline; the same for the discipline which pertains also to the gods. 
Undiscipline exists only among humans. 
One must furthermore except ṣaṇḍhas and paṇḍakas, hermaphrodites and beings in Uttarakuru. 
Discipline exists among humans, with the abovementioned exception, and among the gods: thus, it exists in two realmns of rebirth. 
this results from the Sūtra, ŚOh Mahānāma, white clothed laymen, male and possessing the male oṟrgan. 
, and from the Vimaya, One must expel such a person. 
Why is this? 
Because they possess, to an extreme degree, the defilements of the two sexes; because they are incapable of the reflection necessary to combat these defilements; and because the vigor of respect and fear is absent in them. 
Why are they not susceptible to undiscipline? 
Because the intention of committing transgressions is not strong amoṅng them; becauseundiscipline is opposed to discipline; and only one who is susceptible to discipline is susceptible to undiscipline. 
The Uttarakurus are lacking the undertaking of any discipline, from whence there is an absence of the Prātimokṣa discipline; and they lack absorption, from whence there is an absence of the other two disciplines. 
In the painful realms of rebirth there is no vigor of respect and fear: 
now a vigorous respect and fear are necessary for discipline; in order for there to be indiscipline, it is necessary to destroy respect and fear. 
Neither discipline nor undiscipline can arise in the bodies, or in the persons, of eunuchs, hermaphordites, and beings in the realms of painful rebirth, for these bodies are similar to soil saturated with salt wherein there can neither grow wheat, nor bad herbs. 
Objection: The Sūtra says, OhBhikṣu, there isa Nāga boṟṉ froman egg which, each eighth day of the fortnight, leaves its dwelling, and comes to undertake the eightfold fast.. 
This refers, for the Nāgas, not to discipline, but to good actions. 
Discipline exists thus solely among humans and among the gods. The three disciplines exist among humans. These three are the Prātimokṣa discipline, discipline arisen from dhyāna, and pure discipline. 
So too the pure discipline, with the exception of the gods of the intermediate dhyāna and the Asajñisattvas; and also in Ārūpyadhātu. 
It exists in Rūpadhātu with the exception of the dhyānāntarikas of beings arisen in intermediate dhyāna, and the Asajñisattvas; and in Ārūpyadhātu. 
The gods of Ārūpyadhātu never in fact manifest this discipline, since discipline is matter, rpa; but they can possess it.19 Following the exemination of action, the author now defines the diverse categories of action which are taught in different Sūtras. 
keṭk There are three actions, g0od, bad, and neutral. 
Good action is salutary, bad action is pernicious, and action differing from good and bad isdifferent from the salutary and the pernicious. 
Such is the definition of good action, etc. Good action is salutary, because it is of agreeable retributionandas a consequence it protects one from suffering for a time ; oṟ rather, because it brings about the attainment of Nirvāṇa and, as a consequence,definitively protects one from suffering. 
this is action of disagreeable retribution. 
Action concerning which the BlessedOne does not say whether it is good or bad, that is, morally neutral action, is neither salutary nor pernicious. 
There are three actions: meritorious action, demeritorious action, and nonagitated action. 
Meritorious action is a good action in Kāmadhātu; non agitated action is a good action above there. 
Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is called meritorious action, because it purifies, and because it produces an agreeable retribution. 
Good actionabove there, that is to say, of the two higher spheres, is called nonagitated. 
1 But did not the Blessed One say that the first three Dhyānas are agitated? 
Did he not say that the Āryans say that the viarkita and the vicaria of the First Dhyāna are agitation? 
The Blessed One said in fact that the first three Dhyānas are agitated, but he is saying this from the point of view of the corrupted characteristics of these dyānas ; their vices are what agitate them. 
But in the Iījiasūra, the Blessed One declared that these dhyānas are nonagitated because he considerd them a pathway favorable to nonagitation. 
But why term that which is agitated nonagitated? 
t Because, with regard to that which concerns its retribu tio, action of the domain of the higher stages does not vary. 
Action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is agitated in its retribution. 
one action which produces, naturally, a certain realm of rebirth, can be retributed in another one; an action which produces a heavenly realm of rebirth can be rettibuted in another heavenly realm of rebirth. 
In fact t happens that actions which produce power, a good figure, beauty, or objects of enjoyment, instead of being retributed in a heavenly realm of rebirth, are retributed in a human, animal, or Preta realm of rebirth through the efficacy of certain causes. 
But no cause can make an action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu be retributed in any but the sphere which is proper to it. 
As for actions of agreeable feeling, etc.: Good action, up to the Third Dhyāna, is of agreeable feeling. Agreeable sensation ḍdoes not exist above the Third Dhyāṇas: it thus has Kāmadhātu and the first three Dhyānas for its domain. Hence the retribution of good action is of agreeable feeling up to the Third Dhyāna. Action having such a retribution is called of agteeable sensation. 
Above, it is of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation. Agreeable and disagreeable sensation do not exist above the Third Dhyāṇṉa. There only remains the sensation of indifference, which is the only retribution of good action retributed above the Thitrd Dhyāṇna. Bad action, here below, is of disagreeable sensation. Bad action is of disagreeable sensation. The ārkā says here below in order to indicate that this action exists only in Kāmadhāta. 
kṣksk Is the result of all these actions only sensation? No; they also have the apparatus of sensation as their result. 
Ḷ According to others, intermediary actionthat is,action which has for its retribution neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensationalso exists below the Fourth Dhyāna, Since there is no retribution with regard to dhyānāntara. 
some say that the retribution of dḍhyānāntara action is the seṇsation of pleasure of the dhyāna itself; some others say that the retribution of this action is not sensation,.! 
These two opinions are in contradiction to the Śāstra , Does it happen that an action is solely mental sensation? 
Yes, the retribution of a good action which was free from vsitarka. 
The Śāstra says in the same place, Does it happen that there is at oṉe and the same time retribution of the three types of action? 
the retribution of an action of agreeable sensation, namely of materialdharmas, ; the retribution of an action of disagreeable sensation, namely the mind and the mental states ; the retribution of an action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation, namely thedbarmas dissociated from the rnind,. 
Now, the three types of action cannot be retributed simultaneously outside of Kāmadhātu, for the retribution of action of disagreeable sensation takes place only in Kāmadhātu. 
pkkḥ Is the action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation good or bad? 
It is good, but of weak force. 
But didnt you say that good action, up to the Third Dhyāṇna, is of agreeable sensation ? This definition refers to cases in general. 
ksk:k But how can one say that action is of agreeable sensation? 
Action, by its nature, is not sensation. 
One expresses oneself in this way because action is favorable to agreeable sensation; or rather, because its retribution is agreeably sensed. 
In the same way that one calls bathing clothes, snānāyakāṣāya, the clothes with which one bathes, in that same way one terms to be sensed action through which one senses a retribution. 
of itself, through sensation, as an object, by being retributed, and by the fact of its presence. 
contact of agreeable sensation, etc. 
The six objects of the six organs are feeling in the role of object , Seeing color with the eye, he experiences, he feels the color, but he does not feel the color with affection. 
Action is feeling in its role of being retributed, an action experienced in the present existence. 
Sensation is feeling through the fact of its appearance. 
hence when agreeable sensation is functioning, there is no other sensation through which one would feel it. Thus if one says that this sensation is to be felt , this is because it is present. 
The action that we have just described is either determinate, that is, which will necessarily be felt, or indeterminate, which will not be necessarily felt. 
Determinate action is of three types, to be experienced in the present life, etc.1 Determinate action is: 
According to one opinion, action is of five types. 
that which is indeterminate with regard to the period of its retribution, but whose retribution is in any case certain; and that which is indeterminate with regard to its retribution, which can be not retributed. 
Action experienced after being reborn is action which is retributed in the existence which follows that in which it was accomplished. 
Action experienced later is action which is retributed ina latet existence, from the third existence on. 
But, some other masters, , cennot admit that a very strong action has a weak retribution. 
Consequently, the retribution of an action experienced in the present life can continue into other existences; yet, as this retribution begins in the present life, this action i said to be experienced in the present life. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this way of looking at it. There is, they say, some actions whose results are near, and some actions whose results aṟe distant. 
In the same way flax bears its fruit after two and a half months, but wheat and godhāma after six months. Others distinguish four alternatives. The Dārṣṭāntikas distinguish four cases: 
Action determined with regard to its retribution, but indeterminate with regard to the period of its retribution. 
Action determinate from two points of view: nyatavipāka and niyatavedanāya. 
Action indeterminate from two points of view: aniyatavipāka and aniyatavedanṅīya. 
According to this system there are eight types of actions: action experienced in the present existence and of certain retribution, 2. 
action which can be experienced in any existence and of only possible retribution. 
But actions defined in SŚcripture as to be experienced in this life, etc.,are always of certain retribution; action defined as indeterminate may not be retributed. 
kkk Does it happen that a person produces or projects all four types of actions at one and the same time? 
Three types of actions project existence. 
Action experienced in the present existence does not project the present existence ; this has been projected by a former action. 
kkṣk How many types of action can be produced in the different spheres of existence and in the different realms of rebirth? 
In the three spheres of existence and in all of the realms of rebirth the four types of good or bad action can be produced. But this general rule has some restrictions. 
In the hells, one can produce good action to be experienced in the next existence, good action to be experienced in a later existence, and good action which is indeterminate; but no good action to be experienced in the present existence, for there is no agreeable retribution in the hells. 
When he is firm, that is, when he is not subject to falling away The fool refers to a Prṛthagjana. 
When he is firm, the Saint does not produce, in the stage from whence he is detached, any action to be experienced either in the next existence or in a later existence. 
In fact,the Pṛthagjana incapable of fallingaway is not reborn, in the next existence, in the stage from whence he is detached; end a Saint incapable of falling away is never reborn at this stage. 
Both produce, relative to the stage wherein they are born, actions to be experienced in the present existence, and indeterminate action. 
Even when they are subject to fallingaway, that is to say,susceptible of losing the results obtained, these Saints do not produce action to be experienced in the next existence, nor in a subsequent existence, either in Kāmadhātu or in Bhavāgra. 
We shall explhain how the Saint, subject to falling away, always reacquires the results before dying. 
The intermediate being, in Kāmadhātu, produces twenty two types of actions. 
The embryo passes through five states,kalala, arbuda, pesin, ghana, and praśākhā.A hbuman being passes through five states,as an infant,an adolescent, a grown person, a mature person, and an old person. 
The eleven determinate actions of the intermediate being belong to the category to be experienced in the present existence. 
For all these states form, together with the intermediate existence, only a single existence. The intermediate existence and the ten states which follow it are projected by a single action. 
this is projected, in fact,by the action itself which is to be experienced in the life which follows the intermediate existence. 
kksk By virtue of what characteristics is an action determinate, that is to say, necessarily retributed? 
Action accomplished through intense defilement or through intense faith, with regard to the field of qualities, continually, and the murdering of a father and a mother, are determinate. 
Action accomplished through intense defilement, action accom plished through intense faith, action accomplished with regard to a field of qualities, and action continually accomplished, are determinate. 
Field of qualities signifies either the Three Jewels, or certain persons, namely the possessors of the results, or Saints , and the possessors of certain absorptions. 
kkḥ By virtue of what characteristic is an action experienced in the present existence? 
Action bears result in the present existence by reason of certain characteristics of the field and the intention. 
By reason of the excellence of the field, even though the intention may be weak: for example, the Bhikṣu who becomes a woman through having insulted the Saṅgha, You are nothing but women! 
By reason of the excellence of the intention: for example the eunuch who delivered bulls from the danger of being castrated, and so regained his own sexuality. 
as a consequence, action retributable in this stage, but in another existence,whether it is good or bad, changes its nature and becomes retributable in the present existence. 
As for action determinate with regard to the period of its retribution, it willbe retributed in the period for whichit is determinate: 
the person for whom actions should be retributed, in this first rebirth, in a certain stage, cannot be definitively detached from this stage. 
As for action nondeterminate with regard to the retribution itself, it will not be retributed if one detaches himself from the stage where it could have been retributed. 
kskk Which field confers on an action which is in a relationship with it, the quality of being necessarily retributed in the present existence? 
In general, it is the Saṅgha of Bhīkṣus having at its head the Buddha; to enumerate its persons, there are five types of persons: 
in this absoṟption he has obtained an extreme tranquility of thought, for this absorption is similar to Nirvāṇa. 
When he leaves it,it is as if he had gone to Nirvāṇa and has returned from it. 
in this absorption, his mental series is endowed with the intention of placing an infinite ṉnumber of beings into the absence of defilement; when he leaves it, his series is penetrated with an intense and measureless merit. 
in this absorption, his series is endowed with the intention of increasing the wellbeing of an infinite number of beings; when he leaves it, his series is penetrated with an intense and measureless merit. 
The person who leaves the Path of Seeing the Ttuths: in this Path, he has abandoned all the defilements which are abandoned through Seeing the Truths. When he leaves it, his series is thus pure, since his personality has just been renewed. 
The person who leaves the result of Arhat, that is to say, who has just acquired the result of Arhat; he has just achieved the abandoning of all the defilements which are abandoned through Meditation on the Truths. 
This is why good or bad actions, well or badly done, with regard to these five persons, bear a result in the present existence. 
The Paths of Meditation through which one obtains the results of Sakrdāgāmin and of Aṇāgāmin, are incomplete in themslves and in their result. 
Can the retribution of a certain action be excusively mental senṣation, and not bodily sensation ? 
Sensation, the result of good action free from viarka, is exclusively mental. 
Like bodily sensation, that is to say, associated with the five sense consciousnesses, which always embraces vitarka and vicāra , it cannot be the reṣult of a retribution of an action free from vñarka. 
A sensation, the result of retribution of a bad action, is painful; painful mental sensation is what is termeda sensation of dissatisfaction. 
We have established that dīssatisfaction is never the result of retribution. 
Mentaltrouble is produced in the mental consciousness. 
The five sense consciousnesses cannot be troubled because they are free from imagining, inquiry and memory, and mental trouble is the imagining of that which does not exist. 
The person who troubles and deranges the mind of another through curses and formulas; the person who causes another to drink poison or alcohol when he does not want to drink it; the person who frightens game,either in the hunt, or by setting the jungle on fire, or by the hollowing out of traps; and the person who, by whatever means, troubles the memory and the presence of mind of another, will have his own mind troubled, deprived of the aid of his memory through the effect of the retribution of these actions. 
Through fear, the attack of demons, irritation of the elements, and fear. Demon beings, with hoṟrible features, will approach such a person: seeing them, the person is frightened and his mind is troubled. 
Furious at the evil conduct of humans, demon beings willhit them in their vital parts. 
the wind, heat and liqnid will be irritated. 
Onessays that the mind s troubled when,by reason of the disequilibrium or the irritation of the humors, which results from action,.the mind is deranged, anarchic, devoid of mindfuiness. 
We give as an example a being in hellwho laments by saying, Ah! 
ṅtk The Sūtra teaches that there are three ctookednesses, crookedness of the body, speech, and mind; and thus three corruptions and three stains. 
What is termed crookedness, corruption, stains, is action arisen from hypocrisy, hatred, and attachment. 
Action of the body, speech, and mind which arises from hypocrisy, proceeds from crookedness, and is called crookedness ; action which arises from hatred, proceeds from hatred, and is called coṟruption; and action which arises from attachment, proceeds from staiṉ, and is termed stain. 
Action is of four types, white, black, etc. 
The Sūtra teaches that action is of four types: black, of black retribution; white, of white retribution; blackwhite, of blackwhite retribution; neither black nor white, without black or white retribution; and that which destroys the other actions. 60.Bad actions, good action of Rūpa, good actions of Kāma, are, respectively, black, white, blackwhite; action which destroys the other actions is pure action. 
Bad action, being defiled, is absolutely black; retribution, being painful, is black. 
2.Good action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu, not mixed with the bad, is absoḻutely white; its retribution, being agreeable, is white. Objection: 
Why not say the same for good action of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu? 
Because the qualification white applies only to action which has two retributions , aṇd which is threefold, bodily, vocal andmmental. 
But the Sūtradescribesaction of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu as white and of white retribution. Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, being mixed with the bad, is blackwhite; its retribution is mixed, so it is thus blackwhite. This definition is to be understood as applying, not to the nature of the action itself, but to the series or the person; in one and the same mental series, good action is mixed with bad action. 
There is no action which is blackwhite, nor any retribation which is blackwhite, which would be a contradiction. 
Objection: Butbad action is also mixed with whiteaction, hence bad action should be defined as blackwhite. 
Bad action is not necessarily mixed with good action; whereas, in Kāmadhātu, good action is necessatrily mixed with bad, because, in this sphere, the bad is stronger than the good. 
Pure action destroys the other three types of action. Not being defiled, it is not black; not being retributiion, it is not white. It is nonwhite. 
the Blessed One wishes to oppose pure action to white action; but, speaking in the Mahāśūnyatāsūśra of thedharmas proper to the Arhat, he expresses himself thus, The dbarmas of the Arhat, Oh Ānanda, are absolutely white, absolutely good, absolutely irreprochable. 
Does any pure action destroy all the actions of the first three categories, black, white, or blackwhite? 
Four volitions correspond to the four dharmakṣāntis of the Path of Seeing the Truths; eight voiitions correspond to the fitst eight paths of abandoning in thedetachment of Kāmadhātu: inall twelve volitions,all pure actions which destroy bad actions. The volition of the ninth is the action which destroys blackwhite action. The volition which corresponds to the ninth path of abandoning in the detachment of Kāmadhātu is the pure action which causes the abandoning of blackwhite action and black action, for at this moment one abandons, in its entirety, good action of Kāmadhātu and the ninth and last category of bad action. Volition which arises in the last paths of abandoning of the detachment of the dhyānas destroys good action. 
The volition of the ninth and last path of abandoning which produces detachment of Kāmadhātu with regard to each dhyāna is fourfold volition which destroys white action. Objection: Thefirst eight paths of abandoning in the detachmentof Kāmadhātu destroy black action. 
But you attribute the power to destroy whiteblack and white action solely to the ninth path of abandoning. 
There is not, propetly speaking, abandonment of any good dharmas, for even if they are abandoned, the good dharmas can reappear; but when the defilement which has thisdharrna for its object is destroyed this dharma is said to be abandoned. 
Therefore as long as the last category of defilement which can grasp it as its object is not destroyed, this gooddharma is not considered abandoned. and, as a consequence, allows one to obtain disconnection from this defilement. 
According to others, the action which should be experienced inhell is black action; action which should be experienced elsewhere in Kāmadhātu, in addition to hell, is black white action. 
Infernal retribution is produced exclusively through bad action: as a consequence, action which should be experienced in hell is black action. 
Retribution in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of hell, is exclusively produced by goodbad action. Accoṟding to others, arisen in Kāma, actions are black when they can be abandoned through Seeing the Truths; they are blackwhite in the contrary case. 
According to other masters action which is abandoned through Seeing the Truths, not being mixed with the good, is black. 
AIl other actions of Kāmadhātu, namely action which is abandoned through Meditation, is blackwhite, that is, good mixed with bad. 
k The Sūtra says, There are three silences, silence of the body, voice, and of the mind. 
60 Afaikṣa, that is, an Arhats, actions of the body, voice and mind, are, in this order, the three silences. 
Silence of the body and silence of the voice is bodily and vocal action which belongs to the Arhat. 
Why is this? 
Because the mind is the true Silent One, the trne Muni. The Vahāṣikas say that one knows through inferenceby reason of the actions of the body and voicethat the mind is afaikṣa. 
But an Arhats bodily and vocal action, īs, in its nature, abstention, whereas the action of the mind is not, by nature, abstention, because three is no avjñapti of the mind. 
But silence is abstention, thus the mind itself which abstains receives the name of silence. 
Why does only the mind of the Arhat receive this name? 
Because the Arhat is the true Silent One through the cessation of all muṟrmnuring of his defilements. 
kksḵ The Sūtra says, There are three purifications, purification of the body, purification of the voice, and purification of the mind. The threefold good practice in its entirety is the threefold purification. 
All the good practices of the body, pure or impure, are a purification of the body, because, either for a time or in a definitire manner, they efface the impurity of the defilements and bad practices. 
This teaching has for its goal the instruction of persons who take a false silence for silence, and a false purification of purification. 
kkk The Sūtra says that there are three bad practices. The bad actions of the body, speech and mind are regarded as being the three bad practices. Bad actions of thebody are the bad practices of the body and so on. Even though greed, wickedness, anger and false views are not actions, they constitute a threefoldbad practice of the mind. Further, there are three bad practices of the mind which, by their nature, are not mental action: greed, wickedness or harm, and false views. The Dārṣṭāntikas say that greed, wickedness and false views are, in fact, mental actions, for the Sacetanāyasñra considers them as actions. The Vaibhāṣīkas: In this hypothesis, defilements and actions would be the same thing. 
What harm do you see in that? 
Because these produce a painful retribution, and because they are condemned by good persons, these practices of the body, speech and mind are bad; they are thus termed bad practices. 
good actions of the body, speech, and mind; further, nongreed, nonwickedness and right views. 
By taking, among these practices, the most evident, one defines the ten coutses of action, good and bad respectively. 
The Sñtra defines ten courses of actin: good coutses of action, by taking the most important,.:which are the easiest to seefrom among the good practices;and bad courses of action,by taking the gravest from among the bad practices. 
kkk What practices, bad or good, are not included in the courses of action? 
A part of thebad practices of the body,namely preparatoṟy aṇd consecutive actions of bodily courses of action ; and certain defiled actions of the body, for example,drinking alcohol, hitting,binding, etc. 
, ate not incuded among the coutses of action, because these practiees are not extremely grave, Among the bad practices of thebody are courses of action which deprive another of his life, of his goods, or of his wife: one must absoḻutely abstain from them. 
That which is very grave among bad practices of speech, is, for this same reason, declared to be a course of action, not preparatory, consecutive, or minor actior1. 
One part of the bad practice of the mind, volition, is also excluded from the bad courses of action. 
The good courses of action do not include 1. eithera part of the good practice of the body: preparatory or consecutive; abstention from inebriating drinks,etc.; alms, worship,etc. 
or one part of the good practice of speech, affectionate words, etc.; 3. 
or one part of the good practice of the mind, good volition. 
kkk Among the courses of action, Six bad courses of action can be exclusively gviñapti. 
When one has six courses of actionmurder, stealing, lying, maliious speech, harmful speech, or inconsiderate speechperformed by another, then these six courses of action are only avsjñapiHe who had these actions carried out is lacking the principle vijñapti, that is, the act of killing itseif, etc. 
One bad course of action is always of two types. Adultery is always viyñapti and vijñapti,fo1 it must be perpetrated in person. When one has it committed by another, he does not procure the same pleasure. 
Seven courses of material actions, that is, of the body and the voice, aṟe of two types, viñap and avijñapti. In fact the morality that one undertakes depends on one vrjñapti. They are only zvrñapti when they have arisen from absoṟrption. 
The courses of action which are included in āharmasia, that is, in the discipline of dhyāna and in the pure discipline, are qualified as arisen from absorption. 
If not, then no. 
The opposite concerning consecutive action. 
Consecutive actions are, on the contrary, necessarily gvijñapti:They are viñapti whenṉ,having accomplisheda course of action, one continues to commit actions analogous to the course of action. 
k What is it that constitutes preparatory action, the course of action proper, and consecutive action? 
A maṇ, desiring to kill an animal, rises from his bed, takes some silver, goes to the market, feels the animal, buys the animal, leads it, pulls it, makes it enter, mistreats it, takes a sword, strikes the head once or twice: as long as he does not kill it, the action preparatory to killing lasts. 
At the strokeby which he deprives the animal of its lifethat is,at the moment when the animal diesthe vñapts of this moment and the aviñapti which is simultaneous to this viñapti, are the course of action proper. 
For it is by reason of two causes thatone is touched by the transgression of murder: by reason of the preparatory action and by reason of the achievement of the result. 
The moments that follow, the moments of viñapti cteated by the killing, are the consecutive action; the series of the moments of viñapti are also consecutive action: 
moments that constitute pulling the hide off the animal, washing it, weighing it, selling it, cooking it, eating it, and congratulating oneself on it. 
In the same way one can explain, with the necessary changes, the other six courses of bodily and vocal action. 
There is no reason to distingnish preparatory and consecutive action for greed, wickedness and false views: at the moment when they manifest themselves, by the sole fact of their presence, they are couṟses of action proper. kk Objection: 
A question is raised. 
at the moment when the animal is in varapa bhava, ṭthat is,at the moment when the animal dies? 
Or is the vjñapti and the avjjñapti of the moment when the animal is in rtabhava, that is, when it is dead? 
If you accept the first hypothesis, a person would be guilty of the transgression of killing when he kills at the very moment when the killed animal dies: but your system does not admit this. 
And in the second hypothesis, you have rightly said that, at the stroke by which he deprives the animal of its life, the viñapti of this moment and the svjñapti simultaneous to this vifñapti, are the course of action proper. 
Further, if you accept the second hypothesis, you contradict the explanation that the Vaibhāṣikas give to the phrase,while the prayoga has not yet disappeared, that one reads in the Mlasfāstra. This Śāstra says, Can it be the case that a living being has already been killed but that murder has not yet occured? 
Yes, when the living being has already been deprived of life, but when the prayoga has not yet disappeared. 
The Vaibhāṣikas explain this text by saying that the word prayoga which normally signifies pteparationhere has the meanin of consecutive action. 
Now you contradict this explanation since, placing the course of principle action at the moment when the animal dies, it is indeed the course of principal action which, according to you, has not disappeared at the moment when the animal dies. 
One must explain the Śāstra insucha manner that it does not lend itself to criticism. 
And how is that? 
In the text in question, prayoga signifies principal course of action: 
But how could the vñapt of the moment when the animal is already dead be the principal course of action? 
Why would it not be? 
Because it is ineffective. The Vaibhāṣikas: 
ḥk Can it be the case that one course of action is either a preparatory action or a consecutive action of another couṟse of action? 
For example the ten courses of action can be a preparatory action for murder. 
A man desires to kill his enemy; in order to assure the success of this enterprise, he takes the goods of another and offers an animal in sacrifice; as a means to this same end, he committs adultery with the wife of his enemy in order to make her an accomplice; through lying, malicious, injurious, and frivolous words, he causes a falling out between his enemy and his friends who would be able to defend him; he coveṭs the goods of his enemy; he wishes to do evil to his enemy; he nourishes false views with regard to the murder that he wants to commit. 
But, greed, wickedness and false views are never preparatory actions, for they are not the beginning of an action; nor are they preparatory actions, for they are solely a production of the mind. 
kkṣk The Sūtra says, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, three types of killing: 
killing arisen from desire, killing arisen from hatred, and killing arisen from ignorance, and thus following to, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, three types of false views. 
All the courses of action are not indifferently achieved by desire, hatred, or ignorance; but Preparatory action arises from three roots. 
The preparatory action of all of the courses of action can indifferently arise fromm the three roots. 
killing in order to seize a ceṛtain part of an animal; killing in order to seize some goods; killing for pleasure; killing in order to defend oṉeself, or ones friends. 
Killing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. Killing arisen through ignorance. 
To consider the sacrifice as a pious action andso to kill, when a king, according to the authority of the legalists kills through duty, The first of the meritorious actions of the king is to punish evildoets; when the Persians say, One should kill ones aged and sick parents; when one says, One should kill serpents, scorpions, and ryambuka flies , etc., because these creatures are poisonous; one must kill game, cattle, birds, and buffalos in order to nourish oṇeself.? 
And finally killing which is provoked by false views: murder committed by a person who denys a future life and whom nothing can stop. 2.Stealing arisen from desire. 
Either one steals the object desired, or one steals in order to then gain possession of another object, to acquire honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Stealing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
Stealing arisen from ignorance. 
A king, upon the authority of the legalists, seizes the goods of evildoers.The Brāhmins say, All things have been given to the Brāhmins by Brahmā; and it is through the weakness of theBrāhmins that the Vrṣalas enjoy it. 
Consequently, when a Brāhmin steals, he takes that whichbelongs to him; he eats what is his, wears what is his, and gives what is his. 
And yet, when Brāhmins take, they indeed have the notion of the goods of another. Stealing provoked through false views is also stealing from ignorance. TIicit sexuality arisen from desire. 
Sexual intercourse with the wife of another, either through love, or in order to obtain honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Illicit sexuality arisen through hatred, in order to satiate hostility. Ilicit sexuality arisen from ignorance. 
The Persians, etc., have intercourse with their mothers and other forbidden womer.. 
In the gosava sacrifice, a Brāhmin drinks water in the manner of an animal, grazes through the grass, has intercourse with his mother,his sister,ora woman of his gora; he must copulate with them wherever he finds them: 
in this manner this bull will triumph over the world. And such too are those that say, Women are like rice mortars, flowers, fruits, cooked food, ladders, roads, and ferryboats: they are there to be used. 
This is lying provoked by false views. 
Malicious words and other vocal transgressions arisen from ignorance. 
Greed and the other two mental courses arise from the three roots because they appear subsequent to these roots. 
This good mind,being necessarily associated with the three roots, arises from the three roots. 
Ñ The renouncing of a preparation of a bad course of action is a preparation of a good course of action; the renouncing of the action proper which constitutes a bad coarse of action is itself a good course of actioṉ; the renouncing of a consecative action of a bad course of action is a consecutive action of a good course of action. 
From the moment when the novice enters into the nānāvasa, salutes the Saṅgha,addresses his request to the Upādhyāya, uṇntil the first or second karmavācana, this is the preparatory actior. 
At the achievement of the third armavācana there takes place a viṝñapti, and an avijñapti simultaneous to this vēupti, which constitute the course of action itself. 
kkk We have seen that bad courses of action were not indifferently achieved by the three roots. Killing, wickedness, and injurious words are achieved through hate. Solely by hate. They are achieved when one thought of murder, or one thought of violence manifests itself. Adultery, greed, and stealing are achieved through desire. Adultery is illicit sexuality. 
False views, through ignorance. 
The others, by the three. 
The other courses of action,.lying, malicious words, and in considerate words,are achieved either through desire, hatred, or ignoraṇce. 
The courses of action, which have just been divided into four sections, three , three, one and three, have respectively for their Object: living beings, objects of enjoyment, nāmaripa, and ṉāmam. 
Living beings are the objects of killing, wickedness and injurious speech; the objects of enjoyment are the objects of adultery, greed and stealing; nāmarūpa, that is, the five skandhas, atre the object of false views; nāman, that is,thenāmakāya is the object of lying and the other two transgressions of the voice. 
kkṣk When one has decided to kill someone, and if the murderer dies either before the intended victim, or if he dies at precisely the same momentas the victim,is therea principal courseof action for the author of the murder?Jf one dies before or at the same time, there is no principal course of action. 
This is why the Vbhāṣā says, Question: When a person has made the preparation for killing, can itbe that, at the moment when the result of this preparation is achieved, thiśs person is not touched by the transgression of killing? 
Answer: 
Yes, when the murderer dies before or at the same time. 
The reason is cleat: 
as long as the victim is living, the murderer is not touched by the trans gressioṅl of murder; and when the victim dies, he no longer exists if he died at the same time or before. Because a new body has come into existence. 
The bodythe personalityby whom the preparation had been accomplished, the body of the murderer, is destroyed; the murderer takes up a new body which belongs to another niāyasabhāga : 
this body did not make the preparation, is not prayoktar and, as a consequence, cannot be touched by the transgression of murder. 
When many persons are united with the intention to kill, either in war, or iathe hunt,or inbanditry, who is gnitty of mutder, if only one of them kills? 
As soldiers, etc., concur in the realization of the same effect, all are as guilty as the one who kills. 
Having acommon goal, all are guilty exactly as he who among them kills, for all mutually incite one another, not through speech, but by the very fact that they are united together in order to kill. 
But is the person who has been constrained through force to join the army also guilty? 
Evidently so,unless he has formed the resolution, Even in order to save my life, I shall not kill a living being. 
kkṣk What does he do in order that he who kills should commit the course of actin? 
Murder is to kill another, consciously, without making an iiA When a personkills by thinking, I am killing such a one, and kilis this same person, and not another through error, then there is murḍder. 
But is there murder when a person kills, doubting if he hits a living being or a thing, or if he hits another? 
This person possesses the certitude, This is certainly him; he hits him; and as a consequence, there is the thought of parityāga. 
How can therebe murder, or destruction of the prāṇa , since the skandhas are momentary? 
Prāna, the vitalbreath, is a wind whose existence depends on the body and the mind. This prṇa is annihilated by a murderer in the same way in whichone annihilatesa flame or a sound of a bell, that isto say, by obstructing the continuation of its reproducing itself. 
Or rather, prūṉa is the vital oṟgan : 
when a person creates an obstacle to the arising of a new moment of the vital organ, he annihilates it, and is touched by the transgression of killing. 
But to whom do you attribute the vital organ? 
Who do you say is dead when life is absent? 
Let us observe that the Blessed One said, When life, heat and consciousness leave the body, it lies abandoned, like a piece of wood, deprived of feeling One says that the body lives when it isendowed with the organs; and that the body is dead when it is devoid of them. 
kesk According to theNirgranthas, transgression results for the doer from killing, even comrmitted without knowing it, or without desiring it,in the way that contact with fire results inburning. 
But if this is the case, then one is gnilty when one sees, or touches, without wanting to, the wife of another; he who trims the hair of the Nigranthas is guilty; the master of the Nirgranthas is guilty since he preaches terrible austerities; he who gives the Nirgranthas food which provokes cholera and death is also guilty. 
The mother and the embryo which are both the cause of suffering,are guilty; guilty aiso is the person killed, for he is bound to the action of killing as the object killed: and fire burns its own support. 
But on the other hand, he who has murder committed by another is not guilty, for one is not himself burned when one has another person touch the fire. 
Since you do not take intention into consideration, wood and other materials, even though lacking consciousness, are guilty of murder when a house collapses and living beings perish. 
kkḵ Stealingtaking what is not givenis to appropriate to oneself the goods of another through force or in secret. 
To appropriate to oneself, through force or in secret, that which is possessed by another, when one does not confuse the person from whom one wants to steal with another person, constitutes stealing. 
The plunder of a Stūpa is to take a thing that has not been given by the Buddha: for, at the moment of Nirvāṇa, the Blessed One accepted, appropriated to himself all the gifts made to Stūpas. 
According to others, this is to take a thing which has not beengiven by the guardians of the Stūpa. 
To take a thing that does not have an owner is to take what is not given by the ruler of the country. 
in the case when an ecclesiastical action has not been done; in the opposite case, this is to take what is not given by all the disciples of the Buddha. 
Illicit sexuality, fourfold, is intercourse with a woman with whom one should not have intercourse. 
Intercourse witha forbidden woman, that is, the wife of another, onesmother, onesdaughter, or ones paternal or maternal elations; 2.Intercourse withones own wife through aforbidden way;3. 
an uncovered spot, a cuiya, an araṇya 4. 
at an unsuitable time: 
when the wife is pregnant, when she is nursing, or when she has takena vow. 
when she has taken a vow only with the consent of her husband. 
The reservation relative to killing, with the condition that there has been no error,also extends to illicitsexuality,and there is no course of action when one has intercourse with the wife of another if one thought that he was with his own wife. 
Opinions differ on whether there is a coutse of action when one takes the wife of a certain one for the wife of another one. 
For some, yes, for it isthe wifeof another who was the objectof the preparatory action; it isalso the wifeof another thatone enjoys. 
Forothers, no, as in the case ofkilling with an error of person: 
With regard to whom is intercoutse with Bhikṣuṇis ilcit sexuality? 
With regard to the master of the land, who is not disposed to tolerate it. 
As for the master of the country himself,if his spouse, when she has undertaken a vow, is forbidden to him, all the more reason are nuns so forbidden. 
Intercourse with a young gitl is illicit with regard to the Inan to whom she is engaged, and, if she is not engaged, with regard to her guardiam; if he has no guardian, then with regard to theking. 
Lying is discourse held, with differing thoughts, with a person who understands the meaning, 1. 
Lying is discourse held, with thoughts different from the sense expressed, with a person who understands the meaning. 
When the person addressed does not understand, such discourse is only frivolous words. 
2.Discourse is sometimes made up of numerous syllables. Which will be the course of action? Which will be lies? 
The last syllable, which is viñap and which is accompanied by avijñapti.Or rather, the syllable whose hearing causes the meaning to be understood. 
The preceeding syllables are a preparation for the lie. How should one interpret the expression arthābhijña, a person who understands the meaning? 
Does this refer to the moment when the person addressed understands the meaning? 
addressed capable of understanding the meaning? 
for the person addressed understood the meaning through mental consciousness, which is consecative to auditory consciousness; and the vjñapt, oṟ vocal action, peṟishes at the same time as the auditory consciousness. 
But what must one do in order that the person addressed is capable of understanding the mean ing? 
The person who knows the language and in whom auditory consciousness has arisen is capable of understanding the meaning. 
One must interpret the text in a manner in which it will not give rise to criticism. ksksk The Sūtra teaches that there are sixteen yocal actions, eight of which are bad: tosay that one has seen what one has not seen, to say that one has heard, cognized, or known what one has not heard, cognized, or known,; to say that one has not seen when one has seen; and to say that one has not heard, cognized, or known when one has heard, cognized, or known; and eight are good: to say that one has not seen when one has not seen. What is the meaning of the words seen , heard , cognized , and known ? 
75.What is perceived through the visual consciousness, through the auditory consciousness, through the mental consciousness, and through three consciousnesses, is called, in order, seen, heard, cognized, and known. 
What is perceived through the visual consciousness receives the name of seen,..what is perceived through the consciousness of smell, taste, and touch, receives the name of known. 
How do you justify this last interpretation? 
According to the ūtra,andby virtue of reasoṇing. 
The Sūtra says, What do you think,Oh Mālakīmātar, the visible objects that you have not seen, that you have not seen formerly, that you do not see, about which you do not think Would that I could see them, do you have, by reason of them, any longing, lust, desire, affection, attachment, appetite, or searching out? 
Oh Mālakīmāta:, with regatd to the subject seen, you will only think, Śit is seen, with regard to the subject heatd, cognized,and known, you will only think, it is heard, cognized, known. 
The words seen,heard, and cognized, certainly refer to visible things, to sounds, and to the dharmas: hence the word ata refers to smells, tastes, and tangible things. 
If it were otherwise, the experience relative to smells, tastes and tangible things would notbe refered to inthis teaching of the Blessed Oṇne. 
This Śūtra does not have the meaning that you beiieve it does, and is does not confirm your interpretation of the word maia.The Blessed One does not aim to define the characteristics of the four experiences, having seen, having heard, having cognized, having mata.His mind is evidently, In the fourfold experience, seeing, etc., each of which beats on the sixfold objects, visible things, sounds, smells, tasṣtes, tangible things and dharmas,you maintain only that this experience takes place, that you see, etc., without attributing to the object the characteristic of disagreeable or agreeable. 
According to the Śautrāntikas, that which isimmediately perceived by the five material organs, is seen, dṛṣṭ4; that the consciousness of which is transmitted to us by another, is heard, frux; what is admitted by reason of correct reasoning, is zaśa,known; and what is perceived by the mental organ is cognized, vñāta. 
According to former rnasters, seen is what is perceived by the oṟgan of seeing; heard is what is perceivedby the organ of hearing and what one learns from another: known is what is personally accepted or experienced; and cognized is what one feels in and of oneself. 
kksk Does he who, by means of his body and not by means of speech, causes to be understood what is not in his mind, comrmit lying? 
The Śāstra says in fact,Question: 
Can one be touched by the transgression of killing, without acting, without attacking bodily? 
Answer: Yes, when one acts vocally. Question: 
Can one be touched by the transgression of lying without vocal action? 
Answer: Yes, when one acts bodily. 
Can one be touched by the transgression of murder, by the transgression of lying, without either bodily or vocal action? 
But, we would say, how could one admit that Ṛṣis and a Bhikṣu accomplish a courseof action which is at one and the same time vijñapti and vijñapti? 
This is a difficulty that must be resolved. 
Malicious or slanderous speech is the discourse of a person with a defiled mind with a view to dividing. 
The discourse that one has, with.a defiled mind, with a view to dividing others and creating enmity, is malicious speech. 
The restrictions formulated above, when the person addressed understands, when there is no confusion of persons, applies here. 
Discourse pronounced with a defiled mind, outraging, understood by him whom one addresses, addressed to him whom one wants to address, is injurious speech. 
All defiled discoutse is inconsiderate speech. 
; but it refers here to discourse. 
Greed is the desire to appropriate to oneself, by illigitimate means, the goods of another. 
To desire to appropriate to oneself the goods of another in an illegitimate manner, in an unjust manner,by force or secretlyWould that the goods of another were mine! is the course of action called greed, abhidhyā. 
According to another opinion, 2bhihyā means all desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, for the Sūtra of the Five Nīvaraṇas, on the subject of kāmacchanda, expresses itself thusly, Having abaṇdoned abhidhyā. 
Let us admit thatall desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is bhidhyā: 
Only the most notable among the bad practices are included among the courses of action. 
Wickedness is a hatred of living beings. It is a hatred of living beings, by which one desires to harm the person of another. 
False view is the opinion that there is neither good nor bad.t As it is said in the Sūtra, There is no gift, no sacrifice, no oblation, no good action, nobadaction. 
Such is the definition of the ten bad courses of action. 
kṣkṣk What is the meaning of the expression cou1se or pathway of action ? 
Three are courses of action; seven are also action. 
Greed, wickedness and false views are courses of actioncourses of action that one terms volition. In fact, volition which is associated with them is moved by their movement, in that, by their force, it acts in conformity with them: it moves by their outgoing. 
Murder and the other six transgressions are action, for they are, by their nature, actions of body and voice; and they are also courses of this action that is called volition, for the volition that gives rise to them has in these transgressions its end and reason for existence. 
The expression course of action thus simply means course of action when one applies it to greed, etc.; it signifies action and course of action when it isapplied to killing, etc. 
A single meaning is maintained even when the terms of a compound are different. 
In the same way one should understand the good courses of action, the renouncing of killing, etc., non etc. 
kksk Why are not preparatory and consecutive actions considered as courses of action ? 
And finally, courses of action are actions the augmentation and dirinution of which have for their result the augumentation or the diminution of things and living beings. 
strk The Sautrāntikas do not recognize volition as a mental action; for them, there is no mental action outside of greed, etc. How then do they explain the fact that the Sūtra gives the name of course of action to greed etc.? 
This is a question they must answer. 
Greed, wickedness and false view are mental actions and they are pathways leading to bad realms of rebirth; or rather they are both courses of action, for greed sets into motion wickedness and false view, and vice versa. 
kīk The ten bad courses of action are in complete contradiction with the good dharmas. 
The view of negation cuts off the roots of good. 
The cutting off of the roots.of good takes place through the false view of the ninth degree, strongstrong. 
You affirm that only false view cuts off the roots of good, but the Treatise says, What are the strong roots of evil? 
They are the roots of evil which cut off the roots of good, the roots of evil which are initially adandoned when one acquires detachment from Kāmadhātu. 
Only false view cuts off the roots of good; but false view is brought about by the roots of evil: hence the Treatise attributes to these last the operation which more properly belongs to false views. 
In the same way that one says that bandits burn a village because it is they who light the fire that burns the village. 
kksk What roots of good are cut off? 
The innate roots of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. The roots of good of the sphere of Kāmadhātu are cut off when one cuts off the roots of good; for one who cuts off the roots of good of Kāmadhātu is not endowed with the roots of good of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
If this is so, how should one understand this text of the Prajñāpti, What cuts off this persons roots of good of the three spheres?. 
